ТНЕ 


JATAKA 


TOGETHER WITH ITS COMMENTARY 


TALES OF THE ANTERIOR BIRTHS 


or 


GOTAMA BUDDHA. 


FOB THE FIRST TIME EDITED IN THE ORIGINAL PALI 


By 


V. FAUSBØLL 


VOL У 


LONDON 
KEQAN PAUL TRENCH TRÜBNER & CO., Ltd. 
1691. 


[АП Rights Reserved.) 


TO 
THE ENERGETIC STARTER AND SUPPORTER ОЕ THE PALI ТЕХТ SOCIETY 


T.W. RHYS DAVIDS, 


Ph. D., L. L. D., Professor, 
AND 


THR STRENUOOS AND INGENIOUS INTERPRETER OF PHE PALI LANGVAGE 


THE REV. RICHARD MORRIS, 


M. A., D. D. L. 


THIS VOLUME IS DEDICATED #ГЇН PROFOUND RESPECT. 


— 38711. 


CORRECTIONS AND ADDITIONS, 


29 read „ldba āvātah khanitva tasmir etc. 
24 add (= Sumañgala- дзе) after Сафа, 
24 read Indassa vākyena hl Sarvaro. 


. 24 read parldevamanarn. 


2 cfr. Senart, Mahâvastu 1 p. 282. 

15 cfr. Mahāvastu І p. 281. 

17 cfr. Sumañgala- I ЕЯ 

21 reed karuna. 

9 read Ssrmyamassa for Seyyassa. 

24 read Вёагїпаз1гаһйа рапа Samyamena. 

25 read baddhabhavam. 

27-29 read „Sāmi, panduvanno si jato. kin nu te kāci cintš attht, 
udaáha гаја - - tanhā прраппа ~ ~ tanha - - паш. (Neglact of the 
compositor in the last proof ) 

12 cfr. Mabāvastu 11 p. 49 sq. 


Vol. V. 


CORRECTIONS AND ADDITIONS. 


202,4 fr. bottom read so all. 
332,22 read patitthasi 
333,13 — balavā vedana 
334,18 — Buddha- 


PRELIMINARY REMARKS 6. 


I bave done my utmost by abbreviations to compress tbe text, still it 
bas not been possible to finish the book in 5 vols, as originally com- 
puted, because of the many verses that appear in the latter Jātakas 
and take up so much space. fn the remaining part of the book 
there are also many verses, but by employing local abbreviations, if I 
may вау во, 1 mean ahbreviations in eacb separate Jātaka besides the 
general ones, Í hope to finish the whole of it in two more volumes, 

For the Cullahamsajataka I have һай one extra MS. written in 
Siamese charactera procured for me by Doctor Sofus Deuntzer at 
Bangkok and marked Sdr, From the Various Readings it will be 
seen that this MS., in most instances, agrees with B in opposition to C. 


Kopenhagen, 29 June 1891. 
V. Fausbsll. 


ADDITIONAL ABBREVIATIONS. 


A. after ti means attho. 

А. — @һа, 

Ва. = Baršnasi 

Bhi. == bhikkhave. 

Dh. = dhammam. 

J. = Jetavane, 

Ta. == tattha. 

Dh. d. = dhammam desesi. 

С. а. == gātham йһа. 

J. а. == jštakam samodhanesi. 

T. а. — tess’ во, 

І. v. h. = idam vuttam hoti. 

T. a, р. S. = tam attbam ракёзепіо Satthā. 

К. n. bh. e, k. s. ti р. 1. п. ti v. пе bh. і. р. == Ейув nu ‘ttha 
bhikkhave etarahi kathāya sannisinnā ti pucchitvā imāya nāmā 
ti vutte па bhikkhave idan eva pubbe. 


XVI. TIMSANIPATA. 


1. Kimchandajšátaka. 

Kimchando kimadhippāyo ti. Idah S. J. v. uposathe- 
kammam ё. k. Fkadivasam hi S. bahü' upāsake са upāsikāyo ca 
uposathike dhammasavanatthāya āgantvā dhammasabhāyarn рівірре 
„uposathik’ attha upāsakā“ ti pucchitvā „ёша bbante" ti vutte 
„sādhu vo katam uposatham karontehi, porāņakā upaddhuposatha- 
kammassa nissandena mahanta yasam patilabhimsü" ti vatvā tehi 
yācito a. ā.: 

А. B. Brahmadatto dhammena r, kārento saddho’ 
ahosi dānasīlauposathakammesu appamatto. So sese рї 
amaccádayo dánádisu samādapesi?® Purohito pan’ assa para- 
pitthimarhsiko ° lañcakhádako kütaviniechayiko° ahosi. Rājā 
uposathadivase amaccádayo pakkosápetvá „uposathikā hothë““ 
‘ti аһа. Purohito uposatham па ватайіуі, atha пай diva 
айса gahetva kütattarn' katvā upatthaáanam āgatarh гаја 
(аф? uposathiko™% ti атассе pucchanto ,,tvam рі? ācariya 
uposathiko“ (і pucchi. бо „аша“ ’ti тивёуййай katvā 


10 


рйёзёй& otari. Atha nam еко amacco ,nanu tumhe оа uposa- i 


thiká“ ti codesi' So аһа: „aham velāyam eva Оһийўїї, 
geharh pana дашуй mukharh vikkhāletvā uposatharb adhitthaya 


1 Ok Ba -u, 3 NA вп-. 3 Ck -dā-. * Bd adds vlya. 5 Ck Bå ku-. * Bds 
tumhe. ? Bde -kaá, ° Bas omit рі. * OF ce~. 


Jesin У. 1 


3» 


Р] XVI Tihbsaniípšta. 


sñyarh па bhuñjissámiti, rattih silah rakkhissáini', еуаф me 
upaddhuposathakammarh bhavissatîti“. ,,Sšdhu äcariyā* ’ti, So? 


. gebath gantvā tathā akāsi. Роп’ ekadivararh {авшїш vinicchaye 


nisione айбвќага sllavatI itthi аббат Кагоп!1* gharah gantur 
alabhamănă „прова{һакатшаї nátikkamissámiti“ upakattha- 
kāle‘ mukha vikkhāletuh ārabhi. Tasmin Кһапе brāhma- 
nassa supakkánar ambánarn°' ambapindI° ñáhariyittha"” So 
tassë uposathikabhävarn ñatvå imam’ khāditvā uposathikā 
hohiti“ adāsi. Sā (аһа акаві. Ettakarn bráhmanassa kam- 
шаш. So aparabhāge КАЈаф katvā Himavautapadese Ковікі- 
gañgāya’ tīre tiyojanike ambavane ramaniye bhūmibhāge s0- 
bhaggappatte kanakavimāne alarnkatasirisayane suttappa- 
buddho viya nibbatti alarnkatapatiyatto uttamarāpadbaro во]ава- 
sahassadevakaññāparivāro, во rattih yeva tarn sirisampattiri- 
anubhoti, vemšnikapetabhávena bi 'ssa kammassa sarikkhako '° 
vipāko ahosi, tasmá arune uggaccbante™ ambavanarhn pavieati, 
pavitthakkhane yev’ авва dibbattabhāvo antaradbāyati, asīti- 
tālahattbappamāņo™* attabhāvo nibbattati'', sakalasariram 
jhāyati, supupphitakimsuko viya hoti, dvisu hatthesu ekekā va 
апдан, tattha™ mahākuddālappamāņā™” nakhā honti, tehi 
nakhehi attano pitthinarnsam phāletvā uddharitvā khādanto.- 
уедапётаі(о '* ınahāravarn ravanto dukkha anubhoti. Suriye 
atthamente'' вагїгаїй antaradhāyati, dibbasariram nibbattati, 
alahkatapatiyattā dibbanëtakiyo'" nānāturìiyāni gahetvā pari- 
vārenti, so mahâsampattin anubhavanto ramaniye ambavane 
dibbapásádam abhirūhati ™*. It so uposathikāya itthiyā amba- 
phaladānassa” nissandena tiyojanikarn' ambavanath patilabhi, 
lañcam gahetva kütattakarananissandena pana pitthimarnsam 


1 Bd ma ti 3 Ске omit во. è all three MSS, -i. . * Dde -kathe-. ° Bd 
anibaphalánam. ° Chs -їп, Bd -i. 1 СЕ -riyitts, С^ -rayittha, Bd -га-. © Dd 
йлап. * Ckz -sa-. !€ Сг kammasasarikkhako, Ck kammasari-, Bd -sarikkhiko. 
tt Rd upaga-. 13 Bds asitihatthatālakkhandhappa-. © Ва шрраш. !* Bê 
hattbā. 1° Bd -па. 16 Bdz -nappatto. 17 Сіз -mante, Віз atthañganite бањ. 
18 Bk -kitthiyo. 19 Bd -hi. 20 СЕ -narh, Се -na, 2) Ске -kâ. 


1. Kirchandajstaka. 4511.) 3 


uppátetvë khādati, mnpaddhuposathassa nissandena' rattim 
rattirn' yasa anubhoti' solasasahassanátakiparivuto“* [pari- 
уйге(і *]. —“Tasmim kāle Bārāņasirāăjā kámesu dosah disv& 
isipabbajjar pabbajitvā Adhogañgāya ramaniye bhūmippadese 
раппав&]атп káretvá пйсһасагїуйуа yāpento vihāsi. Ath’ eka- 
divasah tamhá ambavaná meahághatappamāņah ашђараккай 
Gañgāya patitv& воїепа vuyhamëpam tassa tāpasassa pari- 
bhogatitthabhimukham agami, so тпїһай dhovaoto tam 
majjhe nadiyā āgacchantah dievā udaka taranto gantvā 
ādāya assamapadarh šharitvë agyāgāre' thapetvá satthakena 
pháletvá yápanamattam khāditvā sesarh kadalipannehi ра{їссһа- 
detvā punappuna divase divase' yáva parikkhayā khádi. Tasmirmn 
pana khine aññam'  phalaphalam kháditurn nâsakkbi, rasa- 
{апһйуа bajjhitvá „tam eva ambapakkam khádissámíiti“ nadi- 
гат '° gaptvá nadim olokento „ambar alabhitvá na uttha- 
hissámiti!!G@ ganpitthánam katvā nisīdi. So tattba пїгаһйго 
ekam рі divasarh dve pi (їрі catopañcachadivasáni'” vātāta- 
репа parisussanto olokento пївїйї, atha sattame divase nadi- 
devatë āvajjamānā tam káranam баіуё „вуаш tāpaso tanháva- 
віко butvā sattáharm nirāhāro Сайрап olokento pi nisldi, 
imassa ambapakkath adëáturh'' па yuttah, alabhanto marissati, 
dassámi 'ssā'‘‘“ ‘ti йрап{уй Сапрйуа upari ākāse thatvā tena 
saddhir sallapant! раашаф gātham аһа: 
1. Kirhchando kimadhippáyo еко sammasi ghammani, 
kim patthayáno kih esam kena atthena brābmapā 'ti. 1. 


Tattba chando ti ajjbāsayo, adhippayo ti citta, ssmmasiti ассћаві, 
gbammanîti gimbe, esan ti esanto, brābmanņā 'tl pabbajitattā tšpasarb 
âlapati, Idah тшшш hoti: bráahmana tvah kimadhippayo Кіт cintento kiro 
pattbeuto kih gavesanto ken’ atthene imasmih Gañgātire байдай olokento 
nisinno tl. 


1 Ck omita pana ~ - nissandena. # Bd only one гаш. # Ci» -bbonti, * Oks stă, 
3 Bd „ві, Сә pariváreti corr, to -cšretd. * Bd -māsi. ? С^ egya-. * Cè only 
опе д-. * Ck -a. 19° Bd -те 1! Вёпра(һа-. 1% Ck dvepi пійја divasšni. 
1: Che ā., 14 Ва tassi. 

1* 


æ 


90 


935 


4 XVI. Tirsanipëta. 


Таш sutvā (ёраво pava gāthā abhāsi: 
з. Yathë шаһа väridharo kumbho впрагїпйшауй 
tathüpamarn ambapakkam vanpagandharasuttamarp. 2. 


Tarn vuyhamánam sotena disván' amalamajjhime 
pšnihi паш gahetvána agyāyatanam ñharirh, 3. 


а. Tato kadalipattesu nikkhipitvá sayarn abarh 


satthena nar vikappetvā Кһиррірёват ! аһӣві me. 4 
a. бо? 'harn apetadaratho' vyantibhüto dakhakkhamo 
assšdarh nádbigacchámi pbalesv-aññesu kesuci*. 5, 
e. Sosetvā nūna’ maranarh tam mamarn āvahissati 
ambarh y`assa* phalarn sádurb ' [yam uddharir °] vuyhamánarh 
[udadhismš'] mabannave. 6. 
v. Akkhătan te mayá sabbam yarmā upavasám' aham, 
rammarh pati nisinno 'smi, puthulomäyută puthü'°% 7, 
в, Tvañ ca kho me va akkhāhi attāoam apalāyini, 
kā vā tvam asi kalyāni, kissa vā tvarù sumajjhime. 8. 
Ruppapattapalimattbiva !' vyagghiva girisānujāà 
yñ santi'' nariyo'" devesu devānarh рагісагіка 9. 


9. 


ie. Үй са manussalokasmirn гйреп` anvágatitthiyo '* — 
гаре te sadisī u` atthi 
devesu'" gandhabbamanussaloke '*, 
putthâsi me, carupubbañgi brūhi, 
akkháhi те námañ са bandhave са 'ti. 10. 


Tettha vàrídharo kumbho ti udakaghato, ворагі па шауб t! susaq- 
hko’? vanpagandharasuttaman ti vanpagandharasehi uttamath, бівуёла 
"И діва, ешаіатајјЬіше tl nimmalatoajjhe, devataro älapanto evam āhs, 
pšánihiti hatthehl, agyšyatanamiaharin ti nttano aggihuttasālah aharirh, 
vikappetvā t! vicchinditvā!*, vikantetvā ti рі pštho, khšdin t! pathaseso, 
ahāfi me ti tah Jivhagge !hapitamattam eva sattarasaharsnisatani'! pharjtvë 


1 СЕ, 2 СЁ уо, 3 Ck -dharsto. * Ске -рі. 5 Оке sositvā nüna, Rd 


sosetvi nanu. “ Bd passa. ? Ck -dhun. * СЕ зат- * СЕ -sama, Bd 
-samma. !° Bd -0, 1! Сә -райтаНЫша, Bd rūpapattaplamatti, Ве rappa- 
mattaplamantiva.- 19 Ck yassanti. 15 pd nā-. M Bd rüpenanvš-. 15 С 


devesi. 1% Bà gandhabbesnu-. !? Bs _santháno. !® Ck chin-. 2!" Bde -nisa- 
hassâni. 


1. Kimchandajataka. (511.) 5 


mama khudañ са pipšsañ ca һап, apetadaratho ti vigatakayacittadaratho, 
mudhábhoJanarh bhuttassa viya hj tasaa tah sebbadaratharn apāhari, vyantl- 
bhüto t| tassa amhapakkassa vigatanto Jato, parikkhinasmhapakko hutvā ti 
attho, dukkhakkhamo tÍ dukkbena amštena Еёуаккһашепа с’ eva cittakkha- 
mena! са #amaupašgato, aññesu  kadalipanasádisu phelesu parittakam pi 
авзадат! nâêdbigacchāmi, ваЬЬап1* jivhāya thapltamattanl tittšn' eva sampajjan- 
tit dipeti, вовеёуаз ti nirâhåratāya sgosetvā® sukkhápetvš, tar maman” ti 
taù mamar’, yassš 'tÍ уат assa, yarn?” ahositl attho, idah тобат hoti: уз 
phelarn шаша азёд аһовї yam ahah pamhbhire!'? puthulaudakakkhandhs- 
вафкћаќе mahannave vuyhaminar tato udadhismā uddharirn!' ambam mama 
maranarh avahissatiti шапбаті, шаућет 19 tah alabhantassa jivitah па-рра- 
vattissatiti, upavasšámíiti khuppipšsšhi upagato’? vasmi", гаютагй pati 
nisinno вті! ramaniyarn nadih patt abaro nisipuo, puthulomāyutā 
puthü ti ayarn nadi puthulomebl macchehi áyutš, patbū tí vipulä, арі nëma 
me jito sotthi!5 bbaveyyá ti adlippšyo, apalāyinîti apalayitva mama sam- 
mukhe 1% thlte ti devataih alapati, ара[арїһїїї!? рі pštho, palāparahite?® ana~ 
vajjasarīre ti attho, kissa vā t| kissa vā Кагапё idbågato afti pucchati, 
ruppapsțtapalimațthīvā?’® 'u sutthupalimat(hakañcanspaltasadiañ 20, vy- 
agghivaá 'u Iilävilšsena багипаууовећаройка viya, devànan ti channam %! 
kaámiavacaradevanarm, у 5 ca manussslokasmin ti ya ca manussaloko, rū- 
penanvšágatitthiyo?” (1 rüpeua anvāgatā?? Itibiyo, natthiti attano sam- 
bbāvauāya evam āha, tava rüpasadisiya пата na bharitabban ti М ’ssa adbip- 
pšyo, zgandhabhamanussaloke ti mülagksndhbadinlssitesu ° gandhabbesu са 
шапизваїоке 25 га, сатириһЬЬай ЇЧ cšrunë pubbañgena varalakkhanena2* 
samaunágato, пёшай ca bandbave cå 'tl attano пёта gottañ са bandhave 
са mayharn akkhäbiti vadati. 


Tato” devatā attha gāthā abbāsi: 
и. Yar {уаш pati nisinno si rammar brāhmaņa Kosikirmn 
sàharn ' bhusälayă vutthá*' varavârivahoghasā. 11. 
12. Маоёдотарарёкіооа bahukā™ girikandarā 
mam’ eva panukhá honti, abhisandanti paávuso*. 12. 


1 Che cittakilamathena. 3 Bd adds paua. ? Ck Ва -da “Bd adds ше. 5 Ot 
вотістёпё, Bd sositvā, © al) three MSS. в081- ? Ск man. Š Bd mama. * 
Ck omits уаш. !© Ва -ra. '! Bd -ritarn. 2% Bd mayhe '2 Cha upa-. ™ Cha 
-mìti. 25 Bd eutthi. ?* Bd asmukharh. !' so Ве; Bd apalšsiniu. Ck apalā- 
yiu, С” apalāyinīti. !® Hd malšyarahite, !? Bd rūpapattaplamațblvā, Вг ruppe- 
pattaplamattivā, 20 Ckə -sarn. Bd -si, Нг -si. ?! Cks cha. ?? Bd -nānvā-. P$ 
Chs ча. 34 Bd -kbandhā-. 25 Ва -esu. ?* Bd urulak-. 27 Bd add вё. # 
Bd аһа. #% Bd vuthā, Вг vuttá. 20 Rd adds na. ?' Bde -ge. 


10 


15 


20 


25 


30 


10 


15 


20 


?5 


30 


6 ХУІ, Tieantpëta. 


ye. Atho bahü venato 'dá' nflavărivahiadharā 
bahnuk& nëgavittodá abhisandanti vārinā. 13. 
14. Та ambajambolabojā пір& tšl& с' udumbarā’ 
bahüni phalajátáni ёуаћапіі abhiņbaso. 14. 
15. Yam kiñci nbbatotire phalam patati ambuni 
asarsayam tarn sotassa phalarh boti уавёпорат. 15. 
16. Etad aññ&ya medhavi puthupañüa sunohi me, 
тё rocaya-m-abbisañgam patisedha јапёйһіра. 16. 
үт. Ма уёһат" vaddhavarh maññe yarn tvarh ratthābhivaddhana 
асеууатёпо* гајіві гпагапаф аЪъЫкатфЕћаві. 17. 
19. Tassa’ јёпапіі ріїаго gandhabbš са вайетакё 
уе сёрі isayo loke saññatattā увваввіпо, 
asamsayan їе* jānaoti vaddhabhūtā’ yasassiuo ti. 18. 


Tattha Kosikin И yar tva bráhmana rammar Koslkigañgarn patini- 
sinno, bhusšlayš vutthš? ti bhuse*' candasote'9 alayo увага vimanassa 


‚ tasmirh айдама Ња, Gañgatthakavimâneväsiniti sttbo, varavârivahoghasā ti 


varavärivebena одһепа annāgatãā, pamukha ti tš vuttappakšrš girikandarā 
шат psmuhharn karonti, abarh (ават рёшоћкћа homiti dasseti, abhiasan dan- 
titl sandanti pavattanti, tato ágantvë mah Kosikigañgaih pavivanttii attho, 
vanatodâ’! ti na kovala kandar va atha kho bahd vanatodâ tambā tambā 
тапатһа!? udakāni pt babūni pavisanti!5, nilavārivahindbarâ ti mayi- 
тайпепа п1епа värinā yutte udakakkhandhasarnkhšte vahe dhārayantlyo, näga- 
vittodá ti nāgānarh хіцакагепа 1 vanasarbkhātena'® udakena samannāgatā, 
värinā ti evarūpā hi bahunadiyo шат wšrlnë va abhisandanti pūrentiti dassoti, 
tā ti 05 nadiyo, š vabantitl etanl атЬайїш! akaddhanti, sabbêni hi etānl 
upayogatthe paccattavacanāni, atha vå tă ti upayogabahuvacanarn, ävahantiıi 
imën! ambādini tā nadiyo äāgacchanti!* upagacchantiti attho, еғаф ирада! 
pena шаша Botë pavisantiti addhlippåyo, sotassš ' уаш ubhatotire jāta- 
rukkhehi phalam mama ambuni patati sabban (ат mama sota ' eva тавапидый 
hoti, n` ас’ ettha warisayo ti, evarh ambapakkassa nadisoten 
kathesi, medhavi puthupañña ‘ti ubhayah ñlapanam eva, 


арешацакёгапат 
mà госауа ‘і 
evarn (апһабһївайдагтп mā госвуа!?, patisedha "і ра[івейћа '* пап Ч rèjànain 
ovadati, vaddhavan ti pañāāvaddhsbhăvarn рапдібаЬһағагт, гаф аЬіі- 


1 Ва dhanatodš, Сё vanātodā, read тапаг odă or vanato 'dā? ' Ва -talamudum- 
рага. * Ck cáëhern. * Bd adds hutva. ° Cztattha. < Bd adds рі, Ck vi. ' 
Bd sanhabhüta “° Bd vntbš. ° Ck bhüye, Bd bhüse. '° Bd -сепа. !! Ck -ja. 
19 Сё vanamānā. !% Ck qti. `+ Ва vittakarmranena, Ck vittikarena. !5 Bd 
dhana-, СЕ adde тё. !* Bd škadhanti. 1? Bd rocatha. 21" Bd -dhehi. 


1. Кіфећапдајакака. (511.) 7 


Yeddhana '1 ralthaess Aabbivaddhsna, ёсеууашіпо Ч тыйзаЇоһиИеМЇ 
ñciyanto' vaddhanto” taruno va butvš ti attħo, răjieîų tah Шарай, Іда 
тонаб hoti: ya tvarh пігаһагаскуа sussamšro tsruno та samâno ambslobhena 
marenah abhikarnkbasi па ve sba tava? pandqitabhšvarn maññamiti, tassa 
Ч! уо puggelo tanhšvasjko hoti tassa tanhaávasiksbhšvsrb, pitaro ti sarhkha- 
вага brahmapaá ca saddhir kamavacaradevehil gandhabba са vuttapakëára dibba- 
секкћока [sayo ea asarhsaysrh Jänanti, anacchariyarh c’ ебагі уап te lddhimanto * 
jJaneyyurn: esuko пёта tenhšvasiko ti’, tesah Ъћаветоёпёпаф тасапат sutvā ye 
p! tesarh vaddhabhütšë* yasassino paricšárikš' te pi jšnanti, рёраф? karontassa 
hi raho лата n' atthîti tëpasassa sarhvegam uppidenti evam ёћа. 


Tato tüpaso catasso gāthå abhāsi: 

w. Evarh viditvā vidū sabbadhammarm 
viddhamhsanarh cavanam’ jfvitassa 
па сїуаїї !° tassa пагаввв pāpam 
sace па ceteti уайһйуа tassa. 19. 

зо. Ївїрйдаватаййа{е еуаф Іоћуќ'! viditá вай!” 
anariyaparisarpbháse pápakammatrn }їдїїїзавї''. 20. 

зї. Sace аһаш marissãmi tire te puthususeoni 
аваїйваўаш asiloko mayi pete '* āgamissati. 21. 

з. Tasmá hi раракаф kammarn rakkhass' eva sumajjhime 
mā tarn '* sabbo jano рассћа pakatthási!'t* mayi mate ti. 29, 
Tattha етап viditva ti yathë aharn silañ са nulccatañ ca јанаші ovaro 

Jjänitvā thitassa, vidū ti viduno, sabbadhamman ti заһЬага sucaritedħhammai, 
«һаг висат ата bli idha sabbadhawmo ti adbippetah, viddhemwsanan 
tU Байда, cavanan ti cutih, jivitassš t ayuno, idar тией hoti: evarh 
viditvä thitasaa panditassa sabbasucaritadhamopurh Jivitassa са aniccatah jnen- 
tassa avarūpessa nerasen pšpam па ciyati па vaddhatí, засе пасеїе{1 
vadhäya tassà 'ti’? ватка gatassa parapuggalassa ғадһ буа па сеек па 
kappoti, n eva parapuggslarn vedhāya ceteti nêpi parassantakarn niset[!9, айап 


са kasseci vadhâya acetetva kevalam ambapahhe аваг !* katvà Оайраф olokento 
nisinno, tvain22 mayhaù kin pma akusalah passasiti, isipūgasamaññáte 


17 СЕ Ва ас-, Сг ajiyanto. > (ks vattanto. ? Bd adda idat. * Ck -to. ° Bas ой 
puna, * В2 pamanbabbūtš. ? Ck -vārakā, * Bd påpskammam. “al three MSS. 
тасапап. #0 Ck naciyati, Bd najlyyati. 11 Ck -a. 33 Bd viditi th '? Cha 
Jigirnssti, Bd jigisasl. 1* Bd mate. 1% Bd tvaru. 1!" Chs -катеёві, 84 pakvat- 
tbāsl. 27 Bd adds tassā. '* Сіз puggalšnarh pissa santikarh хіпёвей. !' Ck 
Ъвафват katvā. ?* Rd? add olokentl, 


10 


25 


15 


20 


95 


30 


8 XVI. Timsanipšra, 


ti Isigapena sut(hu aññâte isinarn ssmmate', evam lokyš ti іта nime 
рїраратаһапепа Jokassa hitš tl бтп viditvā, ваї? sati? sobbane uttame 
И šlapanam etam, anariyaparisambhišse ti tasse jànanti pitaro ti âdikâya + 
asundaršya paribhšsaya semannJgate*, jigirnsasiti* mayi раре aviljante pi 
mam’ paribhšsanti шагашапаш* aljhupekhharnti са attano рарайапиваш 
s asi оррайеві, (їге te ti tava Gre, puthusussoniti putbulšya sunda- 
тауа soniyë samannāgate, pete’? ti арђараккат alabhitvà paralokarn gate, 
mate ti attho, pakatthasitl!! akkosi garahi nindi, parcakkhësiti!? pi patho. 


Tam зшуйа devadhītā pañca gāthā ађћазі: 
qa. Айййбап› etah avisayhasáhi, 
attánarh ambañ са dadāmi te {ай 
уо duccaje Кап:адипе pahāya 
santiñ ca dhammañ ca adhitthito si. 23. 
яз. Yo hitvá pubbasarhyogarn pacchā sainyojane thito 
абһаттай c’ eva carati pāpañ с” assa pavaddhati. 24. 
es. Ebi, tarh pāpayissāmi, kāmar ” appossuko bhava, 
upanayámi '* зїїазтїт, vibaráhi anussuko. 25. 
зв. Tah puppharasamattehi vakkañgehi arindama, 
Койей тауйгё diviyá koyatthimadhusāliyā 
kūjitā harhsapūgehi kokil ettha pabodhare. 26. 
п. Amb' ettha vippasūnaggā palálakhalasannibha 
kosumbhasalalánipa pakkatālavilambino (і, 27. 


tametan ti garabā te bbavissatfti vadanto ambapakkatthšya 
vadasiti etarh karanain 1° mayá ласа, avisayhasišbiti га)зпо nëna dussaharh 
Sshantiti!t tena пат šlepanti өташ šha, attānan ti tah šlingitvë ambavanarñh 
nayanti attānañ ca te dadami (ай са ambam. kiàmagune ti kañcanamala- 
sSetacchattapatimandita vatihukāme, santiñra dhammañcå “і дчввуараве- 
шепа '7 santisarnkhatarn вай c° eva ғисегібадћатшай cü ‘11, sdhitthitosiu 
уо 1% tvah ime gune upagato etesu vā patitthito siti attho, pubbasemyogan 
ti purimabandhanai, pacchāsainyojane tìi pacchimabandhane, idan уйнаш 
hoti: embhħo {умп (арача yo mahantaih rajJasirivibhavarn'? раһйуа ambs- 


! Dd sammame. 2 Bd patiti. * Dd ран. “ Pd adds каа > Ва ло. * Ck 
Jihirhnsasiti, Bd jigisatīiti. ! Ваз add evan * В сајагатагапай. * Оке -па, 
Bd adds ca. !0 Bd mate. 11 Ске pakatva-, Bd pakvatthā-. !? Bd pakvstvā- 
13 Dd komam. 't Bdupá-. 1% Bd adds таћауапё. !* Dd sahanti Y had 
dussilavūpasamena. !° Сёз ao. 19 CE rajjarh. 


1. Kirmchandajataka. (511.) 9 


pakkamatte rasataņnhāya bajjhitvë тазарат agaņetvā naditir@ sussamšno 
nisidati so mahšásamuddarín taritva velanta sarbsidanapuggalasadiso, yo puggalo 
rasatanhšvasiko adhammañ с' eva сагах! rasatanhšvasnena keriyamánarn рёрай 1 с' 
авва pavaqqhatitl, iti за 15раваф garaharti evam šha, kamar sppossukko 
bhavë 'ti ekarhsen' ova атђаракке nirâlayo hahi”, sitalo ambavane etan ti 
erah vadsmānā devatñ (8равэїп aliñgitra ure nipajjāpetvā āk5se pakkhanta2?, 
tlyojanikam dibbarı ambavanain disva sakunaraddañ са sutvā tăpasassa 
āclkkhantî ehi tan‘ tiè аһа, puppharasamattehîtì puppharasehi mattehi, 
vakkangehiti vakkañpiveli sskunehi sbhināditan ti attho, idni te sakone 
3ctkkhanti koñeš ti адил аһа, tattha diviyá t! díhbà*, koyatthimadhuasa- 
уа? ti koyatihisakuna ° ca пата вйуаппаз&!!Шазайип&”# са ete dibbasakuná 
ettha тазап(1! dassetl, Кара hamsapūgəhiti harsaganehi upakūjitā 10 
viråvasarhghatitã'!, kokilettha pabodhbare ti еһе ambavane kokllà 


vassantiyo attānaiı pabodhenti ñāpenti, ambetthā tÍ ambš ettha, vippa- 
sünaggå t! phalabbârena uddhumátasškhaggša'3, palälakhalasannibhāă ti 
pupphasannicayena 8ülipalàlakhalasadisa 12, pakkatšlavilamblnotl pakkatāla- 
phalavilambino 1%, evarūpă rukkhā са ettha atthit; ambavasnath vanneu. 

Vannayitva са pana taápasarm tattha otaretvā „imasmim 
ambavane ambāni khādanto attano tanham pürehiti” vatvā 
раккаші. Тараѕо ambāni khāditvā taņharħ pūretvā vissamitvā 
ambavane vicaranto tam petah dukkharh anubhontarh disvä 
kiñei vattu násakkhi, suriye рап' atthamite™ (аф nátaka- 
parivāritah dibbasainpattih anubhavamānah disvā tisso 
gāthā abhási: 
зв. Māli (їгїт Кауйгї añgadī candanussado 

гай (уат рагісагезі diva vedeai уедапат. 28. 
зо. Solas’ itthisahassāni уа te "тё '° рагісагіка, 

evań mahánubhávo si abbhuto lomaharmsano, 29. 
во. Kim kammar akarī pubbe рӣраћ attadukhāvahari 

yan Кагііуа manussesu pitthimarhsëni khádasii. 30. 


Tattha måâliti dibbamāladharo, tirītÌii dibbavethanadharo!?, kayüriti 
dibbåbharanapatimandito, añgaditi dibbañgadasamanuñgato, candanussado 


1 Ва kaylramānain=e. ? Dd hoti. ? Ck -tīi, Bd ~ti. 4 СЕ etan, Ad tan. ° Dd 
adds evam, * Ck divya. 7 Ске kosatth1-, Ra kopatbi-. ° Ckekos-. " Bd 
-sāliyā-, 10 Сіз pak-. 1! Ck -sarnghátika, Bd# sarhgbațtitā. !? Bas onamlla 
ва-. ' Bd omits khala. !* Ck omits phala. !* Bd atañgamite, Вг atthagamite, 
зе Ck yümita. 17 Ck -vedhana-, Bd .vettana-. 


10 


15 


30 


15 


20 


25 


30 


10 XVI Tihsnipāta. 


4l dibbacandanarvilltto, parlršresitl Indriyani dibbavisayesu сётеві!, divå tl 
divā pana mahäādubkharh anubhosi, уй te mā ti yi te ima, abbhuto ti 
manussaloke sbhütapubbo, Jomabamsano ti ye ta passanti tesa lomâni 
harnsanti, pubbe ti purimebhave, attadukbavashan ti attano dukkhāvaharb, 
manussosū “ti yah? manusssloke katvi idêni attano pitthimarhsâui kbâda- 
«їй pucchati. 


Peto (аф sañjāoitvā „tumhe тап па? sañjānătha, aharb 
papa tomhākarı purohito ahosim, idam me rattiin sukhánu- 
bhavanam tumhe nissáya katassa upaddhuposathassa nissan- 
dena laddhari, divā dukkhanubhavanarh pana mayā katapā- 
pass’ eva nissando‘, ahah hi tumhehi vinicchaye thapito 
kütattarn karitvā lañcamńı gahetvā parapitthimarhsiko һоіуй 
tassa divá katassa kammassa nissandena idarh dukkhah anu- 
bhavāmîti“ vatvá gāthadvayam аһа: 

s. Ajjheuăni patiggayha kámesu gathito° аһа, 

acarin digbam addhanam рагеѕат аһиау' аһа. 31. 
ss. Yo pitthimarhbsiyo* hoti evam ukkacca khādati 

yatháham ajja khādāmi pitthimarmsáni attano ti. 32. 

Tattha ajjhanăniti vede, patigg aybă’ti patiggahotvā adhīipitvă, acarin 
ti patlpajji, ahitāyahħan ti” attanåsanāya ahath, уо pitthimamaiko ti yo 
puggalo paresarh рі ћітатвакћабако plsuno boti, ukkaccā '1 ukkantltvš*, 

Idañ са pana vatvā tāpasarh pucchi: „tumhe katha 
idbâgatā“‘ ti. Tāpaso sabbar vitthārena kathesi. ,,.ldáni pana 
bhante idh' eva vasissatha garissathš" ‘ti. „Na vasissámi, 
assamapadarh yeva gamissāmîti“. Peto ,8sšdhu bhante, аһа 
vo” nibaddharn ambapakkena upatthahissamiti“* vatvā attano 
ñšuubhavena assamapade yeva otāretvā ,,anukkanthanta idh' 


` 


eva vasathā“ “і patiññańh gahetvā gato”. Tato ра{{һйуа 
nibaddham ambapakkena upatthahi. Tāpaso ќат paribhuñjanto 
Кавіларагікаттаф jhánábhi5ñarn' nibbattetvā Brahmaloka- 


рагёуапо аһовї, 


1 Ваг ү|с-. 3 Dd omita уеп. 5 СЕ mam nana, Bd ma na. *Bd -ena, *B4 
glddbito. * Bd -iko. ? Bd adds sabitāys. ° Dd ukksanditvá. °’ Bde ів, 10 СЕ 
omlts gato. 11 В4-а. 


2. EKumbbajātaka. (512). 11 


S. ирёзвкёпат і. д. а, s. р. j. з. (Бассарвгіуовёве keci sotāpannā 
аһевиш, keci звкайёдётіро, keci апёдётіпо: „Tad devatë' Uppala- 
таппё sahosi, tãpaso aham езй“ "і. Kimchendajštakam, 


2. Kumbhajātaka. 


Ko рёіигёвій. Idah S.J.v. УїзёКһҺауа sahāyikā вигй- 
pāyikā’ pañcasatā itthiyo &. К. Savatthiyam kira вигасһапе ghutthe°* 
të pañcasatā itthiyo sāmikānam chanakilávasšne tikkhasuram pati- 
уёдеітб * „chanar kiīliasāmā" 'i sabbåpi Visākhāya eantikah gantvë 
„sahāyike chanam КПіввёшё 'Н vatvâ* „ayam surācchano, aham 
surah па рітізвёшій“ vutte „tumhe Sammāsamhuddhasse danam 
detha, mayah сһапаш karissāmâ" ‘ti āhamsu. „Sādhū“ 'ú sam- 
pațicchitvā (8° uyyojetvă 5-таш pimantapetvë mahbädānam datvā 
bahum ' gandhamálam ādāya sāyanhasamaye dhammakatbarh sotu tāhi 
parivāritā’ Jetavanam врвтёві, Tā pan’ itthiyo surah" pivanamanë'° 
va'' tāya saddhim gantvë dvārakotthake thatvåpi'” suram pivitvā ув 
єёуа saddhim Satthu santikam адашашви. Visākhā S-ra vanditvā 
ekemantam nisidi, itarësu екасса Satthu santike yeva пассішзи 
ekaccă gāyihsu екасса hbatthakukkuccapādakukkuccāni'? екассё 
kalahan аКашви. S. tāsańh samvegam*' jananatthâya '° bhamukalo- 
mato гашзїш!* vissajjesi, endhakāratimisā '' ahosi, Tā bhilā'® вһевиш 
maranahhayatajjita, tena tšsam sură jīri'™, $. nisinnapallarnke 
antarahbito™ Sinerumuddhani țthetvā unnalomato ramsih vissajjesi, 
candasahassuggamannrm ?! viya ahosi. 5. tattha ¿hito va tāsah sam- 
vegajananatthāya 

Ko nu һйзо kim ānando niccam pajjalite sati, (Dhp. р. 146.) 

andhakārena опаййһа padiparh na gavessathā `ti 
imam йаш Аһа, Gāthāpariyosāne tā райсазаїйрї sotāpattiphale 
patitthahimsu. 5. ёдапіуё gandhakuticchayaya Buddhāsane nisīdi. 
Atha паш Vi»sākhā venditvā ‚„Ыһвшїе idam hirottappabhedanam вига- 
pšnam nāma Када?* оррапрап“ ti pucchi. So tassā acikkhanto а. ā.: 


1 Ва devadhītā. 3 Bd surāpitå. ° Bd зашаһи{!е. * Rd pati-. 5 Bd gatvâ, * 
Che ќаш. 7 Ck-u. ° Bd -vuta. ° Ck -ra, !0 Ck pivamānā, Со pivamana 
corr. to pivamānā, Bd рі шапа, 11 Вё са, 19 Bd omits рі. !Šš Cha ¿cca- 
pāda-, Bd -ceápadakukkuccš. 1* Сә -ga, Ва savega. !5 Bd janatthaya. '* all 
three М59. -i. 17 Bd -saā, ! Ck Bd bhi-, Се si- corr. 40 bbi-. !9 Bd Jiri, 
20 Ва -hino. #1 Bds caudasuriyasshassa-. 2?! Bd adds kale. 


10 


2^ 


10 


15 


20 


12 XVI. Tirhsanipáta, 


А.В. Вг. г. к, еко Kasiratthavási! Suro nāma уврасагако 
bhandapariyesanattháya Нітауапќат agamāsi. Tatth' еко 
rukkho uggantvā porisamatte thāne tidbākappo ahosi, tassa 
tiņpań Каррйпаг1 antare surācāțtippamāņo’ āvāto ahosi, во 
deve vassante udakena püri', Тай parivāretvā barīțakī‘ 
āmalakī maricagaccho ca ahosi, tesar pakkāni phalani° 
chijjitvā’ раќапі. Tassåvidūre ѕауайјаіо' va’ sāli. Tato 
suvā’ sálisisáni āharitvā™ tasmim rukkhe nisiditva khádanti, 


tesarn КЪёдатӣпёпађ patito '' sāli pi tandulápi tattha patanti, 
iti tamh“ pdakarm suriyátapena! расбапйпат!!* salohita- 
уарпаћ '* аһоѕі, Nidaghasamaye pipâsitā вакипарапё '* tarh 
pivitvā mattá'” patitvā™ rukkhamüle окап niddäyitvā 
vikūjamānā ” pakkamanti, rukkhasunakhamakkatádisu рі ев’ 
eva nayo. Vanacarako tam disvá „sace idam visa bhaveyya 
ime mareyyurn'”, ime pana thokarh niddáyitvá yathāsukharh 
gacchanti', na idan?’ visan“ 11?! sayarh pivitvá matto hutvá 
mamsarn™* kháditukámo ahosi, tato aggin katvā™ rukkhamūle 
patite?’ tittirakukkuțādayo” māretvā тагат añgāresu pacitvā 
ekena hatthena naccanto ekena шават ** khādanto ekāha- 
dviham tatth' eva ahosi, Tato pana avidūre eko Varuno 
nāma tāpaso vasati. Vanacarako aññadápi*° tassa santika 
gacchati. Ath’ assa etad ahosi: „ida pánarn tāpasena 
saddhirn pivissāmîti“ so ekam velunalikam?*' pūretvā pakka- 
marhsena ѕадаћіт haritvā ” раппавёіат gantvā „bhante imam 


1 во all three MSS, -. 3 Bd sucati-. * Bdz pūrito. * Bd harlttaki. 3 Cie 
vaņțā. 6 Вда add tattbe. 7 Rds saysi) јаќа. * Bd omits va. * Bd suvaki. 
10 Bd haritvā, '! Cke йуз, Bd patita. t? Ске 15, omiting iti. !# Bd -yasanti- 
репа, !* Вә -па. D Сіз o=, Bd 10-, Bs гавапцо-, !* Bd -сепёрапуа, 1" 
Ва adda upari, В» uparisākhâ. '° Cks patțipațitv5. 19 Cs viku-, Bd víkuñca-. 
20 Ва та-, 3! Вг kūjitvā utthāys pakkaman ti іп the place of у, g. 3° Bd 
yidam. 2° Ва adds tato thokarb gahetva. 24 Bd mamsádi, Hs masani. %* 
Bd adds nippajji, Вг pajjalitvā. 3 Bd patita. 21 Chs tittora-, Bd útthira-. 2 
Bd omits ma-. 2° Rd аййе divase. *° Ck pana. Сг pane corr. to pánam, B2 
р!рапат, 2! Ck -nalakarn, C# -nšllkari corr. to -nalakam. 32 Bd раћесуа 


2. Kumbhejātaka. 1512.) 13 


pünam`' pivathā" 'ti vatvā ubbo рі marsa khādantā pi- 
vińňhsu. Iti Surena ca Varunena са ditthattă tassa рӣпавва 
s BUT“ ti ca „vāruņiti™ са námam jātarn. Те ubho pi „atth’° 


ево" upáyo*“ ti уејопё]іуо pūretvā kācenâdâya' paccantana- 


garam gantvă „pānāgárikā' паша agatá" ti raüño ãrocāpesut. 
Rājā pakkosāpesi, te tassa рапат прапевигп, rājā dve tayo 
уйге pivitvā majji, tassa tarn° ekāhadvīhamattam eva ahosi. 
Atha ne „añãam рі atthîti™ pucchi, „atthi devā“‘ ‘ti, „kohin“ 


ti, „Himavante деуё“ 
ekadveváre'" ānetvā „oibaddharn ™® gantur nà sakkhissãmā“ `ti 


ti, „tena hi anethá“ °Ч, Те gantvā’ 


sambháre sallakkhetvë tassa rukkhassa tacain айі katvà 


sabbasambháre'' parikkhipitvá'* 


nagare surath karirnsu. Nāgarā 
surab pivitvā pamādam араппа duggatā ahesurn, парага 
suññarm viya ahosi. Те pānāgārikā™ tato palāyitvā Iārânņasim 
gantvā „pānāgārikā'™ араса‘ ti rañño йгосйревий. Rājā 
pakkosāpetvā paribbayam adāsi, tatthàpi surah аКатви, tam 
рі nagararh tath' eva vinassi, Tato palāyitvă Sáketañi" Sāke- 
tato Svatthiiñ аратагтзо ‘*, Тада Sāvatthiyah Sabbamitto 
năma гаја Aahosi'', so tesarm samgaharh katvā „kena vo 
attho*“ ti pucchitvā ,sambhāramūlena с’ eva salipitthena '* 
pañcah' eva са!" cátisatebiti“ vutte sabbarn дареѕі, Te pañ- 
casu сӣ{іѕаќеѕи surarh sapthāpetvā`’ cāțirakkhanatthāya ™' eke- 
kaya сйїїуй santike еКеКагп bilálain'" bandhirnsu, te™ paccitvā ™ 
uttaraņakāle '° cštikucchisu paggharantarn suran pivitvā таа 
piddayiisu?**, mūsikā āgantvā tesarh” kannanaásikadathikanam- 


gutthe khāditvā асатітво **, „Bilālā* sura pivitvā matā“ 


1 Ck nam, C? nam corr. to рёлаћ. ? Bd varuno ti. ? Bd еко. < Bd kaje-. 
5 Bd рёпеткагіка. “ Bd omita tah. ° Bd atthlnatthīti. 6 C's ар-, * Dd 
ekarndvevšrarb. )° Bd nibandharn. !1Bd -ram. 1 НЯ pakkhi-. !# Bd pánaka- 
guna. 1% Ck „Ке, Сг -ko, В4 рёпекёгікё, Ве pånâkärikâ. !5 Ck -ta, Bd omits 
вёкеіагь. !* Bd sg-. |© Dd һоп, 1° Bds add са. !* Ck pañcameva, omitiing 
са, Се pañcameva са, Bd pañcahi, omitting eva ca. 7° Cs Bd santha-, В4е add 
müsikš bbayena. 2! pd -na-. 23% Ck bilā-, Сг bilš corr. to bllá-, Bd bilárarh, 
39 Ва bilārā te. >t Ck panditva, Bd pacitvā, Ве гаойсічЕ. ? Bd uttárana-, 
Be ottānakāye, 2? Rds пієайуат. 37 Ва uee. 3! ág. 2* pd гаја bllara. 


10 


ao 


25 


14 XVI. Timsanipšta, 


ti ayuttakapurisñ rañño агосезић. Rājā „visakārakā ete 
bhavissantiti“ dvinnarh рі }апапатп slsšni chindāpesi, te „eorarn 
detha', шайһигаш dethā’“ ‘ti vadentā’ va marirnsu* Raja 
te mārāpetvā ,cštiyo bhindathā“ 'ti āņāpesi. Bilšlápi' вогёув 
jinnáya utthahitvá kīlantā vicarihsu. Те Чбїзүй rañño āro- 
севші* Rájá „sace visah assa ete тагеуупй, madhuren" 
eva’ bhavitabbarn, pivissšma ° рап“ ti парага alarnkáršpetva" 
rājañgaņe тардара Кёгеіуё '° alahmkatamaņdape samussita- 
setacchatte '' rajapallarhke nisîditvā amaccaganaparivuto surarb 
pātuh ārabhi. Тада Sakko devarājā „Ке nu kho mátu- 
patthānādīisu appamattā tīņi sucaritádini pàrentiti“ lokarh 
volokento*" {атп гајапаф surah раїшїй пїзїппаїп дівуё „вас` 
був surah pivissati sakala-Jambudipo nassissati, yathá na 
pivati” (Һа nam karissāmîti“ ekam surápunpam kumbharh 
hatthatale thapetvă brāhmaņavesenâgantvā гайбо sammu- 
khatthëne ākāse thatvā „imam КишЬһат kinatha imam kum- 
bhai kiņathā" “і аһа, Sabbamittarājā {аш tathā vadantam 
ākāse thitarù disvā „kuto nu kho brāhmaņo āgacchatíiti“ tena 
saddhirm sallapanto'* tisso gāthā abhási: 
+. Ko pátur йвї tidivā nabhamhi 
obhásayarh sarvari candimë va, 
gattehi te гавшіуо niccharanti 
sateratë!° vijju-r-iv° antalikkhe. 33. 
2. So chinnavatarm'' kamasi арћатћі", 
vehësayam gacchasi titthasi ca, 
iddhi nu te vatthukataá'*% subhāvitā 
anaddhagūnām арі'* devatānah. 34. 
‚ Vebāsayain samkammágamma ?° titthasi 
tkumbham kináthá' 'ti yam etam attharh 


1 Ваг deve. 2 Bdedová. > Bd =јгатапіб, * Bd mā-. ê Bd bilār-, * Ва 
-сёревщй. 7 ОХ -reuekena. * B4 -ші. * Ва -karetvā, !9 Bd kārāpetvā. " 
Bd omits веш. '? Bd olo-. !® Ві» pivissati. !* Bd -pento. 18 Bds -ri-. 1* 
Ck jinņa-, Bd сћалпе-. !? Bd agghasmi. 19 Çk -thā, !° Ва sndbagnnamas. 
30 Ck sarhtamamag-, C? samkamamag-, Rds sarngammamag-. 


2. Kumbhajštaks. (512.) 15 


ko vā шуат! kissa vatáya' kumbho 
аккћаһ me bráhmana etam atthan ti. 35. 


Tattha ko рабогёвіі kuto pštubbÚto kuto āgato sitl ettbo, tidivā 
nahbamhiu ki Tavatinsabhavana ägantvā idha nabhambi &Шйзе pākato јао 
ekti pucchati, sari varin ti такіћ, ssterati ti evannämlkā*, so ti во ќай, 
chiunavátan t! valàhako pl ёта vštena kamati, (авва рапа во pi váto n 
айы, ten' evam aha, kamasit) pavattasi, aghambiti° appatighe каве, 
vatthukatšá 6 Ц vatthu vlya patitthë viya каба, anaddhagūnāmapl?’ deva- 
апап ti уй va радавё addbšánarb agamaneua' anaddhagūnaro’ детапаф 10 iddhi 
у& ар!!! tava subhávjitš ti pucchati, теһавауат sayñnkammagamma'!? 'tj 
ākâse pavattapadavitihararh 1° paticca nlasāya calt titthasi!’, Ішаева Шо vā 
tuvan?’ ti ішіпа sambandho, evarh titthamšno ko уй!? tvan ti attbo, yam 
etamattham ti yam! ! гаф 't vadasi Іоінва 20 kisaa vatáyau ti Imină 
вашһапйһо, yaro etarb kumbbharh Кїп&їһ& 'ti vadasi’! kisse vå te ayain kum- 
bho ti attho. 


Tato Sakko „tena hi suņāhiti“ vatvā вогёуа dose das- 
sento āha: 

4. Na sappikumbho na pi telakumbho 
па phánitassa па madhussa kumbho, 
kumbhassa vajjāoi anappakāni, 
дове bahü kumbhagate™ sunātha. 36. 

з. Galeyya yarn ™ pitvá' pate papaštarh 
sobbham goham candaniyoligallarn ** 
bahum pi bhuñjeyya abhojaneyyarn 
tassã punnam kumbbam imat kinátha. 37. 

в. Yam? pitvā” cittasmi™ апеваїпйпо 
аһїпдаїї go-r-iva bhakkhasārī™ 


1 Cke (тай, Bd tuvā, 32 Ok тауа, C? catāya, Bd vatayarb. ? Bde -ri-. * во Che; 
Bà -mako. 6 Bd agghasmí. * Ck -thä. T Chr -bhünámapi, Bd anantagunamasi. 
è Ва yä рай!з& andhana andhāgamanena, Ве addhagemanena. * Cè anandabhü- 
nai, С» snaddjhabhünarn corr. to апайдһадйпап, Bd anandhaguparh. ?? Ck 
детёпа, Dd deratānah. !! read: sã арі? Bd iddba va уй аз! !3 Ck sarne 
kamamagamina, Віз вайрзтшашадашша. !? Bå’ psvattarnpa-. 1* Bd omita ca. 
13 Ва siti. 16 Cka tvan. !? Bds пила. !# Bs parati. ›* Bd етай. ?° Ва 
imassa. 2: На е1. 32 Bd -ghate. 32 Ck galeyyam, omitting yarn, Bd баіеууаћ, 
omitting уап. 34 Bd pivitvā, 33 Cke -nloli-. 29 Cks yam, P Bà pivitvā, 
Bs ve pivitvā, 36 Ска -smirh. 29 Cka -sāvi. 


15 


30 


10 


15 


20 


25 


16 


u. 


LED 


XVI Тиїшзап!ра!а. 


anāthamāno' upagëti' naccati* 
tase punnarh kumbham imam kinátha. 


. Yarn ve! pivitvā acelo va naggo 
P g 


careyya рёте visikhantarāni 
sammülharitto ativelasãyī* 

tassā punnam kumbham imam kinatha. 
Yar“  pitvá' utthaya pavedhamāno 
sisañ ca báhañ' са pacálayanto 

so naccati dárukatallako va etc. 40. 
Yam ve‘ pivitvā aggidaddbā sayanti | 
atho sigālehi pi’ kháditáse 

bandhan vadham bhogajániih с” upenti 


. Үат* pitvá '° bhëseyya abhásaneyyarm 


sabhāyam sino '' apetavattho 
samiuakkhito vantagato vyasanno ete, 
Yam  pitvá'? ukkattho āvilakkho ” 
mam’ eva sabbā pothavîiti™ maññe 


38. 


39. 


ete, 41. 


42. 


па me samo càáturanto рі гаја еіс. 43. 


Manatimána '° kalahāni™ реѕџрёпі'" 
dubbannini naggayinï рајауіпї 


согаёпа'° dhuttānarh gati niketo ete. 44. 


Iddhāni phitáni kulāni assu 
апеказаһаѕѕайһапапі'" loke 
ucchinnadāyajjakatān’ ітауа ete. 45. 


‚ Dhaññam dhanarm rajatarn }атагйраг! 


khettańh gavarn yattha vināsayanti 


ucchedani vittavatarh” Киараћ etc. 46. 


"Ва adds va. ? Bd -gāyati. > Bd adds са. * Ске увбсе. 5 
yam. ? Bd pivitvā, Bz ve pivitvš. ê Bd bšhuüñ. # Cks -lepihi, Bd atho pisiñgalehl. 
10 Rd уа ve pivitvā, !! Ckhs āsl-, Bd abhāsamāeino. 13 Bê 


bháseyya. 


13 На ача-. 1# Па patha-. 3% Bd mánštimino. 


Сіз sasi. * Сі 


ve plvitvšá, adding 
26 Cks kalahš. !7 


Bd paresunli, Вг posuni. !Š all three MSS. -паф. 33 Ck -sasšhassshananani, 
Се -asšhassagananani, Bd -ваһаввёпі dbanāni, Ве -sšhassadhanani. 20 Ва 


vattatarh, 


W. 


2. Kumbhajātake. (512.) 


. Yañ се pītvā' dittarūpo уа" poso 


akkosati pitararn mátarañ са 
assum рі? ganheyya atho pi sunham ete. 47. 


. Yañ се pitvā' dittarüpá va nárI 


akkosatI вавџгат вйштїКвй са 
dásam рі ganhe paricārakam рі etc. 48. 


‚ Үай се pītvāna‘ һапеууа poso 


dhamme thitarn ватапаф bráhmanam vå 
gacche apáyam pi‘ tatonidápar etc, 49, 


. Yañ ce pitvá* duccaritarh caranti 


Кауепа vácáya са cetasă ca 
пїгауатй vajanti' duccaritarh caritvā etc. 50. 


. Yam уйсашӣра° па labhanti pubbe 


bahum hiraññam pi pariccajantă 
so {ай pivitvā alikarh bhaņāti ete. 51. 
Yar pivitvá ° pesane pesiyanto '° 


ассйуіке Кагапїуатћі játo '' 
attham pi во na-ppajánáti vutto etc. 52, 


°з, 


Пігітапёрі ahirikabhávarh 

páturmkaronti!" шайігауа '* mattš, 

dhirápi santë bahukarh bhanannti еіс, 53. 
Yañ се'* pitvā™ еКа(һйрй'* sayanti 
апйваКй'' thandiladukkhaseyya'* 
dubbanniyain āyasakkañ™ c' upenti еіс. 54. 
Үай ce руй '° pattakkhandhā [sayanti] 
gāvo kütahatë-r-iva?*' 


17 


Y Па уар va piviivå 3 П4 са. 3 Bd sassurampi. * Bd yar ve plvitva. 
Càs epa. * Rd -yambi. ? во all three MSS. ® Ck уа yañcamānâ, C% у уйса- 


mànš, Bd yarn yoca-. ° во Bd; Che yampitvā. !9 СЕ posi-. Bd pisi-, Bè реѕа-. 


o Bde-te. 


Jataka. V. 


28 Che pštuk-. !? Ве madanāya. !* Bd yara ve. !* all three 
М55. pivitva. 1% Ва — thupa. 11 Ве -вара. !® Ck -yya, Ва -ууа. 
-кка, Bd ayyasayyarn. #? Dd уай ve pivitvā. 7! Bd _tërive. 


2 


19 с 


10 


10 


25 


18 ХІ. Timsanipáta. 


па hi уёгопіуй уеро' 
narena susaho-r-iva' 55, 
24. Yam тероввё vivajjenti° 
sappa ghoravisarm * іув* 
tam loke visasamánarh 
ko паго рёќот arahati. 56. 
ss, Yañ се pivitva* АпдһҺакауепһира\а&' 
samuddatire paricârayantā 
upakkamurm топваЇећі" aññamaññarm etc. 57. 
эв. Yañ ce pitvë* pabbadevá pamattă 
tidivā cută sassatiyā samëyë 
tah tādisah majjam imar niratthakarh 
japam mahārāja katham pipeyya’. 58. 
эз. Na imasmi kumbhasmimh ° dadhi vā madhum vå 
evar abhiñüaya kiņāhi гаја, 
evar hi mamkumbhagatā mayá te, 
akkhátarüparm tava Sabbamittā "і, 59. 


Таһа vajjanit šdinava, geleyyā "1 gacchanto pade райе рагі 
vatteyya!!, yarn ріст 19 расе ti yari pivitvá pateyya, sobbhan (1 Bvštarh, 
candaniyoligallen tl candanikañ !6 ca ollgallañ !* ca, abhojaneyyan й 
bhuñjituń ауокаф, snesamano ti anissaro, goriva 'ti доро viya, bhakkha- 
martitil# puranakasatakhádako!$, yathà во їайһа tattha bhakkharn'!! sampari- 
yesanto šhlndati!? evan āhiņpdatiıi ettbo, апаїһашапо ti пїгатаввауо anātho 
viya, оравёуасі0 aññam gäyantarh disvš upagantvā та! gäyati, acelo vä ‘ti 
acelako viya, vieikbhantarānitìi antaravithiyā, ativelasšyiti? aticiram?' 
p! niddsrh okkameyya, а{їте)асатї! pi pātho, ativelacārī hutvš careyyā 'Ч attho, 
darukatallako vā 'ti dārumayayantarūpakain vliyaą, bbogajšnjüñcupentii 
bhogajāniñ ca upenti panatipatadini katvā daəņdapīlitā дһапајапій ca аййап 
c eva?! vadhabandhšdidukkbarn pšpunantiti ettho, vaotagato Ц attano 32 


1 Вә sarbvogo. ? Bs narakesusaâbhoriva. ? Bd -jjanti. “ Bd ghoramvi-. ° Ck 
сіта, Сг miva, Bd -visamiva, * Dd yah ve p.vltvë&. 7 Сг -küšvennu-, Ck -ka- 
vennu-, Bd -këvenha-, 5 во all three MSS. for musele ог -leb'? ° Вз pive-. 
10 Bd na himasmi kumbhambi, Cts па imasmim-, read ш’ Imasmi kumbhe. !! 
Bd рапраіеууз, 13 СЕ pivitvā, Bd pita. !? Bds -yañ. 1: Ck oli-. 35 Ске 
абу. 16 Сз вцтаказаіе-. 17 Bd -ā, 186 Bd omits āb-. !* Bd оріс va. #9 
Ck -aāsitl. 3! Bd atirekataram. 3: Che айпай. 33 Сё -па. 


2. KumbpbaJátaka, (612.) 19 


vantasmi gato, vyasanno! ti vyasanapanno, visenno? ti рі pātho, tasmim 
vante Csanno3 ti attho, окка (һо tl ayan meshayodhako t maya sadiso atthitl 
етай ukkarnssgato butva, š vilakkho tl rattakkho, sabbaá pathaviti sabba 
patbasi, sabbš роћеуій рі рё{ћо, cãturonto ti cetusamuddantšya  pa(ba- 
ч[уй* lassaro, mānātimānā ti mānakārikā, sesapadesu pi ев’ eva пауо, gatîti 
Dipphatti”, niketo t! nivšso, tass punpan ti уа evarūpā tassā punast 5 
yattha viínãsayantit! yarn nissàya yattha рай!{М(4 evarn babum рі dbaññā- 
dlaāpateyyah’ nāsenti Шарап&!9 honti, Iddbānft! eamiddhinl!'!, phitaniti 
vatthšlarnkšrabhandchi!'” pupphlitāni, ucchinnadāyajjJakatāníti uccbinna- 
dāyajjāni nidàhanāni katāni?’, ditterūpo ti gabbitarōpo'*, ganheyyá "tui 
bhariyassññaya 15 kilesavasena hatthene ganbəyya, dasampil ganhe (1 attano 
4&ваш pi Кехағавепа sëmiko me ti ganheyya, pivitvänā tl pleitvä, doc- 
carita caritvā tl evarn tihl дуйтеһ! dasavidham рі akusalarh katvâ, yam 
yäcamānā t| yarn purisam puhbe вогаго apivautarn, habuin birañĀam ралсса- 
jantâp! musavádarn karohiti yācamānā па labhanti, pītvā’® ei pivitvà (blito 
парра}ёпа11 vutto t| ken’ atthena Y gatositi типо sāsanasea duggahitattā 16 
tar t attharn” na Jänäti, hirfmanapiti biriyottacittåpl, ekathbōpā”' ti 
sükarapotaká viya binjaccehi?? saddhih ekaršsi hutvå, anāsakā ti пігёћёга 25, 
thandlladukkhaseyyen 11 bhümlyarn dukklaseyyarn sayanti, äyaaak kan’? 
Ч garaharn, pattakkhandhi ti patitakkhandh), ка (ааба? Ц gīväya bad- 
dhena kütena batã’® дато viya??, yathā (42° білет akbādantiyo раштуа api- 
vantiyo sayanti tatbâ ввуашї!Ї?# attho, ghoravisammivá39 "і ghoravlsath 
чіуз, уізавашіёоец t| visnsadisarn, Ап бћакатепі о рика е! ti dasabhâtika- 


гајёпо, upakkamun t psbarirhsu, pubbadevš (1 Asura, tid|vë ti Тата- 
tirimadevaloká 9", sasaatiyā tÍ sassstá!2 digbayukabbšavena 24 niccasamimatá 55 
devalokš?*t ti anho, samāyā ti забы asuramāyābi’?, Janan ti evam ni- 
ratthakain etan"? ti jënanto tumhādiso pandltapuriso katha ріреууа?*%, kum- 
bhagat mayā'? ti kumbhagatarn mayi?) ayan ета vā pāļbo, akkhata- 


rüpan t| sabhávato ak 


Тап sutvā rājā suráya ādīņnavarh ñatvá*' tuttho Sakkassa 
thotim karonto dve gāthā abhāsi: 


1 Сіз туассаппВ. 3 Bd viphanno, Ck višstto. > СК" овапќо, * Bde -yodhoko. š Ck 
=, Bd cšturasamuddautá. * Ck sabbapa-. 7 Ck Dds nlbbattl. Š yë evarūpā ‹авва 
ропа wanting iu СЮ. э Cka yarnĀšdi-. !° all three MSS. -пё, !! Ске -ddbā. 
'з Ба -kërakeppablhandehi. 1? Ch? repeat katáni. !* Bd dippata-, Ве dappita-. 
13 Bd -yyā-. 16 Ва pivitvā vā. !7 Bd tenartbenā. 16 Ck -tbā. !9 Сів pai. 
30 Ck omits atthah. 1! Cke -thupo, Bd -thupā 7? Bd -ena. 33 Che nira- 
bhārā. *‘ ВЕ.вапуап 25 Ck ku-, Dd kutahata. 36 Bd hata. 27 Dd omits 
viya. 35 Ва omits tā. 29? pd omits ёаћа-- 1, 20 Bd -visamivā. 35 Ck 
=veunu-, C? -venhu-, Ве -vendu-. 27 Che -ka. 233 Dd -ti. 1% Bd -kābhavena. 
as Ck {1фавашана? Bd niccasamatā. 8 Cks ko. !2 Ске -yābbl. 26 Cha patan. 
29 Bd pive-. #5 Bd шёуё. #1 Bd „даа maya. “9 Све add disvš. 
РЫ 


10 


10 


95 


30 


20 


95 


20 ХҮІ. Tirbsanipšta. 


эв. Na ше рий уй athavëpi mātā 

etādisā уйдівако tavar ві, 

hitánukampi paramatthakámo 

во `һап karissarh уасапег {ау' ajja. 60. 
4». Dadámi їе рйтауагйпї рабса 

dásisatarn satta ратат satáni 

ājaññayutte са rathe дава ime, 

ācariyo hosi mam ' atthakámo ti. 61. 

Tattha gšmavaršntiu brihmana acariyassa пата acariyabhago ісеМ- 
tabbo ваттассћаге satasahassatthanake tuyharb pañca gāme dadāmitl vadati, 
dasš Ime it даза! ime purato (hita kañcanavicittarathet dassento evam ёћа, 

Тат sutvă Sakko Чеуайа!(аЬһаёуап dassetvā attānam 
jānāpento ākāse thatvë dve gáthá abhási: 

вә, Tav' eva dásisatam atthu rāja’, 

gšmë ca gāvo са tav' eva hontu, 

šjaññayuttë са rathā tav’ eva, 

Sakko ‘ham asmi tidasãnam indo. 62, 
зз. Marhsodanam sappipáyásam bhuñja, 

khādassu‘ се* tvam madhunā арйре*, 

емай tuvam' dhammarato janinda 

anindito saggam upebi thānau ti. 63. 

Таһа evar tuvan” dhammarato 4i етап (уар nānaggarasasųe 
bhojanah bhuñjante вигёрапаѕіғабќо 110! dnccaritáani раһёуа tividhasucarita- 
dhamme rato hutvā kenaci anindito saggatthënarh? upehiti 10. 

Iti Sakko tassa ovšdarn datvá saggatthānam eva gato. 
So рі вчгай apivitvā surābhājanāni bhindāpetvā sllarh samā- 
dáya дёпат datvá saggaparāyano ahosi. Jambudipe pi anukka- 
mena surüpánarh vepullappattarn jatarh. 

S.i.d.a.j.s,: „Tadā raja Anando ahosi, Sakko aham evā" “і, 
Kumbhajatakam. 


1 Bd іше даза. 3 Dd -ite rathe. Сз гаја. 4 Скә -dassa. 5 so all three MSS. 
forea? “$ Dd вараже, ° Cke tva. ° Bd -пипа. * Cke -пё. 10 Ca _hitl, Bd пре]. 


3. Jayaddisajātaka. (513.) 21 


3. Jayaddisajātaka. 


Сїгавваш! vata me ti, Idam 5. J, v. mātiposaka- 


bhikkhum? а, k, Paccuppannavatthum Samajštake vatthusadisam. 
Tadā pana S. „рогёпвКарапфиё kañcanamālańh setacchattam раһауа 
mâātāpitaro розезип“ (і твітё а, й.: 

Апе? Kampillaratthe UUttarapañcšlanagare Рабсё10 
пёта гаја ahosi. Tassa aggamahesi gabbharh pațilabhitvā 
раат уйу. Тазва purimabhave ekā sapattiká* kojjhitvå 
„tuyharh јаќат pajah khāditurn samatthá bhavissāmîti*“ pat- 
thena thapetva уаККһїп1 ahosi. Sā (айа okāsam labhitvā 
tassā passantiyá va’ tarh allamarhsapesivannarh КишйгаКатп' 
gahetvá тигишига* ti Кһаййуй pakkámi. Риоауйге* рі tath' 
eva akāsi. Табіувуйге pana tassá sütighararn pavitthakále 
већа pariváretvá gšálharh'° árakkharh akarsu. Vijātadivase 
yakkhini āgantvā puna dárakarh раһевї''. Devi ,yakkhiniti' 
mahāsaddam акӣзі, Avudhahatthá purisā āgantvā deviyā 
дїппазайййуа'* yakkhinirb anubandhirnsu. Sā khaditurn oká- 
ват alabhanti palšáyitv&ë udakaniddhamanarh pāvisi. Dārako 
mëtusaññaya ' tassá thanarn'' mukhena ganhi, вё puttasineharh 
uppădetvā вивйпатп gantvá dárakar рёѕӣпаЇепе '° Каїуй'* pati- 
jaggi. Ath’ аваа anukkamena vaddhamānassa 'manussamarh- 
gam ñharitvá adási, ubho рі manussamarmnsarh kháditvšë vasirhsu, 
Dárako attano manussabhāvah па јӣойі, ,yakkhiniputto 
smiti saññaáya'” attabhāvah jahitvá antaradhāyitah na 
aakkoti. Ath’ assa sā antaradhânatthāya ekarh màülarn adasi. 
So mūlānubhävena antaradháyitvšá'° manossamarhsarn khādanto 
vicarati. Yakkhini Vessavaņamahārajassa уеууёуасса һуа 
gatā'” tatth' eva kālam akāsi. Devi pi catutthe'° уйге аббат 


3. Cfr. Carlyap. р. 90. ? Ck -вва. ? Bdr mštu-. 5 Dd adds kira. * Bd omits 
hā ° Ве bheveyyanti. * Ва ga. 7 В-га. ° Bd muruhmurā, C? murü 
eorr. to murūmurā. ? Hd dutlyavāre. 20 ]i2 dalban. *! Bd agga=. !? Rd 
Qinnšya sa-, Ck diyšdinnasañšya. '3 Bd mātā t| вайпауа. 14 Вй{(аййаш. 25 
kd -lene. 16 Bd kepetvā, Re (hapetvš, 1? Ck asarnüšya. !* pd -у|. ** he 
вана. 20 84.2. 


о 


15 


20 


95 


LI 
22 ХҮІ. Tibsanipita. 


puttam vijāyi, во yakkhiniyā matattā' ёгодо* аһові°, tassa 
paccamittam yakkhimim jinitvë jëátattë Jayaddisakumāro 
1* пашат akarnsu'. So vayappatto sabbasippe° nipphattirh 
patvā chattarn ussápetvá rajjam!' anusăsi, Тай Bo. tassa 
aggamahesiyá kucchismih' nibbatti, Alinasattukumāro ii 
‘saa nåmah karibsu. So vayappatto uggahitasabbasippo 
uparājā ahosi. So рі" yakkhioīputto aparabhāge pamādena 
tah mülam пйзе{уй antaradhāyitub asakkonto dissamánarüpo 
va susãne manussamarhsam khädati. Manussā tarh disvå bhita 
āgantvā гайпо upakkosirhsu'° „deva еко yakkho dissamana- 
rūpo'' вовёпе manussamarsam khádati, во anukkamena na- 
garan pavisitvá manusse māretvā khādissati, taħ gáhápetum "" 
уабайи“. Баја „sādhā“ 'ti patisunitvá „gaņnhatha ™ nan“ ti 
ānāpesi. Balakāyo gantvā susánam parivāretvā atthási. 
Yakkhinīputto парро uggarüpo't maranabhayabhito viravanto 
mannssánarm Aantaram! pakkhandi. Manusså ,yakkho% ti 
maranabbayabhitá dvidhā bbijjimsa. So рі tato palāyitvā 
агаййаћ pāvisì, па puna manussapatharh āgañchi'. So ekam 
mahävattaniatavih'? nissãya maggapatipannesu manussesu 
ekekarh gahbetvā агаййапї pavisitvā maretvá khádanto ekasmim 
nigrodharukkhamüle уйват Карреві. Ath’ еко satrhaváha- 
bršhmano atavipalánam sahassam datvā pañcahi sakatasatehi 
tan шардай patipajji. Manussayakkho viravanto раккћапаі, 
Bhitā mauussš ure nipajjinsu, So brābmaņai gahetvā palā- 
yanto КЬйпооӣ '* viddho atavipálesu anubandhantesu brāhmaņarn 
chaddetvá'' gantvā attano vásanarukkhamūle nipajji. Tassa 
tattha піраопавѕа sattame divase Jayaddisarājā migavar ™ 
āņāpetvā nagarā nikkhami. Тат"! nagarā nikkbantamattam 


1 Bd mutattā, Bz vuttatt&. # B2 а-. > Bd -siti. 4 Bd вва. 5 Bd kariman. 
+ Ва -äul. 1 Bd -аш. ° Bē -imhl. ° Bd omits рі. 7° Bd àrocesi. !! Сї 
-тйрепа. '? Bã gae. !®% Bd -hā-. !* Bd ubbblggatarü-, Ве uggata-. '5 Bd 
-re. 18 Сә āgaĀūji, Ва āgacchi, 17 Ck -viyaib, Bd -vi, Вә mahāațeriin, 5 
Hds add päde, 1° Ck ја-, Bd chat{o-. 29 Bd adda тайһїуа. ™ Ck цап, 


3. JayaddisaJštaka. (513.) 23 


еүа! Takkasila-vás!' Nando nama mātiposakabrāhmaņo’ catasso 
satārahā gëthá ādäya йдап{уй* addasa. Raja nivattitvā 
„Suņissãmîti" tassa pivāsagehah’ dāpetvā nigavar gantvā 
„yassa раввепа* migo palāyati tass’ eva’ glvë“ ti аһа. Ath’ 
-ko pasadamigo uțțhahitvā rañño abhimukharh gantvā palāyi. 
Ашассё Pparihásarn karińhsu. Баја khaggar gahetvā tamh 
-anubandhitvā tiyojanamatthake patvë° khaggena paharitvā dve 
khandáni Касе katvā’ āgacchanto manussayakkhassa nisin- 
matthánam '° patvā dabbatinesu nisīditvā thokar vissamitva 
#antum ärabhi. Atha namh so uttháya ,,tittha kuhit gacchasi, 
bhakkho me si!“ ti" hatthe gahetvá pathamarm gëthar aha: 
1. Сігазваф vata те!” udapādi ajja 

bhakkho mahā sattamibhattakāle '*, 

kuto ві Ко vási tad imgha brūhi, 

ācikkha játirh vidito ” yathásiti, 64, 


Tattha bhakkho шара ti mahabhakkho, sattamlbbattakalel1t ti 
påtipadato patthšya pirãbărassa sattamiyarh bbattaká!e, kuto siti kuto Bgato 8i. 


Каја yakkham disvā bhīto ūürukkhambharh !* patv&'!' palā- 
уоп nâsākkhi, аһ рапа paccupatthápetvá datiyarm 
gātham ёһа: 

2. Райсаіагаја migavarh pavuttho '' 

Jayaddiso паша yadi-ssuto te 
carāmi kaccháni! уапйпї cáham, 
pasada”? imar khāda, mam ajja тийса 'ti. 65. 


Tauba migavarh pavutiho!® tl migavadhatthaya ?1 raitbā nikkhanto, 
khacchaniti' pabbstassš 'tl23, 


* Bd nikkantamova. ? all three MSS. -1. >? Bd mātu-. * Bd adds tan. 5 
Bd nivesana-. © Ck passeva. 7 Cts add во. ° Rd gantva. ° Bd kaJebašdšya, 
Ba kājenādāya. '° Dds pipanna-. !! Bdesl me. 33 Ске omit Ч. 12 во all 
three MSS. for cirassa ve me? 14 Bd -me-.. !* Ck vidhito, Bd viditvā, 19 
Ck ürukamharb, Bd uruksammarn. 17 Bd katvā. !® Ва ратћо, !% Rde ga-. 
30 Ске visa-. , 2! Bd migarnvādhaya. 2?% Bd рарраќараѕеёпі, adding pasadapti 
sarsbhamigarn. 


о 


15 


15 


24 XVI Tisanipšra. 


Таш sutvë yakkho їайуаш gšëtham aha: 
а. Sen’ eva tvah panasi' sassamëno', 
тат’ esa bhakkho равай” йуага* vadesi, 
tam khádiyánarh' pasadarh dighaññarn° 
Кһ&Чївваш * pacchá, па vilāpakālo’ ti, 66. 

Tattha senevš '(1 mama santaken’ eva, рапавїсі a voharasi' attinarir 
Vikkinasi, sassamüëuo!0 Ц Мтвапёпо':, tem khādiyāänan?® d tm patha- 
mami’? khäditrā, pasadan ti pasadamigam, dighañüant tl ghasitukámo 
mi", kbädissant ti tasmā etah pacchā yhadissšmi, па vilāpakālo ti 
mā vilâpi ® nâyain vilåpakâlo tì тайа}. 

Таш satv гаја Nandabráhmanar saritvë catuttham 
gātham āha: 

a. Na с” atthi mokkho maina nikkayena 
gantvāna paccāgamanāya ™ рапће"" 
tah вашрагат'* brähmaņassa-ppadāya " 
saccãāvurakkhī punar āvajissan ti. 67. 
Тайһа na catthiti na?? ce mayhan nikkayena vinimayena?! шокко 


аНЫ, gantvānā 01 evarb sante вјја imar miga?” kbāditvă mama павагай 
gantså рарће?% 1114 paga?’ yeva втв tava påtarāsakâle paccâgamanalihâya'* 


райбаф gsnhë `ti edbippiyo, tam sagaran’ 11 mayá dhanan te dassamiti 
brāhmaņassa sarngaro!'š kato, taro tassa datvi Imain mayā vuttarn васса» 
anurakkhanto shar puna ägamissîmiti?* attho. 


Tar sutvā yakkho райсатат gatham âha: 
s. Кіп Каштајаќат anutappatī tar” 
pattar валпїраї maranassa гаја", 
ācikkha me (аш, api sakkunemu 
anujániturh âgamanāya рапһе'' ti. 68. 


1 Ва palassi. ? Ck вавшёпо, Bd sayamāno. 5 Ck pasadayarn, Bd pasadoyarn, 
Tead pesado, omitting yam? * НЕ -ра. 5 RBdjl-; С, tator jigbacchab? * 
Bd -disan, ? Ве -le. ° Bd palâsiti, ° C> Ва -hå-. 19 Сә asamëno, Bd ss- 
yamāno. !! Bd vihlsayamāno. !? Rd -иа, 13 Bd равайашашбвап. !* Bå al. 
15 Ce vilapa, Ва lapi. *'* Bde pacchš-. ' Ckr pañhe. !š Bda sañka-. '*# Нё 
-nassasampadāya. ?° Bds sa, >! Bd pi ла vl in the place of vle. 23 bds 
migamarhsain. 23 Ck psōhe, С° рашбђе, 2* Cs eu, Ск omite tl. 35 Rd 
padose. 25 Bd punëága-. 21 Bd tvah. 7° Ck ВА rājâ. 


2. Jayaddisajātaka. (513.) 25 


Таа kammameva Каш оај аа, snutappatiti' anutappati, pattan 
tl upsgatam, арі sskkunemü 'ti арі nima tarn tava sokakāraņarı ашта pato 
та âgamanâya tab anujániturñ sakuneyyamáë `ti attho. 

Баја ат Багалаф kathento сһа((ћаф gātham ha: 

в. Katā тауё’ brāhmaņassa dhanāsā’, 5 
tah sarhgarar  patimokkham ° па muttam, 
tarh ватфрагат * bráhmanassa-ppadáya * 
saccánurakkhi punar йуа}їззап' ti. 69. 

Tautha реток к һақ па muttan ti catasso satărabā даса sutvš 
dħanan te dassimitl ра(іййёуа mayá attani patímuñcltvë thepltain na pana 10 
muttath dhanassa ad'nnattā. 

Tam sutvá yakkho sattamarh gátham йһа: 

s. Yë te katá brāhmaņassa dhanësa' 
tarh sarhgaram  patimokkharn' па muttam, 
tarh ѕафрага:ӣ  bráhmanassa-ppadáya * 15 
saccanurakkhi punar āvajassū" ti, 70. 


Tatha punarāvajsssū’' ti puna šgacrhassu '?, 


Evañ сё papa vatvā rājānań vissajjesi. So tena vissat- 
tbo „tvan më cintaya'*, ahar pāto va agamissñiniti' vatvá 
magganimittāni sallakkhanto attano balakāya upagantvā 20 
balaparivuto nagara pavisitvā Nandabrähmaņam раККовй- 
petvā mahārahe йзале nisīdāpetvā tā gāthā sutvā cattāri 
sahassāni datvā уйпай āropetvā „imam Takkasilam eva 
nethā“ 'ti manusse резе!үй!* Dršhmanarh uyyojetvā'™* dutiyadivase 
patigantukāmo hutvā puttarn āmantetvā anusåsi. 15 

Таш ааш dipento S. dve gāthā msbhasi: 

в. Mutto са во ригізёдазва !* hatthā 


gantvā sakan mandiram kāmakāmi 


1 Bd tappatiti. 3 Bd mahā. 3! Ске „ва, read: -nassa-ddhanāsā? * Bd sañka-. 
5 Ва pati-. * 1:0 -паѕваватрайёуа. 7 Ckr-Jis<un. ? Ck -ва. # Bd -mokkarm. 
10 Çs „Наво, СЕ âvapuasu, Bd švsjassu. !! Che -jasau, Bd рипагајатавеи. !3 
Ck авассћезәпф. ' Вёз .у{ 14 Cks datvë. 1 СЕ uyyedetvā, Сг uyyodetva, 
Bd uyotvå, 1  Ckz purisodassa. 


96 XVI. Тіфвапірёіа. 


хаф samgaram' brăhmanassa-ppadâya ° 
ётепівуї puttam Alinasattuh*: 71. 
s. Ajj' eva rajjarn sbhisecayassu, 
dhammañ сага* вези* paresu càpi, 
5 adhammakaro te màhu ratthe, 
gaccham' aham рогізабаззв BDatte“ і. 72, 


Tattba Alinasattun?' t| evarnnëmekarh kumarskarm t Palyam? pana 
Adinasattun '° ti likhitan, ајјета rajjan ti putta rsjjarh ta dammi tvam ајј' 
eva muddheni abhisakarn abbisecayassu '!, ñatte)!1 ti ty-ante'® santike ti attho. 

to Тай sutvá kumāro dasamarh gātham аһа: 
зо. Кїїї kamma kubbar tava deva рёде 
nárëdhayim, tad icchāmi soturh 
yam ajja rajjamhi udassaye'" tuvarn '*, 
rajjam рі n'iccheyyarh '* ќауё viná ahan ti. 73, 
16 Tattha kubban ti karonto, yamajjā '(1 yene апёгёйћаоепа ° kammena 


ajja шай rajambi tvsh udassayo nssayāpesi'® tam me ācikkba, abarth Ы!? 
{ауа vinā rajjarh рі na Icchêmiti attbo: 


Tam sutvăā гаја anantararh gātham аһа: 
и. Na kamınanā” vā™ vacasā va" tāta 
20 aparšdh' ito ° "Һат tuyharn*™* sarāmi, 
sandhi са?* katvā purisadakena 
saccñnurakkhi рип" аһа?! gamissan ti, 74, 
Tattha aparādhlto?? ti арагайцай 9° ito, tuyhan 153" tava santakarn 35, 


14атй vatta hoti: така abam fto tava kammato vā vacanato vā kiñci?° mama 
35 appiyam aparšdharb?” na загашїп, sandhiñca katvå tÍ mar pana mle 


1 Ва sañka-, ? Bd -nassa ватрайёуа. > Bd alinnasuttah, * Dd саге. 5 


Вёз sosa. * Се пасека, Bd папе, Вг dassu sante. 7 Рё аіппа-. ® Bd -rarh, 
» Ск pšliyam, Cs руат. 19 Сг айїпавацап, Bå arindasattun, Ве adinna- 
sattun. '? СЕ abhlseka sbhisokaca, C? abhisekarn аһһївейайсауап, Bd abhlsekarh 
абћівесаяви, Ве ебћівесеуушћ. 1! Bd ñante, Bs santa, !? Cs ñanta, Ck omits 
ti tyante. ' Bs udi-. 15 Ck tvan, Сега. !% Che па iccheyya. "© С. 
-dbana, Bd -dbanarb. !® pd ussayyāpesi, Cis assasāpesi. !" Bd ahaühl, 30 
Hds -упё, ?! vā wanting in all three MSS. 9: Bdsca. %: Chr a нова 
yantuviyarh Іп the place of haih tuyhatn. "3 Bd saddbiñca. ** Ck punšbasm, 
Bd ринага. 31 Bd hantuviyanti Iu (ће place of tuybanti. ?* Dd -ti-, 29 ВЕ 
adds tava santikarh. 


3. Jayaddisajatika. (513.) 27 


gavarn’ gatah еко yakkho kbadissamiti gaņb! athšharn bråbmaņnessa dhamma- 
kathah sutvā tassa sakkšrarn katvā ave tava pătarāsakāle šgamiíissšmiti tena 
рчгівёдакепа sandbhlih? katva gato tasmā tah sacca anurakkhanto puna 
tattha gamissāmiti?’ tva rajjarb kārebîti vadati. 


Тат sutvë Котёго gātham аһа: 
зз. Ahah gamissšmi, idh’ eva hohi, 
n’ atthi tato jivato vippamokkho, 
sace tuvarh' gacchasi yeva гӣја 
aham pi gacchami, ubho na homā ‘ti. 75. 

Tattha idhevā ’ti tvah !dh eva hohl, tato ti tassa santikā Jivantassa 
mokkbo пёша п' ай, uhho tÍ ета sante” ubho рі na bhavissáma. 

Таш sutvā гаја gātham аһа: 

з». Addhā hi tāta satán' ева* дһатто, 
maraná са me dukkhatararh tad assa” 
kammăsapădo ќат yadā pacitvā 
развуһа* khāde hitarukkhasūle’ ti. 76. 

Taas’ attho: айдһ& 9 esa tšta satānain panditānas dhammo sabhávo 
уйна tvan vadasi ?', арі ca kho рапа maybarh maranato р’ etah!’ dukkha- 
tarah азва yadš tarn so kammāsapādo hiterukkhasüje!5 ti ulkhinarukkbs- 
süle '* 167215 расісуё 16 pasayha balakkšrena khšdeyya “і. 

Tam sutvá kumäro gătham āha: 

14, Рапепа ќе pánam aham nimissam, 
mā {уа арӣ porisādassa ñatte", 
evañ са'* te рёпат ahar цїшїзваш, 
tasmă matar jivitassa vannemiti, 77. 


Tattha nimissan ti shah idh' eva tava рёпела mama pánar pari- 
vattessarh’®, {ава (1 yasmā?’? etah pšnarh tava pāņenâhariı nimissarh tasmë!! 


1 Bd -vadharhvanarh. ? СЕ saddhih, Bd» saddhlm вассап. ? Bd -ssimi, * СК 
trah, 5 Ck» omit ubho ti етап sante. * Ckz sutanesa. 7 Bd tavassa, 5 pd 
paseyha. ! во Ck; Сг hirutakkha-, B4 bhidarukkha-, Вә tidārukkha-. !9° Bds 
add ekarhsena. '! Bd -desi. '? Bd теба. “13 Сә hiterukkhamūle, PBd 
bbldārukkhamūle. !* Сё tinarukkha-, Rd tikkhanesukkharukkhasüle. !° Bd 
bbitvā. ! Bd omits ра-. :' Rd папіе. t° Bd etañca. !# Bds seyyar, 29 Ck 
Yyatasma, Ва omita ti ysamā. °! Ск omit tasmà. 


10 


15 


28 XVI. Тирваціріч. 
бата Jivitass sttbšya mama marapat’ таппеюі, maranam ета všremi" 


lerbămiti atthe. 


Тат sutvá гаја puttassa balah’ jāoanto ,,sëdhu (ийа, 
gacchá 
nikkhami. 


ti sampaticchi. So mātāpitaro vanditvë парага 


Tam attbarh pakāsento S. upaddhagëtham аһа: 
15°. Tato have! dhitimë rājaputto 
vandittha ° måtuc ca pituc ca рёде ti. 


Tattha рабе (1 раде venditva nikkhanto ti attho 


Ath’ assa mátápitaro pi Dbhagini рі bhariyápi amacca- 
јапёрі* saddhirn yeva’ nikkhamimsu. So nagará nikkhamitvá 
pitararn maggarnh pucchitvā sutthu уауайһареїуй* вевёпаф 
ovádar баіуё · asambhito kesarasiho viya тарда aruyha 
yakkhāvāsań’ pāyāsi. Тап gacchantarh disvá mātā saka- 
bbávena santháturn'° asakkonti pathaviyah papati”. Риа 
bāhā paggayha mahantena saddena kandati. 


Tam рі attbam pakāsento S. 
15°, Dukhini °ssa mätā шра(1!' pathavya, 
рі авва paggayha bhujāni kandatiti 78. 
upaddhagátharn vatvā (азза pitarā payuttam ñsimsam'  matibhagi- 
піћћагіуаһі '* katarn '° saccakiriyam  paküsento арагёрі catasso 
găthā abhāsi: 
16. Tam gacchatam '* tāva !" pita viditvā 
parammukho vandati pañjalīi so: 
Somo ce гаја Varuno св гаја 
Pajāpatīi candimë sūriyo ca!" — 
etehi gutto purisadakambë 
anuññâto ** sotthi pkccehi! tata, 79. 


1 Ва matah. 2 Bd omits maranameva уёгеші. 3 Rd phala, * Ска bha-. 
8 Chs tva, Nd {хуа “ Bd -рагЈапёрі. 7 Ва ñeva. 5 Ck Ва -tta-, CS -tva- corr. 
to ~tiha-? " Bd yakkha-. '° Kd sandhëšreturh. 2 Pd pati, 12 Cts „tå, BA -ti. 
13 Chs aa, lið tšsisavšdarh, ВӘ šsirhsavšda, !* Bd màta-, C? -yaya, Ck mati- 
уйу. 15 (k katë, Се katā corr, to katah. 16 Ске ti. 17 Chs teva, 18 Ске 
va. !# go all three MSS. 20 Bd: muñceeli. 


3. Jayaddisajitaka. (513.) 29 


iz. Yam Dandakëraññagatassa' mātā 

Rümass' ak’ sotthënarn sugattă’ 

tan te* sharh sotthānah karomi, 

etena saccena sarantu devà, 

апиййабо?* sotthi рассећі* putta’, 80, 
ie. Avi raho pi manopadosarh 

пёћет ваге jatum Alinasatte", 

etena зассела sarantu детё, 

anuññato” sotthi расеећі '° bbš&të ii. 81. 
19. ваша св me ападһїшапо!” si '° sami 
па сарі me шепазё appiyo si, 
etena saccena sarantu детё, 
+ 


anuñĀāto sotthi paccchi'* sami. 82. 


Tattha parammukln ti ayam me putto parammukho gacchatit] (аб 
vidltvā’’, pañjalîti tasmiis kăle airas) añJsli; thapetvă vandati devatā nae 
шада, purisādakamhā 'ti рагізідаказка ваника tena anuññāto sottbinā 
paccehi 16, Rimaassakā?’? (1 KRāmassa akási, еко kira Рагёпввіта01'* Ramo 
nåma måâtiposako'? mštšpitaro palljagganto voháratthaya gato Dandaklrañño 
vijite Kumbhavatinagarah бапа navavidhena тазвепа sakalarețthe vinësiya- 
måne màtápltunnari ® gunar sari, atha pan màtupatthänadhammassa?! balena?’ 
devatā sotihinā ànayltvà måtu адайео, (атп Иагапагп sutivssena?® šharítva evam 
Ра, sotthānan ti sotthibhávarn t pana Ыйсёр! деха! karirnsu matupatihanan 
Dissšya nibhattattë рапа тача akšsfti vuttati, tarh te’ ahan ti aham pi to 
tath’ еса soithānaii?® karomi, mam nis tath’ eva)? sotthibhâvo hotü 'ti 
anho, atha vā karomid icchámi, eteus sacceuš "i васе devatšbi tassa 
sotthlna ânitabhāvo sacco etena вассепа matapitunnarn' sarantu devā, Ramarh 
viya tam рі ånetvà тлаша dassentù ‘1 atiho, anuñüšto t| рогівёдепа gacchā 
'ti anuññăto devatāņah šnubhavena sottbirh3° ра(5дассћа рий "i уздан, 
Jštumialinasatte39 t| Јаго"! Alinasatte?!? mama bhātike sheh sammukhā 


vā peramimukhá тё тапорадоват ra ssrëm!, na тауа tamh! manopadoso kala- 
pubbo р\%!, evam авва karni(tha яассат akasi, yaema са me snadhimano 


1 Ва _klrañño-, % Hd akosi, Пе аңла, > Hd sugutto, Rè звивина. “ Hd bbante, 
6 so all three MSS. 6 Віз muñcehl. ? СЁ puttarh. ° Ck jamadins, Nd Jåtum- 
alinasatte. ° Rd -āto. 10 Bd muccehí, Ck рапдеМ. !! (k hoti. 1? Bd -mano. 
% Ва pi. 3: Bd mañceti, '* Bd adds mštapitaro vanditwā gacchatiti it! «(а 
taù purarimukkha gacchantah puttan disvà in the place of tarh viditvā. 16 
Bd muñcehi. '7 Rd -kāskl, 15 во all three MSS. !# Bd matu-. 7° Bd -tu. 
з: Bd -kammassa 32 Bd phalaena. 32 На guta-. $: Bdtadd tari. 3° Dd bhan 
се, 26 Hd tameva война, 2" Ra taitheva, 24! Bd шатаріриаф. ?* all 
three MSS. -1. C Сї” Jštumadina-, Hd jatumandalisstte. °! Bd: add wkariisena- 
32 Ске $@т-, Dd aindasatte. Bs alina-. ® Не ti. 


10 


15 


25 


зо 


30 XVI. Timsanipšta. 


sl sšmitl mama siml Alinasattu' yasmā {тап adhimano% mah? sadhibhayitvá $ 
atlkkamitva аййаш manena па patthesl', na сёрі me manasš applyo вій 
шауһаш pi cat апав tvah? арр!уо па hosi, añĀamaññar piyasarhvšsë va 
тауап ti evam авва sggamahesi saccam akëšsi. 

Kumáro рі? pitarā akkhátanayena yakkhávásamaggarh pati- 
pajji. Yakkho рі" „kbattiyā nâma bahumāyā honti, ko jānāti 
kim bhavissatiti* rukkbam abhirūhitvā rañño ñgamanam'° 
olokento nisīdi. So kumārah āgaccbantarh dievā ,,pitararh 
nivattetvā'! putto āgato bhavissati'*, п' attbi me bhayan“ ti 
otaritvā tassa pițthiń 'dassento nisīdi. So āgantvā tassa purato 
ațthāsi. Atha™ yakkbo р. й.: 

зо. Brahā™ ujü carumukho kuto si, 
па тат pajánási vane vasantam, 
luddam mam ñatvā purisadako ti 
ko sotthim ājānam idhávajeyyë "і. 83. 


Tattba ko saotthimáJjJšanamidbavajeyya '1 kumārako паше рогіво 
attano sotthibhāvarh Jánanto icchanto!š idhágaccheyya!9, ајёпапіо Bgato maññe (l. 


Таш sutvā Китйго gātham aha: 
зз. Јапаші ludda: purisādako (уат, 
па tah na' јапёті vane vasantarh, 
aham pi'' putto "вті Jayaddisassa, 
mam ajja khada pituno pamokkbā* ti. 84, 
Tattha ратоккћа ti pamokkhahetu 20, abarh pitu Jivitarn даға Idhá- 
gato, tasmā (ага?! шийса marh khšdá 't! attho. 
Tato yakkho gātham āha: 
Фе. Јёпаті: putto 11°° Jayaddisassa, 
tathā hi vo mukhavapno abhinnam, 


1 Bd alinda-. ? Dd anadhimano, ° Bd nima. * Bd’ abhibha-. 5 Ві pațheal. 
8 Bd omite ca. ° BA adds pi. ° Oks omit рі. ° Вг adds evarh clntesl. 10 
Ва ga-, В» аёңашапашар ап? !! Bd -ltvā. 2° Dd -tīei. !5 Ва athassa, Вг 
atba пат. !* Ck brü-? Bd brahma. !* Dd omits іс-. 1* Bdr add (таф. 17 
Сіг Bd omit na. !# Bds abañca. !9 Bd -о, Вә pemukbā. *° Bd -kkha-. ?! 
Chs tra. ?1 Bd al. 


3. Jayaddisajātaks. (513.) 31 


sudakkararh c’ eva katan tavêdarh 
уо maccum' icche pituno pamokkhā” ti, 85. 

Tattha tathā bl vo ti 120160 та? vo tumbākah ubbínnam р! sadiso va 
moukhavanņo ti attho, Кабай tavedan ti idah tava kammarn sudukkaran. 

Tato kumaro g. й.: 

зв. Na dukkararm kiñci-m-ah' ettha maññe 

уо maccum* icche pituno pamokkhā 
mātu’ са betü paraloka gamya' 
sukhena saggena са sampayutto ti. 86. 

Тацћа kiñc! mahettba mapüe tl kicl abai ettha патаййаш!, idam 
votta boti: yakkba уо puggslo pitu và pamokkbattbāya” mâtu +&* betu’ 
рагаіокаф gantvā sukhena!° anggo nibbattanasukhena!'l sampayutto bbsviturh 
maccum iccheə!3 maritum jechati, tasmë aharh ettha mātāpitunnarh atthāya 
Jivitepariccóge kiñci dukkararh па шаппашїп, 

Таш sutvë yakkho ,kumara maranassa abbayanakasatto ” 
оёта п' atthi, {уаш kasmā па Ъћауавіц“ россћі, So tassa 
kathento dve ра{Ьй abhāsi: 

24. Ahañ ca kho attano pápakiriyarh 

йүї!* raho уёрі'° sare па jātu, 

garnkhatajátimarano'" ап asmi, 

yath' eva me idha tathá parattha. 87. 
°з. Kbād' ajja man дап} mahānubhāva, 

karassu Кїссапї imam sarirarh, 

rukkhassa уй te papatámi'' аррй, 

chādayamāno' me уап!” {уаш adesi marhsan ti. 88, 
Tattha ваге па Jštü "И екафвеп’ eva па?0 aarāmi, sam khištajáti- 


maranobamasmiti31l ahah ñaánena suparie,hinnajátimarapo Jitasatto32 smara- 
padbammo пёша n'atthíti Jšnimi. yatheva те {аһа ’ti yath' ета?? mama 


1 Bd mattam. ? Вг pamukha. °’ Chz са. * Bd mattbum. ° so all three MSS. 
for matuc-? * Bd -kah gantsš. 7 Bd рашоккћа-. ° В• adds pitu тё. 9 Bd 
айһёуа. 10 Bd sukha ssggena ti. '? Bd nippatita-. ' Bd mattumicche t 13 
Cke abbšá-. 14 Ck Ва avi. 15 Che capi. 16 all three МЗ8. -játl-. !? Cs pi- 
patimi, Bd omits pi. !# во Сї; Bd chādamāno. 1° Сіз me ya, Bd таућай. 
29 Ске omit na, 21 Ске -Jšti- asminti, Pd -jatimarano, omitting hamasrmitl. 
29% Bd Н attho in Ње place of já-. 22 Ckz tathova. 


10 


15 


20 


10 


?0 


#5 


39 ХУІ Tirnsanipšta. 


idba tethā paraloke tathă idhâpi maransto оі! пата п! atthiti idam ше? 
йапепа suparicchinnsh, karassu Кісеапісі iminë sarirena kattabbahiccšuí 
kara), iman te mayā nissattharn sarira, сһадауашапо* me yantvama- 
Фезітатвап i ti mayl rukkbaggà patitvi mate шаша вагўгаќо (тага chšda- 
уашёпо? rocayamāno yam yam icchasi (ап tañ пагава айеві* khadeyya- 
siti attho. 
Yakkho tassa vacanarh sutvā bhito hutvá „na sakká imassa 
mamsáni khāditurh, орёуера паш palápessámiti“ cintetvā 
эв. Idañ са? te ruccati râjaputta : 
сајӣзі'° рарат pituno pamokkhi '!, 
tasiná hi во"? (уат taramëanarüpo 
sambhbañja kattháni јајеһі ' aggin ti а. 89. 
Tattha јаіер ті 12 агаййайз pavisitvă өётадагоні Āharitvā aggirh }а!е1уа!® 
niddhüme!* айё ге Кага tattha te тагзый pacitvë khädiseãmtıi dipeti. 


So tathā katvā tassa santikah адатаі, 


Таш Кагапаш pakăsento S. itarah gātbam аһа: 

вт. Tato һате '° dhitimá rājaputto 
дага samāhatva™' mabantam aggim'' 
sandipayitvā ?# pativedayittha '': 
ādīpito dāni таһйуат aggiti' 90. 

Yakkho aggin. katvā āgatam kumaram oloketvā „ayat 
purisasīho*!, maranena? pi ‘ssa bbayarn п' atthi, mayá etta- 
Каф kálam evam nibbhayo nāma па ditthapubbo“ ti loma- 
harnsajáto kumärah punappuna™? olokento оіѕїйі. Kumāro 
tassa kiriyarh disvā g. ā.: 

эв. Кһай` ajja тап dāni’”' равауһаКагї?, 

kim mam muhum pekkhasi hatthalomo, 


! Bd auto ? Bd таша. ? Bd karape. * Rd khādamāuo. * CE yantvarh 
mandasi-, С“ yantvari madesi-. lid mayhan tvamadesi masan in the place 


of me--. ^ Cè sariro. 1 Ва khādayamāno. 6 Bd khadesl, ° во all three 
MSS. force? 10 Ck сагаві, Се cchàsi. © Па o. 12 СЕ han, Cz bha, © Bd j&-. 
14 Ва nanidbñ-. !5 Ско bha-. ?% Ck -bhatva, Ва -hantvš. 17 а three MSS. -1. 
19 Ck sandhi-, Bd sannl-. !# Ске „ипо, Dd pati-, 29 Bd maháyskkhamaggiu. 1! 


Hd -sostho мїун. 33 Bd haranā. 33 14 пот. 34 Dd тайдан, 93 CK pd гі. 


3. Jeyaddisajataka. (513. 83 


(аа tathā tuyham ahan karomi 
yathā yathá marh chādamâno' adesîti. 91. 


Тайһа mubun tl punsppuna, tatbš tatbā tuyhamaban t! аһап 


tuybarn tathā баһа? vacanah karomi, idâni? Магівваоі yatbå ула таш 
chädayamāno < adesi khadissasl, tasuā КЬ’ ajja man tl. 


Ath’ assa’ vacanam sutvá yakkho р. ā.: 
о. № е(айїватї* arahati khāditāye” 
dhamme thitam saccavādih vadaññum, 
muddhåpi tassa vipphaleyya’ sattadhā 
yo tādisarn вассауййїїї adeyyā ‘і. 92. 
Tam sutvā kumāro „sace mam na khāditukāmo si atha 


kasmā dārūni’ bhañjāpetvā aggih kāresîti™®“ vatvā ,pala- 
yissati nu kho no ti tava parigaņhatthāyā“ `Н vutte „tvar 
idāni mam kathah pariganhissasi, so'' "ай tiracchānayoniyarb 
nibbatto Sakkassa™ devarañño айапат pariganhiturh'* na" 


adásin“ ti vatvā 


а:. Indain" hi so brāhmanņarh'* maññamâno (vol. HI p. в.) 
ваѕо '' ауйвеві ™® sake sarire, 
ten’ eva so candimā devaputto 
sasatthuto ™ kāmaduh’ ajja™ yakkho ti š. 93, 


Tass’ attho: ийат 't' hi во sasapandito brāhmaņo eso ti bråbmaņai 


maññamšuo ejja Iwaib sarira khaditvë idba vasā 'tI!'2 eçarh sake sariro attano 
aarirarn dátur avāsesi’®? уйвйёравї1%* attbo вагігай c’ assa bhakkbattháya айёзі, 
Sakko pabbatarasath piletvā ādêya candamandale sasalakkbanarh akāsi, tato 


patt. 


(һауа ten eva ваѕајаккћађапа so сапдішё devaputto sasi sasiti evarh sa- 


satthuto?® Jokassa kimaduho2?2° pemavaddhano °? ajja?! yakkho virocati, 
kappatthlyarh h’ eteih 3° ра!1Һагїуап tl, 


! Bd kbšda-; read chàdamšn'? > Ck? omit опе tathā. 3 Bd adds kim. * Ск 


са-, 


Bd khā-, adding rocanamäno, Ве adds госаувтапо. ° Bd kumārassa in 


the place of atbassa. 6 Hd ko tā-. 7 Ва -tâse. ° Ck vipa-, Сг vipbe-, Bd 
рһа!еууий. ” all three MSS -цпі. 10 Bd kāresiti, Ck’ Като, 1 Bë yo, 


Ээ Ck āva-, Се ёға-. 2! Са va-, 2% Ck easutthato, Bd sasatthuko. 2% Bd -rubo. 


Bd sakka, !3 Ck -tun. !4 Bd omita па. !5 во Ce; Bd idam, Ck па idarn. 
Ве -po. 17 Bd yaso. 18 Ck Bd а-, С*а- corr. to а-, 19 Bd sasatihako, 
Bd -ууһајјв. 3° C> indain corr, to idam, Bd Idam, Ck па idari. 28 Bd Ы, 


Bd -vsdhano. °° pd sjjapi. 7° Bd kappaltbiyañhetain, Cks kappathitiyath-. 
жаза V. 8 


10 


15 


#5 


10 


з0 


85 


ad XVI. Timsanjpata. 


Tar sutvā yakkho kumārarn vissajjento 
s. Cando yathā Rāhumakhāä pamotto 
virocate pannarase уа Ыһапита 
evarh tuvarh ' porisadá pamutto 
viroca Kampilla mahānubhāva" 
âmodavarh® pitararh mâātarañ са, 
sabbo ca te pandatu ñatipakkho' ti а, 94, 

Tattha Ьһаппшща ti suriyo, 1. v, h.: уза? pannarase Rihumukbā pa- 
mutto cando vå bhšnuma vā virocati eva tvam pi mama запа шоко 
Kamplllaratthe vlroca mabānubhāvā ‘ti, nandatū `ti tnasatu е. 

„Gaccha mahāvīrā“ "і M-am пууојеві. So pi tam 
nibbisevanarh katvā pañcasilani' datvā ,yakkho nu kho eso 
no“ ti pariganhanto „yakkhānarh akkhini rattāni honti animi- 
sãui, chāyā па panñayati. asambhītā honti, náyam yakkho, 
manusso esa, шауһаш kira pitu tayo bhātaro yakkhiniyā 
gahitá, tesu táya' dve khāditā bhavissanti eko'° puttasinehena 
patijaggito bhavissati'', iminā tena bhavitabbam, imam uetvā 
шауһай pitu’ ácikkhitva гајје patitthápessāmîti“ cintetv& 
„‚еуат '? bho, na (уай yakkho, pitu me jetthabhëátiko si, ем 
mayá saddhih gantvā kulasantake гајје chattarm ивйреһїїї“ 
vatvā itarena „„пйһагп manusso‘ ti vutte „па tvarh mayharh 
saddahasi, atthi pana so yassa saddahasiti“ pucchitvá ,„atthi 
авика апе dibbacakkhutapaso'*“ ti vutte ќат ādāya tattha 
agamāsi. Tāpaso tam disvā va „Кїї Кагопрбо'* pitāputtā 
агапйе carathā“ 'ti vatvā tesarh ñātibhāvaro ,kathesi. So! 
porisādo tassa saddahitvā „tāta tva gaccha, аһа ekasmirh 
yeva’ attabhāve dvidha'' jāto, na me rajjen' attho, pabba- 
jissëm` ahan“ ti tāpasassa santike isìipabbajjarù pabbaji. Atha 
narn kumäro vanditvá nagaram agamási. 


1 Oks twan. 2? Che -çü. 3 Bd атойауа. * Сёз pamokkhā. 5 Bd сафа. 6 Bd 
adds vå. ' Bd -Јаді. ° Вӣе «tuno. ° Bd omits taya. '° Ck elte, C? eko 
corr. to eko. '! Bd stiti, '? Bd ghi. !2 Dd -kkħukatā-. 1 во all three MSS. 
15 Bd -omits so. 135 Bd -ññeva. !? Сә duvidhi. Ck dvi- corr. to duvi-, Bd 
duvidbo. 


3. Jayaddisajātaka, (513.) 85 


Tam attham pakāsento S.' 
эз. Tato have? dhitimā rüjaputto 
katañjali paggayha ' porisadam 
аппййй{о sotthi sukhi arogo 
paccãga' Kampillam Alinasatto* і 95. 
găthah vatvā tassa nagaram gatassa negamādīihi katakiriyam das- 
sento osânagātham а. : 
эв. Tam negamā jānapadā са sabhe 
hatthārohâ rathikā pattikā ca 
namassamānā panjalika-m-upagamurp °: 
nam’ atthu te, dukkarakārako siti. 96. 

Ваја" „kumāro kirágato*“ ti sutvā рассиррапапаш akāsi. 
Kumāro mahājanaparivāro gautvā rājānah vandi. Atha паш 
so pucchi: „tāta kathah tădisā porisādā mutto siti“ „Täta 
пйуаш yakkho, tamhákam jețthabhātā’ esa mayharh реќќеууо“ 
ti sabbapavattirh"' ārocetvā ,tumhehi mama petteyyarh datthurh 
vațtatiti“ аһа. Rājā tam khaņah ñeva bherib сагаре{уй 
mahantena parivārena tăpasänarh santikam '° agamāsi. Маћаќа- 
раво tassa'' yakkhiniyā ānetvā akhāditvā positakáranañ са 
yakkhabhāvakāraņañ са ™ tesan ñátibhávañ ca sabbar vitthā- 
гепа kathesi. Баја „ehi bhātika, rajjah kārehîti“ аһа. 
„Alan mahârājā“- ‘ti, „Tena hi etha”, uyyāne vasissatha, 
ahah vo catupaccayehi™ upațthahissāmiti“.  , Nágacchami "° 
mahārājā“ `1, Raja tesa азваша(о'* avidüre екаф pabba- 
tantarah™ khandhāvāram™ bandħitvā mahantarh talšákarp 
kāretvā kedáre sampādetvā mahádhanam'° Коааваћавваї ānetvā’? 
mahaágamarh°' nivesetvá?t tāpasānarnh bhikkháhararm ° pattha- 
pesi. So gāmo Cullakammasadammanigamo °" jāto. Suta- 


1 Bd adds аһа. 2 Ok bha-. > Bd -hà, Ckz pariyagā. * Bd paccāgamā. ° Eq 
-linna-. $ геад: namassamān’ айј-? Rd pañJaligata up-. ? Сёз * Ra 
-tiko. * Ва sabbarn-. !° Ва -ka. '! Rd tassā. °? Ck omits yakkha-. “Bd 
eitha. !* Rd catühi-. !? Bd ца а2-, Се na џа-. }%* Bd agumapadato. " Cs 
pabbatattararn? Bd рарра(ата. !# Cka omit khan-. 2° Fd mahautaro. 20 
Rd adds mahädhana:n kulacahassarh, 21 Bd omits mahā. 2 Bd nivāsetvā. ® 
ВФ -3cararn. #* Bd khuddakak - - nàma, 


3% 


© 


35 


36 XV]. Тийвапірёта 


somamahāsattena рогіѕёдаѕѕа damitapadeso' Маһакаттаӣва- 
dammar °’ оётё 'ti veditabbo. 


S. i. d. а. 5, р. j. 5. ($ассарагїуовйпе måtiposakatthero” воїй- 
pattiphale patitthahi): ‚Тада müëtapitaro maħārājakulāni ahesum, 
їёразо Sāriputto, ропзйдо Angulimšlo, Eanitthë Uppalavannë, agga- 
mahesi Rāhulamātā, Alīnasattukumāro‘ aham етйё`* і. Jeyaddisa- 
jātaka т. 


4. Chaddantajātaka. 


Kinnu socasîti. Idam S. J. v. ekam daharabhikkhunim 
&. k. 58 kire Savatthiyam ека kEuladhita gharāvāse ādīnavarm disvā 
pabbajitvā екайітазаш bhikkhunīhi saddbim dhammasavanaya gantrāà 
alamkatadhanımāsane nisiditvā Чһаттап  desentassa Dasabalassa 
aparimüëñapuúñappabhavanibbattam uttamarüpasampattiyuttan atta- 
bbávam oloketvë ,.paricinnapubba ` nu kho me bhavamhi carantiyā* 
їшазза purisassa pādaparicārikā`™™ ti cintesi. Ath’ assā tam khanam 
пета }а!їззагайпйпат цррајјі: .Chaddantavāraņakāle ahah imassa 
"ti. Ath’ assā sarantiyā 
mehantam pitipāmojjam uppajji. Sà pitivegena mahābasitam basitvā 


purisassa pādaparicāârikā bbutnpubba:': 


puna cintesi: „pādaparicārikā nāma sāmikānsh hitajjbasayá hi’ 
арраКа* aħitajjhasayā va bahutarā, hitajjbāsayā nu kho aham imassa 
purisassa ahosim ahitajjhāsayā"“ ti за anusseramānā „abam appa- 
mattakain !° dosah hadaye thapetvā visamratanasatikam Chaddanta- 
mahāgajissarah Sonuttarah пата nesādańn pesetvā visapitasallena '' 
vijjbāpetvāå jivitakkhayam püšpesin!?%“ ti addase. А’ assā soko 
udapåādi, hadayam ипһаш ahosi, sā sokam sandhāretuh asakkonti 
assastvā passasitvā'? mahāsaddena parodi. Tari disvā S. sitam 
pātukaritvā'* „ko nu kho bhante hetu’? sitasse pātukammāyā"“ `ti 
bhikkhusatghena puttho ..bhikkbave ayam dahsrabhikkhuni pubbe 


mayi katah aperadham saritvë roditi vatvā a. ā.: 


t Бе adds pans. ? Rda -dammanigawo > Bå mwātu-. * Dd alina-. % Ck 
-cipuš-, Се pariminuā-e, РФ jarlciunaru-, Ba paricchinpa. °“ Hd уісв-. 7 во 
all three MSS. for -cariya? 6 Bd omite hi. ° Cts omit appakř, 19 Bd -kampi. 
11 Dd visayantena sallena, !3 Ck -sen. Bd -ṣi 12 Td omits pa-. 14 Rd рати. 
18 Ва adds ko paccayo. '* Bd rodatiti. 


4. Cbaddantajātaka. (514.) 37 


Atite Himavati! Chaddanta-daharm upanissãya atthasa- 
hass& hatthināgā vasirnsu iddhimanto уеһаѕауафрата”, Tadā 
Во. jetthakavāraņassa putto hutvā nibbatti, so sabbaseto abosi 
rattamukhapâdo. So aparabhāge vuddhippatto' atthásiti- 
hatthubbedho ahosi visarnratanasatāyāmo* atthapannásabatthëya 
rajatadāmasadisãya вопјёуа samannāgato, dantā pan’ assa 
parikkhepato panņarasahatthā ahesur dighato timsahatthá`' 
chabbannáhi rasmihi° samannágatá. So atthannam nāgasa- 
Һавѕ&ёпат jetthako ahosi, paccekabuddhe' рӣјеѕі. Tassa dve 
aggamahesiyo аһевит Cullasubhaddā Mahāsubhaddā сё 'ti. 
Kágarájá ațthasahassanāgaparivāro Kañcanaguháyan vaeati, 
So рапа Chaddantadaho āyāmato са vitthārato ca paññäsa- 
уојапо hoti, tassa majjhe dvādasayojanappaniāņe tháne sevšálarh 
vä paņakah’ vā п' atthi, manikkandhavannam udakam eva 
santitthati. “adanantararn yojanavitthatarn suddharh kalla- 
háravanam * tarn udakarh parikkhipitvá thitarp. Тайайашагаш 
yojanavitthatam eva suddharh'° niluppalavanarh tarn parikkhi- 
pitvā thitarn, yojanayojanavitthatáp' eva rattuppalasetuppala- 
rattapadumasetapadumakumudavanëáni purimam purimam pa- 
rikkhipitvá thitëni, ішеваф рапа sattannarn vanánam anantararn 
sabbesam рі tesarb kallaharadivasena!' опізѕакауапаф yojana- 
vittbatam eva (ёрі рагіккћірііуа thitam. “adanantaram nā- 
gānarh patitthappamëne'*' udake yojanavitthatam eva rattasāli- 
vanam. Tadanantararo udakapariyante nilapitalohitodátasura- 
bhisukhuniakusumasamaškinnarn khuddakagacchavanam. Iti 
iináni дава vanāni yojanayojanavitthatán'eva. Tato khuddaka- 
гајашаћһагајатӣватирратапатф. Tadanantaram tipusaelalukalá- 
bokakumbhaņdavallivanāni ‘°. Тао pügarukkhappamanam '* 
ucchuvanarh. Tato hatthidantappamánarmn'" kadaliphalarh 


1 Bd -vaute. *# Bd хеһёвай-. 1 Pd vudhi-. (Dd visa га- * Bd casa-. * Bd 
rarbsihl. ' Bd pañcasate рассека-. * Ck pana-, С: panna-. ° Bd kalla... 20 
Сів suddha 1! Ба kellëbšršdinarb vasena. 12 Bdr katippa- 32 Bd -vanam. 
14 CE puga-, Bd pugga-. 15 -йапда-, adding phalarh. 


90 


10 


15 


38 XVI Tinsanipšta 


kadalivanam, Tato sàlivanarn. “adanantararn сайїрратйпа- 
phalarn' panasavanam. Tato madhuraphalarn ciñcavanarm. 
Tato kavitthavanarn', “ato omissako mahāvanasaņndo’. Tato 
venuvanam. Ayam assa tasmim kale sampatti, Samyuttattha- 
kathāya pana idáni vattamanasampatti yeva kathita, Venu- 
vanari‘ pana parikkhipitvā sattapabbatā thitá, tesarh háhiran- 
tato° pattháya pathamo Cullakálapabbato° паша, dutiyo 
Mahakalapabbato” пата, tato Udakapabbato ° nāma, tato 
Candapassapabbato nāma, tato Suriyapassapabbato пёша, tato 
Manipassapabbato паша, tato° sattamo Suvannapassapabbato 
пата, so ubbedhato sattayojaniko Chaddantadaharh parikkhi- 
pitvā pattassa mukhavatti viya thito, tassa abbhantarimapassarmn 
suvannavannarn, tato nikkhantena obhāsena Chaddantadaho 
samuggatabālasuriyo viya hoti, bahirimapabbatesu'° pana eko 
ubbedhato cha yojanāni eko pañca еко cattāri eko tīni eko 
dve eko уојапат. Evari sattapabbataparikkhittassa рапа 
tassa dahassa pubbuttarakanne udakavátapaharanokáse mahā- 
nigrodharukklo '', tassa khandho parikkhepato pañcayojaniko 
ubbedhato sattayojaniko, catüsu disāsu catasso sākhā сһауо- 
janikā, uddharm uggatasākhâpi chayojapiká va, iti so mūlato 
patthāya ubbedhena terasayojaniko sākhānaih огішапќаќо yāva 
рагітапі& dvădasayojauiko'® atthahi pārohasahassehi"™ pati- 
mandito Mundaianipabbato viya vilasawāno'* titthati. Chad- 
dantadahassa pana pacchimadisābhāgena™ Suvannapabbate 
dvādasayojanikā Кайсапариһа. Chaddanto'* nāgarājā vassā- 
ratte atthasahassanāgaparivuto Kañcanaguhāyam vasati, gimha- 
каје udakavātan sampațicchamāno mahānigrodhamūle páro- 
hantare " titthati. А’ assa ekadivasa „„таһаза1ауапаш 
риррћіќап“ ti ārocayirsu, so sapariváro „săālakīļarn kilissamiti% 


1 Cka „паф-. ? Bà kanitha-, B# kaplttha-. 3 Bd sondo. * Bd tato veluvanam. 
è Bd -rantarato. 5 Cs -kšla-, Rd cula-. 7 Сә -kàla-. " Cks udakapassapah-. 
9 Ce Bd omit tato. 10 во СЮ; Hd bāhirapa-. 11 Вг add atthi. !? НЕ -ká. 
13 Ck roba-, Bd рого-. '* Ck Dd vila-, C? vila- corr. to у. 15 С. bd -ge. 
16 Ва adda паша, !? Bd poro-. 


4. Chaddantajātaka. (514.) 39 


tarh вајауапаі рапіуа eka supupphitah в&1агоккһат kum- 
bhena pahari. Тайз! Cullasubhaddā uparivātapasse {ҺИй, 
їавва sarire ѕиКЕһадапјакатівѕӣпі“ рогёпараппёпі с’ eva 
tambakipillikāni са patimsu. Mahāsubhaddā рапа? adhovata- 
passe thitá, tassā sarire puppharenukiújakkhapattëni patithsu, 
Cullasubhaddā‘ ,attano piyabhariyāya upari puppharenukiñ- 
jakkbapattāni pātesi, тата sarīre sukkhaądapdakamissāni 
Mahāsatte veram bardhi. Aparam рі divasarh nāgarājā sa- 
parivāro nahánattháya Chaddantadaharh otari, atha dve taruna- 
оёрё sondehi usirakalape gahetvā Kelāsakūțah majjantā viya 
nahāpesurh, tasmiń nahātvā uttinne dve kaneruyo' nahápesum, 
1&рі uttaritvā М-авѕа santike attharnsu. Tato atthasahassa- 
пара saran otaritvā udakakilarh kīlitvā sarato nānāpuppbāni 
āharitvā rajatathüparn alamkarontaá' viya M-am_ alarhkeritvā 
рассһа dve kaņeruyo* alamkarirhsu. Ath’ еко hattbi, sare 
vicaranto sattuddayamahāpadumarn° labhitvá āharitvā M-assa 
adāsi. So tahm sondaya gahetvā reņuh kumbhe okiritvā 
jetthikaya° Mahāsubhaddāya adāsi. Tam disvā itarā „idam рї 
ваїїпйдауатаһарайишаш!'° attano piyabhariyāya eva dadāti 
па mayhan“ ti puna рі tasmim veraro bandhi. Ath’ eka- 


` 


divasarh B-tte madhuraphalāni с" eva bhisamolālāni" са 
pokkbaramadhunā yojetvā pañcasate paccekabuddhe bhojente ” 
Cullasubhaddā‘ attanā Jaddhaphaláphalarm рассеКаһиааһапаш 
datvā „ito dāni cavitvā Maddarājakule nibbattitvāSubhaddā nama 
rājakañāā hutvā vayappattā Bārāņasirañño aggamahesibhāvatn 
patvā tassa piyá тапара tarh attano гисіф káretum samatthā 
hutvā tassa ācikkhitvā ekarn luddakam'° pesetvā imam hat- 
thi visapitena Кардепа vijjhápetvš jlvitakkhayam päpetvä 


% Ске omit ta-. > Bd rukkba - - mlesskäni. 5 Ске omit рапа. * Bd cüla=, 5 
Ва adds ре. “ Bd karenukayo. 7 Bd -to, C? -tā соп. to -to. ° Ba 
-ЧЧаузп паша mihā-. * СЕ јәнына ti, Сә Jetthita ni. 10 Bd ¿yarbmaha-. 
12 pd -mülánl. !*% Сә -to corr. to -te. Bd -Jante. !3 Bd luddam, 


10 


15 


20 


95 


40 ХҮІ. Tirmsanipšta. 


chabbannararnhsi vissajjente yamakadante ahërapetur) samatthā 
homiti“ patthanath thapesi. Sā tato раф ауа росагат aga- 
betvā susaitvā nacirass’ eva Каат katvā Maddaratthe rāja- 
mahesiyā kucchismim nibbatti, Subhaddā ti 'ssā патат 
karimsu. Atha nam vayappattam Вагапаѕігайбо adamsu, sā 
(аваа piyā ahosi manāpā solasannam itthisahassánarm jețtțhikâ, 
jatissaraññanarh patilabhi. 54 ccintesi: ,,samiddhë me patthana, 
idāni tassa параѕѕа yamakadante āhārāpessāmîti“. Tato вагїгатћ 
telena makkhetvā kilitthavattharn nivásetvá рїЇёпйКагатї das- 
setvā' màñcake піра)јі. Ваја ‚„Киһїїї Subhaddā™‘ ti vatvā 
„gilänā“ ti sutvá sirigabbharn pavisitvā mañcake nisiditvá 
tassā рисі parimajjanto pathamam р. ā.: 
1. Кіп пи ѕосаѕі anujjañgi’, pandu вї varavannini, 

milāyasi visãlakkhi, mālā уа parimadditā (і. 97. 

Tattha апојјайр ії * kañcanasannibhasarire, mâlâ vs parimadditā 
ti batthehi parimadditapadumamiala viya. К 

Тай sutvå sà Магат gātham аһа: 

e. Ооћајо те mahārāja ѕиріпарќеп’ ирассарӣ, 

па so sulabharüpo уа yādiso шата dohalo ti. 98. 

Tattha па во ti yadiso шаша supinantena црассавё supinarh passantiyá 
mayá dittho dohalo во sulabharüpo viya па boti dullabho so, mayharh рана 
саф 5 alabhantiyá јіеі ат n' atthtti avoca є. 

Тат sutvā гаја gatham аһа: 

з. Үе keci mānusā kāmā idhalokasmirh nandane 
sabbe te pacurá mayharn, ahan te dammi dohalan ti. 99. 


Tattha pacurā ti bahū sulabha!. 


Тат sutva devi ,maharaja, dullabho mama dohalo, na 
nam idāni kathemi, yāvatakā рапа vo’ vijite ludda te sabbe 


1 Bd adda sirigabbharn paviaitvā. 7 Bd cülasu-, 2? Bd -cañgī. < Rd -cañgttl. 
5 pd сайса. * Ва -cab. 7 Ddz add bhadde subhaddā idhalokasmi manuseā 
кашё mauussehi pathiyamânā уе keci sattaratanarpandane шаповвећі ye keci 
pañca Кёшэвопё atthi sabbe te vatthukšámakilesskame аһаш te tuyham dadami 
° Bd te. 


4. Chaddantajataka (514., 41 


sannipātāpetha ', tesam тајјһе kathessámiti“ dīpentī auan- 
tarah g. а.: 
а. Luddā deva samāyantu ye keci vijite tava, 
etesarn aham akkhissam yádiso mama dohalo (1°, 100. 
Каја „sādhū“ °ti sirigabbhā nikkhamitva ,,yavatika ° 
tiyojanasatike Kāsiratthe luddá te sabbe* saonipatentü' 'ti° 
bheriñ сагаре{һа** 'ti атассе ӣапареѕі, te tathá akarmnsu. 
Nacirass' eva Käsirațthavāsino* ludda yathābalah pannaákiararn 
gahetvā’ ágatabhávarn raüño йгосарезшї, te sabbe рі satthi- 
sahassamattā ahesum. Каја tesarn aágatabhavarm ñatvá vāta- 
pāne thito Һаіһат pasāretvā (еваф āgatabhāvarh deviyā 
kathento 
5. Ime te luddakā devi katahatthā visāradā 
vanaññü са migaññü ca, тата te° cattajīvitā ti а. 101. 
Tattha ime te ti ye (хай sannipåtāpesijime te, katah|attha ti vijjhana- 
chedane sukatahattkā kusal3 suaikkbitā, visāradā ti nibbhayâ, тапайбӣ ca 


migaññü са Чї эапані ca mige ca Jšnantl, mama te” ti sabbe pl te таша 
cattajivitā, yam ahar '' iechāml tari karontiti, 


Тат satvā devī te āmantetvā itarar g. â.: 

a. Luddaputtä nisámetha yävant’ ettha samäāgatā : 
chabbisaánam '° раја setar addasarn sapinen’ ahar '°, 
tassa dantebi те attho, alabhe п' atthi jivitan ti. 102. 


Tattha nisāmethā ti випёїһа, chabbisäānan t chabbaņpnavisānņarih. 


Таш sutvå luddaputtā 
s. Na no pitunnamh na pitāmabānar 
dittho suto kuñjaro chabbisáno 


1 Bd -pātetba. ° Dd#zadd taitha deva уе keci tava vtjitā yattakā 10008 attbi 
вађђе te luddā samāyanti pakkosirisu ahar yādiso mama dohalo etesarh lud- 
дапат akkhissarn akkhlssams tari. > Bd -vattakā. < В ваф. * Bd sanni- 
pätatthāya in the placa of pan-. * Dd kāsikaratha-. 7 Bs add ágantvā. ° 
Сг omits ie, Bd bas haithe. ° Cs mama te corr, to mamatthe, Bd mamatte. 
10 Bd pi ca ele mamatte. С Bd -tå yam aysin. 8 Ck Bd -nah. 2 Вё 
зпріле ahar. 


20 


95 


5 


10 


15 


20 


25 


42 XVI. Tiùeanipãta. 


yam addasã' supine rājaputti, 
akkhāhi no уййїзо hatthināgo” ti bhāsińsu. 103. 
Tattbə pltunnap 1] karsnatthe ramivacanarn. 4, v. Ь,: n’ eva ашһёйат 


РИФ na pitimahehl evarüpo kuñjaro ditthapubbo pageva ашћећі, (авта attanā 
dițthalakkhanavasena аккћЫ ð no yādiso сауа dittho batthipago u. 


Anantara gāthâpi tehi' yeva vuttā: 

в. Disá catasso vidisë catasso` ° (vol. I p. 401.) 
uddharh adho, dasa disã* їтйуо, 
katamari: disah titthati парага]а 
yam addasā’ supine chabbisanan ti. 104, 


Tattha діва? (1 01626, kataman ti etāsu disāsu katamiya disāya. 


Evar vutte Subhaddáa" sabbe ludde oloketvå tesari 
antare patthațapādarh '° bhattaputasadisajarnpham'' mabājānurn 
mahaphásukam ' behalamassum tambadathikarm nihbiddha- 
piñgalarn™ dussaņnthānarh bhībhaccharh’* sabbesarn matthaka- 
matthakena paññäyamānarn M-assa pubbe verin Sonuttaram "° 
пйёта nesådarn disvā „esa пата уасапат !° káturh sakkhissa- 
tîti“ rājānam anujānāpetvā tarh ādāya sattabhūmakapāsādassa 
орагітаќаіат Āruyha uttarasihapañjararn vivaritvā Uttara- 
himavantābhimukharn hattharn pasāretvā catasso gāthā āthāsi. 

ө. Ito ujan" uttariyarn ™ disáyarh 

atikamma '° во satta giri* brahante 


ста 


Suvannapasso пата"! giri” uláro 
supupphito kimpurisánucinno. 105. 
зо. Aruyha selarn bhavanarmn?* Кїппагапатп 


olokaya” pabbatapadamülarm, 


L Сә „ва corr. to -вәт, Ed sa. 2 Ске hatthināho. 5 R bhak-. * Сіз 


gātbāki te. 6 Ck omits vi-. © Ске disa 1ā8. 7 СЕ disata, Сг diaātā. 5 Rds 
disāsu. ? Hd cülasu-. 10 Bd patthatha-. ®© Ck hattaputasšdisar-, Се 
bha - - вате. Nd -sadigha-. 2 Ck Bd -pà-. ' Bd nippaddhari-. '* Bd 
vibhajjari !5 Се sonu-. !® Ck esa саташа, Се esa mamamanah? 1 Ch -ŭ, 


16 Bd -га-, !# Ckratikka-. 29 ail three MSS. -гі. “1 во а three MSS. for 
рі? 2: во all three MSS. for bhavarh? ?* so all tbres MSS. for -у8? 


4. Chaddantajātaka. (514.) 43 


atha дакЕһаѕ1 терһаватапауаппагп 
nigrodharájarh atthasahassapadain'. 106. 
11. Tath'acchati kuñjaro chabbisáno 
sabbaseto'duppasaho рагеһ1°, 
rakkhanti пат * ațthasahassanāgā 
isádantá * vātajavappahārino. 107. 
19. Titthanti te bhimüla* раз$азапїй, 
kuppanti vātassa рі eritassa, 
manussabhütah рапа tattha disvá 
bhasmarh'kareyyumr, nàssa’ rajo pi tassā "і. 108. 
Tattha” Ito ti Imamha (иа, uttariyan?° ti uttarōyah'!, ulāro tl 
mabā'? itarell chahi pabbatehi uccataro, olok'ayā "Ч}!® оЈокеуудві, tatthac- 
chatitl tasmih nigrodbarukkhamūle gimhasamaye udakavëšterh sampatiechanto!* 
Ч ћасі, duppasaho ti аййе!® tari upagantvà равауһакёгат kāturh samatthā 
nëma п' atthîti duppasaho parehl?6, 1в3дапїй ti ratbisãaamānadantā, уёба- 
javappahārino ti vätajavena gantvå psccamittóo pabaranasila!?, bhimüla 10 
ti bhirhsanakarpahüsaddá nibaddhah?’? assâsain?? muñcantā”', erltas ti 
vātassa yan?’ saddšanubaddharh erltarn calanah kampansto tassa’? рі kuppanti?t 


evan plharusarn, nêesâ?® 'ti tassa nasšvátena ° viddhatbsltva bhasmañ) ka- 
сазва 27 tassa rajo?® рі na?’ bhaveyya. 


Tam шуй Sonuttaro™ maranabhayabhito *' 
1а. Bahū h' ime гајакшатћі santi 
pilandhanā* játarüpassa devi 


1 во Cks; Где -porath; read рі for attha? > so all three MSS. > Bd -bbi, 
* Ске tar. 5 Ра byšsanadartá. © so Dd for bhīmalā, Cik mülari, ' Ва 
asmī. Ó so Ck? for na? Bd nasš, D# nāsā. ° Bde add bho luddaputta во tvar. 
30 Hd „га-, .!' Dd -твуа disāyam, adding ujur рассһа gaecchâbi garntvana bra- 
haute ва(ќавїгі atlkkamwa atikkantena taya patharuameva chapabbate atlkkamitvā 
витайпарввзо паша giti kidiso. '? Bd mahbapto, 12 Chs si 34 Bd adds ac- 
chati. 16 Bds -ehi. '5 Bd parebhi, adding evarüpo kuñcaro tattha tasm! nigro- 
dhemüle gimhasamaye udakavätah sampalicchanto acchati titthati ludda аа 
sahassanāgā kirnhdiaš. '7 Dd adds evarüpš athassa nāgā narh rakkhanti. 1% Rd 
bħimūlen, Ch timüla. !*# Bd nubandbam. 20 Bd -ea passāsantā. 2! Cks muc- 
cantà, Hd тийсаша tibantl. 2° Bd vātepaharitesea yah. +7 Bd tassā. °?! 
Bd adds ta nägå taithe tasmi tháne араба тшапцазаһһШа dievā. "3 Ві 
павай, %* Ва nisavāteneva , 3: Ва katva. 26 Bd adds rajaññabhavarmn 
bhesmarh pi Eareyyuru. *% Ва omits ріпа. 30 Ca Dd sonu-- i Bd adds 
hutva. 32 На plladdhani. 


10 


15 


90 


5 


10 


15 


95 


44 XVI. Tibsanipita. 


muttā mani veluriyamayá са, 
kih káhasi dantapilandhanena!, 
одаһо ghātessasi luddaputte ti аһа, 109. 

Tattha pilandhanā? ti ābharaņāní, тө! пгіуатауа ti veluriyamayani, 
ghatessasitl udšhu pilandhanapadesena luddaputte ghătäpetukämâsiti pucchati3. 

Tato devī gātham аһа: 

14. 54 issita dukkhitā с" asmi ludda, 
uddhañ са* sussami anussaranti, 
karohi me luddaka etam attharh, 
dassāmi te gämavarāni райса ‘і. 110. 

Tattha за ti sã abam, anussarantiti tena +агапепа? шау! katarh 
verao anussaramănā, dassāmi te ti etasmih te stthe nippbadite вай- 
хаесһаге satasahassuttbānake райса game! dadāmîti. 

Evañ ca papa vatvà „атта luddaka “aharm etam° 
chaddantahatthiñ тагареіуа" yamakadante аһагаре!шї'° 
samatthā homîti’ paccekabuddhánarn dánarm datvā patthanarh 
thapesim, тауа supinantena dițthan" паша п' atthi, sā pana 
mayá patthitapatthană samijjhissati, tvarh gacchanto má uhá- 
уйі (ат samassāsesi™. So „sādhu ayyo!!1% (і tassā va- 
сапат sampaticchitvá „tena hi me pākațarh katvā tassa 
vasanoatthánarn Каёћећіі“‹ pucchanto 

15. Katth' ассһа1'* kattha-m-upeti thanam, 
vithi 'ssa kā nahánagatassa hoti, 
katharh '* hi so naháyati nāgarājā, 
Каат vijānemu gati рајаѕѕ& ‘і а. 111. 

Tattbs katthacchatiti kattha vasati, katthamupeti tbānan ti 
kattha tittbatiti attho, vithissa kā t! їазва паһёпадасавва kā Үй boti, 


kataramaggena пёша!6 gacchatii 17, katltharh viJšuemü “i tayā айа(һИе 
mayai katbarñ (азза gajassa gatih ғіЈапізвёша, (ава kathehi по ti nttho. 


1 Ва plladdbaneəna, adding maretukami kuñjeraiñ сһаЬЫвапап. 3 Сә -nani, 
Ва plladdhanā. * Ва puechi. * Bã» uddbacca, * НЯ adds рӣге. * Ck Bd 
піррг-. ? Bd varagšme te tuybah dassimi. ° Bd eba. ° Bd mārətvā, '0 
Cs ~tu. !! Bd аньг. !? Ва -ssãsiti. '® Bd -e.- 1$ all three MSS. -Ц. 18 
Ck kattha, С^ kattha corr. to kathari, Bd кааб. 1# Ва adda во, 1? Bd -ati 


3. Chaddantajštaka. (514.) 45 


Tato sā jătissaraññāņena paccakkhato ditthatthanarh tassa 
асіккћапії dve gāthā abbāsi: 
16. Tatth' eva sã pokkharani adüre 
гаштӣ 50008 са mahodiká' са 
sampupphitā bhamaragananucinná, 
ettha hi ао naháyati пёрага)а. 112. 

15. Sisam naháto' uppalamālabhārī 
sabbaseto pundarikattacarngi' 
āmodamāno* gacchati [san] niketarh 
purakkhatvá mahesim sabbabbaddan ti. 113. 

Тайша tatthevā “1 tasas vasanatthane yeva, pokkharaniti Chad- 
dantadaham вапдһёуёһа, sampupphitā tl duvidhehi kumudehi tiçldhbehi 
uppalehi райсатаппв\й са padumeh! samsntato pupphitá, ettha hi sọ ti so 
пёвагёј5 ettba Chaddantadahe nahäyat), uppalamālabhārîti uppalêdinam 
JalejathalajJánarn pupphānain аай bharauto?2, pundarīkattacaigitið pun- 
darikasadisattacabhävena?” odātena айрәпа samannāgato, âmodamāno® ti 
āmoditapamodito, sanniketan tÍ attano vasanatthânarn, purakkhatvā ti 
babbabbaddarh? nima їраһезїй purato katvā stthahl nëgasahassehi parivuto 
attano vasanațthänain gacrhati. 

Tam sutvā Sonuttaro „sādhu ayye, aban (аш уагапап 
māretvā dante ābarissāmîti“ sampațicchi. Ath’ assa sā 
tutth& sahassam datvá ‚„реһпап tāva gaccha, ito sattābacca- 
yena tattha gamissasîti“ tam wuyyojetvá kammāre pakkosá- 
petvā „tāta™ атһакаш vaásipharasukuddalanikbádanamutthika- 
velugumbacchedanasatthitinalayanaasilohadandakhapnukaayasim- 
ghaátakehi attho, sabbarh sīgham katvā аһага“ 'ti апйре(уй 
cammakāre pakkosāpetvā „tāta ambākarh kumbhakaragahikam !' 
саттађћавќаш!! Касип vattati'", cammayottavarattahatthipáda- 
upáhanacammachattehbi'* рі по attho, sabbam sigham katvā 
ābarā "і āņāpesi. Те ubho pi sabbāni їйпї sīghah katvā 


1 Rd -dakā. ? read nabšU? 2 СЕ -i, Bd punparikatthacañgi. * Ck Bd as 3 
Ва dbärento 6 Ck pundarikattha-, Bd pugnarikaithacañgitt, * Bd punnarl- 
kasadisattabhavena, 6 СЕ a-. 9 Che sabbarn-. 10 СЕ t3tá, Ce tåtā corr. (0 tata. 
11 Dd -gāōbakah. '2 Сә camma blastai. 1? Ска vatjatiti. 26 Ско yottañca- 
таба - -, Ce -urahanañca сат-, Bd -yottmih varattaii - - upåhanarh. 


10 


15 


25 


30 


10 


15 


20 


35 


46 ХУІ. Тіфвапірёх. 


āharitvā айап. Sā tassa раһеууаф samvidahitvë агаріва- 
hitan ádirn katvš' sabbath оракагапай са baddhasattuãdikamh " 
pëtheyyañ са cammabhastayam ракЕһірі, tam sabbam рі 
kumbhabharamattam аһозі. Sonuttaro рі attano parivacchath 
katvë sattame divase āgantvā devim vanditvā atthási. Аа 
nam së ,pitthitam te samma’ panthüpakaranam', їшаш“* tâva 
pasibbakam рапһа“ "і аһа. So pana mahāthāmo райсаппай 
һап һїпаш balah dhāreti, tasmā tah pūpapasibbakah’ viya 
ukkhipitvā upakacchaptare thapetvā rittahattho viya ațțhāsi. 
Cullasubhaddā’ luddassa dārakānah paribbayam datvā rañño 
ācikkhitvā Sonuttaram uyyojesi. So pi rājānañ ca deviñ са 
vanditvñ rājanivesanā oruyha rathe thapetvā mahantena pari- 
vërena папага nikkhamitvá gāmanigamaparamparāya’ paccan- 
ta patvā jánapade' pivattetvë Ppaccantavšsihi saddbim 
агаййаш рахіѕійта manussapatham atikkamma paccauntavasino 
рі nivattetvë ekako va gacchanto tirsayojanikah magga '° 
dabbagahanam Бёѕасаһапаф (їпагаһапаш!! tulasizahanarn '* 
sarazgahanam'* tirivacchagahanádini't chakantakasgumbaka- 
gahanaáni vettagahanañ omissakagahanam nmalavanasaravana- 
gahanasadisarh '° uragena pi dubbinivijjharn ghanavanagahanarmh 
rukkhacahaqarm velugahanam™ kalalagahanah udakacahanarn 
pabbatagahanan ti atthárasagahanaáni patipátiyë patvā" dabba- 
gahanadini asitepa laávitva'° tulasigahanādīoi venugumbacche- 
danasattheua chinditvá rukkhe pharasunā kottetvá'*' atimahante 
nikhādanena vijjbitvá maggaù karonto veluvaoe nisseniro katvā 
veļugumbai ` āruyba velurh chinditvā aparassa veļugumbassa 
upari pátetvá velļlugumbamatthaken’ eva дашуй kalalagahane 


V Ed аһагіста. * СА _sattutb-, Bd batidhasarthuidikaditvā, 3 Bd omits sas. * 
Bd sabbūpa-. ° Bd іЈаш. * Ck puppasimbakaiù, Bd tampulapasippa-. ' Bd 
omits culla, * Ba -nigama janapadatbyarauipariya ? Bd ja- 19 Ck tiġ- 
тојапа, Сг їййїзуо]аһїйаї шабаш corr. to titisayojanatp. M Rd adds sara- 
zabana. 12: Bd 01-. !3 (А sarasiga-. 1% Fd -Jitan vasena. $ Dd nala- 
раһәпаш зага- 18 Çs omits rukkbagshanarh veiugabanaii, U Bd petvi upa- 
ашта. 19 [d рајз-. 1° Cès kottbe-, Bd: kote- `? Bd ve'uvanizumban 


4. Chaddantejātaka. (514.) 


47 


sukkhapadararh' attharitvā tena gantvā aparath attharitvă 


itara khipitvā puna purato attharanto 


{ай atikkamitvā 


donirh katvă (ауа ойакасаһапат taritvë pabbatapāde thatvá 


ayasirnphátakarh yottena bandhitvā uddham 


khipitvá pabbate 


laggāpetvā yottenáruyha vajiraggena lohadandena pabbatarn 
vijjhitvā khāņukam kottetváë tattha “thatvá simghátakarh 
ākaddhitvā ропа прагі laggāpetvā tattha țhito cammayottarh 
olambetvā ќат ¿daya otaritvā hetthimakhánuke bandbhitvá 
vāmahatthena yottarn gahetvá dakkhinahatthena muggaram 
ādāya уойаш paharitvā khápukam niharitvá puna abhirühati, 
eten’ прёуепа pabbatamatthakarh áruyba parato” otaranto? 


purimapayen' eva patbamapabbatamatthake khánukam koțțetvā 


cammapasibbake yottarh* bandhitvā khanuke° 


уе{һеїуа * sayarh 


aotopasibbake nisiditva makkațakānarn makkatasuttavissajjana- 
karena yottarh vinivethento otari’, caminachattena vātarb рйһй- 
petvá sakuno viya оќагаєі? рі vadanti yeva. Буаз (азва 
Subhaddaya vacanarh айауа парага nikkhamitvā sattarasa- 
gahanäni atikkamitvā pabbatagahanarh patvā tatrâpi cha 
pabbate atikkamitvā Suvannapassapabbatamatthakarn abhirülha- 


Ъћёуат' ácikkhanto '° S. à.: 


аз. Tatth' eva so uggahetvána vākyar 


ādāya tuniñ ca дһапип са luddo 


'1 satta piri!” brahante 


vitureyyati 

Suvannapassam паше girih '? uláram, 

19. Aruyha selam Ыһатапат !' kinnarānam 
оІокауї'* pabbatapadamülam, 


tatth' addasā meghasamënavannarmp 


114. 


півгодћагајащ atthasahassapádam '*%. 115, 


t Ва sukkbarukkhapa-. 2? Dd pu-. ° Bd adda Изге. * Bd yottakam, * Bd 


*karn. * Bd pavedhitvi. 7 Bd -riti. 8 Па otarantlti. 


з Bd ablirūyba. !” 


Bde āvikaronto. 11 so Ске; Bd vitariyati. 12 all three MSS. +i, !? so all 


tbree MSS. Гог pi? ' so all three MSS. for bhavari? 
18 во Ске; Bds -рога›; read pi for attha ? 


13 all three MSS. -yi 


10 


15 


20 


95 


10 


95 


30 


48 XVI. Tihesanipāta. 


so, Tatth’ addasā kuñjaram chabbisánam 
sabhasetarn duppasaham parehi', 
rakkhanti nam atthasahassanaga 
isádanta? vatajavappaharino, 116. 

зт. Tatth' addasā pokkharanim adüre 
rammar sutitthañ са mahodikañ ° са 
sampupphitam bhamaraganüanucinnam 
yattha hi so nahâyati nagaraja. 117. 

ss, Disvāna nagassa gatim thitiñ са 
ЖЫ 'ssa уй nahānagatassa hoti 
opātam agañchi апапуагїро 
payojito cittavasãnugāyā ti, 118. 


Tettha во И bblkkhase во luddo 1ай eva sattabhümikapšsidatale 
tbitaya (авва  vacaparn uggabetvā saratünirañ 5 са mahidhanuā са ёддуа 
pabbatagahanain раїуй kataro пи kho Suvauuspassapabbsto nāmā і satta 
mahāpabbate vítureyyšti% tasmiń kale tuleti tireti, во evarı tīrento Suvanna- 
passari паща girivarah? disvā аумй во bhavissatiti cintesi, olokeyiti tati 
kinnaräųņarh bhavanabhütari pabbatah aruyha Subbaddäya dinnasaññavasena? 
hbetthá!9 olokesi, tatthā `ú tasmiir pabbatapadamüle evldüre yeva tañ 
nigrodher oddasa, tatthā 'ú tasmin nigrodhamūle thitaru, tattbā 'ti tattb' 
eva antopabbate tassa nigrodhassa а\їййге!! yattha so nabāyati tah pokkha- 
raņiib addasa, disvanā 'ti gathšyar Suvanņapassapabbatā oruyba hatthinati 
gatakāle batthipādakaupābanah šñnyha tassa magarañño gatəilbānarh nibaddha- 
vasanațthānāni'’ upadbārento iminā magpena gacchati idha nabāyati паћауіста2° 
uttipno idbs tittbaiiti ваба діву аШгікаЫһахена anariyarüpo taya clita- 
vasānugāya payojito tasmā opata āgañchi?* patipajji, атй{а1п khaniti attho. 


Tatthüyarn ° anupubbikathā: so kira M-assa vasanokásam 
sattamāsäādhikehi sattehi samvaccharehi’® sattadivasehi patvā 
vuttanayepa tassa" уаѕапокаѕа№ sallakkhetvā idha avatarh 
khanitvá'° ,tasmirh thito vāraņādhipatirh '° vijjhitvā jivitakkha- 
yam раревѕашіїі“ vavatthapetvā araññam pavisitvá thambhA- 
dinam?° atthāya rukkhe chinditvā dabbasambháre sajjetvā 


1 Bd -bhi. 2 Bd Ьуава-. 8 Bd -da-. * Bd adds subbaddāya. * Cka -tunhirañ. 
Ва -гцпһіа. € во Ске; Bd vitarlyatīti. 7 Bé gīriulārarn. * Ска -parnbhü-. ° 
Ва -saññäyavasena, 10 Cks add па. >! Bd adds patrā. '* Dd nibandharı 
уавапа1һдпат. 18 Bd лЬаіға, !* Bd tasmā upātarh ёрассші, Ске бавѕ& ovādariı 
ñpañchi. 15 Rd tatrāyarn, '6 Dd adds са, 17 CE тавѕё, Сә taseā corr. to tassa. 
18 Сә Ва -ni-, Ck enis, 19 Ва adds хівариепа kandena. 29 Bd sambhārādinam. 


4. Cheddantajātakar (514.) 49 


batthisu nahānatthāya gatesu tassa thānokāse' mahākuddālena 
caturassarh ávátarh khanitvā uddhațaparhsum * bijah vapanto viya 
udake vikiritvā udukkhalapasánánam upari thambhe patițtthā- 
petvā tulā ca Касе? са datvā padarāni attharitvā kandappa- 
manam сһідбаф katvā upari parnsuü са kacavarañ са pakkhi- 
pitvā ekena равѕепа attano pavisanațthānah katvā етап 
пие ауаќе paccūsakāle yeva patisisakam pațimoðcitvă 
Каѕауаоі paridahitvā saddbir visapītena* ваПепа dhanur 
ādāya āvāțarh otaritva афазі. 


Tam attham pekāsento S.‘ : 

as. Каїтйёпа* Казий phalakehi сһабауі 
attānam odhāya dhanuū ca luddo, 
passagatam puthusallena пйёрат 
samappayi dukkatakammakariti увіуё! 119. 

a4. Viddho ов паро" koñcam anādi ghoram °’, 
sabbe ув !° nāgā ninnadumi '' ghorarūpam, 
бова св Каўћаб ce cunna ” karonta 
dhëvimsu te atthadisā samantato. 120. 

ss. Vadhissam etan ti" parāmesanto 
kāsāvam '* addakkhi dhajam isinam, 
dukkbena pbuttass' udapadi '° ваййа: 
вгаһаддБајо '* sabbhi avajjharupo!' ti а. 121, 


Tatha одЬёуё "1 'odabitvā pavesetva, passšgatan ti attano’? avšlassa 
š! uttinpo"® tasmim 


paesa арасат. во Кіта dutiyadivase agantvà naha 
mabavlsšlamšlake nāma райеве atthësi, ath’ aasa sarirato udakarb3' nkbhippa- 
desena ogalltvë23 tena cbiddena 23 luddassa ѕагїге pati, tàya ѕабйёуа во М-авка 
āgantvā tbitabhšvani баба (ай ?4 раявёраќаі puthunā sallena ветаррауі?5 viJjhi, 
dukkatakammakiarit| tasaa М-авва?% käyikacetasikessa dukkhassa \ррї- 
danena dukkataasa kammassa karako, koñcamaniaditi kocanšdarh kari, tassa 
hira tath ваЦаф 21 nabhíyë pavlsitvā pibakādīni ssrñcunuitvë aniåni cbindleva 


1 Hd vasanokāsain. 3 Се -ви, Hd uddhatarnparhsu. ? Bd -je. * Ва adds се. 5 
П adds аһа. * Ва kheņitvā. * Са Bd omit vatva. 5 во all tbree MSS. for во? 
» Cks ku-. 19 Bd ca. 11 во all (тев MSS. for nadum? 19 Che ranam. !% 
Ва vadhissāminautl, J+ Cka „уай, '3 Ck puttbh-, Bd puth-. 1% Bd aberad- 
дһе)о. !! CE avajja-, Ва apajba- ' Dd add са. 19 Bd nbatvá. °’? Ck -e. 
71 Ck Ва „ка 2 Ва ogalbitvā. 232 Cts omit chiddena. 3: Bd omite тап > 
Ck samapeyi, Cs вашрауі. 3° Bd omite m-aesa. 7? Rd sallena, 


Jaska. V. 4 


10 


15 


90 


35 


30 


15 


90 


25 


30 


50 ХҮІ. Tirssnipšáta, 


pltthibhágarb pbarasuna phālentah? siya uggantvå ākāse pakkhandi, bhinna- 


Tajatakumbhato rajatarh? vlya pal шийһепа lohitarn paggharl, balavavedanā 
uppajji, во vedanam adhfvâseturh ssakkonto vedanāmatto wakalapabbatarn eka 
ninnšdsm karonto tikuhatturn mahentah koñcanādami nadl, взЪЪеу&? ‘^ti te 
рі sabbe аї:Һазаһазеё naga tah saddam sutvà maraņebhayabbită ghorarüparn 
ninnadurn *, сиппаш® kerontā ti tena saddenâgantvāä’ chaddantavāraņpath 
vedanāmattah disvš paccàmittah ganhissama ‘і (пайса katthañ са cunnari- 
сипай karontā dhāvlhsu, vadhissametan ti? bhikhbave во chaddanta- 


våraņo disi pakkhantesu па еви Subhaddăya kaperuyš? passe thatvë sandharetvá 
samassãsayamānäya тејапаф adbiväsetvā kandasss āgataithānarn saliakkhento? 
aaco іслаш 1 puratihimadisšdihi agatarn bhavissa 1! kuwbbādibi pavisitvā paccbi- 
makāyādībi nikkhamissati Imari 10 pana паЬһиї!# pavisitvā škšsarñ pakkhantarh 
tasmā patbeviyain thitena vossattharn!? bhavissatiti upadharetvà thltattbšnarn 
upaparikkbitukāmo ko jänåti kim bhavissati Subhaddert арапейип vatțatit* 
cintetvá bhadde atthasahassanágá шаша paccàmittaiii perlyesantă dl!sá pakkbantā 
tvar idha kih karositi vatvā deva abarn tumbe sandhāretvā samassāsenti'i 
1105 khamatha me ti tikkhatturn padakkhinari katvå catüsu thānesu vanditvA 
taya &кават pakkbantāye bhūmih pädanakhene pahari, padara uppatitvā 
васат, во 15 chiddena olohento Sonuttararn 1° disvā vadhiseamž etan ti? сїйл 
Tajatadāmavannain sondah pavesetva рагашавапіо Buddhādīnań isīnah dhaJato 
Кавйуагп addakkhi, luddo kāsāvarh М-авза hatthe tbapesi, во tam ukkhipitvā 
purato thapesi, ath’ авва tena!’ tatharüpenëpi dukkhena pbutthapsn!’ ara- 
haddhajo!®” пёша sabbhi?? panditehl avajjharūpo?! añūadatthu?? sakkātsbbo 
garuhâtabbo yevā ti ayah saññaá udapādi, so tena saddbimh ssllapanto gâthe- 
dvayam а, : 


зв. Anikkasāvo kāsāvarh уо уаќћаћ paridahessati *° 
apeto датазассепа па зо kāsāvam вгаһаёі. 192. (Dhp. »-10. 
38%, П. 158, Тһегар. V. vev.) 
зт. Yo са vantakāsāv’' assa silesu susamahito 
upeto damasacceua sa уе kāsāvam arahahîti, 123. 
Tass' attbo: вашта luddaputta уо purlso rāgādībl kasāvehi anikkasāvo 


dindriyadamanena?t c' eva vacisaccena са?5 anupagalo tehi gunehi Кавёуагава- 
Vavatthari paridabati 802 tain kësšvarh nârahait, ananucchaviko?? во 


риат 


1 Ck pål-, Се phāl-, Bd padāl-. ? СЕ ВФ-пап. ? Ra -eā. “ Dd пїппадап,. 
5 Ва сйппап, Ске гапаг. * Bd -па-. ? Rd vadhissaminanti. 6 Pd Шатеппуё, 
° Ва -ебуа, 109 Rd idar. ?! Bd abha-. t Bd -iyå. > Bd viaathan. 14 Cha 
=santi. !5 Bd adds (аф. 1% Сг воп-. '? Bd omits tena. !# Ck pu-. 19 ра 
arabattadhajo. 32 СЕ sabba. 21 Bd abajha-. 38 Dd aññardetbuib. ?? read 
paridhassati? 2* В4 -damena, 25 Bd adds apeto. 3° Bd уо. 3: Ва nānu-. 


4. Chaddantajštaka. (514.) 51 


Хавва vatthassa, уо рапа tesaro kšsšvanarh! vantattã’ vantakasãvo® assa silesu 
susamāhlto suppatitthito рат1риппав1!йсйго во шага kšsañvarh arahati паш 'ti. 

Evah vatvā М. tasmim cittam nibbāpetvā „samma ki- 
matthah tvah mam vijjhi attano atthena' udāhu аййепа 
payojito siti“ pacchi. 

Таш ваш āvikaronto S.* 

ws. Samappito puthusallena nāgo 
adutthacitto luddakam ajjbabhāsi” : 


kimatthiyam kissa уй samma betu 
mamam vadhi kassa vàyam payogo ti. 124. 


Таа kimatthiyan ti ayatliñ kih patthenta, кава vea ti kissa hetu 
kona hàáranena, К пата tava mayšá saddhim veran ti adhippāyo, kassa vā 
ti Кавва vā айпавва ayah payogo, kona payojito mam vadhitl ао. 

Ath’ assa ācikkhanto luddo gātham aha: 

so. Kñsissa rañño mahesI° bhadante, 
вй pūjitā гајакше Subhaddā 
[58] (ап addasă sā са mamam asadsi, 
dantehi attho ti’ ca mar avocā 'ti, 125. 

Таһа pūjitå Ч aggamahesitthānena?®? pūjitā, addasā ti ва kira taib 
supinena addasa, asamaîti så ca mama sakkāraiw kâretvā Himavantapadese 
evarüpo nëáma någo asukasmim пёща thāne vasitl äcikkhi, dantebitl tassa 
nágassa chabbapnnararhai samujjaladantã'! teb! mam’ atibo'? рїїапдһапап 
kātukāmo’? ОМ te me šharš ‘і mai aveca. 

Tam воќуй „іда '* Cullasubhaddāya kamman“ ti ñatv& 
M. vedanam adhivāsetvă ,tassā maina dantehi attho n° atthi, 
māretukāmatāya рапа pahiniti“ dípento gáthadvayam &.: 

в. Bahü hi me dantayogă ulārā 
ye me pitunnam рі pitamahëánam, 
jānāti ва kodhanā rājaputti, 
vadhatthikā veram akāsi bālā. 126. 


1 Che -varh. ? Сіз vantata. ? Rd -kā-. © Bd viJbasl, adding шіт. 5 Bd omits 
atthena. * Bd adds Bha, 7 zo all three MSS. for sjjhabhás! juddarn? ° all 
three MSS. -1. ° Bd +e. 10 ра -thāne thapetvā. 1 Chs-lantš. !2 Bd adds 
atthi. !? Bd kāretukāma. !* Bd imsi. 

4 


10 


15 


95 


50 


10 


15 


90 


26 


52 NVJ. Tirsanipšrts 


e1. Utthehi {хаг ludda, khoram ' gahetvá 
dante ime chinda purñ marāmi, 
vajjāsi tam kodhanam rājaputtirh : 
паро hato, handa im’ assa дапій ti. 127. 

Tatha ime ti? tassa kira pitupitāmahānah dantë mā vinaseihsù ’ti 
guhāya 6arnicia, te sandhàya evam šha, jânāttel baburnari vāraņnånam idha 
sannicite daite јара, vadhattbikā ti kevalarn рапа ва mam māōretukämā 
appamettā® dosan hadaye thapetvi attano хетаў akâsl, avarüpena pharusa- 
kammena matthakarn pšpesi, КЬ огап! ti kakacah, рита maramiti уйата па 


maršmi*, vajjāsitl® vadeyyãsi, banda imassa dantå ti hato so mayá 
nëzgo, шапога{һо ќе mattbakarb patto, zanha іше tassa danta ti. 


So tassa уасапат sutvā nisinnatthānā uttháya' kakacarn 
ādāya „dante chindissāmîti“ tassa santikaib upagato. So рапа 
ubbedhato atthaásitihattho pabbato viya' apaviddho, ten’ assa 
во dantattháanam па paápuni'. Atha М. kayar upanāmento 
hețthāsīsako” пірајјі, {айа nesādo M-assa rajatadámasadisarmn 
soņpdarh maddanto abhirühitvá Kelāsakūte viya kumbhe {һаїуй 
uukhakotimarnsarn }апипй '° paharitvā anto pakkhipitvā kum- 
bhato oruyha КаКасаш antomukhe pavesesi. M-assa balava- 
vedanā uppajji, mukha lohitena рӣгі. Nesādo ito с’ ito са 
вайсагепїо'' kakacena chinditurh na’? sakkhi. Atha паш M. 
mukhato lohita chaddetvë vedanam adhivāsetvā ,,Кій samma 
chinditurh na sakkositi'"“ pucchi. „Ата sāmîti“ vutte™ M. 
eatin paccupațthāpetvā „tena hi samma mama вопдаш ukkhi- 
pitvā kakacakotiyarn'° рапһареһї, mama sayan sondar ukkhi- 
piturn balarn о’ atthîti“ аһа. Nesādo tathā akāsi. M. воп- 
дауа Какасат gahetvā aparáparam cālesi, dantā kalīrā viya 
chijjinsu. Atha ue āharāpetvā рапһібуа „вашта luddaputta, 
аһатп ime dante tuybarh dadamâāno о! eva ,mayham appiyā“ 


1 Ва kha-. ? all three MSS. ime bi. * Rd appamattakarh. * Bd adds tāva 
{ше dantå kaccharn kakacarn pūrəetvå cbinda te gahetvā kāsipurah garitva de- 
vīyā datvå tatn kodbanain råjaputti. ° Rd vajjšsiti, Ске vajjeyyãsīti. % Bd vu- 
tbâya, ! Ва adds ыһа! * Ва -nāti. ! Bd batthá-. !° Bd jannunà. '! Се 
sañcārente, Bd sañcaranto. 12 Cs Bd гё, !3 Bd nasakkbiti. 1* Rd omits vu~, 
о В -ți 


4. Chaddantajštaka. (514.) 53 


ti dammi na Sakkatta-Máratta-Brahmádirn' patthento, imebi 
pana ше dantebi satasahassagunena" sabbaññutañanadantüë 
va piyatarā', sabbaññntañanapativedháya me idah puññam 
paccayo hotü“ "ti dante datvā „samma tvah imar {һйпат 
kittakena kalena āgato*‘ ti pucchitvá „sattamāsasattadivasā- 
dhikehi sattasarovaccharehîti““ vutte ,„gaccha imesa dan- 
(апат ānubhāvena sattadivasabbhantare yeva Bārāņasiyarh* 
pápunissasiti“ vatvā tassa parittarb katvš* uyyojesi, пууо- 
jetvā ca pana anāgatesu” yeva tesu nágesu c' eva Subhad- 
dáya са* kālam акаві. 


Imam attham pakăsento S." 
ss. Шауа зо luddo khuram'° gahetvë 
chetvāna дапіёпі gajuttamasss 
vaggū subhe appatime раћатуё 
ādāya реккёші tato hi khippan ti аһа". 128. 


Tattha vaggü t! vilāsavante, 'subbe ti sundere, eppatime ti imlssà 
puthuvlyar вййеМ '2 asadise, 


Tasuiiñ раККапїе naga paccāmittarb adisvā аратігрво, 


Таш attham ракёзепіо $.!* 
вв. Bhayadditā nágavadhena айа 
уе te nāgā attha'' disa vidhávum 
adisva '° posam gajapaceamittam '* 
paceagamum yena so пёрагаја ti áha '!' 129. 


Tattha bhayaddita ti maranabhayena upaddutā, attš “(| dukkhità, 
gajapaccamittan)s ti ра]авва paccarpittarn, yena во ti yattha mabāvisāla- 
mšlake'"” во пйёдагё}& kalarn katvā NKelšásspabbato ујуа patito ta hanan 
рассадашоп t! attho. 


1 Dd sakkasampatti na mārasampatti па brabmasampatti. > Bd ялїарппепа 
ñahasssgunena sstasabassagunena. > Ck omits sabba- – tarà, БФ omits tara. 
4 С“ abato, Bd adda sì. * Bd -вї, C? -simn. “° Bd adda tah. 7 Ck âgatesu. 
2 Bd omits cava snd ca ° Bd adds аһа '° Bd kha-. !! Bd omita iha. !? 
Ba add dantehi. 1? Rd adds аһа. !* Ck -ā. 15 Сә adisvā, Bde айівтёпа, 
18 Bd рассё-. 17 Bd omits аһа. !* Cke -malake, Bd omits maha, 


10 


15 


20 


35 


54 XVI Timsenipëta. 


Tehi' saddhim Subbhaddâpi āgatā, te sabbe tattha roditvā 
kanditvë M-assa kulüpakapaccekabuddhëánarh'” santikarm gantvá 
„bhante tumhákar paccayadáyako visasallena*' viddho kāla- 
kato, sivathikadassanam авва арассһаіЬ& "і vadimsu. 
Pañcasatápi* paccekabuddhā* ákásenágantvë mālake:* otarirnsu. 
Tasmim khane dve taruņanāgā nágarañño вагігат dantehi 
ukkhipitvë paccekabuddhe vandapetvá citakam ropetvš' jbā- 
payihnsu., Paccekabuddhā sabbarattih iláhane° вајјһауат 
akarsu. Atthasashassá' пара áláhanam '° nibbāpetvā nahātvā 
Subbaddarh purato katvā attano vasanatthánarh gamimsu '', 


Etam attham paküsento S. 
sı. Те tattha kanditvā roditva™ naga 
sīse sake'? pamsukam okiritvā 
воатащѕо '* te sabbe sakam niketam 
pvrakkhatvā mahesirh sabbabbaddap ti в. 130. 


Таа райшеокап ti šlahanaparhsukarn. 


Sonuttaro™* рі appatte yeva sattame divase dante ādāya 
Вагапавїй pávisi ". 


Tam attham pakāsento S.'* 
ss. Адаув dantāni gajuttamassa 
vaggūü subhe appatime pathavyë 
эитаппвгајїћі samantamodare 
so luddako Kàsipuram upāgami, 
ирвпеѕі so rājakañāāya dante: 
паро hato, handa іт’ assa dantā ti. 131. 


Tattha suvapnnarājibiti suvannararneibi !°%, samantamodare ti as- 
mantato obhásente29, sakalavanasandarh suvannavannar viya karonte?!, 
upanesiti Chiddantavšrauassa chabbannararnsi viys vlssajjamane yamakadanto 


1 Che сепа М. 2 Bd -ұёпаћес-. >? Bd visapitena за-. * Bd omits pi. 5 Bd 
adda pi. " Chka ша)-‚ Bd viaālamālke. ? Ck citam āpetvā, Rā cittakarh-. 
СЕ Ва ålä-, Bd adding dhammaerí ° Bd -а. (0 СЕ зї. 21 Bd ар-. !3 Cke 
-tva, Bd tvāna, '? Ck sisakena. Се sisakena. 14 Rd agamirhsu. 15 read: katvā 
pure sabbabbaddarn mahesim? !* Сг воп-. 12? Ba -пазіуат вашрарип1. u 
Bd adds аһа. '° Cks -rājibi. 1° Bà -sante, Cks -sento 7! Ches -to. 


4. Chaddantajataka. (514.) 55 


šdays šgacchami' nagaraun slarpkárapetü 't! deviya sšsanarh ревебе& tāye сайбо 
ārocetvå? devanagare? viya nagare alarnkáršápite Зопакаго * pl nagararn pavl- 
sitvā рёв&йдагп агпућа  dante upanesi. 


Upanetvā‘ ca pana ,,ayye yassa kira tumhe арратаќќакайћ' 
dosar hadaye Кагійћа* во паро тауй* hato mato“ ti", „Mata- 
bhāvam me aroceyyñsiti“ аһа, „Tassa matabhávam jānātha, 
ime tassa'' dantā“ ti dante adasi, Sā M-assa chabbanna- 
rarhsivicitte dante manitālavaņptena '° gahetvā ūrūsu thapetvā 
purimabhave P attano ріуавётікаѕва dante olokenti ,,evarüparm 
püma sobhaggappattarn váranarn visapitena sallena jIvitakkha- 
yarh păpetvā™ dante chinditva!' agato" ti M-arm'' anussaranti 
вокат uppādetvā adhiváseturh 'násakkhi, ath’ assā tatth' eva 
hadayarn phali'!, (а divasam eva kalam akiási'*. 


Tam еійћаф-рраказеріо S.'* 
se. Disvāna dantëni gajuttamass8 
bhattu-ppiyassa ригїпйуа јёбуё 
tatth' eva tassë hadayam aphali, 
{еп' етв sā kālam акаѕі bālā ti āba, 132. 
эт. Sambodhipatto va '° mahânubhāvo 
sitam akāsi рагівёуа majjhe, 
росећіфзи bhikkhu suvimuttacittä, 
пёКагапе pātukaronti buddhā. 133, 
вв. Yam addasatha ' 4аһагип kumarim 
kāsāya vattham апарёгіуай '? carantim 
sā kho (ада гё}аКаппа ahosi, 
abam {айа парагёја ahosim. 134. 
вә. Adaya dantāni gajuttamasse 
vaggu subhe appatime pathavya 


1 Cka ga-. ? hd .сёрестё. ? Bd -таф. *Сё воп-. `° Cks oruyha, Dd aruyhiltvá. 
* Bd upanšmesi upanšámetvá. ? Ва -ka. ° Bd -иһа ti тайа. ° Сёз omit maya. 
10 Cks omit matotl. 19 Bd jànāthā tl handa (аяза ime. !? ao Ске; Dd mani- 
kšlahatthavanrne, Rs manlulahatthavappe !3 pd р огёпака, B? poršuakassa, !* 
Наг add ime. !? Ddz add sonuttaro. !* Bd mabāauttah. '° Bd’ phulltvá. 5 
Bd siti, !# Bd adds аһа. 20 Bd са 1 Rd -asatba 2° Bd anàgàriyaru, 


10 


20 


95 


20 


25 


56 XVI. Timsasnipšt 


уо' luddako Kāsipurah upāgami 
so kho tadā Devadatto ahosi. 135. 
aw. Anšvasuram cirarattasarisitar * 
uccãvacamh ° сагат idar puranam 
vitaddaro vitasoko visallo 
sayam abhijññaya һЬһаѕі Buddhu. 136. 
a. Abam vo tena kalena ahosim tattha Dbbikkhavo 
оёрвгаја tadàáhosim, evam dhāretha jātakan ti 137. 
imā даа Dasabalassa gune vannentehi dhammasamgayikattherehi 
thapitā. 


Тайһа sitam аківійі švuso* sambodhippato Š. mahinubhävo* alarn- 
katadhammiasane parisamajjbe nisluno ekedivasarn sitan акёзі, па akārane ti 
bhante buddbā паа ahåraņe sita na karont! tumhehi* ca sitam kena nu 
kho karanena (алй katan ti mahākhīņāsavā bhikkhü purchihsu, yamad da- 
aāthāä” tl evarb puttho ávuso S attano sitakäraņarn ăcikkhanto ekara dahara- 
bhikkbunih dassetvā evam аһа: bhikkhave yain etab? debaran уоһЬапар- 
рабай kupirirn käsäyavatthaih апарагјуат upetarh pabbajitvā Imasmir sasane 
carantih addasātha” passatha sā tadā visapitasallena!® пёдатп!! рап{та!? 
vadhehiti Sonuttararn 16 реве{уй!+ rājskañňā abos! tena gantvà Jivitakkhayatb 
påpito аһа tada!5 nāgarājà ahosin t! sttho, Devadatto ti bhikkhave Idsšni 
Daevadatto tadå so luddo!* ahosi, anāvaeūran t| na ахавигаф anattharh 
gala:uriyau ti sttho, cirarattasamsitan?’? ti ito clraratte anekavassskoti- 
mattheke ваге! (ат '® caritarn 1? anucinyarh, i. v. h : âvuso ito anekavassakoti- 
matthake sarbsaritam 20 рі pubbanhe katar {ап divasam eva ®8уапЬе вагао 
viya attano carltavasena uccath täya ršJjadhitšya са?! Sonuttarasss 9° ca carita- 
tavasena picatta uccšànicatcaritari” idam puršánarh rāgādinain дагапато 2* vigata- 
(ауе #3 vitaddaro ñatldharnagokšdinsin #% abhāvenas vītesoko г5даза1аділаго 
vigatattà?? visallo attana #6 janitvá Ruddho abbàsl??, abam vo ti ettha vo ti 
nipštamattarn. bhikkhave abaro tena kālena tattba Chaddantadahe ahosin ti 
ао, nāgarājā ti bhoato29 уа?! na añño Косі tadi homi, atha kho 
nägarājā bomîti sttho, етага dharetha ‘ti tumhe etarb 2 jšrakarh evarh dhå- 
retha ®? pariyapunàátha. 


1 Oks во, Bd ya. ? Dd -rattain зейшзіәт. 8 Ck uecānl, Се uccãnicah. * la 
во. > Bå adds alarhkatasabāyarı % Cks tumhe. ? Hd -asuha ° Bd ekar, 
omitting узш. ° Bd adassatha. '° Bd -pitena- Vi Bd nāgarājam, adding 
vljhitvā. 12 Ad garntvå, Ско hantvā 1? Сә son+, Bd sownuttarassa, !* Ске 
peaitā, '* Bd adds ao. !* Bd -ako !? Ва -rattiyarnsitan. !® Bd вафвагі- 
tain. 19 Bd omits са 20 Rd віка. #1 Bd omits ca. ®? Ck Rd sone. ?? 
Bd -nlcarnca-. 24 Ck» dá-, Bd purāņpa, Ве агїпїпапп. 33 Bd vigatāya, Chs viha- 
tatāya, °* Bå? adds papa 27 Bd omits dhana, Ckssokadhanasokā-. ?* Ce 
viha-, 2? Ad -no са. 50 pd -siti #1 Ck homto, Bd һоп. 82 А4 са. 55 
Bd tarn. + Rd upsdhārethe. adding ganhatha. 


5. Sambbavajataka. (515). 57 


Imaü св pana desanam sutvë Ьвһи sotāpannņnādayo вһевиш, ва 
pana bhikkuni pacchë vipassitva arahattam раа ti Сһайдапіа- 
jatakam. 


5. Sambhavajataka. 


Rajjañca patipannasmā ' 


&. k. Paccuppannavatthum Mabãummaggajātake švibhavissati. 


ti. Idah 5, J, v. paüñapáramim 


Atite pana Karuratthe Indapattaqagare Dhanañ- 
jayakorabyo nāma' rajjain kāreti’, Tassa Sucirato пёта 
bráhmano purohito atthadhammānusāsako abosi. Баја 
dánádini puüñani karonto dhammena rajjarn anusasi, So екё- 
Чїуазай dhammayšágam оёта рабһат abhisarmkharitvá Suci- 
ratarn bràhmanarn аѕапе nirīdāpetvā sakkāram katvā рабћат 
pncchanto catasso gáthá abhasi: 

ıs Rajjañ са patipann'asma adhipaccarn Ѕисїгаќа, 
mahattam’ pattum icchāmi vijetarn pathavim imam 138. 

s. Dbammena по adbammena, adhammo ше па ruccati, 
kiceo va‘ dhammo carito габбо hoti Sucirata, 139. 

a. Idha с’ evâninditā’ yena pecca* yena aninditā 

yasam devamanussesu yena pappomu brāhmaņa. 140, 

4. Yo ‘harn’ attbhañ са dhammañ са kattum icchâmi hrahmana 
ќат tvar atthañ са dhammañ са 

brābmaņ’ akkháhi pucchito ti. 141. 


Tatha гајјап ti асагіуа mayai Imasmirh sattayojanlke Indapattanagara 
raljañ ca tiyojanaeatike Kururatthe issarlyabhavasarnkhšátam adhlpaccað са 
patipauna адћіваса, mahattan t| idšni mahantabhšvarh pattum icchámi, 
viJetun ti imam pathavimn dhammena abhibhaviturn sJjhottbariturn icchami, 
kicco? vā’? 't| avasesajanehi rañño va!l dhammo kicco 12 karauiyataro, rājā- 
nuvattako hi loko. so tasmiih dhammike sabbo'® dhammiko hot, tammë өза 
Чһашто!+ rañüo va kicco ti, idha сетапіпаіса ti уена тауап idhuloke 


1 Rds add гаја. 2 Rā -ві, > СЕ Bd mahantarn, C? mahattah? * Bd са, 5 
Ck idhe vevā-. © Bd расса. ? Ске soha. ° Bd mahantan. ? Cks kiso, 10 
Ва сё, '! Bd carito, © Bd adds са. 12 Ваг add pi. 1% Bds add паша. 


10 


95 


10 


15 


?0 


?5 


30 


58 XVI. Timasnipata, 


cal рагаіоке ca anindita, yena раррошй” `ti yene mayen’ nirayšdisnu 
anibbattitvā devesn са Inanussesu cat yasarp ° issariyarn asobhaggarh раропеу- 
умла tam káraņarh kathehiti, yo han u һгёһтапо уо abah phalavipākasa- 
Каа attbañ ca tassa’ stthassa betubhūtah dbammañ са Байиги eamëdiya 
vattitoh uppådetuñ са icehámi, tah tvan ti tam? tassa’? mayharb tvara 
sukhen'eva nibbànsgamimaggain šruyha appatisandbikabhávar patthentessa tarh 
atthañ ca dhsmmañ ca puccbito akkbšhbi me pakatarh Ката kathehîti brib- 
шарап dbamməayàgapañhbarh pucchi. 


Ayam рапа рабћо gambhiro Buddhavisayo, sabbañün- 
buddham ev’ etarh'!' pucchiturn yuttarh, tasimim asati sabbaññu- 
tañanapariyesakarh Bodhisatta. Saucirato pana attano abodhi- 
sattatāya pahan Ка(һеіот nåsakkhi asakkonto ca pandita- 
manarn akatvá attano asamatthabhāvarh kathento 


'* arahati 


5. Náññatra'* У:йһига!? гаја etad akkhátum 
yard (уаш atthañ ca dhammañ ca 
kattum icchasi khattiyā ‘і р. а. 142, 
Tass’ attho 15; avisayo esa mahàršja pabo mādisānarn, abam bi n’ ev 
авва дігі na } вгіуовёпат passämi, апдћакагагі: 16 pavittho viya homi, Вагапаз1- 
rañño pana purobito Vidhuro пата bràbmano ай! so etaro Acikkbeyya, 
бет (hapetva yam tvarb attbañ са dhamriosñ va kātum icchusl etad)? akkháturb 
Da añño arnhailii. 

Каја tassa vacanam sutvā „tena hi brāhmaņa Кһїрраш 
tassa santikam gacchā“ ‘ti раппйёКйгаш datvá tarn pesetukšuo 

в. ЕМ kho pahito gaccha Vidhurassa upantikam, 
nikkham imarn'" suvannassa haram gaccha Sucirata, 
abhihárarn iuam dajjā atthadhammåânusatthiyā ti р.а. 143, 
Tattba upantigan tl santikarhn, nikkban ti pañcadasaauvangā'” еко 

nikkbo, ayab рапа гайазитађџаѕѕа nikkhasahašssari datvā eram аһа 


dajjá ti tena irasmiri duammayñgapañhe kathite 1а38829 atthadbammišnu- 
satthiya abhihäram püjam karonto imar nikkhasabassaih dadeyyâsiti è, 


t ПЧ omite ca 3 Bd рарре-. ? Bd mayka. * Bd ma, ? Сіз уай. * Bde tarb 
по. ? Ске cassa. ® Ck omits (аф tvan ti ° Bd omita хай. 19 СЕ omite 
(авва. !1 Ck evenaí, Bd buddbametarb. $! Сіз паа-. !3 Hd vidbūrä. 14 СЕ 
akko-, Се akkbo-. !# Ck has etadakkhāturii па arnño arabatiti in the place of 
kbattuyá - - attho, 1: Bd -ra tt Ва eteh. 1% pd nikkbsñci-. 9 Ck -0, 
Се -о. 29 Ва tassa. #1 Che dadeyyáti 


Б. Sambharajataka. (5)5.) 59 


Evañ ca pana vatvā pañhavissajjanassa likbanatthāya 
satasahassagghanikah suvannapattamn' gamanatthāya уйпа 
parivárattháaya* balakāyab (ай ca papņākārah datvā tarn 
khapañ ñeva uyyojesi. So‘ Indapattanagará nikkhamitvá 
ujukam eva Bārāņasirb agantvá° yattha yattha рапфий vasanti 
sabbāni tāni țhānāni upasarhkamitvā sakala - ЈатЬойїре pañ- 
harn’ vissajjetárarn' alabhitvā anupubbena Bárënasim ра{уй 
екавтіт {һапе пїүйватї gahetvā katipayehi' saddhir pātarā- 
ваф" bhuñjanaveláya Vidhurassa'° nivesanam gantvā āgata- 
Ђһауаф ārocāpetvā tena pakkosāpito tam sake ghare bhuüja- 
manam addasa. 


Tam attham ракёвепќо S. sattamam gāthem ha: 
am 


т. Sv-âdhippâgā'' Bhāradvājo Vidhurassa upantikarm, 
tam addasa mahābrahmā азвшйёпаш sake gheare ti. 144. 


Tattba avâdblppāgā’? u so Bbāradvājagotto Sucirato adhippāgato '? 
ti attho, mahabrahni ti mahābrâbmeno, asamānan t! bbuñjamënarh. 

So pana tassa bālasahāyako ekācariyakule uggahitasippo, 
tasmá tena saddhim ekato bhuñjitvā bbattakiccapariyosāne 
sukhapisinno „samma kimattharn agato siti“ 'puttho ёратапа- 
káranarh ācikkhanto atthamam g. á. 

s. Rañño ‘har pahito düto Korabyassa't yasassino, 

“attbar) dbanmañ са pncchesi' ісс-абгауі Yudhitthilo, 

tam tvah atthañ са дһаттаб са 

Vidhur' akkhëbhi'* pucchito ti. 145, 


Tattha rañüo ti sharh rañño Korsbyassa? 5 yasassipo düto. pablto™ ti 
tena pesito Idhágamim, pucchesiti so Yudbitthllagotto Dhanañjayaràjā шагь 
dhsmmayšgapañharñn пёта риссЬ!, aharn katheturñ asakhonto (уір 1° sakhhissa- 
siti ñatva tamgshrocesirni?, во раппёйїгагї datva pañbarm pucchanastthšáya шат 
tava santikarh pesento Yidhurassa 20 santikaro gantvă ітавва райћаѕва atthaü ea 
pšalldhammañ ca puccheyyšsitl iti abrav[. tah ёха ідіпі mayá pucchito akkhāhîtl, 


! Bd —pattañca. 3! Bd -raņatthāya. ? Bd -yañca * Bd adds рапа. * Ck Ва 
Bg-. * Ck <a, ! Ва psnhassa visajjanškárarh. ° Bd adds }апеМ. * Ва -.. !0 
Ва -dbü-. !! Ck svadhippšhagšá, Сг -ррадёка. !? Cks svādbippakā. !3 Ck 
adhippagâbato, Bz adbippagā āgato? '* Ва korabbassa. !° Bd vidüra-. !*Сїз 
=туавва, !! Се pahi-, Bd påhl-. !° Сз tah. “* Bd (авва â- 20 Bd vidhūra. 


Г 


5 


10 


13 


20 


25 


60 ХҮІ Тіфвепірієа. 


Tadā pana во brāhmaņo „шаһё}апавза cittarh рапһївзй- 
miti“ Сайдаш рідаһапіо уіуа vinicchayah vicáreti, nasa 
райћатізвајјапе okāso atthi'. 

So tam attharn acikkhanto navamam gátham aha: 

s. Gamgam те pidahissanti, ра narh” sakkomi bráhmana 
apidheturn mahásiodhurñ, tarn katham во bhavissati, 

па te sakkomi akkhātuth 

айрат dhammar ca pncchito ti. 146. 


Тава attho: bršhmana mayhan? тлаһ2јапавка nánaácittagatlsarnkhšátarp 
garbgarh pldahisanti, ууёраго uppanno, tam аһап! mahšsindhurb apidheturn па 
askkomi!, tasınā katharñ во okšso bhavissati yastmirn 5 te shar рабһе* visasj- 
}еууай, iti cittekaggatañ c’ еза? окаваб ca alabhanto па (е sakkomi аккћ го 
афв. dhammañ ca pucchito tl. 


Evañ ca pana vatvā „putto me pandito mayá ñápavanta- 
taro, во te vyākariseati’, tassa santika gacchá“ ‘ti vatvá 
dasamam gātham iha: 

10. Вћһадгакаго ca me putto oraso mama atrajo, 
tah tvah atthañ ca dhammañ са 

gantvá pucchassu бгаһшарё ‘ti. 147. 


Tattha oraso ti ure sarnvaddho, atrajo ti ацапо јао, 
Тат sutvā Sucirato Vidhurassa" ghará nikkhamitva Bha- 


drakārassa bhuttapātarāsassa attano parisáya majjhe nisinna- 
kāle nivesanah agamāsi '°, 


Tam аһа pakāsento S. ekadasamam g. aha: 
11. Sv-ädhippägā'' Bhāradvājo Bhadrakārass’ upantikam, 
tam addasa mahābrahmā пїзїппаш samhi vesmaniti. 148. 


Тайһа vesmaniti ghare. 


So tattha gaotvā ВһайгаКагатапауепа katāsavābhibāra- 
sakkárq nisiditvá agamanakaranam puttho dvádasamam g. ёћа: 


1 Ва tassa райћавва vi- -natthi. 3 Ва ай, °? Dd pañham. * Bd па tai 
sakkomi brahmane apidheturn mahšsindhuiüi, 5 Bd yasmā. * Bd -arb. ? Bd 
tava. Š Bd titi. ° Ска -пё. 10 Ва äge. !! Ске svädhippakā 


5 Sembhavajātake (515.) 61 


з. Йайпо 'harh pahito düto Koravyassa' yasassino, 

“ааш dhammañ са pucchesi' icc-abravi Yudhitthilo, 

tam tvar atthañ са dhammañ са 

Вһайгакага brávihi' me ti. 149. 

Atha nam Bhadrakáro ,„tāta aham imesu divasesu 
paradārakakamme® abhinivittho, cittar те vyšákularn*, tena 
!у-Ёһатї* vissajjetuh na sakkhissšmi, maybar рапа kanittho 
Sañjayakumëáro' тауа’ visadañánataro°, tah риссһа, во te 
tam рабһат vissajjessatiti“ tassa santikar pesetuh dve 
gštha abhāsi: 

1а. Mariisakacarn” ауаһауа godharn anupatam' aham, 
na te sakkomi akkhāturh attharh дһаттай ca pucchito. 150. 
14. Sañjayo пёша ше bhătå kaoittho me Saucirata, 

tam tva atiíibañ ca dhammañ са 

gantvā pucchassu Ыгаһшапй “і. 151. 

Tattha шайвакасап? ti yathā пата puriso thülamigamarnsarb Касепё- 
dáya!° gacchanto antaramagge godhapotakarn disvá mamsakācarn” chaddetvš tarh 


anubandheyya evam өзаг!! attano ghare vasantirn 1? bharlyarn chaddetvë рагевва 
rakkhitagopitarn 12 Itthih anubandhanto homití dipento evam &һа. 


So {аѕтіћ yeva khane Sañjayassa nivesanam рапбуй tena š 


Каќаваккаго agamanakaranam puttho ácikkhi. 


Таш attham раказепќо S. dve gëtbë abhasi: 
ів. Sv-adbippāgā '* Bbāradvājo Sañjayassa upantikam, 

tam addassa mabābrāhmā nisinnam sa[mhi] parīsati °, 152. 
16. Ваййо 'ham pahito düto Koravyassa' yasassino, 

‘аіһаф dhammañ ca pucchesi' ice-abravi Yudhitthilo, 

tarn tvam atthañ ca dhammañ св Sañjay’ akkhahi pucchito ti. 153. 


Sañjayakumaro pi pana {айй paradāram eva sevati, ath' 
авва ,so ahar tāta paradaram sevāmi, sevanto са!* Gamgam 


) Ва -byassa. ? Bd pabrühi, ® Сі» рё-. < Ва ьуа-. 5 Ва kyābeb. * Bd 


набсвуув-. ? Bd mabā. ° Рё ativiyañāņavantataro. ° Віз -јај. '° Bæ kaje-. 


3% Ва eva, 13 Ddz vasavattaphb. '> Bd -taùigo-. !# Cis -ppakü, !5 Ck Bd 
parisati, Се parisatiih. !* Bd adds pana. 


15 


10 


15 


20 


95 


во 


62 NVI. Тігазапірата. 


taritvá рагаќїгат рассһёші, (аф шаш вйуай са рахо са nadim 
tarantarh maccu рабі пёша, tena те cittah ууёкојаф, па 
ty-aharn ācikkhitam rakkhissámi', Капі һо рапа те" Sam- 
bhavakunáro паша atthi jātiyā вайатазеіко mayá sata- 
guneua ваһавварипева°? адћікабапо“*, во te ёсіккћівѕай, рассћа 
taht рисећа ** ‘ti. 
Tam attham pakasento S. dve gathë abhasi: 
зт. Sada mam gilati” maccu ѕёуаф рёќо Sucirata, 
па te sakkomi akkhātum attharn dhammañ са pucchito. 154. 
1в. Sambbavo nama me bhåtā kanittho me Sucirata. 


tam tvam atthañ ca dhammañ ca 
gantvā pucchassu Ыгаһшапа ‘і. 155. 


Tar sutvā Sucirato ,ayar райһо imasmim loke abbhuto 
bhavissati, imam уіѕвајјеішр samattho nama а’ atthi, maññe“ 
ti ciotetvā dve gathá abhāsi: 

зә, Abbbuto vata bho dhammo, náyarñ asmāka ruccati, 
tayo janë pitā puttā te su paññáya no vidu. 156, 
зо. Na tam sakkotha akkhaturn attharn dhammañ са риссһїїй, 

kathan па daharo jaññā attharn йһаштай ca pucchito ti. 157. 

Tattha nayan ti ayam райһайһашшо®  abhhuto, Imar katheturh aa- 
matihena’ nāma na bhavitabbarn, tasmë yan tvar kumararh kathessatit] vadesi '0 
n&yarh smhšákarn succati, te вй 'U ettha sukšro nipátamattarh. pita Vidhuro!1 
putto Bhadrakáro са Sañjayo сё '1 te pl me tayo рий рина pañüšya imati 
dhemmarm no vidu na vijšuanti!?, аййо ko Jániseattti attho, na tan ti tumhe 


tayo janā pucchitā etarn akkhšturn na sakkotha daharo sattavansikakumiro puc- 
chito nu }аййа, kona karanena Janiturp sakkhissaditi attho. 


Тай вашбуйё Sañjayakumāro ,¿tāta Sambhavakumárarh 


5 vissajjane n’ atthi 


daharo ti mā maññāãsi, sece pi pahar 
ko*™ gaccba tam pucehá''“ "і atthadipanáhi npamāhi kumā- 


rassa vannam pakāsento dvādasa gāthā abhāsi: 


t Bd -miti. 3 Сёз omit me. ® Bd adds satasahassagunena. * Bd -ñapataro. 
5 Bd tvah. “ Bd pacchāhi. 7 Bd -te. * Bd -hâ-. ° Chr -ttho. !° Bd vada-. 
и pd -аһа-. 13 Сі viditanti, Bd vidu ti. '> Bd pañhša. !* so all three MSS. 
for koci? 13: СЕ фассһ, omitting ѓаш риссћа, Bd gaccha пат puccha. 


5. Sambbavajātaks. (515.) 63 


a. Ма nam daharo [ti] uññási' apucchitvána' Sambbavarh, 


pucchitvá Sambhavarh јайда 
attham dhammañ ca bráhmana. 158. 

эз. Yathápi cando vimalo рассһат akásadbátuyá 
sabbe tārāgaņpe’ loke ābbāya atirocati 159. 

зв. Evam pi dahar’ йреќо* paññáyogena Sambhavo, 
mā namh daharo [ti] uññšsi' apuochitváana  Sambhavarn, 
pucchitvā Sambhavarh јабӣё 
atham дһаттай са bráhmanə. 160. 

и. Yathápi rammako* mëso gimhánam hoti brāhmaņa 
at' еу” aññehi mäsehi dumapupphehi sobhati 161. 

s. Evam рі dahar’ ūpeto -ре-, 162, 

зв. Yathâpi himavá brahme pabbato Gandhamadano 
nëánñárukkhehi зайсһаппо* mahabhütaganálayo 
osadhehi са dibbehi disá bhāti pavāti са 163. 

ат. Evam рі dahar’ ūpeto -pe-. 164, 

зв. Yathšpi pávako brahme accimali yasassima 
jalamāno cara kacche’ analo” kanhavattaoi 165. 

s. Ghatāsano’ dhnmaketu uttamāhevanandaho '” 


nisithe'' pabbataggasmim pahütedho' virocati 166, 
so. Evam pi даһаг` üpeto -ре-. 167. 


ei. Javena hhadrarh jánanti halivaddañ са vāhiye™ 


dohena Чфһепшй jananti bhāsamānañ са panditam, 168. 
вз. Evam pi dahar' üpeto paññāyogena Sambhavo, 


mü nar daharo [ti] uñãāsi apucchitvána' Sambhavam, 
pucchitvā Sambhavam jañña 
attham dhammañ са brāhmaņā '°і, 169, 


Tattha }аййа ti Janissasi!t, cando ti punpacando, vimalo t! abbha- 
dimalarahito, evam pi daharü pato tl eva Sambhavakumāro daharabhšávena 


1 В4 шаййа. > Bd šp-. 3 Ck tarāgāņā, Bd tārsgaņe. * Che upe-. ° Ok 
таїїйайо. * СЕ saüjenno, Сэ sañjatto, Bd saccbanno. 1 Ck varan kacche, Сг 
тагаш kaccho, Вг vane gacche. ® C? atalo yathë рі рёхако - - - analo wanting ін 
Ва. * Ck .пе, !9 Ck -hemanañcaho, С -hevanandsho, Bd -hevandaneho. 1! 
Ck -(а, Bds niəlva. 12 Bd bahutejo. !2 Cha se, Вабуаһаув. !* Сів -ti. 


10 


15 


20 


10 


15 


95 


64 XVI. Tiñsanipata. 


upeto рі раййауорепа векаіе рі! Jambudipatale avasesapenditehi? atiroeati? 
bhâsati*t, rammako (і clttamáso, stevañüehiti stiviya aññehi ekādasabi 
màsehi. evan ti evan Sambhavo рі paññayogena sobbati, himavā (1 bima- 
pātaramaye himayutto ti bimavš, gimhakāle himar vamatiti’ himavā, вашраца- 
Janah’ gandhena шайауа!ї!? Gandhamàádano, mahābhūtazxanālayo ti 
dovsgananiváso, disā bhatiti sabbadisā ekobhāso® viya karoti, pavātiti 
gandhena sabbadieš? pharati’?, evan ti Sambbavo pi Āăņnayogena'! sabba- 
disã'? bhăti?® с' evs pavšti са, уавазвішё til tejasampattiyā yasassinihi 
accihi!t yotto, jalamāno cararb 15 кассће!е ti kacchasamkhāte'® mabāvane 
Jelanto carati, analo ti atitto gatamaggassa kanhabhivena kanhavattani yaññe 
ñahutivasena!'? ahutarn !® għhatah asanātîiti ghħatāsano dhümaketu kiccarn aasa 
нааһеии dbūmaketu, пїїашаһетапапдаһо!# і ahevanah vuccati 
vanasando, utiamavanasandadaho ti?° attho. nisïthe?' ti rattibhāge, pabba- 
taggasmiu ti pabbatasikhare, pahütedho32 ti bahuindheno??, virocatiu 
вађђадівёви obhasati?4, evan ti өуаі mama kanittho Sambhavakumāro pi 
paāĀūâyogəna virocatli, bhadran ti bliadrarn sssšjšniyarh jsvasampattiyā jJBnanti 
па sarirens, уаћіуе 25 (1 vahitabbe bháre satt Ъћагатаһапаідуа 26 ayah nttamo 
0127 balivaddarı Jåuanti, Фоћепа ti dobusampattiyá дБепші sakhīrā ti Jánanti, 
bhësamanan ti ettha pans’? Ыёзашёпагі јёпані misean bâlehi panditan 
ti suttarh aharitabbarn 


Sucirato evam etasmirn `’ Sambhavarn vannante ,,pañhan 
pucchitvā jápissáamiti“ „kaha рапа te kumárakanittho“ ti 
pucchi. Ath’ assa so sihapañjaram vivaritvā hattham раза- 
retvā „so esa °° pāsādadvāre antaravithiyam kumārakehi sad- 
dhim ѕиуаппауаппо kilati ayam mama kanittho, upasamkamitva 
nam риссћа*', Buddhalilhaya te pañham kathessatiti“ aha, 
Sucirato (азва vacanarn sutvá раѕаба oruyha kumarassa 


santikam agamáasi, kaya velāyā 'ti kumārasya™” nivatthasāțakarh 


1 Bd sakala, 9 Bd -(ә 5 Bd atikkamitvā pirocati, Се atirocati аќаккатісеа 
тігосай, * Bd воћа. 5 Ck һішаг vatiti. Dd himañca ташаб. * Hd -ttarhja-, 
? Ваг mo-. ® во all three MSS. ° Rds sabba-. 1° Cis pa-, Bd» vāyati. !! 
Bd раййауо-. !* Bd sabba-. '! Bd Ъһавай. 1* Bd .уа yasaseimā acchimāhiti 
acchihi. !5 Bda vane 18 Bdga-. !7 C*àhü-. 1% Сә ahü-, Bd shuti. !* 
Cks -папдаһо, 39 Bd -sandarh dahatitl. 2! Ck півісе, Dd nisive. 38% Ck bahu-, 
Cs bahū-, Bd hehūtejo, Ве pahütejo. 38 Bd bahutaiddhino, Вг pabūtaindhano. 
34 Ска obhāsāsati. 5 Bds сёһауе 26 Ck -vahantàya, Bd -vahatáya. ?1 Oks 
omit ti. 26 Ва па. 2% Ва casmim. 20 Bd eso; all three MSS. зо for yo 

M Ва {ата pucchatha. 33 Сіз -ra. 


5. Sambhavajātaka. [5]5.) 65 


mocetvá khandhe' khipitvā ubhohi hatthehi райвшї gahetvā 
thitavelaya. 


Tam attham avikaronto S. 
ss, Sv-âdhippāgā’ Bhāradvājo Sambhavassa upantikam, 
tam addasa таһаһгвһша kilamanam Баһ pure ti g. š. 170. 


Tattha babi роге tí babi nivesane, 


M. pi brahroanarh āgantvā purato thitam disvā ,„tāta 
ken’ atthenágato siti“ pucchitvā ,tšta komāra aham Jambudi- 
patale āhindanto mayá pacchitah райһаш katheturn samattharh 
alabhitvá tava santikah" ágato `mhbíti“ vatte ,sakala-Jam- 
budipe kira avinicchito pañho, шаша santikam agato, аһаш 
папепа mahallako“ ti hiriottappam patțilabhitvā hatthagatarh 
рафвоф chaddetvá khandhato sátakam ādāya nivāsetvā ,puc- 
cha brahmana, Buddhalīļhāya te kathessámiti“ sabbaññū рауй- 
тапай pavāresi. Tato brāhmaņo 

s. Rañño ‘barb pahito düto Koravyassa yasassino, 

“attham dhammañ ca риссһавви' icc-abravi Yudhitthilo, 

tarh tvar atthañ ca dhammañ са 

Sambhav` akkhāhi pucchito ti 171. 
găthāya pañham pucchi. 

Tass’ attho Sambhavapanditassa gaganamajjhe риппа- 
cando viya pākato ahosi. Atha narn „tena hi sunáhiti“ уабуё 
dhammayagapañharn vissajjento 

s. Таррһа* te aham akkhissarn yathâpi kusalo tathā, 

гаја ca kho пай jānāti yadi kāhati vā na vā ti g. а. 172. 

Tassa antaravithiyarn thatvá madhurassarena* dhammarh 
desentassa saddo dvādasayojanikah закаја-Вагёпавіпасагаф' 
avatthari°, atha гаја" uparājādayo ca sabbe sannipatimsu, М. 
mahājanamajjhe '° dhammadesanam patthapesi, 


1 Bd adds kanthə. ? Che -ppakā. # Bd -ke, * Сё -a. 5 Bd (ащ. * Bd . тепа 
sarena, ! Bd -lambārā-. ° Bd attbarl. ° Bd adds са. !° Bd -павватајће. 
‚иза. V. 5 


20 


10 


35 


50 


66 ХУІ Tibsavipāta. 


Tattha tagghā "і ekarhsavacanarb. yathåpl kusalo dú yathë atikusalo 
ваЪһапйй Buddho acjkkhati tathšë ekarusen' ета saham skkhissan ti atiho. гаја 
ca kho пап! {1 ebai etam? рабћаф уг:ћа tamhškarn гіја janltarn sakkoti 
tathë katbessäwi, tato иНапш гаја evam цый janšu yadi karissati vë па vi 
karissati. karontassa hi vā akarontassa ха tass’ ета паго 2 bbavissati шауһаш 
рапа daso n а dipen. 


Evam imáya раїйауа рабһака(һапаф patijānitvā idāni 
dhammayāgapaūharh kathento 
зв. Ајја suve ti samseyvva габбӣ puttho Saucirata 
më katvā avasi гаја atthe játe Yudhitthilo. 173. 
эт. Ajjhattam ñeva sarhseyya гаййа puttho Sacirata, 
kummaggarm оа niveseyya' yathā mülho acetaso. 174. 
вв. Attánarh  nátivatteyya, adhammam па samëcare, 
atitthe па-ррй(агеууа?, anatthe па yuto*° siyā. 175. 
з. Yo са еїйрї thánñáni katturh јапасі khattiyo 
ѕад&' so vaddhate гаја sukkapakkhe va candima. 176. 
w. Ñatinañ са ріуо hoti mittesu са virocati, 
kāyassa bheda sappañño saggar so upapajjatiti йһа. 177. 


Tattha sarnseyyš ’ti katheyya, i v b: tāta Sucirata васе tumhäkafh 
rañāà ajja dānam dema silah rskkhima upossatbakammaj karomš  `ti koci 
puttho шаһёгёја s)ja táva pānaio һапаша* kåme paribhuñjâma surar pipanis '° 
kusala раџа 11 Кагікзёоа вче ti rañño sariseyya 19 tassa atimahantassápi 
amaccassa Vacaliarh katçë tumbâkarn гаја Yudhittbilagotto tathârūpe atthe jåte 
хат divasarn pamâdena vitinsmento mā avasi tassa vacaharb akatvë ирраппай 
kusalaclitah aparibāpaetvā kusalapatisarnyuttar Катоо) karotu унта idam assa 
katheyyšsiti, етап М. imāya gachàya “ajj eva kiccarh átappah ko Jaññā mara- 
пап! suve' ti Bbaddekarattasuttañ c' eva ʻappamådo amatapadarb pamëdo mac- 
cuno padan’ ti Арратадотёйай ca kathesi, ajjhattarh yevë ‘ti tâta Sucirata 
Sambhavapandito tayå dhammayñgapañhe puccbite kiin kathesiti таййё!? puttho 
зашапо tumbškarn rañño'? ajjhattam eva sarhaeyya uniyakajjhattasarnkhätarn '* 
kbandbapañcakarh һи{#Ё abhávatšya!` апіссеп ti katheyyāsi, ettavata M. 'sabbe 
sarnkbärā anjiccá (1 yadā райбёуа passati’ ‘апісса vata sarbkbasrë uppådavaya- 
dhammino’ t| avam рі bhasitarn aniccatarn katbesi, kum maggan 1} brahmana 


lBd цап В tri, ° Rd niseveyya. * ajja euve - - - аанай wanting in Cs 
5 Bd psháreyya. “ Bd yutto. 7 Chs satah. 5 Сіз karissāmā, ° Bd pákema. 
10 Cs Bd pivā-. !! Cs patata corr. to рапа, Ck pana па. !% Віз add ka- 
theyya. 18 Cha -а. !* Ck piyakajjhattasarnklišta, C? tikajjbatta-, Bd niyyakajha. 
18 Ваг abbâvato. 


6. Mahakapljátaka {Б16.) 67 


yathā mülho acelano endhabšlaputhujjano dvanatthiditthigatasarnkhštarn kum- 
maggarh sevatl alai tava гаја tah па seveyya niyyšánikarn dasakusalakamma- 
pathamaggarh ета sevatü 'tl evam авва vadeyyšásiti, attānan tl imar sugatiyarb 
{Шеш ! attabbavarh pnåtlvatteyya, уела kammena tisso kusalesampattiyo sabba- 
kimamegge’ atlikkamitvš арёуе nihbaitati (аф ® kammar па kareyyá 'ti attho, 
adhamman ti tlvidhaduccaríitasarnkhštarb айһатташй па ssmacareyya, atitthe 
t! dvasatthisarbkhšte atitthe nappatăreyya*, па о!йгеуу& ° рі pštho, attano 
ditthánugatirn āpajjantarh јапаф па otāreyys, anatthe 't akirane5, yato" 
ti yuttapayutto па slyš, Ьгйһшапа yadi te гај= dhammayágapaūho vattitu- 
kamo imami ovāde vattatü 'ti tassa katheyyäsfti ayam ettha adhippáyo, 
вада ti вайїай, |, v.b.: уо khattiyo etani kāraņāni kātu Jšnšátl ao raja 
snkkapakkhe' cando viya зайл vaddbati, virocatiti" mittämaccamajjhe attano 
eilšcarañanadigunehi  sohhati virocatîtl. 


Evai М. gaganatale candar ntthápento viya Buddhbalil- 
һйуа brāhmaņassa pañhe'° kathesi. Mahājano nadapto selento 11 
appothento sādbukārasahassāni adāsi celukkhepe ca añguli- 
pothe са pavattesi, hatthapilandhanādīni khipi, evam khitta- 
dhana khotimattar ahosi. Rājâpi 'ssa tuttho mahantarh yasarh 
adāsi. Sacīrato pi nikkhasahassena püjetvš'' snvannapatte 
játihiñgulakena райһе!* vissajjanarh likhitvā Iodapattanagararh 
gantvë гаййо Чһашшауйарарайһаш Ка(һеві, Rājā tasmirh 
dhamme vattitvā saggapadarh '' pūresi. 


5.1.4. а, „па bhikkhave idan' eva pubbe рі Т. mabāpañho yevā" 
'ti vatvā j. s.: „Tadā Dbanañjayarājā Anando abosi, Sucirato Anu- 
ruddho '', Vidhuro Кавзаро!*, Bhadrakāro Moggallāno'*, Sañjaya- 
māņavo Sāriputto'*, Sambhavapandito sham evā" "і. Sambbava- 
јаівкай. 


6. Маһакаріја(ака. 


Вйгйёпвзввш!' ahü гаја ti, Idah S. Veluvane у, Deva- 
dattassa silāpevijjhanarh а. к. Tene hi dhanuggahe рауо}ебуй apara- 


1 Сіз -yatthitarn. ? Chs -kamagge, Bd -kâmasagge. ? Ck sarn, Сг уаш. * Bd 
mnappakareyya. ° Bd -nena. * all three MSS. yutto. ? Ск addı va 5 СЕ 
«eati, * Bd -dihigu- 1° Bd -am. 1 Bd omits se-. ! Bd pūjarh katvš. 
2 Bd „аф. 4 Bd -pūrah. 15 Bd adde ahosi. 1* Bd -syarb. 

5* 


10 


16 


95 


30 


15 


95 


68 XVI. Tiùsanlpāta. 


bhāge silāya paviddhāya' bhikkhūbi Devadattassa avanne ksthite S. 
„na bhikkhave idän’ eva pubbe pi Devadatto таућаф silam” pa- 
vijjhi уез" 'ti vatvā a, а, : 


A. В. Br. г. k. Kāsigāmake’ eko kassakabrāhmaņo khet- 
taib kasitvā gone vissajjetvā kuddalakammar kāta árabhi. 
Gonā ekasmim рассһе раппйпї* khādantā anukkamena а(атйй 
pavisitvā. ра!йуййвп. So vela sallakkhetvà kuddëálam tha- 
petvá gone olokento adisvā domanassappatto te pariyesanto 
atavirh' pavisitvá áhindanto anto" Himavantarh pävisi, so tattha 
disamülho'" sattaharmrn niraháro vicaranto eka tiņdukarakkharh 
бівуа abhiruyha phalāni khëdauto° parigalitva" gsatthihatthe 
parakapapáte pati, tatr’ assa даѕайіуава vitivattá. Тада Bo. 
kapiyoniyarm nibbattitvá phaláphaláni khádanto tarm purisarh 
disvā silaya yoggarn' katvā tam purisarm uddhari. So tassa 
niddāâyantassa silāya matthakar padálesi'', M. tassa (аш 
kamma ñatvā uppatitvā sškháya nisīditvă „bho purisa, ста 
bhümiyam ™ gaccha, ahah sākhaggena ќоуЬаф magga &сік- 
khanto gamissámiti tam ригїзаш агабба(о niharitvá magge 
thapetvā pabbatapādam eva pāvisi. So"! puriso M-e арагај- 
jhitvá kutthi'* hutvä ditthadhamme yeva manussapeto ahosi, 
so sattavassāni dukkhapilito vicaranto Bārāņasiyah Miga- 
cirarn'* пууапаш pavisitvā pákarantare kadalipannarh attharitvā 
vedanāmatto “ пірајјі. Тада Bārāņasirājā uyyánam gantvá 
tattha vicaranto tar disvá „ko si уаш, kih vā katvā imam 
dukkha patto ti pucchi. So pi ‘ssa sabbar vitthārato 
ācikkhi. 

Tam ан аш pakasento S. ñaha: 

1. Ватапаѕзаш '" ahü raja Kasinam ratthavaddhano, 

mittamaccaparibbülho agamësi Migëciram '* 178. 


1 Bd -vljhšya=. 3 Ck Bd ai-. * Bd -game. * Ва tiņāni. * Ва anto маз. © 
Bd omits anto. Т Bd adds hutva. ° БФ tiüdukaraqkkhato. * Bd -li-. 10 Ck 
Ьһорвањ. >! Cks ра-, !!' Bd -yā, !° Bd adds рі '* Ck шцы. ' во Сіз; 
Ваг migaJinarn. !* Bda -patto. !° Na -пазуађ. 


6. Mahákapijátaka. (516.) 69 


з. Tattha brāhmanam nddakkhi setan citrah kilšsinam 
viddhastarn kuviláram ' va kisan dhamanisanthatam. 179. 
в. Peramakaruñüatam pattsm disvë kicchagateh naram 

svaca’ vyamhito? таја: yakkhanam katamo nu ві, 180. 
4. Hattbapādā са te setā, tato setataro siro, 

ваќаф kammasavannan te. kilāsabahulo с' asi, 181. 
в. Vatthanavalisamkasa °  pitthi te ninnatunnata, 

Каја pabbš ca te añgü, nàññarn' passëmi edisah, 182. 
в. Ugghattapado  tasito kiso dhamanisanthato 

chëto ātattarūpo’ si, kuto nu tvam'° agacchasi'', 183. 
т. Duddasi аррвЕйго si dubbanno bhimadassano '*, 

janetti уарі te mātā па tam iccheyya рвззііот, 184. 

s. Кий kammam akarë'° pubbe, kam avajjham aghatayi '*, 

kibbisam yam Кагїуйпа idah dukkham upāgamîti. 185. 

Tattha Baáršnassan!5 (1 Вёгапавіуат, mittamaccaparlbbülho Ч 
mittehi ca dahabhattihl amaccehi parlvato, Migāciran!* ti evannámakarh 
uyyánarn, sotan t| ве(айи!{Һепе setara kabarakutíhesa citrani 7 pabhinnena 
kandüyanakilñasakutibena! kilisinarh vedanāmattarh !# kadalipanne nipannarh20 
addasa, viddbastan kuvilšraiñ vë ' vaņamokbehi patantena 31 marnsena 
"1ддБазќаф supupphltakurilärasadisarh?®. kisan ti ekaccesu радевева atthl- 
сашшашаї!авагїгаш 22 вігај 1авап(ћагагр 2*, vyambito?? t| bbito vimbaya- 
раппо%* vä, yakkbšnan ti yakkháparm antare tvarn katarayakkho nāmä 'd, 
за ћапёта[ іла кава?! ¿| plithiketthëne) ° avunitvë {ларієа vatthanavali- 
вадівё ?', апра ti kaJjapabbavalilsadisšni 39 te añgānl, пайбап ti sñüerh purlsaü 
ca 60 odieah na passim(, üugghattapáado ti rajokinnapàdo, ātattarūpo?! 
tl sukkhssariro, duddasiti dukkhena passitabbo, арракёго sîu sarirsppa- 
kărarabito, dussanthšno 61} attbo, kih Катта akaran?” tl ito pubba kid 
kammar akara®?, skšsiti attho, kibblsan23: ti дагапайашташ. 


Tatoparah brāhmwaņno ha: 
+. Taggha ie aham akkhissam yathàpi kusalo tathā, 
зассатаёйип hi? lokesmin pasamsant' idba радиа, 186. 


3 Bd ko-. 8! Ck ауайса. > Bd byamitto. * Bde .rarn. 5 во Ck; Ог vajpbati- 
vali-, Bd vattanë-, Bd vaddhana-. * Rd kālapubbā. 7 Bd nañūah. °’ Bd ug- 
Bbatha-. * Ck ātattba-, В@ aditta-. '° Cke Bd tvam. !1 Ad kuto ві Каса 
gacchasi. !2 Ck hima-, Bd bhimm-. !® Bd „гат. '* Ска -el, Bd aghāțayi. !° 
Bd _—ayan. 1% Bde migMjinan. ' Bd vici-. 3° Rd kandupharanaki-. !° Bd -nap- 
pattan. #0 Се tipa-, Rd nippa-. ?! Bd paggbaran-. ?? Bd риррнаф kos, 2% 
Cs Bd -шайап-. #* Ck -santhavaib, C* -santhavarn corr, to -santbatarh, Ba 
sirajñlasanatarn, 9° Bd by-. >* Bd vImhayamšpsnno. 31 ао СЕ; Cr vanthatšvalí-, 
Bd vattanavali-. 235 pd pithikandukathšáne. 2° Ck kálšávalli-, Сә kalāpavalli-. 
30 Bd -sarh, omitting са-. °) Bd айца-, Вг šditra-. 33 so all three MSS. for 
-rā? 2% Bd гат. °t Ck -dimbi, Bd -dī Ы. 


15 


25 


30 


70 ХУІ Timmsanipata. 


1 Eko caram gogaveso mūlho' ассазагиш vane 
arañūe їгіпе’ vane” nānākuñjarasevite. 187. 

п. Våālamigānucarite vippanattho 'smi kānane, 
acarin tattha sattšham khuppipásásamappito. 188. 

19. Tattha tindukam addakkhim visamatthabuhhukkhito 
рераќаш abhilambantaem зашраппарЬа!айһаппаш. 189, 

19. Vātasitāmı Ьћеаккћевіф, {апі ruccimsu me Ыһиваш, 
atitto* rukkham aruhim °, *tattha hessámi йзйо'. 190. 

14. Fkam me bhakkbitam азі dutiyam abhipatthitam, 
tato sā bhañjatha' sakhš chinnë phgrasunë туа. 191. 

10. So `һаш аһа va sākhāhi uddhapādo’ avarhsiro 
appatitthe anālambe giriduggasmi pápatam. 192, 

16. Yasmâ са vāri gambhiram tasmā па samabhajjisam °, 
tattha sesin оігёпвобо аоорё dasa rattiyo, 193. 

зт. Ath' ettba kapi-m-agañchi' gonangulo'° dartearo 
вакһё [hi] sëkEham vicaranto'' khādamāno dumapphalam, 
во таш disv kisam pandum kâruññam акагаф !'* mayi: 194. 

19. Ambho ko nāma so ettha evam dukkhena attito, 
manusso amanusso vü attanam те pavedaya. 195. 

19. Tass’ aūjalim paņāmetvā idam vacanam abravim : 
manusso 'ham vasam patto, sã me n' atthi ito gati, 
tam vo™ vadāmi: bhaddarn vo'?. tvañ ca ше вагапаш bhava'*, 196. 

so, Garusilam '° рве1үйпв vicari pabbate kapi. 
silåya yoggam Евітапа nisabho etad abravi: 19Ү. 

а. Ebi me pitthim šruyba рїғаф gaņnhăhi bāhuhi'*, 
ahan (аш uddharissami giriduggato vegasā. 198. 

эз. Tassa tam vacanam sutvă vāpariodassa sirimato 
рїї āruyba dhirassa givam bāhāhi aggshim, 199. 

+в. So mam tato samutthasi tejasi'' Ьвівтё kapi 
vihanñamano Кїссһепв giriduggato vegasā. 200, 

зг. Uddbaritvāna mam santo nisabho etad ebravi: 
iņùgha паш samma rakkhassu, равзпрїзваїй!” muhuttakam *. 201. 


1 Cko, Cs-a. 5 Ске irine, Bd irana ° Ck vicine, С vicine. * Rd atito. 
5 pd sruyhi. % Ске bbajjitā. 7 Bd uddhai-. ° Bd sampapajjiyap, ° Ck 
кай), На касс]. :!9 Rds -guttho. 1! во all tbree MSS. 12 во all three MSS. 
for -rā? 12 Bdie. !$ Ck -vaib, Ca -ve. 15 Ck Bd silah. !%# Сы -hābi. 1 
Ck teresi, Bd tejasi. !% Che равѕв-, Bd pasu-. !* Bd -tti. 


80. 


1. 


вт. 


6. Mabākapljātaka. (518.) 71 


Sihevyagghā' св 4їрї* са scchako katarsccbayo 

te шаш pamsttah һийвеуушй, te {таш дівуала ° уйгауа. 202, 
Evam те paritëtüna ° passupi зо muhuttakam; 

tadàham рӣрікаф dițthih patilacchih ayoniso: 203. 

Bhakkho ayam manussánam yathü с’ аббе vane migā, 

yan пйп` imam vadhitvana chāto khādeyya vānaram. 204. 
Asito’ са gamissámi mamsam adáya sambalam, 

kantëram nittharissãmi, pātheyyam me hhavissati. 205. 

Tato silah‘ раћеіуёра matthakarm sannitálayim', 

mema hatthakilaotassa’ pabāro dubbalo ahu. 206. 

So ca vegen’ udappatto' kapi ruhiramakkbito 

assupupņehi nettehi rodanto шаш udikkbati: 207. 

Màyyo "° 
tvah св kho пйёшв dighāyu'® аббат 


mam kari'', bbaddan te, tvah са nâm’ edisnm kari, 
' vāretuh erahasi, 208. 
Aho vata те purisa tāva dukkarakāraka '* 

edisā visamā duggā papātā uddhațo'* mayā, 209. 

Anito !* рагаіокё va dubbheyyam'' mam amanñatbs, 

tar tena” papadhamniena '' pāpah pāpene cintitah, 210, 
Ma" h' eva tvan adhammattha vedapam katukarh phusi, 

mā b’ eva рёраш kammantam phala velum va tam *! vadbi. 211. 
Tayi me n' atthi vissãso, papadhaninam атабба(ћа"?, 

ehi me pitthito gaccha dissamāno va santike, 212, 

Mutto si hattbš vāļănam®”’, patto si mānusib padam, 

ева таро adhammattha, tena рвссһа?* yathësukham, 213. 
ldarn vatvā giricaro rahade’ pakkhalya matthakam 

assüni sampamajjitvā tato pabbatam āruhi. 214. 

So "ham tenâbhisatto’™" 'smi parilāhena ațttito”, 

dayhamānena gattena vürim *° pātum upāgamih. 215. 
Agginā viya santatto rahado ruhiramakk hito 


pubbalohitasarhkaso sabbo? те samapajjatha °. 216. 


1 Bd вїћа byasggha. 2 all three MSS. -1. > Bd -пі * Ck -tetuna, Сә -tàtüna ? 
Bd -ttatuua. ° Ck āslno, С° авіо? Ва зано “all tbree MSS. вї-. * Ca 
=-layi'h, Bd -layi, ° Ce bhatta-, Bå -gatta-, Вг -gattarh-. ? Bd -naduppaito 
10 Çk mayye. !! Che omit kari. '? Bd dighavu. '5 Bd -ẹ, 14 Ck „кё, НЕ 
=rikam. 18 Bd ло. '# Ck апо, Bd anito. 37 Сів dumbheyya. 18 Cke tetai, !9 
Bd -kammena. 1° Ске me. 21 Cks va Кай. 33 СА asaññata. 2° Ck vāli- 34 


Ct -е. 


25 Rds ruhirar. 35 Cke tenšhisatto, Bd tenābhisitto, 3! Ck atthi-, Bd 


andito. *6 Bd -i 2° Chka -e. 20 all three MSS. sammap-. 


10 


90 


#5 


30 


10 


30 


50 


72 XVI. Тіфвапірёіа 


«о. Yāvanto udabinduni küëyasmim пірабішзи me 
tâvanto gandü' jäyetha addhabeluvasādisâ”. 217. 
я. Pabhinnā paggharimsu me` kunapa pubbalohita, 
yena yen' eva‘ gacchëmi gāmesu nigamesu ca 218, 
аз. Dandahatthë nivëárenti itthiyo ригїзё са шаш: 
okkitā’ pütigandhena måssu orena-m-āgamā'. 219. 
«з. Etādisam idam dukkham sattavassāni dàni me 
anubhomi sakan Катта pubbe dukkatam attano, 220. 
<. Таш vo vadami Ыһайдаш vo yāvant' ettha samāgatā: (Dhp. v. звт.) 
mëssu mittšngm dubbhittho', mittadubbho ° hi pápako. 221. 
as. КиМ kilasi bhavati yo mittënam idha’ dubbhati, 
һвуазва bhedā mittaddu '° nirayam [во] upapajjatiti. 222. 


Tattha kusaslo ti ysthā cheko kusslo Кабће 1! tatha!3 kathessami, go- 
gavoso ti rnatthagone!3 gavessnto, accasarin ti manussspatharh atikkamitvā 
Himavantara pavləim. агай йе ti агајаке 1* suññe, irige’? ti sukkhakantašre, 
vicine’? ti vivltte!), тіррапа{ {о ti maggsmülho, bubhukkbito ti вай- 
Jatabubhukkho chātajjhatto, papštamabhilambantas tí papātaabblmukharh 16 
olambantan, sa mpaunaphaladhārin ti тадћигарћајайЬагінаф, vatasitánitií 
pathamam tāva vātapatitāni Шһайїїї!#, (аа 20 bessåmiti tasmim rukkbe 
aubito bbavlesämiti ёг Ьо `mhi, tato 882! ti tasaa abblpatthitasaa аі буа 
hattbe pasārite sā шауё abbirülhasëkha 22 pharasunā chinnā viya sbhañjatha 33, 
anålambe ti ālambitajthānarahite?’*, giriduggasmin ti girivisame. 5ев1п 
ti sayito `шМ, hapimagasüñchitl?5 Карі âgacchi?’’, gonañgulo3! tigunnarm is 
nañgutthas, añguitho, gonañguttho??” ti рі pštho, gouañgulid pi pathanti, 
akaran mayitl akari mayl, ambho tí таһаг&)а во kapirājā їавш!тп Nara- 
kepapāte?™? шаша udakapothanssaddarh sutvă шаф ambho ti ālapitvā ko 
nâma’! во ti pucebi, vasappatto ti vyasanarh patto”, papātassa vassm 
patto”? ti attho, bbaddamh?* vo® (j tasmā tumhe vadiwi: bhaddarn tum- 
һава hotu, garusílan ti шаћёгёја so Керігаја mayá evarh vutte më hhayíci 


marh assāsetvå patbamamh (ёта garut silarn ?* gahetvā yoggain karonto pabbate 
1 Bd: gandu, Сёз anu. % Ва adha-. ° Cks omit me. * Нё yena ca. 6 Ck 
osakkhită, Сә овакиа * Ck опешёрашатй, Cs огепа-, Bd orena атаба. ? Bd 
duhbi-. 5 Cks -dubho. #во all three MSS. 10 Ва -dubbhi. !1 Bd -ві. 19 Ваг 
add ғо. 1% Віз naitbe-. !* Bd araññe tł rBjake, Ch arañüake tl arājake, !5 
Си irino, Сг irine, Bds irane. 16 so С^; Ck -пе, Bd vivano. 1 C% vicitto, 
18 Bd -tābbi-. '9 Bd omits khā-. 20 Ске omit tattha. ?! Bde eākbā. *2 Bd 
-hā sākbā. 28 Ck abbijja, Сә abhijjatba, Bd abbañcaths-. ?* Bd’ ālambitabbe-. 
38 Ck „васса, C" -gañjiti? Bd -gacchlti. 28 Ck āgachl, Сә āgañji? 9" Bd 
gonañgutbo, 2* Ck gunnā, C* gunna. ?° Ва omite go-. °° Bd -ke-. 31 Сі 
-mo 3? Cks panno. °? Bd omita та. 234 Cks bhadrarh. !5 Bd’ bhaddante. 
35 Ck Bd ai-. 


5. Mabākapijātaka. (516.) 73 


vicari, nisabho td purisaniaabho uttamavānarindo papātatațe! thatvā mam 
etad? abravl, bahuhiti? dvibi bihăābi mama givarh sugabitarb вап <, теё вей 
ti vegena, alrīmato ti psññavantassa, aggahin, ti satthihatthan Narakapa- 
pštarn 5 vātavegena otaritvë * udakapițthe thitassa aban vegena pitthirb sbhirü- 
bitvë ubhohí bāhāhi gīvam aggaheslrn, vibaññamāno ti kilanto, kicchenë 
"ú dukkhena santo papdito athavā parisanto kllamanto, rakkhassü 'Ш abarh 
tan uddbaranto va! kilanto ° mubuttarh хі 


amanto разепріава (авта тай? 
rakkhšhitl, ystha с аппе!® vane migàš ti asihšdibil1 аббе рі уе imasmirh 
{һапе!? vālamigā, pāllyab pana acchako! kataracchayo И likbanti, parl- 
tātūnan?’ ti maháršja evsm’* во kapirājā mam attano parittāņah katvā 
muhuttarn равворі ayonisomanasikarena, bhakkbo ti khšdítabbayuttako, âa! to 
ti дһасо 1% subito, sambalan ti pšátbeyyarn, matthakamh aaunitâlayin” 
И (авва vānarindassa matthakarh paharirn!5, sannitšlayln!?* tl рі pātho, dube 
balo abū 'ti Da balavā šei?” yathådhippāyah па agamāel, vegenëš ‘ti шауё 
раћаќарёвёпатедепа ?!, udappatto?? t| utthlto, mâyyo?® ti rena mittadübhi- 
ронвепа 34 silšya paviddhšya 25 mahëácammarh chiJjitçvë2% olambi, ruhirah pag- 
ghari, M. vedanamatto 27 cintesi: Imasmirm (ћёпе añño 5 п' atthi, Idan bhaya 
ша 99 purisah nissšya uppannan ti зо maranabhayabhito olambentarn camma- 
vajtirn 20 hatthena gabetvë uppatitva sškbarh abhiruyha tena рёрепа #addhith 
sallapauto máyyo *2 man ti šdim аһа, tattha mäyyo?? mamb bhaddante ti mä 
ayyo*' marh bhaddante ti’? tari nivāretl, tvan пата evan mayá papátá пййһа!о!! 
edisarn pharusakammaib mayl kari abo te ayuttarh katan ti, aho vata ti gara- 
banto өуаш šha, {ёта dukkarakārakā?? 'ti may! aparajjhanena atidukkata- 
kammakâraka, paralokā v8 `1 peralokato vlya ёпіко, dübheyyan3% ti dübbhi- 
tabherh vadbitabbarn, vedanarh katukan tt evar sante рі tvah adhammattha 
у&діват 25 abarù phusámi edisarn 2* vedanarı Каќокаф ша phust, tah рара- 
kammar pbalam velurb va tan mā vadhiti таш məbárāja plyaputtaksñi viya 
anukampi, афа пет ahar etad avocarn: syya may5 Кабат dosamh һадауе?! mā 
karl, mā шага asappurissm evarüpe araññe пагауі 2%, abarh disámülho maggaru 
пе Јёлёі, attanä katakammarh? ша “9 näsetha, Jivltadànarn me деа, агайбћ 
nīharitvā manussapathe *! {һаре!һ& 'ti evarn vutto so mayñ saddhim sallapanto 
tayi me D’ atthi vissšso ti аділ aba, tattba tayiG ito patthāya maybarm tayi 


1 Ваг pabbatapapāte. > Nd etan. ?° all three MSS, bahahiti. 4 Cha-a. 5 
Ва -te. * Ско notaritvā, 7 Hd omits va, ° Bd kilamanto. ! Ве пай. 109 
Ск» yo covaüñe. !1 во all three MSS. '? Bd vane. !% Cks ассһа-, !* Cè 
-шип, Bd parittãuā. !* Bd omita e-. 1* Вё khâdito. 37 Ck -tâlayin, Bd 
-їаЇвуїп. 18 all three MSS. -ri. 1° Cha -tšlayin, Bd -tālan. "° Bd as, 9) 
Bd pahita-. 32 Cks udapa-. 23 Ck māyye. ?* Ck -dubbi-, Сә -dühhi, Bd 
-dubbhi-. 28 Bd pavithaya 2* Bd bhijjitvā. #! Hē -ppatto 95 Bd -e. 3} 
Bd omits iz. %° Rds cammaebandharn. ^! Ck Bd -е. 33 Bd omits mâ- - ti. 
33 Сіз -rikā. 34 Bd dubbh-. 35 Bde adde vedanarh. 2* Bd 18-. 37 Сів omit 
dosamh hadaya. >: Bd ші nassa. °? Hd katarn-. *0 so šll three MSS for mā 
шай? #! Bd am. 


10 


16 


30 


30 


10 


16 


80 


74 ХУІ. Тїфвамрёш. 


уіввёво п! ай, еЬїн bho рогіва ahah taya saddhirn magge na Ramissámi 
tvar pana shi mama pitthíto avldüre dissaminasariro va цассћа nban ruk- 
khaggen' eva l gamissšnútl, mutto siti atha mam во mabārāja агайй& піћагістё 
bho ригіва mutto sl vš|amiganarm batthā’, patto ві mānusib padan ti 
manussupacārarn? agato al, esa te maggo etena gacchā `i аһа, giricaro ti 
giricārivänaro, рай ®һа]уй '() dbovitvā, tenabhisatto 11 eO ahar mahārāja 
tena vânarena abhlsstto papakamma рагїплїө* tenábhlsatto ° "ваші таййатёпо 
evam аһа, attito’ ti upadduto, upšágamin {i okar гаһћадат префа(о 'эш!, 
samapajjathā! 'ıl Jāto evarūpo hutva црабћав!, yāvanto ti yattakāni, 
дапфй®* јауесћа 'ti апда јауітви, so kira pipāsah sandhāreturn asakkonto 
udakañjalih ukkhipitvà * (окат pisltvā eosan sarire siñcl!'9, ath’ assa tāved 
eva ndabindugananâya аддһареіоғараккарашёрё!! gandš utțthahiinau, tasmā 
evam äha, pabhinnā ti te gandá ќат divasam «va bhijjitvë kunapš!! pūti- 
gandbikà hutvä pubbalohitáni paggharihau, yenā ‘ti yena '3 maggena, okkitā!* 


115 pūtigandhena okinná parikklta!6 parivāritā, màssu orena ё аша ti" 


dutthasatta orena mëssu agama, amhâkarn ssutikarn mā agamāsi evam vadantë 
nivārentît! 1% attho, дёпі me ti mshëršja tato patthaya ідёпі sattavassåni mama 
ettakarb Каја sakakammarı anubhomi, ditl so atiano mittadübhlksmmarn*° 
vitthāretvâ mabårāja mani yeva oloketvà evarüpah kammar na konaci kattabban 
Ч vatră tarb vo ti adim aha, tatiba tan ti tesmā yasmà ervarūpai kammar 
ava dukkhavipákar (автё (1 attbo, kuttbi Кав? bhavati уо тоїїїйлат) idha 
dubbbati káyassa bhħedā mittaddu?' пігауа so upapajjatiti?? ауа abhlsam- 
buddhagātbā, bhikkhave yo idha imasmic 33 loke mittānan dubbhati Бітва 
80 вуагйро hotiti®! artho. 


Tassápi purisassa гаййй saddhim kathentassa kathentass' 
eva pathavi vivaram adāsi, tah Кһапаш ñeva cavitvá avicimhi 
nibbatto. Баја tasinim pathavin pavitthe uyyáná nikkhamitvä 
парвгат pavittho. 

5.1. d. а. „па bhikkhave idan' eva pubbe рі Devadatto mayham 


silam ` pavijjbi?' уе+а'* 'ti таёта j.s.: „Tadā mittadūbhipuriso Deva- 
datto shosi, Карігаја aham еуй* ‘і. Mahākapijātakam. 


! Bd -ggohova. 2 Cks hattha. 2è Bd adds patto. * Bd о 5 Cks tona satto, 
6 Chsatthi-, Bd andi-. `! Скә sammap-. © Ckeandu. Bd gangu. ? Cr 
udakajallrh-, Bd udakañcalikkhlpitva. 10 Bd -catl. !1 Bd adhabelupakka-. 1° 
Chka spa. 18 Bd repeats yena. !* Ck okkbitā. >° Che add окина, !* СЕ 
-kkhata. Сә -kkhita, Bd -kkhitā. 1" masaq - - ti wanting in Cks. 34 Bd «siti. 
19 Che „гети. °° Bd attanā dubbhi-. 11 Ва -dubbhi, 33 all three MSS. 
срра-. 32 Bd omite im-. #* Cks ahositi. 2° all three MSS. вПаш. 36 Bd 
pativiJjhi, cfr. Dbp. p. 279. 


7. Dakarakkhasajātika. (517.) — 8. Papdarajātaka. (518.) 75 


7. Dakarakkhasajštaka, 


Sace vo vuyhamānānen ti. Dakarakkhasajātakam, “Tam 
sabbam Mahbāummaggajātake āvibhavissati. Dakarakkhasa- 
jštakem. 


8. Pandarajātaka. 


Vikigņaväcan ti. Idah S. J. т, musávšdam katvā Derva- 
dattassa pathavipavesanam ё. k. Tadā hi 5. bhikkhuhi tassa 
атаппе kathite „ne bhikkhave idan' ета pubbe pi Devadatto musā- 
Yüdam katvë pathavim pavittho yevā" "і vatvā a. ā.: 


A. B. Вг. г. k. pañcasatavāņijā pëváya ватиййат pakkhan- 
ditvā sattame divase 'atīradassaniyāya пйуйуа samuddapitthe 
bhinnāya thapetvā ekar avasesā macchabhattá' аһевий. Eko 
pana уй!ауавепа* Karambiyapattanarn nāma pāpuņi, во 88- 
mačdato uttaritvā naggabhoggo tasmirn pattane' bhikkhāya 
сагі. Tam enar manussá „ayan вашапо apiccho вап{и{{һо“ 
ti sambhāvetvāâ sakkáram karirmsu. So ,„laddbo me jiviko- 
pāyo*“ ti tesu nivësanapápuranarh' dadantesul| рі па icchi’. 
Te ,,o' atthi ito uttari appiccho ватапо“ ti bhiyyo bhiyyo 
pasiditvá tassą авзашарадаф katvā tattha nam vësesum°, 
So karambiyaacelo° ti paññayi. Tassa tattha vasantassa 
mahalábhasakkáro udapādi, еко nāgarājâpi ‘вва supannarájá 
са upatthanam йрассһапЧ, tesu nāgarājā námena Pandaro 
ойта. Ath’ ekadivasam supannarajá tassa вапіікат рапгуй 
vanditvā ekamantarn nisinno evam аһа: ,„bhante ашһаКатй 
ñštaká паре ganhantë bahu vinassanti, etesah nápanam 
вапһараоіуётагћ '° mayah na jánáma, guyhakáranarh'!i kira 
nesam atthi, sakkheyyātha"™ nu kho tumhe ete piyāyamānā '' 


) Bde macchakacchapabhakkhā. ! Bd -vegana. > Bd adds neva. * Bà -topšyo, 
3 Ва -påruppanai. 6 Bd dentesu; аһевшї eko ~- - tesa wantiog in Ck. T 
Bd icchati. 9? Bd ғавёреваф. # Hd -blya acelo, Ckz -biyavelo. !0 Bd -tani- 
уётаф. `! Cha guyharh-. !3 Bae sakkuneyyštha, !*% Bd piyamànā. 


10 


15 


20 


35 


76 XVI. Timsanipata, 


viya tar Кагапаф pnucchitun“ ti. So ,„sādhū“ ‘ti sampa- 
ticchitvā aupaņņarāje vanditvā pakkante' nāgarājassa āgata- 
kāle vanditvā пїзїппаш nagaršájáparm pncchi: ,,парагёја sn- 
раппй kira tamhe ganhantá bahu vinassanti, tumhe gaņphantā 
kathan ganhitum sakkontîti“. ,Bhante, idam amhākarh 
guybarh’ rahassarn, mayá imar kathentena ñëtisarhghassa mara- 
nam ñbhatam?' hotiti% ‚Кїї рапа tvar āvuso “ayar 
вбпавва kathessatiti” evamsaññi hosi‘, nëáham anñassa' 
katheseãmi, attaná° pana jānitukāmatāya pucchāmi’, {уаш 
тауһаф saddahitvá nibbhayo hutvā kathehiti% Марагаја 
„kathemi bhante“ ti vanditvā раккаші. Punadivasam' pi 
pucchi, tadápi `вва оа kathesi. Atha nam tatiyadivase 
āgantvā nisionah nágarájanam ¿ajja tatiyo divaso, mama 
pucchantassa kimatthah оа kathesiti“% „Tumhe aññassa 
ācikkhissathā ti bhayena bhante“ ti. ,,Kassaci па kathessāmi, 
nibbhayo kathehîti“, „Tena hi Ыһаше aññassa mā katha- 
yitthā“‘ 'ti patiññarn gahetvā ,bhante тауаф mahante mahante 
pāsānņe gilitvā bhāriyā hutvā nipajjitvā supannánam ágamana- 
kāle mukha nibbāhetvā dante vivaritvë supanne dasiturmn 
gacchāma'!, te āgantvā ambākańh sīsah ganhanti, tesar 
amhe garubhāre hutvá nipanne uddharitun vayamantánam '* 
ñeva одакаф ottharati, te anto udake yeva maranti, iminā 
kāraņena bahü supannë vinassanti, ќеѕаф ambe рапһапїапаг 
kim sisena gahitena, bālā naūgutthe'’ gahetvā amhe hetthá- 
sisake't katvā gahitagocararn'° mukhena chaddāpetvā la- 
huke katvā рапішр '* sakkontiti“% Iti so attano rahassa- 
káranam tassa дивѕаѕва kathesi. Atha tasmim pakkante 
supannarája āgantvā karambiyaacelakarm '' vanditvā „kith 
bhante pucchitarn te nāgarājassa guyhakāraņan " ti āha, So 


1 Ck pakkhante. Э В4 guyha. * Bd ahatah, Oks gvštarn. * Bd» аһаф, $ 
Bd kadhissaii, Ве kathissanti. * Bds ahositl. ? Bd абба. ё Rê -no. * 
Cks pucehi. 19 Bd -se. 11 Ва icchima. !° Bd vāyamāna, 13 Rd -өпа. !* 
Bd siso. 12 Ck -u, Bd gabitah. 1% Ске add na. 1? Bd -Јаф. 16 Ске guyharm-. 


8. Pandarajataka (518.) 77 


„ёша üvuso'“ ti vatvā sabba tena kathitaniyamen' eva 
kathesi. Tamh sutvá snpanno ,,nëgarñjena ayuttarb katai’, 
ñütinarñ nāma nassananiyámo рагавѕа па? kathetabbo, hotu 
ajja mayá supapnavátam  katvë pathamarn evam* eva gahe- 
tub vattatiti“ so вораппауёќаф katvā Рапфагапарагё}йпа 
nañgutthe° раһеіуй hetthasisakam' katvā gahitagocarath " 
chaddāpetvā uppatitvā škásam pakkhandi. Pandarako" ākāse 
hetthāsisakarù olambanto „пауй ув!" mama dukkhaih aábha- 
tan“ ti paridevanto ёћа 
1. Vikinnavácarb anigülhamantam '' 
аваййа(аш aparicakkhitārarh '° 
bhayarh tam anveti'" sayah abodham '* 
парат yathā Pandarakarm вираппо. 223. 
s. Yo guyhamantarh parirakkhaneyyam '* 
mohá naro sarmsati Ыһ&вашйпо'* 
tah bhingamantah Бћауат !" anveti Кһірраф 
пёратп yathā Pandarakarn supanno. 234, 
s. Nánumitto garurn'” attham guyhar vedetom arahati 
sumitto са asambuddharh sainbuddharb vå '° anatthavā, 225. 
< Уівваваш арајјіт '° aham: acelo 
samano ayah sammato bhāvitatto, 
(аввёћат akkhirn уїуагий guyharh attharn'', 
štitamattho Карапо?* rudámi. 226, 
s. Tassáham рагатаф brabme guyharn "" 
vācah h' imam násakkhi sarnyametum, 
tappakkhato hi bhayam ёраќаф mama, 
atitamattho Карапо?* radămi, 227. 


t Bd káraqanti ётатово ° Bdak-. ? Bd omits па. * Bd -vikan. 5 Bd 
etam. #4] vatvā - - - naügutthe wanting in Ck. ? Bd sisah, *# OF -te-. 9 
Ck -ra, Bd -ro. !0 Bd omite va. !! Bd -guybs-. !% Bd aparirakkhi-. 1? 
Ска anvo. !* СЕ akkho-, Сг skho-. !5 Bd -rakkheyyarn. J€ Bd Һа-. 17 во 
alt three MSS, for bhay’? !* Bd guru. 19 C% ca. 3° Bd -i. 3! Ck Bd guyha- 
meitai, Сг guyhemattharn for guybattbah? 7? Вдә -narm. 23 во all three MSS. 
for саввёће brahme paramarb guybattharn ? 


16 


20 


10 


15 


78 XVI. Tirsenipâta. 


в. Yo ve паго subadam шаййатапо 
goyhar айћаф вашвай dukkalfne' 
dosá bhayā athavë rāgaratto 
pallittho' bālo asarhsayam so. 228. 

т. Tirokkhavāco’ ава{аш pavittho 
yo samgatisu'-m-udireti' vākyarh 
&вТтіво dummakho ty-ābu tam parar, 
бта“ arā’ вафуаше tādisamhā. 229. 

в. Аппаш pënarn kásikarn" candanañ ca 
manapitthiyo mālamucchādanañ ca 
oháya gacchāmase sabbakāme, 
supapna pánupagatá va ty-amha 'ti. 230. 


Tattba vikipnavacan ti patthatavacanarn, anligūlhsamantan” aps- 
ticchantamantarh, ssañĀatan ti köyadvärâdīni rakkhiturb asakkontar, арагі- 
саккћісёгап !0 t| ayarn mayá hathitamantarh rakkhiturn!1 nat? sakkbiasatîti 
puggslarn oloketurb upaparikkbitah asskkontarn, bhayarh tan?’ ti tab imehi 
catühi añgehi samannăgatsin sbodharh't ліррабба№ puggalarh sayarhkatam eva 
bhayarh anveti!5 yathā mar Pandarskarn пава supanno anvëágato tl, ваф- 
sati bhšsamáno ti rakkhiturp ssamətthassa pāpapurisassa bhāsamāno ka- 
theti 1%, nanumitto ti na anumitto anuvaitanamattena $ yo mitto na hadayena 
во guyham 1% attharn Janitum nårahatiti’'” paridevati, aeambuddhan ti авар- 
buddha ajñnanto, appañño ti attho, sambuddban ti sambuddharh Jananto 
ti attho, І. v. b.: yo рі subadayo mitto apañüo варабӣо pi vā уо? anatthavā 
anatthacaro so pi guyharn vedituh ;nârabat' evà 'ti, samano ayan ti ayain 
ввшапо ti ca jlokasammato сі са bhäāvitatto ti са maññamāno aha etasmirn 
vissšsarh äpaljih, akkhin ti kathesiin, atitamattho ti atitartho atikkan- 
tatibo Һат idëni kapaparh тайаш1й pariderati, tassā `Ч tassa асејалва 
brahme Ц squpannarm alspati, јзатуашеёоп ti idam’! пура vāca ra- 
hassakáranarh 3” rakkhiturn guyhiturh 2! na t sakkhirn, tappakkhatohfti idăni 
1дага bhayam mama (авза acelassa pakkbato 25 kotțhāsato ssutikā сабаш iti 
atītattbo Карапет rudamii, suhadan Ч suhado me ayan ti шайбашёпо. 


1 Cha „по. ? зо Cs, Ck pallitto, В4ғ pallatthito, °’ СЕ nirukkha-, Се rika- 
rukkha-. * Bd -tisu, Ске -tisa. 5 Be sumu-. * Bdeará. ? Са ёга. 5 Bd 
-ka. ° Bd -guyha-. !° СЕ parimekkbi-, Cs paricakkbi-, Bd арагігаккЫ-. '! 
Ck add rakkbissati. ?? Bd n3. '6 В4 bbhayamanvetī. }* Ck akhodam, Се 
akhodarn corr. to abo-. !* Сіз ārocati. !* Bd katbesi. 17 Cks -mantena. 18 
Cs Bd -a. 1!" ВФагаһа-. 10 Сіғ зо. 3! Bd imam, 9? Cks rahessarn-. 33 В 
rehiturh ә: ga-. 34 Bd nš. 35 Ck га-. 


8. Pandarajātaka. (518.) 79 


dukkuline t! akuline! nice, доза tl etehi dosâdīhi karanehl уо evarūpe’ 
Euyharb sarhsati ao bšlo assrhnaysrh pallstthito 5 parlvattetvā patito‘ hato yeva 
nāmā 'ti ettho, tirokkhavāco ti attano? vâcarh bhasitukëmo* tassa tirokkba- 
кака! pațicchannavāco*, asata pavitțbo ti asappurlsšánarb апќагый ра- 
{о assppurisesu pariyapanno, samgatisaknudfretiti’ sarhgatisu udireti 
yo evarüpo ратеваш таһлёбай sutvà рагізашајјһеви asukena asukar піша 
katam vā vuttarn vå ti vákyaih udireti tah nararn šsivieo dummukho рй}. 
mukho ti šhu, tâdisamhā purisâ ётё ârā’? вапуаше düradürato’! virameyya, 
рагічајјеууа '® ’tj attho, mšlamucchšdanañca'3 'Ч mālā !* са dibbarn catu- 
Jätlgandheucchâdanañ ca!5, оһауй!® "і etehl!7 dibbasnnádayo sabbakame ajja 
mayerh ohšya chaddetvë gemissãma, sü рап napšanupagatšvatyambi "tÍ bho 
апраппа päņehl орава! va te amhe!! saranarh по hohíti. 


Evarn Pandarako ākāse hețthāsīsako olambanto atthahi 
gāthāhi paridevi'° Supaņņo tassa paridevanasaddam sutvā 
„пёрагёја attano rahassarh acelakassa kathetvā idāni ki- 
mattham paridevasiti“ tam garahitvā 

ə» Ko n' idha tinnam garaham upeti 

asmin dha loke pāņabbū?’ nāgarāja: 
samano supanno athavå tav’ eva, 
kirhkaranëá Pandaraka-ggahito ti gātham аһа. 231. 


Тайһа konidha ti idha amhesu tisu Janesu ko ru, автіт ?0 dhă ‘ti 
ettha, idhë 'ti лірёсашацеф, amin loke ti attho, pâņabhū ti pâņnabhûto, 
athavā tavevà 'ti udāhu tava yeva, tattba 8ашапаш tiva mā garaha, so hi 
upäyena tah rahassarn pucchi, supappam pi mà garaha, aham pl tava?! pac- 
catthiko, Pan derakaggahito ti samma Pandaraka aharh kirhkaranš supanpena 
gahlto t| cintetvë pana attănam eva дагаһа (ауа hi rehassarh kathentena attanë 
va attano anattho kato ti ayam ettha adhippāyo. 


Тат sutvà Pandarako itararn gātham aha: 
10. Samano ti’ me sammatatto ahosi 
piyo ca ше тапава bhâvitatto, 


1 Ва akusaslaje, Ве akulaje. è Bde -раћ. > ao all three MSS. * Bd pāpito. * 
Chs add уг. © Bd kathetu-. 7 СЕ tirokatattbā, Сг tirokataitā. * Віз apati-. °? 
Ck sarsbatlea-, Cs вагпдайїза-. !9 Віз агі arā. '' Bd omits dūra. '% all threo 
МЭЗ. -yyan-. 18 Ска mālāucchãā-. !* Bd -Іаф, 35 Bds -jåtiyagandhañca-. 16 
Сіз -ya 17 Rds omit hi. !# Bd amba. !* Bd -vyiti. 10 al! three MSS. 
asmi, 31 Bd tava. 22 Cks hiyo. 


30 


25 


30 


10 


15 


80 ХУІ. Tirmbsanipšta. 


tasmáham' аккһий уїўагй guyham atthath*, 
atitamattho kapanarh rudámiti. 232. 
Tattha #smmatatto ti зо samano шауһат sappuriso ayan ti sammata- 
bhšávo3i abosi, bhav!tatto t! sambhavitabhšvo 2 са me ahoel. 
Tato supanno catasso gātbā abhāsi: 

п. Na с’ atthi вайо amaro pathavyā, 
paññávidbá п' atthi na“ ninditabbá', 
вассепа dhammena dhiyá*' damena 
alabbham avyšharati naro idha. 233. 

и. Mātāpitā paramā bandhavānarh, 
nåssa’ tatiyo° anokampak’ atthi, 
tesam pi риуһат рагатай па вашве 
mantassa bhedam parisarnkamáno. 234. 

ıs. Mātāpitā bhagini bhātaro са 
sabhāya vā’ уавва ћопії ™ sapakkbā 
tesam рі guyham paramai na samse 
mantassa bbedarh рагіѕзафкатёпо. 235. 

ia Bhariyá ce purisam vajjā Котйгї piyabhanint 
puttarüpayasüpeta ñátisamghapurakkhataá 
tassápi риућатф рагатай па sarnse 
mantassa Ъћедат parisamkamëno ti. 236. 


Tattha amaro ti ameraņasshbāvo вайо nima n' atthí, paññavidhá 
natthiti nakáro padasandhikaro, pañüšvidha atthîti attho, l. v. h.: nāgarāja 
loke araro рі n'atthi, pañūāvidbâpi atthi, sā aññesarn paññikot(hasasarhkhšta 
panüavidha айапо jivitahetu na ninditabbā ti, etbavâ райбіётідһа ti 
paññasadisš na'! nluditabbā!? паша, paōūūājâtlidhammā?!’ п апы, tam 
kasmā nindaefti, yasab pana paüñavidhanam рі па ninditabban tl pl раћо 
tosan 1* Qjuksm eva saccenā і ādieu vacisaccena са sucaritadbeammena са 
pañüšaarnkhitšya бһіуё 25 ca indriyadamanena!$ alahbharn dullabhah а{{һа- 
samāpattiphalanibhānasarnkhātam 17 pi!$ visesarp аууғћагабі 1! āvahati tab 


1 Ва tassi-. è во all three MSS. for gnyhattharn? ° Сіз -tasabhàvo. * Cks 
omit па. ° Сёз nandi-. © Che viyā, Вё dhîtiyā for dhicca, Вг dhittya. " Bd 
naasa, ° Bd tiyo; read па авва tacco? # C* ваһһата, Bd sabāyāvā. 20 all three 
MAS. -1. jí Ck omits па. !3 Ck pandi-. !? СЕ arnñachštidbamma, Bde айба- 
dhammajāti. !¢ Ска tejasarn. !* Cke viyā, Bd dhitiya, Вә vithiyāys, !° Bd 
-dhammena. !1 Bd -pattimaggaphala-. :* C'e hi. 219 Bå abya-. 


8. Pandastalštaka. (518.) 81 


nlpphadeti ! паго idha, tasmë пйгаһаз1? acelarh ninditurh, attšnam eva ватаћа, 
acelena hl attano pañnñüëvantatáya? прйуайцаа1!а!йуа ќар ё vañcetva (уа $ ra- 
hassarn gülhamantarn pucchito ti attho, рагата Ч ete ubho Бапдћатёпай 
uttamabandhavā пёша, пазга? tetiyo (1 assa puggalassa mütapitübi añño 
tatiyo satto anukampako nāma r` ай mantassa bleda parisamkamšáno 
pandito, tesan matapitunnam рі paramaguyheri na sarbseyya, (таш рапа 
mātāpltunnam рі akathetabbarn acelaasa kathesiti attho, sabh.5ya’ vā t! suba- 
dayamitta vā, вараккћа? ti petteyyamatulapituecbimatucchadayo samāna- 
pakkbā ñātayo'?, tesampiti pesab '! рі ñštlmittanami па katheyya, tvarh 
pana'? лсејакавва kathesi, attano va kujjhassü "ti dipetí, bhariyā vā" u 
komašri piyabhāņinī'! puttehi ca rüpena ca уавепа ca upetā evarūpā Ъћагіуёрі 
ce!’ äclkkhābhi mo tava guyhan ti vadeyya taesĝpi na вагшвоууз, 


Tatoparā "°: 
в. Na guyham attharm vivareyya rakkheyya narh yathā nidhim, 
na hi pātukato sādhu риуһо!' attbo ра}йпаїй!*. 237. 
в. Thiyá'° guyharh па samseyya amittassa ca pandito 
уо câmisena *° sarbhīro™ hadayatthe no са уо naro. 238, 
зг. биуһаш attham asambuddharn sambodhayati уо naro 
mantabhedabhayă tassa dāsabhūto titikkhati. 239. 
18. Yëvanto purisass' attham риуһай jánanti mantinath 
tāvavto tassa ubbegā, tasmā guyhar na vissaje" 240. 
19. Vivicca bhāseyya divā rahassam, 
габий giram nâtivelan pamuñce, 
upassutiká bi supanti mantar, 
tasmā manto khippam upeti bhedan ti 241. 
райса даа Ummaggajātake Pañcapanditapañhe āvibhavissanti”. 
Tatoparāsu : 
зо. Yathâpi assa *™ парагаш mahantarh 
`ālārakam ” āyasarù Bhaddasālarn 


1 Ck Bd nippā-. °? Rd nšharasi, 3 Bd раййахапіёуа. * Bd omits tam. 5 Chs 
omit tvan. * Bd guyha-. ? Bd nassa. all three MSS. rahàya. 9 Che aaparikkha. 
w Cs Ва ñäti.- !! Bds ete-. 12 Cs adds matapitunnampi akathetabbarn, '° 
Ваг ce. 14 Ва adds ti. '5 Cke me, !* В adds аһа. !? СЕ -am 1° 
Вёә -to. !? Cke piya, Bd Чуё. 230 Ca -narn. 21 all three MSS, -hi-. 22 Ва 
visssjje. ?3 Ска -sgati. 9* Bde ауа. 23 Bà advār-. 

amia, V. 6 


10 


20 


25 


10 


15 


90 


35 


89 XVI. Timsanipšta. 


samantakhátšáparikháupetam 

evam рі me ќе idha guyhamantā. 242. 
s, Ye guyhamantá ауікіппауаса 

dalhá sadatthesu пага dujivhá' 

Ārā amittā vyavajanti tehi 

āsīivisā vā-r-iva sattusarhghā’ ti dvisu gāthāsu. 243. 

Bhaddasšlan 1] äpapādībhi? 8818414 aampannari, aamantakbātă- 
рагі ёоресап ti samantakbātåbi* parikhābi upela’. evampi me ti 
evam рі mayha (е рцгіва khāyanti katara ye idha guyhamantš, 1 v.b.: yathā 
åjädvârakasaać ayomayenagarassa manussânaih upabhogo! paribbogo anto hotl 
па abbhaptasrima bahi nikkbamanti na bihirš auto pavlsanti арагёрагат sañ- 
свго * chijjati gūlhamantà?’ рогів evarüpë honti attano gūlhah'° апепо anto 
yeva јігарепії 1! na аййаяза kathentiti, dalhā sadatthesū 'Ч etlano attbesu 
thirá, dujivbā ti Pandarakarh'? nāgain 'ālapati, vyavajanttiti pațikkamanti, 
&siviaš vâriva sattusamhghā!* ti ettha vā 1 nipátamattam, šsivisš sattu- 


sarbghārirã’* 'ti sttho, yatbā āsivleato sattusarnghš ! jivitukāmā manussë ёгё 
patikkamauti @varh tehi guyhamantehl narebi'S йг& emittå patikkamanti 1, 
upaganturh обага !% na labhantitj тоба hoti. 
Evam supannena dhamme kathite Pandarako: 
s. НИуй'* gharar pabbajito acelo 
naggo mundo carati” ghāsahetu, 
tamhī nu kho vivarim?' guvham attham';, 
atthā ca dhammë са avāgat' ашһа”. 244. 
as. Katharhkaro сё hi™ supapparāja '* 
kisilo Кера °° vatena vatta ; 
samano caram hitvā mamáayitáni 
kathamkaro saggam upeti thānan ti aha, 245. 


Tattha ghasahetü i niesiriko kucchipüranatthšya khadanlyabhojaniyarh3? 
pariyesanto carati, avāgatambā®® t! apagatā parihin' атһа, Каћа каго 


1 Ва dujiva. ° Ok aatthu-, Bd satta sañkha. 6 Bd apanšdihi sšlah!. * nas 
Gamanta-. ° Bds прара(аш, * во Ck for &!18-? Се švarakassa, Bd» advār-. 7 
Bds -ga. ° Bd -caro. ° Bd guyba-. 1° Bd guyharm-. !! Ck pd jie, 1% Dts 
=ka. 18 Bd satta-, Be santa-. 1 Ck -ghariva, C? -ttusazhárivë corr. to 
-gharivšá, Ва aattasañkhārivā, Вә santasaroghā-. '5 Rd sattasañkha. :% Bd na- 
garobi. T Bd atikkamant!i. !® Bd okásari, 1# Rd hitvána. 20 Ck vicaratl. 
31 Сіз vicari. 3 Ck Hd guyhamattarn. 26 Bd spsgatamhá. 34 Cs са М, Bas 
hoti. 35 Ck „ја. 2% so all three MSY. for keneva? 27 Bde -yọ. 


6. Pandarajātaka. (515.) 83 


сё! ti idah nāgarājā naggassa вашарађётаф  ñatva samanapatipattih puc- 
chanto iha, tattha kirhzilo 1} katarena йсйгела samannašgato, kena vatonā 
"И katarena 6 vatasamādānena vattanto, samaņo caran ti‘ pabbajjāya’ sañca- 
rauto tanhamamiyitani? hitvā kathah samltapāpasamano паша hoti, saggan 
ti katharnkaronto са suțthu agga devanagsrarh sameno upetiti. 


Supanno аћа: 
s. Hiriyā titikkháya damena khantiyā 
akkodbano резирїуагї pahāya 
ватапо сагат bitvá mamāyitāni ` 
evamkaro saggam upeti thànap ti. 246. 
Tattha biriyā ti samma nāgarāja ajjhattabahiddbšsamuttbánehí hirottap- 
pebi titikkbäsahkbätāäys adhivassnakbantiyá indriyadameona ca upeto акијјбепа- 


silo piaupavāäcamh раһауа taņhâmamâyitāni ca bitr pabbajjâya caranto samano 
пёша hoti, evarhkaro yeva са епі Мгіёдїпі са kusalåni karonto saggam 


upeti {һапац ti, 


Ітаф supaņņarājassa dhammakathari sutvā Pandarako · 


jivitarn уйсапїо 
ss. Mātā vá’ рокат tarunam 1апп}}атп* 
sampassa tah" sabbagattam phareti'' 
еуаш pi me tvah рёќог ahu dijinda'' 
mātā уа putta anukampamāno ti gātbam ha. 247. 
Taso attbo: yathā mātā (апијат !* sttano вагїгајаќаш tarupsputtarb sam- 
passah diavå tah'? ure nipajjăpetvā 1һепаф '5 рёуепії puttasamphassena '® 
sabbarh attano 7 байат phareti na pi'® mit puttato bbăyati na putto 
mātito ovam pi me!’ tvah pātur айп pātubhūto dijinda’® dijarāja, tamā?! 
шаа va punttan mudukena badayena anukampamano шай patsa jivitam me dehîtl : 
Ath’ авва зирарџо јїукаш dadanto itara g. ё.: 
зв. Hand’ ajja tvan тойса уайһа dujivha* 
tayo hi puttā ua hi año atthi : 


1 Che уд, 9 Сів assamana-. 5 Bë adda saha. * Ch сага. * Che -)ја. * 
Bd caranto. 7 Ваг tambā. è Ске ca. ° Bde tanujain. 1° Bds -tā. 1! Cke 
parobi. ©? Cke dicbinda, 28 Сә -jjan, 1* C? samphassarn disvā tar, Bd 
варбавзаѓз, Hz sampassa tâ, omitting disvš. '° Вде сђайбат. 3: Ck Bd -sam- 
passena. '7 Bd adda та. 18 Bd М. 9 Bd omita me. 20 Cès dichinda, Bd 
Фада ti, 2! Bd taamiň. 32 Ске di-. 

6* 


10 


15 


20 


25 


10 


15 


95 


84 XVI. Tihnsanipāta. 


antevāsī dinnako atrajo' ca, 
rajassu, putt' aññataro те ahosîti, 248. 


Таса muncă 'ti шийсый?, ayam eva vā рёћо, dujivbā 't tar šlapati, 
аййо ti añño catuttho putto пата n` atthl, antevāsîcl? вірраф và uggan- 
hanto‘ райһаг vā sunanto santike vuttbo°, діппако t| ayah te putto hotü 
"а ретеМ dinno, rajassÚ ‘tl abhiramassu, aññataro siti tisu puttesu аййа- 
(аго * antevāsiputto те (хат játo tl дїрей. 


Evañ са рапа vatvë ākăsā оѓагііуй tah bhümiyam 
ратійћарезі. 


Tam айаш pakāsento S. dve gāthā abhasi: 

ат. Ісс-етв' такуа тіѕај:" вирерпо 
hhumyā patittháya dijo dujivham'!: 
mutt' ajja tvan sabbabhayátivatto 
thalūdake hohi mayåbhigutto. 249. 

за. Atamkinam yathā'? kusalo bhisakko 
pipásitánam [udaka| гаһайо va sito" 
yesmam yathá himasisirattitánam '* 
evam рі te saranam abam bhavāmîti. 250, 


Тера іссета väkyan tl itl evarh!9 vacanar vatvë tam nāgerājânamw 
тіввајјеві!*, bbumyā ti во sayam p! bhümlyarh patittbäya dijo (аф dujivbara 
sam, ento mutto ajja tvarh ito pattháya sabbabhayātivatto thale са udake са 
mayā ebhigutto rakkhito bohid bs, âtahkinan ti вПапёпаф, evampi te tl 
evarb аһаш tava saranan bhavamitl 


„Сассћа tvan“ ti (атп uyyojesi. So' nāgabhavanarh pávisi, 
Itaro рі supanpabhavanam рашуй „„шауй Pandarako' nāgo 
sapatharn katvā saddahāpetvā vissajjito, kidisarn'” па kho mayi 
tassa hadayarh, vimarsissãmi nan“ ti nagabhavanam gantvā 
вараппауйаш akāsi. Тап disvā пёдо „supanparājā mam 
gahetuñ: agato bhavissgtiti“ maññamano vyämasahassamattain 
attabhávarn māpetvā рёвёпе са válukañ ca gilitva Бћагіко '* 


1 Ска ajọ. 2 Ck muñeca, Cz muñcā. è Bde -vāai dinnako atrajo са Ц. * Bd 
-ћашёпо. 5 Ck Bd тоно. * úsu- - -ro wanting іп С. ? Ck јссезц, Ce 
1ссевиха ° CE visajir>, Се visapiù, Bda vissajji. ° Сёз dijavhah. !0 ao all 
three MSS for va? !! Cis вїпо, Bd sito, !? Cks -tthitānah, Bd himasitatti- 
(апат ; resd: bimasisirattitanarh or himasitattitšinara? 12 Ва еба. 34 Ні 


vis»ajji vissajjesi. !° Bd adds něgarājā, !* Bd -ka !7 Ck» -so, Bd klrndisam, 
1° Bd mto. 


8. Paņdarajātaka 


(518.) 


85 


hutvá uañguttharh hetthá katvā bhogamatthake phaparn dhāra- 


yamáno' nipajjitvā вираппагајёпаф dasitukámo viya ahosi. 


Tarh disvá supanno itararh g. а.: 


зә. Sandhir katvá amittena andajena jalābuja’ 


G 9) 


vivariya dátharn* вауазі*, kuto tam bhayam āgatan ti, 251, 
Tam sutvá nāgarājā tisso gáthë abhási: 


зо. Sarnketh`eva*  amittasmirh, mittasmim рі na vissase, (II 5° 


abhayā bhayam uppannam api mūlāni kantati. 


s. Kathan nu vissase tyamhi yenási kalaho kato, 


niccayattena* thātabbatn, во disambi' na rajjati. 


эз. Vissásaye na са narh” vissaseyya, 


asarnkito' св '° sarhkito ™ bhaveyya, 


tathá tathā viññü parakkameyya 


yathā yathā ЬЫһауаш'* paro па јайбё ti. 254. 


zè 


252. 


259. 


Tattha арћауё ti abhayatthEnabbūtă 1° mittamhā bhayam uppannarb Jivita- 
ВашЫһа!ап1 mülšn' eva kantati, tyamhîti taemih, уепёавіц yena saddhirh 
kalaho kato abosi, niccayatsenā?’t "і niccarh patiyattena 15, so disambi 
pa! rajjatiti во!" nicesyatto tittbsti!5, во attano sattūbi saddbim у!ввава- 
чазепа na rajjsti. tato tesarh yatbakëmakaraniyo !? па Ьо attbo, visaàsaye 


ti рагага attani vissšsayn, tern pana вауаш Da vissaseyya, parena asarbkito attš 
va’? tah sarnkito bhaveyya, bhava paro ti yathk yathà pandito parakka- 
mati tathā tathā (авва?! рого bhávarn па jānāti. (азта panditena уігіуаф kat- 
tabbam evä ‘ti dipetl. 


Iti te aññamaññarm sallapitvā samaggā saąammodamānā 


ubho рі acelassa assamam gamimsu. 


Таш attham pakaësento S.: 


вв. Те 


ubho sama? 


devavanni” sukbumālarūpā 
. 


зијвуо?* puññagendha * 


1 Bd -гі-, 
saketeva. 


āe- 10 


1? Bd yo. 


2 Ва -ja. > Bê -dādhi. * Ck вазауі, Се дававї. 
* Bd yattbena. ? Bd гізвррі, Вг risabbbi. 
Сї omit са. !! Chsadd са, '3 Ck» ~va. 
abhatthšpahbüta. 1* Bd ysıtthənā. !5 піссараіуайћенв. 


18 Bd niccayatthena abhititbati. 


Bds attanë са. 1! Che sea, 7? СЕ 1, Bd -ã. 


Bd -yā. 


85 Ва pañüakhandhi. 


5 Ck ygib-, Bd 
8 Ck na, Bd tah. * Cho 
13 Ске -nambhüta. Ва 

Y€ Ва во risabbhi ni. 


19 Ва -kamar-. 2? Ck зача, 


38 Cis omit sama. 


yt д0 Cka; 


10 


15 


95 


10 


20 


95 


86 ХУІ. Timaaniplu. 


арёръшшр кётатЬіуаф ' acelar 
missibhutë assaváhë va” nāgā ti аһа. 255. 


Tattha ваша t! samānarūpā sadisssanthānā hutvā, sujsyo? ti eucayo t 
parisuddbš ° ayam ava vā pátho, puñüñasgandhš' ti katakosalatāya puüña- 
gandharb vissaljentë ууа”, missīhhūtā ti hatthensa һаа gabetvā Шауа- 
missibhšvarn upagatä, assavähā va’ nšgš ti dburayuttakâ” rathavšhš 10 dre 
авва viya рагівапаса !! tassa assamam agamansu, gantvă рапа апраппагыа 
cintesi: ayam пёдагајё асе[авва jivitarn na dasssti, ебагі 1? duasilarn па van- 
dlssámitl so bahi {һата nāgarājânam eva tassa santika pesesi. 


Таш sandhšya S. itaram gātbam aha: 
s4. Tato bave Paņdarako acelam 
sayam [evam] upšgamma '* 
mutt’ ajj’ ahah sabbabhayátivatto, 
па ba't nūna tuybam manaso piy` amhā ti, 256. 


idam avoca: 


Tattba рїуашһа ti dussilanaggabhoggamusšvšdi nüna mayarh tava manaso 
па-рріуё abumhā ti tarh paribhšsi. 

Tato acelo itaran gātham aha: 

в. Ріуо hi! me āsi вираппага}й 
asarhsayarh Pandarakena saccam, 
so rügaratto'° va akāsim etam" 
рёраф kammar sampajáno па mohā ti. 257. 

Tattha Pandarakenā 'ti taya Pandarakena so!9 mama niyataro ahosí 
saccam etam, во ti во ahar tasmirn supapne!?* гёдепа ratto hutvāi etarh *° 
рёракат таш јапапіо va akasirb па mohena AJánanto ti. 

Tam sutvá nāgarājā дуе раа abhasi: 

ss. Na me piyar appiyar vápi hoti 
sampassato lokam imam рагай са, (IV 22” 
susaññatánam hi viyaðjanena ` 
asaññato lokam їташ сагазї. 258, 


1 Сг kasambi-, Bd karampi, B Магарі-. ? Ck са. > Bd -ya. * Ck surncayo, 
Ва војауё. 5 Cks -о, * Bd -khandhā. ° Bd puññakbandhā viya, Ck -vi. & 
Chka ca. * Bd dhura-. 1° Cke „Һа. !! Cke .gã-. > Oke охай. 1% Bd sayam- 
еторёватат. 14 Rd hi. 15 Ck#omit hi. !% Bd во na rāgatto. !? Bd etah 
in the place of metah. !5 Bd пага in the place of so. !° Bd -ena. 239 Bd 
adds рі. ?! Сё» piysarnjsnena, Bd v|byañj-. 


8. Pandarajštaks. (518.) 87 


э. Ariyävakāso ві anariyo câsi 
asaññato saññatasannikáso, 
kanhábbijátiko' si anariyarüpo, 
pšpam bahum duccaritarh асагіі. 259. 


Tattha па me ti ambho duasilanaggamusāvādi pabhajitassa hi ітай ca 
paran ca loksrh? sampsssato piyarp và me appiyarn vâpi me ti па hotl, tvarh 
pana виваййаїапаш silavantánah vyañjanena pabbajitalliñgena азаййао butvā 
Imar loka vañcento сагаві, агіуёувкаво siti ariyapatirūpako?’, авайбаѓо 
ti kayBdihi asaññato si, kanhabhijštikat ti kālakasabhāvo, алагіуагӣро 
ti shirikasabhšëvo, acârîtl акёві. 


Iti паш* garahitvá idāni abhisapanto imam gātham ёһа: 
зе. Adautthassa tuvarn* dübbi' 4йЫһ1°* са pisuno с' asi’, 
eteua saccavajjena muddhá [te] phalatu sattadhā ti. 260. 


Tass’ attho: ambbo dübhi!° (ғат айи!!һввза mittassa dübhil9 са plsuno 
сёві, etena saccena muddhā ќе sattadhā рћаіаёй “і. 


Iti nāgarājassa passantass' eva'' acelassa вїзатп sattadhā 
phali, nisinnatthāne yev’ assa bbūmi vivaram adāsi. So 
pathavim '' pavisitvā Avicimhi nibbatti, nāgarājasupaņņarājāno 
рі attano bhavanam eva agamarhsu ". 


S, tassa pathavim pavittbabhāvam pakāsento osānag. й.: 
so. Tasmā hi mittanam пв dubbhitabbam, 

mittaddubbā !* раріуо ° п’ atthi абӣо, 

Āāsittasatto '° nihato pathavya, 

indassa vākyene hi samvaro bato ti, 261. 


Tattha tasmā ti yssmā mittedūbhikammasss!? pharuso vipāko tasmā, 
kalttasatto!° ti āsittavisena salto!% |пйазва "і niglndassa уйШуепа 
ваф таго 111° sarhvare thito ‘smiti patiññâya evarn 20 paññáto 2! âjiviko hato. 


1 во all three MSS. for -Jacco2 > Cka loka. * Bd patirüpako si. * Сів -yo. 
5 Bd tarh. * Сіз tvan. 7 Bd dubbhi, Che omit dūbbi. ° Bds dubbbi, Ck 
dübhi, Cs dubba omitting ca. 9 Де casi. 10 Ска —i, Ва dubbhi. '' Ва 
aampas-. 1! Ce-viyan, 1% Bd āgamihsu, '* Вё mittadabbhá. '5 Che 
-ko. !% Bd -patto. 1! Bd -dubbhi-. 19 Bd patto. 1 Bd adds ahan. 2° 
Се ета. *! Bd ваппаїо. 


10 


15 


35 


10 


20 


95 


88 XVI. Tinsanipšta. 


S. i. d. 8. „ne bhikkbave idän’ eva pubbe рі Devadatto тивё- 
тадат Каїтё pathavim pavittho“ ti vatvā j.s.: , Tadë acelo Devadatto 
ahosi, оёрагаја Sāriputto, supannaraja' sbam етё“ "і. Pandara- 
jštakam?”?. 


9. Sambulajātaka. 

Ка vedhamānā ti. Idah S, J. v. Mallikam devin а, k. 
Vutthum Kummasapindajatake vitthāritam ета, 5а pana T-asse 
tinnam kummasapindakanam ° dānānubbāvena tah divasam бете гаппо 
aggamahesibhávam patvá pubhuttháyikadihi* pañcahi kalyánadhammehi 
samannëgatë ñanasampanna Виддћараіћвёуіка patidevata вћоѕі, (авза 
patidevatabhávo sakalanagare ракаіо ahosi. Ath’ ekadivasar dh. 
k. s: „āvuso Mallikā деті kira vattasampannë patidevatā" ti. S. 
ñgantva .kāya nu ‘ttha bhikkbave e. k. s.* ti pucchitvă „imăya 
nāmā" 'ti vutte „na bhikkhave idán' eva pubbe р' еза patidevatā 
yevā" `Ы таіуй a. ё.: 

A. B. Brahmadattassa rañüo Sotthiseno пата putto 
ahosi, tahm* гаја vayappattarh uparajje patițthāpesi, Sambula 
пёша aggamahesi ahosi ойатагӣрайһаг& sarīrappabhāsam- 
panná, niváte јајатёпё* dīpasikhā viya khāyati. Aparabháge 
Sotthisenassa sarire kuttham' uppajji, vejjā икісеһіймо nå- 
sakkhimsu. So bhijjamāne kutthe patikkülo hutvá vippati- 
sürarn° patvā „Ко me rajjen' attho, araññe anāthamaraņar 
marissāmîti“ гаййо ärocāpetvå ісҺарага№”’ chaddetvā nik- 
khami. Sambulš bahūhi upāyehi nivattiyamānâpi anivattitvá 
„ahah tam вёшї'° araññe patijaggissamiti“ vatvā вайаһиїй 
yeva nikkhami. So araññarh pavisitvā sulabhaphaláphale '' 
сһауддакавашрапое '° padese papnnasálam katvā уйвага kappesi. 
Rājadhītā tam patijaggi, kathah: ва hi рахо nttháya assama- 
pada sammajjitvā рапїуаћ '° paribhojanīyarn ' upatthāpetvā 
t Bd -ппо-. ? Rd paņndarenāgarājajā-. 3 Bds -pindi-. * Bd pubbuthâylkādibi, 
Ск pubbutthakë-, (C pubbutíbukayiká-. ° Cks omit ай. * Ck Jalama, Се 
jalamanā. ? Bd kuthi. 8 Ck і, Сә -rīî. > Ска ltthš-. !9 Bd вёшікат. !! 
Bd sulabbamūlapha-. '? Bd chāyo-. !2 Bd раніуа, Ck рапіуаф, :* Ck Bd 


-niyan 


9. Sambolsjātaka. (519.) 89 


dantakatthañ са mukhadhovanañ са ораоётеіуй mukhe dhote 
nānãosadhāni pirsitvā tassa vane' makkhetvā madhuráni 
phalāphalāni khādāpetvā mukharm vikkhāletvā hatthesu dhotesu 
„appamatto hohi.devā“‘ "і vatvā vanditvā' pacchikhanittiarn- 
kuse ° ádáya phalāphalattbāya arabñarh pavisitvā phalāphalāni 
āharitvā ekamante thapetvā ghatena udaka aharitvá папй- 
cunnehi са mattikāhi ca Sotthisenarn nahāpetvā pana madhura- 
pbalāphalāni* upanāmetvāř paribhogävasāne vásitapániyarh 
npanāmetvä’ sayan phalāpbalāni paribhuñjitvā padaratthara- 
Каш? sarvidahitvā tasmim tattha nipanne tassa раде dhovitvā 
sisaparikaimmapitthiparikammapadaparikammani katvā sayana- 
passarn upagantvā nipajji’, eteo’ upāyena sámikam patijaggi. 
Sā ekadivasan агаппа* рһа!йрһа!апї'° аһагапії" ekam giri- 
kaudarar disvá sīsato pacchirh otāretvā kapndaratire thatvë "° 
»nahāyissāmîti“ otaritvā haliddāya sarīrarn ubbattetvá!" na- 
hātvā'* sudhbotasarīrā uttaritvá vākacīrarh nivāsetvā kandara- 
tire ațthāsi. Ath’ assā sarīrappabhāya vanarm еКоЬЫһазаш 
ahosi. Tasmim Кһапе eko dánavo gocaratthāya caranto'tath ” 
disvā patibaddhacitto hutvā gāthadvayam аһа: 
1. Kë уейһатйпа girikandaráyam 

ека tuvarm' titthasi вайпайги'?, 

puttháësi me panipameyyamajjhe, 

аККһаһ me оётаб ca bandhave са. 270. 

з. ОБһёѕауаі vanarb rammar sihavyagghanisevitarh 
Ка và tvam asi kalyáni, kassa vā (уап sumajjbime, 
abhivademi tarn bhadde, фапау' аһа, nam’ atthu te ti, 271. 


Tattba!° vedhamana ti nahátamattataya !! вїїаһһйтепа kampamānā, 
aüñüñatürü30 °t sampinditüru2! “mqrtamaürnlakkhaus 2, panipameyya- 


1 Ck vanno. Hd vane? ®Ce adda sarhkappesi. 3 Bd -kusake. * Bd omits phala. 


5 Bd -metl. °* Bd upanetvā. ? Bd райатавапйһагап. ” Bd -iti, ° Ck -а, Bd -e. 
30 Bd . јат. ™ al! (тев MSS. -i. !2 Ва thapetv8. 1 Bd uppattstva. !* Сг 
nshatvå, Bd nhayitvš. :5 Chs tå. 16 Cke окай tvarn. !7 Ck -turu, C# Dd -turü. 
18 Bd adds kā. `9 Bd nhëna-, 39 all thres MS3, -turū. 21 Chs -turu, Hd 
-turü. 33 СЕ Bd -ura-. 


0 


20 


g5 


10 


20 


25 


90 XV]. Timsanipata, 


majjbe ti batthena minitabbamajjhe !, kā vā tvan ti kā vā tvaù, abbi- 
vādemîÎti vandámi. dānavāhan ti abah eko dānavo, ayar namakkāro tava 
atthu, añjalin te раф апһаш1Ї!1? атаса. 
Sä tassa vacanam sutvā tisso рйїһй аһһйвї: 
a. Yo putto Kasirajassa Sotthiseno ti tarb vidū 
tassåham Sambulā bhariyá, evarù jānāhi dānava, 
[abhivādemi tarn bhante, Sambuláharh, рат’ atthu te ti]. 272, 
< Vedehaputto bhaddan te vane vasati āturo, 
tam aham rogasammattam ° ека ekar ира’ ahai. 273. 
s. Ahañ ca“ vanam uñcháya`' madhumamaarm migābilai 
yada һагаті tam bhakkho, tassa nün` ajja nādhatîti". 974. 
Тайһа Vedehajputto ti Vedeharšjadbitaya putto, rogasammattsn” 
ti rogapilitah, upattbaban tí npatthámi patijagęgāmi, upattbită® ti pl pātho, 
vansmuñchāyā?’ 'ti апаш uñchitva 10 cariya caritvā, madhumathsan ti 
nimmakkb'kamadbuñ ca migšbilamernsañ са sihavyagghamigehi khaditemarbssto 
atirittarn '? коб һавам. tam bh'akkho tí yam'? abarami!3 tarn!t bhakkbo va, 
ao mama sšmniko, tassa nünajjš '(ї tassa mañüe ajja āhārarh alabhamānsssa 
earirarh &їаре !° pabkhittapadumaih vlya nádhati!* upatappati milāyati'?, 
Tatopararn dāoavassa са tassā са уасаоара(іувсапа- 
gāthā honti: 
в. Kim vane rājaputtena āturena karissasi 
Sambule paricinnena, ahar bhattë bhavāmi te. 275. 
з. Sokattšya'*' durattáya' kir rūparn vijjate mama, 
aññarh pariyesa bhaddan te abhirüpatararn mayá. 276. 
e. Ehi тагрїгїт ёгиуһа, bhariya mayharm catusaatâ™, 
tásarn ‘ға pavarā Һоһ1?! sabbakamasamiddhini, 277. 
» Nanu һаќакауарпёђће ** уат kiñci manas’ icchasi 
sabban tarh pacurarh тауһатп, ramasv-ajja™ тауй saha. 278. 


1 Bd namitabba-. 7 Ске paganh-, > Rd eampattam? * СЛ addhšma in the 
place of ahanca. ° Ске uñjâya, Bd uñcāya. * Сї. павай, ? Bd -pattan. ® 
Ck шина, Bd upatbibā. ° Ck uājāyâ, Bd uñcšyá. 1° Bd uňchā. !! Ва -а. 
1 Ва adds ahah. '3 Rd emiti. '* Ck omita tah. '*% Bd štappe. '®% Ск 
nāva-, Bd nādbatīti. 17 Bd adds ёһа !5 Сҝә sokatthāya. !# СЕ durattbāya. 
39 Ck matussatā, C: catussatā? 1! Bd hoti. 9? Ва tarakavannabhe, B° bārita- 
vannahbe. ?? Ck гатаяајја2 Cs ramassajja, Bd rammnasvajja. 


9. Sambulajātaka. (519., 91 


о. No се tuvarn' maheseyyarh Sambule * kárayissasi 
alarh уат" pátarasáya maññe bhakkhë bhavissasi. 279. 
п. Тай са sattajato luddo Ка]аго purisādako 
vane паїһаш“* apassantirn° Sambulam ардаһї bhuje. 280. 
1s Адћірапоё* рівёсепа luddenâmisacakkhunā 
sā са sattuvasam pattá' ° patim evânusocati. 281. 
ıs. Na ше іда tathá dukkharñ yarh marh khādeyya rakkhaso 
yañ се* me ayyapottassa mano hessati aññathā. 282, 
14. Na santi devā, pavasanti nüna, (H 122) 
па ha’ nūua santi idha lokapālā, 
sahasā karontānah asaññatanarh 
na ha’ пйпа santi patisedhitāro '° ti. 283. 


Tattha paricinneua 'Ч tena āturena pariciqpena Lih karissasi, во- 
kațtāyā 'ti sokšturāya?', sokatthāyā ti pl раћо воке thltāyā "і attbo, du- 
тАССАУуБ 12 'ti duggatakapaņnabhāvappattáya '* attabhāvāya'“, ehi man (1 mā 
tvarh duratt" ambíti!3 cintayi!*, etai шаша girimbi dibbavlmanam ebi, imar 
girl abhiruyha, catussstá tj їазои me!” vimane aparápl catussatë Ъћагі- 
уВуо atthi, sabbantan {i yar kinci upabhogaparihbogáya!% vatthábharanadi- 
karn 19 iechasí sabban tan nanu тауһат pacursrn bshurn sulabharh, (авшё 
kapan" amhiti mā cintayi, ebi mayš eaha ramassü 'ti vadati, maheseyyan ti 
bhadde Sambule no ca me ‘тат mabesibhāvam kāressasi pariyattä tvain mama 
‚ раќатаваув, tena tah balakkárena vimānah пезгёті, tatre шаш asarrganbanti 
mama ave pāto va bbakkha2?0 hhavissastti, tarh сӣ "і evah vatvå во sattabi 
jatāhi?! semannāgsto?? daruno nikkhantadanto tasmir vane kinci”? attano 
пеп apassantińh Sambulah hhuje aggabesi, adhipannā?* ti ajjbotihațā’”5, 
Amisacakkhupa ti kiesalolena, patimevā 'ti altano scintetvā patim eva 
anusocat!, mano bessattil marh cirãyantiro viditva aññathâ cittarn bhavlaeati ’’, 
na santi дета ti idam вё dånavena bhuje gahita devatujjhāpanamı ? karont 
аһа, lokapālā ti evarüpšnarñi sîlavautinah patidevatinamh pālakā lokapālā 
nāna idhaloke na santîti paridevati. 


3 Oke tvan. 9 Ba „Ја, 5 Ско (ап. * Cks.a, > Ba q 6 Ске sam., 7 Ck 
pannā, Rd satthā. 5 Cs Bd са. ? Сг Bd -са. !0 Ck patime-, Сё patice-. !! so- 
kottäyā - - - turāya wanting in Сї. 12 Ck duratthayáa. !3 Ck -ppatta 't 
Ck -vā. 15 Ва durattimbīti. ’* Ске ciltayi. 17 Bd omits me. !" В -garb. 
19 Bd --kirn, 209 Ске -о. 11 Bà etahi. 29 Bà adds luddako, 3° so all three 
MSS. 9% Bd „рака. 25 Ck ајјһесБаѓа, C? ajjhotthath5, Bd ajhottata, 2* Rā 
-6d. 31 В -kujjbi-. 


10 


16 


30 


10 


- 


5 


25 


92 ХУІ. Tibsanipšta. 


Асһ’ аввё sllatejena Sakkabhavanam Катрі, Pandu- 


kambalasilásanarh unhákárar давзеві. Sakko āvajjanto tar 


küaranam ñatvā vajiram ādāya vegenágantvë dānavassa mat- 
thake thatvā itararh g. ã.: 


ıs. Itthipam евё pavarā уазазвїпї 
santā samā аррі-г-іу'' uggatejā, 
tañ ce’ tovai’ rakkhasádesi Каййат 
muddhā va! hi sattadhā te phaleyya, 
mā tvami }аһї* muñca patibbată уй чі, 284. 


Tattha santa ti upasantā atha vā paņditā ñanasampanna, вашё ti kā- 


yavisamâdirahitã’, adesîti kbādasi’, phaleyyā “t| iminā’ Indavajirena pa- 
һа{ай bbl)jetha, mā tvar Jahiti?° (ғаш imar patibbatarh mâ väraya. 


Tarh sutvå dānavo Sambularh vissajjesi. Sakko puna pi 


»80 ева'° еуагйраїй kareyyá%“ `1 cintetvā dānavarn Чеуавай- 


khalikaya baodhitvā puna anågamanāya tatiye pabbatantare 


vissajjesi, rajadhitararn appamadena ovaąditvā sakatthápam eva 
gato. Rajadhitápi atthamite™ suriye candalokena аѕватаф 


рёрип1, 


Т. в. p. S. atthe рањћа abhasi: 

Så са азватат ёрабсћі pamuttā purisádaka 

`° va ёівуаш. 285. 
ràjaputti yasassini 


nilai ' phalinasakuniva !' gatasimngam 
Sā tattha paridevesi '* 


Sambulā utumattakkhā vane nátham apassanti: 286. 


. Samane bršhmane vande звшрвапасагапе ise, 


rüjaputtam apassanti tumbam hi saranam gatā, 287. 
Vande sihe ca vyagghe ca ye са вййе'' vane migā 
rājaputtah etc. 288. | 

Тіпајаё&пі !° osadhyo !* pabbatāni vanāni са еіс. 289. 
Vande indivarisšamam °° rattiin nakkhattamëlioimn ° ete, 290. 


108 aggi pi. 2 Ck tace, Bd hhance. 3 Cks (хат. * Bd ca. ° Che .), Bd ЙЫ. 
* Bd -divira-. 7 Ск -ti. © Bd adds me. %# Bd дамб. '° Bd omita во ева. 
1t Rd atthañga- — 33 Bd šgacchi, '? Bd ninnam. !* Ck palinasakuniva, С° 
palinssakanive, Bd palinarn sakuni ca. !? во Сг; Bd gavšslüga, Ck gatasirhharn. 
16 Ck Ва „узв. 1? Ске canne. ' Bd tš ca. !! Ck osaddhye, Cz -ddhyo, Rd 
osabya. 3° Ck indavararn-, C? indisararm-, Bd indipari. %! Bd níikkhitta-. 


9 Sambulajataka (519.) 93 


зз. Vande Bhagirathim айдап! savaptipam patiggaham еіс. 291. 
аз. Vande aham” [pabbata]rüjasetthamn 
Himavantam siluccayam ete. 292, 


Tauha nilam? phalinanakunivat 'ti yathë вакипіка mukhatunda- 
kena Eocarar gahetvā Кепасі upaddavena sakunapotakanari pbalinattā 5 
phħalinasakugi’ nilah” agaccheyya ysthă тй KRatasirngan t° nikkhanta- 
vacchakarn alayarb suññarn? уасеһакав аі vacchagiddhini dhenu ёрассһеуув 
eva Bsuññarh assamar jägañchîti’? attho, teda Ы Soubiseno Sambaqlaya 
ciråyamānāya itthiyo nāma 1015 рассётїнэт рі me gabetvë ёрассһеууа `ti 
parisarphanto panpasšálsto nikkbamltvā garchantararn pavlsitvā nisidi, tens 
этап utumattakkhá ti sokavegasarnjatena!! mnhautuna 19 mattalocanä'®, 
apansantiti taamirn vane раат attauo patijthah apsesanti ito c' ito са 


sandbävamānā paridevati, tattha samane hršbmane ti samitapapabahltapapa- 
samanabrëhmanena !* saha sllanarb ° atthannarh samāpattinam vasena!t sam- 
раппасагайе ise vande ti, evarh vətvā ršjaputtarn араввам‹ї tunihškarn sara- 
Dain ба ambi, васе me sāmikassa nisíinnattbánarn jänātba асіккћаёћа 'ti pari- 
devesiti attbo, sesagatbšsu pi өв’ eva nayo, tilpalatšëni osadhyo!! (1 anto- 
pheggubäbløäratinäni ca Іа(ёпі са '!5 antosaraosadhiyo са, imah gàtharn tinëádisQ 
nibbattadevata !° вапаћгуёћа, Indivarisšman ti indivaripupphasamanavannarh, 
tumharbhiti rattirb sandhaya tam рі aham piri)!" аһа, Bhagirathin3t tJ 
evaropariyāäyanāmikarh gañgath, savantinan ti айбдваг 2° babunnarh nadinam 
patiggšhikagañgaya nibbattadevatarn??. sandbay' evam ёа, Himavante рі ев’ 
eva nayo, 


Tam eva paridevamanam disva Sotthiseno cintesi: „ayarh 
ativiya paridevati, na kho рап' assā bhávarñ jápámi, sace mayi 
sinehena еїатп?* karoti hadayam pi 'ввйё phaleyya, pariganhis- 
sāmi táva nan“ ti gantvā pannasaladváre nisīdi. Sâpi pari- 
devamānāă раппаза]айуйгай gantvā tassa раде vanditvā 
„kuhi gato si devā“ ’ti аһа. Atha паш 'so „bhadde tvam 


1 Ck bhāgirasigarngā, Сг bhāgīrasīgarhgā, Bd bhagirasiñgaga. ? Cks hah; road 
vande 'ham pabbatasettbarn? > Ck |їпай, Се linah? Bd niddam. < Ck pā- 
Jirnna-, Bd palinna-. * Ck pbalīnabā, Са pbelinatta, Bd pallnattā? * Che 
phalinasakunamh, Bd palinasskuni, Ckz add va gatasirgarn và. ? Bd niddar. © 
ao Cìs; Bd yatbá gavàsiñgavanti, ° Сіз .ā, 10 Bd šgacchati. '! Bd .vegena- 
señjatona. !# Bd uphena-. !# Rd manba- ог manda-. '4 Bd -раре samane 
brabmaņpe damnnacaranati. !5 Bd silena. !* Bd adds ca. !?7 Cks -ddhyo, Bd 
assbyo. !% go Bd; Сіз antepheggumbi вагаіоёпі. !* В4-ца. 20 Сг tampi 
abemabbiti, Dd tamhi ambiti. 2! Ck bbāgirasan, Cs bhagirasan, Bd bhagirasan. 
3% Oks arhñesarh. 23 Bd -hitan gañgaya nibbattarh-. 3 СЕ өкаш, Bd evarh. 


10 


15 


95 


94 XVI. Timaasnipáta, 


aññesu divasesu na imāya velāya āgacchasi, ajja atisayarh 
āgatâsiti“" pucchanto gātham аһа: 
n. ÀAtisáyarn vatâgañchi' rājaputti yasassini, 
kena пи `jja’ samāgañchi', ko te piyataro тауа (1°. 393 
Atha nar ва ,aham  ayyaputta phalāphalāni ādāya 
āgacchantī* eka dānavar passim, so mayi patibaddhacitto 
hutva mah hatthe ganhitvá ‘race me vacaparn па karosi 
khādissāmi tan’ ti аћа, aharh tāya velaya"tarh ñeva annsocanti* 
evam paridevin“ ti vatvā 
зз. Idarn kho 'harm tadâvocarn gahitā tena sattunā, 
па me’ idab tathā dukkharm yar mam khadeyya rakkhaso 
уай ce' me ayyaputtassa mano hessati aññathë ti р.а. 294. 
Ath’ assa sesam рі рауа{йш агосепії „tena panáharn 
deva danavena gahitá attánam vissajjāpetuh asakkonti deva- 
tujjhapanakammarh ° аКавїй, atha Sakko vajirahattho āgantvā 
ākāse thito danavarh santajjetvā marh vissajjāpetvā tam!° deva- 
sarhkhalikáya bandhitvā'' tatiye pabbatantare khipitvā pak- 
Каті, ev’ аһаф Sakka nissāya jlvitarn labhin“ ti āba. Tam 
sutvá Sotthiseno ,bhadde hotu, mātugāmassa antare вассаш 
пата dullabharh, Himavante'” Баһӣ'° vanacarakatāpasavijjā- 
dharádayo vasanti'™“, ko tuyhah saddahissatiti“ vatvā gā- 
tham аһа: 
+в. Corina '* bahubuddhinarm `? yāsu зассатй sudullabhamn 
thinarn bhāvo durājāno macchassêvôdake gatan ti, 295. 
Sā tassa уасапай sutvä ,ayyaputta'” aham tar’? asadda- 
hantarb mama saccabalen' eva'" tikicchissāmîti“ udakalasarh 
pūretvā зассаКїгїуагї katvá tassa вїве udaka двійсапії 


t Ва -gacchl. ? Che nūnajja. 3 Ске ошіє ti. * Bd аһа. * Cks ji, Bd gac- 
chanti, Bd agacchantiin. “ а] three MSS. 4. ? Сі іше. 6 Ві са. ' Ck 
tujjāna-, Ca tujjbâna-, Ва devskujjhīpana. !° Ске са, і! Bde add (ап. 12 
Bd adds М. ' Ck Bd -u. 1 Bd santi. 1% Ck Bd -inarm, !* Ck -inam, Bd 
-vuddhiuar, 12 Che а. !® Ске maw. !" Bd ssccam рһв]ецеха. 


9. Sambolajātake. (519.) 95 


эт. Таһа таш васса рёіеіи pálayissati се mamam 
yatháham nâbhijānāmi aññarh piyataram (ауй', 

etena saccavajjena vyádhi te vüpasammatü 'ti р.а. 296. 

Tattha tathāsaddo се maman ti ішіна saddhim yoJetabbo, i. е. h.: yathà- 
bam vadāmi tathš mama sacram, atha mam апі рі påletu äyatim рі pālessatl, 
ідёпі me vacans suņa’: умЫЁёһаш nëbhijanamiti?, potthakesu рапа tathå 
mar басса! pëlatiti ИЫ ато tam* Atthakatháyan п апы. 

Evar táya saccakiriyam katvā udake ;āsittamatte yeva 
Sotthisenassa КиМ ай ambiladhotath уіуа tambamalar tāvad 
eva apagañchi' Te katipāhar tattha vasitvā araññato* nik- 
khamma Bārāņasih patvá nyyánam pavisinsu. Ваја tesa 
āgatabhāvarh ñatvā пууйпаї gantvā tatth' eva Sotthisenassa 
chattar ussāpetvā Sambular aggamahesitthane abhisiñcāpetvā 
парагат pavesetvā sayaro isipabbajjah pabbajitvā пууйпе 
уават Каррезї, гајапіуеѕзапе yeva nibaddharm bhuñji. Sotthi- 
seno pi Sambuláya aggamahesitthanamattam” eva adāsi, па 
pana’ koci sakkāro ahosi, atthibhávam pi 'ssā va па" айййвї, 
añāāh’ eva itththi saddhih abhirami. Sambulá sapattirosena '° 
kisā ahosi пррапдиррапдика}йа dhamanisanthatagattā '"'. Sā 
екайіуаѕаф sokaviuodanatthah bhuñjiturn āgatassa кавига(а- 
pasassa santikarm gantvā tam katabhattakiccarh vanditvā eka- 
mantar nisîdi. So tam milātindriyarh '* disvá 

зв. Yo kuñjarā sattasatā шага 

rakkhanti rattindivam uyyutāvudhā "° 

dhanuggahānañ са satāni solasa 

katharnvidhe passati bhadde sattavo ti g. а. 297, 


Tasa’ attho: bbadde Sambule ye amhākah sattasatá uuñjarā (е va 
khaggagatinarb ! t yodhanarh ce vasena!* uyyutavudba!t арагапї са војава 


*1 Ck ysthā. ? Rd sunšátha. 5 Ck Bd -miti. * во Ве; Ско likbitāya, Bd likbi- 
tatı. > Bd -gaccbi, * Bd arañña. ! Bd -thšánarn. ® Ва puna. * Ba рівва nl. 
30 Bd yasapatidosena. 1! Ck dhamanasantagatagatiā? Bd dhbamanisandatagattš, 
33 В4 miläyati-. !# Сё uyyatšá-, Bd uyyuttš-. 1% Bd vesañcava khandhagatšnam, 
Bd {евайса gandba-. !* Ck yodhānāvavasena, Bd yodbánavasena. !* Rd uyyuttā-. 


25 


15 


90 


95 


96 XVI. Timsanipáta. 


dhanuggahasatānl rattindivarn Baršánasiun rakkhapti, evaŭı surakkhite nagare 
Каап vidhe tvah sattavo pasnssi!, yassi tava sšsarbka заррайЬћауё атабпа 
ёдаіакаје? pebhásanmipannar вагїгаїп idkni pansa milštapandupalšsavannë  ati- 
viys kllantindriyñsi, kasaa пата (таш bhišyasíti *. 
Sā tassa vacanam sutvā ,putto te deva mayi па puri- 
таваізо'* ti vatvā pañca gāthā abhāsi: 
з. Alarkatáyo padumattarattacë 
virāgitā passati hamsagaggarā, 
{йзат sunitva mitagitavadinarh° 
па 'dáni° me tāta tathá yathā pure. 298. 
so Sauvannasarbkaccadharš' suviggahá 
ајатКка(& тапизїу' ассһагйрата 
зепйрїуй* (аба aninditañgiyo 


khattiyakaññá patilābhayanti' паг '°. 299. 
м. Sace ahar táta tathā yatbā pure 
раба uñcháya.'' рипа vane bhare 
заттапауе mam па са mam хішаёпауе 
ito pi me tāta tato varar" siya. 300. 
a. Yam аппарёпе vipulasmi ohite 
uārī vimatthabharaná alarnkata 
sabbañgupetá patino уа'* арріуё 
šhajjha'' tassa тагара tato уагаш. 301. 
ss. Арі се daliddā'* Карапа апа!һїуа'* 
kālādutīyā '' patino са sā рїуй 
sabbañgupetāya рі appiyāya 
ayam eva seyyë kapanápi уй ріу&' ti. 302. 


Tattha padumuttarattacã ti padumagabbhasadisauttarattacã, sabbšssrh 
ñarirato suvanņābhā niccharantiti!®? và Трей, virāglitā tÍ vilaggasarirā 


1 Bde add bhadde. ? 114 adds pi. 2 СЕ -pandusālavanņā, “ Bd add рпсеМ. 
5 Cks suniivamhlta-, Bd sunitvë mitagitivšaditarb, Be supitvāpita-, * Ске jdini. 
1 Ва» -найшайса-. * Bd seno-. ? Bas -lo-. 10 Çs даті. '! Ck райы uōchāya, 
Ва patitarb uccāys. 1? Bd parah. !# Bd ca. !* Сё ābajja, Bd abajha. 135 
Bd даі-. 2% Ck anālbhiyā, Bd adināliyā. 17? Cks -tiyā, Bd kațādutiyā, " 
Ck piya, Bd miyåyå. Вэ ріуёуё, !' Ck Bå nicca-. 


9. Sambulajātaka. (519.) 97 


tanumajjhë ti attho, Lameagaggari ti втагйра hamhsamadlurasserā! nāriyo 
passat), (авап tÍ so tava putto tšsarh nārinamh gitādinam? ашуй* |даш mo 
tšta yathā pure са na vattatiti* vadati, витаппават кассадһћагё ti su- 
заппашауё® ekaccšlarpkšradhari, alar katā ti папё!атпКагара(1шадфИ\4‚ mānu- 
alyaccharūpamā ti mānusiyo accharūpamā, senüpiyš ° t| вауапйрада(а7, 
пап tl tar ° tava робаф pațiläbbayanti’, sace aban t tēta yathā pure васе 
abai puns pl tah patih tth’ eva kuttharogena vatnar pavittharb uücušya 
tasmih vane bhare puna рі шаф во 1° sammāneyya па хішёцеууа!!& tato ше 
ito рі Нёгаоавігајје(о taù araññam ета тегаго siyā (п sspsttirosepa!'3 sussantiyë > 
ti дтрей, уашапнерапе t| уві воцарёпе, olite tl thapite pauyatte, imina 
һаһуаппарйапатп '% gharar» даввей, ауа kir’ азва '* адһіррёуо: уё nāri vipu- 
lannapăna рі ghare екікё уа asampattiaamānă viímatihábharaná nëánšslarbkáreh115 
almikatā sabbebi gupehí ирей patino са арріу& boti šbsjjba!$ givšáya vallin 
та rajjum уй!? bendbitvë tassa'® tato gharšvásato |шатапаш eva varatarau tl, 
analhiyš ti ma 510165 19, kalšdutiya) ti nipajjanakakațasârakadutiyā, 
e0@syyš И Карапйр! вашапа sā patino piyā ayam eva иаша tl, 


Evam tāya attano parisussanakāraņe tāpasassa kathite 
tàpaso rajanam раккозёреіуё „їйїа Sotthisena tayi kuttharo- 
gābhibhūte " araññarh pavisante tayá saddhih pavisitvá tam 
upatthahanti attano saccabalena tava rogar [vūpasametvă уй 
te rajjapatitthanakáranarh” akāsi tassā пата tvar п’ eva 
thitatthánarn па nisinnatthānarh jānāsi, ayuttam te katam, 
mittadübhikaminarm nám etah рёрікап?“ ti vatvā puttar 
ovadanto 
s. Sudullabh’ itthi purisassa уа һа, 

bhatt’ itthiyā dullabho yo hito са”, 

hitā са te silavati ca bhaëriya, 

janinda dhammañ cara Sambulāyā `u рааш aha, 303. 


Тава’ attho; 12а yà 3⁄ purisassa bita mudoucittë апокатріка ittbi уо са 
bhatta itthiyá hito katagunain jánáti uhho pi3% te sudullabbš, ayañ са Sambulš 
1 Вә hameš viya madhu-. ? Bd mibitâdini, Ba mitagitā. > Bd sunitvá. * Bd 
Yatla-. ` 5 во а] (тее MSS. * Bd sono-. ? Bå sotthisenassa ріуё райрајобћауаші 
1п the place of sayanūpagatā, ê Bd лап. ? Bd -lo-. '° Bd adds ne. !! Bd 
mânåtimäueyyâ, Вг nàtimaneyya іл the placs of па vl-. t? Bd sapatidosena, 
Вг apatidosens. !3: Rd bahunrarnpšnarh. 1* Cka tirassa. 1° Bd ngnšála-. !* 
Ва abajha. !' Bd valliyā vajjuyë vā. '° Bd саваб, ° Bd na aļhāka, Ck na 
anšlbika, C’ па anaļlakā. ° Bd katadu-. 21 Ске -to. 33 Bd гајје-. 28 Bd 
pāpa "* Ch: bkāya. ? Che uyiá. 2* Bd ре, 

Jma. V q 


10 


15 


зо 


35 


98 XVI. Timsanipšat, 


tuyha hitā є` eva eilasampannā ca, tamā etissā dbammañ vara, katagunarb 
Jšnitvë muducitto hohi, cittam азза paritosehitl. 

Еуаф во puttassa оуййаш datvë uttháya раккаті, Каја 
pitari gate Sambularm pakkosāpetvā ,„bhadde ейакаф Кајаш 
mayë katadosam khama', ito patthāya sabbissariyam tuyham 
eva dammiti“ овёпардћаш йһа: 

ss. Sace tuvam” vipule' laddhabhoge 
issāvatiņņã‘ maranam upesi 
аһай ca te hhadde imë ca kaññā’ Я 
sabbe уа ќе уасапакага bhaváma `ti. 304. 

Tana attho: bhadde Sambule насе tvatn ratanaršsimbi thapetva аһЫівіа- 
citvā" aggamahesitlbanavasena vipulabhoge? labhitvëpi issšya otipnpë шагапаф 


upesi аһай са ішё ca rijakaññšyo ° ssbbe tava тасапакагё Ьһатёша (уап 
yathšádhippayarn imañ rajjarn vicārebîti sabblissariyam tassā adāal. 


Tato ра ауа ubho samaggāvāsarn vasantā danëdini 
рийййпї katvā’ yathákaimarn gamarhsu. Тараво jhanábhiañarn'° 
nibbattetvā Brahmalokūpago ahosi. 

S. i. d. ё. „пв bhikkbave idán' eva pubbe pi Malliká patidevată 


yevā“ `Ч vatvā j. s.: „„Тайё Sambulš Мека ahosi, Sotthiseno 
Kosaslaraja, pita tāpaso abam ета ‘ti. Sambulajãtakam, 


10. Gandatindujâtaka, 

Appamādo ti. Idam S. J, v. rajovšdam 6, К, На}оуййо 
hetthë vitthārito, 

Ае pana Kampillaratthe Uttarapañcālanagare 
Paúcšlo оёта гёја асайіратапе thito adhammena pamatto 
rajjarn Кагеві. Ath’ assa ашассайауо sabbe рі adhammikā 
Jšta, Balipīlitā гайһауёвіпо puttadare ādāya агаййе migā 
viya carirhsu, gāmațthāne güino паша náhosi, тапизай rāja- 


1 Ва khamatha. 2 Ске tva, 3 Ck vipulama, C* -lam? < Ва іввёсайпрё. * 


Ва поё гајвкаййа. * Rd -sittå. ? Bd -le-. ° Ck -Кашбізо, Bd тајакабӣг. 
* Ва кагу. !9 Ва -šyo. 


10. QandatindaJjštaka. (520). 99 


porisabhayena divā gehe vasitum па sakkonti, gehüni kantha- 
kasákháhi parikkhipitvá arune uggacchante yeva агаййагп pavi- 
santi, біта гајарогівё! vilumpanti rattim сога. Тай Bo. 
bahinagare gandatindurukkhe' devatā һосуё nibhatti, annsarh- 
Yaccbaram rañño santikë sahassagghanakam  balikammarmn 
labhati, во cintesi: ,ayarh гаја pamatto rajjam kāreti, sakala- 
rattharh vinassati, thapetvë mam Aañño' rājãoam patirüpe 
niveseturn samattho оёта n’ atthi, upakárako сёрі me anu- 
ватйуассһагатї sahassabalinā püjesi*, ovadisāmi nan“ (і во 
rattibhâge rañño sirigabbhaín pavisitvā ussisakapasse {һа{уй 
obhësam vissajjento' ākāse atthāsi. Каја tam bālasuriyarh viya 
jalamānarh disvâ ,,ko ві (уаш, kena vë káranenñgato *“ ti pncchi. 
So (авва уасапаф sutvā ,„mahārāja shar tindukadevatšá, 
tuyham ovšdam dassámiti ágato mhîti“. ,,Kim оуйјаш пата 
dassasiti“ eva vatte M. „mabārāja, tvah pamatto hatvā 
rajjarh karesi, tena te sakalarattharm bhataviluttam ° viya vi- 
pattham, гёјёпо паша pamādena rajjam kārentā sakala- 
ratthassápi'° sëmino па'! honti, ditthe va dhamme уіоёватћ 
patvā samparáye pana таһйпїгїуе nibbattanti, tesu са 
ратййай араппеви antojauā bahijanā рі ‘вва pamattā va 
honti, tasmā raññā atirekena appamattena bhavitabban“ ti 
vatvā dhammadesanam patthapento аһа: 
1. Appamado amatapadarm, pamādo maccuno padam, (Dhp. т.з.) 
appamattā па miyanti, уе pamattā yathámatšá. 305. 
+. Mada pamádo jāyetha, рашёда'? jāyate khayo, 
kbayā райовё '* jāyanti, mā шайо!* bharatüsabha'' 306. 
e. Ваһй hi kbattiyā jIná'* attham rattham ратайіпо 
atho рі рётіпо gāmā anāgārā agárino. 307. 


! Bd adds рі. > Bd adds khšdsnti. 3 Bd gandutindukarakkha. * Bd -nikanm, 

5 Ск arnñe mar, Czañño шай. © Bd -ti. ? Ва visa}jetvā. 5 Bd -na [дҺ3- 

gato ві. ° Bds hataviluppantath. !0 Bd -вва. !! Bd nama. !3 Ck Bd -do. '' 

Chs -de-, 14 Bde pamādo. 15 Ch -ваЬһай. !* СЕ pita? Bd jinpš, Вг Jana. 
7* 


10 


30 


100 XVI. Tirsanipšts. 


a Khattiyassa pamattassa ratthasmirh ratthavaddhana 

sabbe bhogá vinassanti, rañño {аш vuccate арһаш. 308, 
s. N' ева dhammo mahărāja, ativelarh pamajjasi, 

iddharm ' phitarh ° janapadar сога viddharnsayanti tarh’. 309. 
в. Ма te puttá bhavissanti na hiraññam па dhániyam, 

ratthe vilumpamānamhi sabbabhogehi }їуазї*. 310. 
v. Sabbabhogaparjijinnarh ° гё]йпаш cápi* khattiya 

ñatimittë subajjā са па nah’ maññanti khattiyarm? 311. 
s. Найћагаһа" anīkatthā rathika pattikārikā 

tam evam upajivantā na nam’ maññanti khattiyarn "°, 312, 
» Asamhvihitakammantai balarn dummantimantitarh " 

вїгї jahati dumiedhar }їппаш уа urago tacam. 315, 
ao. Susamvihitakammantarh káluttháyirn atanditah — 

sabbe bhogábhivaddhbanti'* gāvo sausabhá-m-iva. 314. 
n. Upassutim mahârāja ratthe јапарайе сага, 

tattha disvā са sutvā са tato tar patipajjasiti, 315, 

Тана арратёдо ti satlyā avippavāso, amatapadan ti amatassa 

pibbšánasss padarn adbigamakāraņai 1#, maccuno padan И maranasss këáranarh, 


pamatto bl vipassanarh avaddhetça!í appatlsandhikabhâvarh раци asakkonto 
рапаррипа вафвёте jayati с' eve mīysti са, tasmā pamado maccuno padaro 


nâma, па miyantitl уїраавапагп vaddhetvë hppatisandhikabbšvarh райх puna 
samsāre anibbattantă na miyanti пёша, уе pamattā ti mabáršja уе puggalā 
реше((& te yatbâmatā?’* tath` eva datthabbš, tasmā’' aniccasādhanatăya ќаввёрі!' 
Ы аһатп dšnarn dassêmi ailarñ rakkhiesām! uposathakammaih kariesām! kalyana- 
kammar kerissåmiti äbbogo'* vå рацћапё!? vā pariyutthšánarb và n' attbl, 
appattariñĀĀņattá 5° pamat’assÂpl appamādāblāvā tl, tasmā ubho p'ete екайіуава 
уа?!, mada ii mahārāja årogyayobbanajīvitamadāsariıkhātā tividbā mada 33 pa- 
mādo nāma jåyati, во pamatto pemādam āpanno pāņpātipātādīni pšpakammini 
karoti, atha nam гајёпо chindâpenti và banāpeuti và sabbassa và рап asse’ 
harauti, evam азва pamādo?* Āātidbanajivitakkheyo jáyati, puna во?* dhana- 


1 Bd даф. 7 Cd рпа, Bd pitarb. ? Bd nam. * Ck riyati, Cs Jiyati, Bd Jiyyasi. 
5 Сы -јоппа@, В» -jinnam. * Bd våpi. ? Ва teb. * Bd mandiyarh. ° Bdr 
-ro-. 1? Ва mantiya. 11 СЕ -narh. 1" Bd bhogo pl тафћапі, !* Bd -gamana-. 
14 Cks vaddhetvā, Bd avadhetvš. 15 Bd adds te. !* Ck Bd kasmā. !7 во Cke; 
ВЯ matassa рі. '* Csa-. !* Ck pattană, Сг pattatrhana? Hd рафапа. *° Bds 
aparagata. 3! so Ске; Bd ekasadivasšva. 35 Ck dâ, Bd omits шайё. 132 во Chs; 
Bd sabbâsai vå dhanassa. ?* so ali three MSS., for -dā? 15 (Che yo. 


10. Өзодабіпіојасака. (520) “101 


kbayah vā yasakkhayah vā райо jJivlturn аваккопсо jivitavuttsttbaya kaya- 
duccaritšdini karoti, lec-as khayă padosi jāyanti, tena tais vadāmi: mā 
mado’? bbaratūsabha rsttbabharanskajettha ° Bharstūsabha më pamaljat ш} 
psmaditi айһо, atthsrü ratthan ti )апарайауавїпатп vuddbimh c' етае sakala- 
raithañ ёа bahü pamadino? jīnā’, tesa ävibhbāvatthāya Khantivādijātaka- 
Mātañgajātaka-Sarabbaðgajâtaka-Rbarujītaka-Cetiyajātakādīnįi kathetsbban!, gā- 
mino ti gåmabhojakåâpi’ te te gāmino'? hahupamidadosena јїпё* paribinā 
vinațthä, anāgārā agārino tl pabbajitâpi pabbajitapatipattito gibi pi gharš- 
väsato с' eva dhanadhaññadibi са babū }їн&® paribīnā tl vadati, tais уоссаќе 
agban ti шаһатаја bhogaparihâni ’! паша tam rañño dukkharno vuccati, bbogā- 


bbāvena hi'nlddbanasss yaso bāyatt, binayaso mahanta káylkacetasikadukkharh 
pāpūņāti, nesa dhammo ti mahêrāja esa porâņakarājūnamn dhammo na boti, 
iddham рЬ1їап ti annapånâdinā biraüñasuvannadinëa phitah pupphitamn, na 
te puttš !? u maharšja pavenipšlakš!! te puttā па bhavissanti, ratthavāsino 
Ш adhammikarañüo esa putto kih ambškarn тафо !* karissati nâssa cbattarn 
dessāmā 'Ч chattarh na denti, evam етай ' tesa pavenipšlakša'! puttà na 


10 


15 


һоп пата, parijinnan!)!t ti parihinarn rBjánarh, сар11!1!! весе hi’? во тз , 


boti atha oam raJënarn samănam рі khattiysnl1' ti ayarh rājā ti gsrucittena 20 
mänetabbah katçë na maññanti, upajivantā ti upanissâya јіғаорі ete 
ettakā janë garucittena maññitabbarn na maüñanti, kirnkšáranš: adhammika- 
bhavena, siritl yanavibhšvo2?21, (асап 92 ti yathà urago Jinna (асап 
jigucchamáno jahati”? ne puna oloketi evarh tādisah rājānah siri Jabatl, su- 
ват еіћібакатапсал * ti kāyadvārādībi pāpakəammarn akarontarı 2, abhi- 
vaddbantiti abbimukharn gacchantā?* vaddhanti, sansabhāmivā ’ti ва- 
usabhā iva, appmattasəa bi usabhajetthako!! gogano viya bhogā vaddhantl, 
upasautin tl janapadacšárittasavanšya cšrikarh ацаро sakalaratthe janapado са 
сата, tatthš “t tasmih rattbe caranto datthabbarn disvā sotabbarñ sutvš 
attano дапёдппал рассаккћа katvā tato attano hitapatipattirh patijaggissasi 35, 


Iti M. ekādasahi gāthāhi гёўйпатї отайісуй „рассһа pa- 
pañcarh akatvá pariganha rattharb, më nāsayîti“ vatvë sa- 
katthanam eva gato. Бајёрі (азва уасапай sutvá sarh- 
vegappatto hutvā™ punadivase гајјаф amacce paticchāpetvā *° 
purohitena saddhirm këálass' eva рйасїпайуйгепа парага nikkha- 


1 Ва Ішавва, > Паз pamādo. > Ск» rattham-. * Cka раја. > Bd mā pamā- 
даюёрајј!. ê B vuddbicceva, Ске vuddhamevs. ? Ск .-ле, Bd padāmādino. P 


Bd }юпа. *# Bd -Бһојапакёрі. 10 B4 датёрі '!! Bd» yasabhoga-. !! С _ 


уш. '? Cks pameni-. !* Bd vuddbl. 1° Bd eva. 1% Cke pārijunnan, 17 Bd 
тара. 1° Ваг pi. ›° Bd mantiyan. 2° Bd tigarukacittenasa. 31 Ck sírini- 
yasavibhšvo, С^ siritīyasavibhāvo, Bd өїгі(1-, 32 Сі (ар. 35 Ва boti. * Ва 
-kamman. 3° pd 10. 26 Ске дай, — 27 Dd ва usabbo Jethako. ?* Rds 
-pajjissasi. 3° Bd omita butva. 20 Bd -detvâ. 


30 


15 


102 XVI Timaanipáta. 


шуй yojanamattam gato. Tatth' еко gāmavāsimahallako 
atavito kanthakasákhšá! &haritvā gehadváram parikkhipitvā 
рідаһієта puttadárarm ādāya araññam pavisitvā sáyam гаја- 
purisesu раккапіевп attano pharam ёрассһапо gehadvāre 
рёде kantakena' viddho ukkotikarn nisīditvā Кап{аКап* ol- 
haranto 
ie. Evar vedetu Pañcālo samgāme sarasamappito* 

yathâham ajja vedemi Кап{аКепа* samappito ti 316. 
imāya gāthāya гајапат akkosi, tah pan’ assa akkosanam‘* 
B-ssñnubháven' eva ahosi, B-ttena adhiggahito va во akkosîti 
veditabho. Tamsmim pana samaye гаја са рогоћіќо са aññā- 
їаКауевепа* tassa santike va attharnsu. Ath’ assa уасапат 
sutvà purohito itararh g. â.: 
is. Јіпро dubbalacakkhü si, па rāparhù sādhu passasi, 

kim attha Brahmadattassa 

yan саф шаррһеууа* Капќако? ti. 317. 


Тайһа magghoyyā’ 'ti viJjheyya $, i. v. b.: yadi tvarn attano avyatta- 
tāya Кап(акепа?  viddho ko ettha rañño дово (1 yena ršáJšnarn akkosasi kiro te 


тзйй&? kanteko? olokstva acikhkhitabbo ti. 


` Таш sutvá mahallako tisso gāthā abhāsi: 
14. Pahottha' Brahmadattassa yo" 'harn парво!" smi bráhmana, 
arakkhitā jānapadā adhammabalinā hatā'®. 318. 
1s. Rattimhi сога khëdanti, divā khādanti tundiya, 
га{{һавтїїї Киддагёјавза :‹ babu adhammiko jano. 319. 
10. Etadise bhaye tāta bhayațthā (дуа '° mānavā 
оШепакапі kubbanti vane йһаїуа!* kantakan' ti. 320.. 
Tattha pahotthā'? 'ti brihmana yo! karnsakantake magga!” patito 


sannisinno balū?’? ettba Brahmadatiassa dosà?', tvah ейакет kālab rañño 


а рє Каццаказёкћат. ê Ва kanda-. 5 Ва saramapplto. * Ghe -tern. 5 Ва 


-ueva, 6 Bd уай tvah maggeyya. ? Bd maggeyyā. 5 СЕ Bd vijjeyya. * Bd -o. 
10 во Ca; Ck bhotta, Bd pahettha. !! Bd во. '2 во Ске for magge? Bd magga. 
'3 Bd шаа, !* Bd kuta-, Вә küta-. 15 Ck nëna, Сг тага. '* Bd šbautā. ‘т 
Bd pahvettha. 2% Bd во. !9 СЇ kautakona maggo. 3° Сік -u. 3: Bd -o. 


10. Gandasundujaátaka. 1520.) 103 


dosena шаша sakaniske magge vicaraDabhšávarb па }апаз!!, arakkhltã-pe- 
kantakan ti, tattha КЬ абапі vllumpanti, tundiyš3 ti vadhabandhanadihi 
piletvā adhammabalisadbaki ?, ku ddaršjassš* 'ti pāparañño, adhammiko tl 
paticchannskammanto, tātā 'Ч purohlitah йара, mānavā t! шаоаввё $, 
піПепакёоі й niliyanattbānāni, тапе ¿ihatçat kantakan ti kantakarh 


äbaritva dvārāni p[ldabitvë ghararn сБаўдестё puttadararb ādāya vanai pavi- 
mltvš tasmih vane attano nilīyanațthānāni karont, athavā vane yo kantako tarn 
&harltvë gharán! parikkhipanti, И! rañño dosen’ ет’ smhi kantakena viddho mā 
evarüpassa таййо upatthambho hobiti. 


Tam sutvë rājă purohitaro āmantetvā „ācariya mahallako 
yuttarm bhanati, amhškam eva doso, ehi nivattāma, dhammena 
rajjam kāressāmā“ “і аһа. Во. purohitassa sarīre adhi- 
muccitvá' purato {һа{уй* „рагїдапһйта täva mahārājä““ "і 
аһа. Те tamhā gāmā аббат ратай gacchantā antarámagge 
еківвӣ mahallikáya saddarh assosurh, sā kir’ ека dalidditthi dve 
dhitaro `vayappattë rakkhamānā tāsah araññam gantuh na 
deti, sayarh araññato dārūni с' eva sākañ са āharitvā dhftaro 
patijaggi'. Sā tam divasah ekar gumba йгиуһа sākam 
ganhanti рауа{{атёпа&'° bhūmiyarn patitvá гёўйпаїй maranena 
akkosantt 

и. Kadássu nām’ ауа гаја Brahmadatto marissati 
уавва ratthasmii jīvanti" appatitá'? kumārikā ti g. а, 321, 
Tatthe appatītā!? ti asaāmikā, васе hi 15 sassümiká!! assu msm po- 


Bryyurn, рёрагабћо рапа гајје aharn dukkharn anubhomi, kadā nu kho ева 
mariasatiti evan Bodhisattánubhšvepa!5 akkosi. 


Atha паш purohito patisedhento 

в. Dubbhasitam hi te jammi anatthapadakovide, 
kubit гаја '* Китагїпатп 
bhattárarn pariyesatiti g. а. 322. 


1 Bde add tasaa Ы. 2 pd ко-, 3 Che -sätakð, Bd adhammera ballsšdhaki. 
* Ва kuta-, Вг kûțe-. * Bd adds рі. * Cs šgatra, Bd šgautva, Ck &һа{тї, 7 
Bd -шойеі-. Š Bd рабата. ° Bd -ggati. 10 Bd pavatta-. !! Bd rathamhi 
Jiyanti. +3 Bd appatika. 1° Ck Bd аррайкё, Се appstītikā corr. (о sppatiká. 
11 Bds tasamsamiki. 15 Bd -пета. 16 Сг -2. 


10 


15 


15 


104 ХУІ Tibsanipāu. 


Tam sutvë mahalliká dve gëthá abhāsi: 

19. Ха те dubbhásitarn brahme', kovid’ atthapadā aham, 
arakkhitā jānapadā adhammabalinā hatá. 323. 

so. Rattimhi сога khádanti, divá kbādanti tuņdiyå, 
ratthasmirm kuddarájassa’ bahu adhammiko jano, 
бојјтуе dubbhare dāre kuto bbattā’ komāriyo ti. 324. 
Tattha kovidatthapadš tt ahah attbapade kāranapada* kovidâ chekā, 

më (тай etsi pěparājāneh pasamsi, dujjive ti dojjive rattbe? dubbbare dire 


jäte manussesu* bhitatasitesu araññe vasantesu, kuto bbattà kumâriyo ti? 
kuto kumiriyo bhattšrsri labblssantitl attho. 


Te {авва уасапатп sutvá ,,yuttarn' kathetiti“ parato’ gac- 
chaptë ekassa kassakassa saddarn assosurn, tassa kira kassan- 
tassa Saliyo'° nåma balivaddo phālena pahato'' sayi, so rājā- 
narh akkosanto 

з. Evam sayatu Pañcālo ѕабрате sattiyā hato" б 

yatháyarn Карапо seti hato phālena Sšliyo ti g. ā 325. 

Tatthe yatbā ti yatbā ayah vedanamatto!) Sallyahallvaddo seti evarb 
ñayatü 'Ч attho. 

Atha пага purohito patisedhento 

as. АЧһапипепа tuva '* jamma Brahmadattasra kujjhasi 
уо tvarh sapasi’ rājānarn aparajjhitvána attanā ti р.а. 326. 


Tattha adhammenā "і akäranena asabhåvena. 


Таш sutvā so'° tisso gāthā abhāsi:- 

s, Dhammena Brahmadattassa аһа kujjhámi Ыгаһтапа, 
arakkhbitā janapadá adhammabalinë hatá. 327. 

s. Rattimhi сога khádanti, divā khādanti tundiyá, 
rațthasmirn kuddarājassa'" babu adhammiko jano. 328. 


1 Сә -а. ? Bå kuta-, Bs küta-. > Ck hatthâ, Ва tatthā. * Bd кагапе. * Сг 
adda rattharh. * Ся -sse. 7 Сә omite tl. " ti abar --- ушнаш wanting in 
Ск. ° Rds pu-. !9 СЕ aālittassayo. 11 Bd mabato. ?!7 См bhato. '? Rd 
-nāppstto. !* Che tvah. !5 Ck yapsmbsl, Cs pasarhsi, Bd samas! or sapasi? 
16 Che omit во. !? Bd kuta- 


10. GandatinduJštska, (520.) 105 


зь. $й nüna ропа re pakka vikále bhattam аћагі, 


bhattabárim' apekkhanto hato рЬёіепа Sāliyo ti. 329. 

Tattha dhammenia 'ti Кягапеп' eva па skšranens akkosstit| aaññarh mā 
kari, вё nüna ропа re pakkš vikšle bhattamakharíiti bršhmana аё mama 
bhattabarika itthi pato va mama bhatterh pacitvā aharanti adhammabalisšdba- 
kebi Brahmadsttasea dāsehi pslibuddba bhavissati, te parivisitvā puna mayharh 
bhattara pakkarh bhħavissati, tena Кёгапепа vikšle bhattarp āhari, ajja vikālo 
bhattam äbarîti сезй chātajjhatto ahah tam bhattahārih olokento gonah 
atthāne patodena vijjbirh, беп" ева páñarñ ukkhipitvá?' рһа1епа paharanto hato 
phšlena 8&11уо, tamā esa шауё bato ti saññarn mā kari, pāparañño yeva bato 
nām’ esa, MĀ пагава’ $ avanparb bheniti, 


Te parato gantvā ekasmim рате vasirnsu. Punadivase 
. pāto va ekā kütadhenu zodohakarn pádena paharitvā saddhirh 
khirena' рауаќеві“, so Brahmadattarn akkosanto 
ae. Evah haññatu Pañcālo samgāme asiná dalharn' 
yatháham ajja pahato khirañ ca nie pavațțitan® ti д.а. 330. 
Тат зпїуй* 
21. Yarn pasu khīrah chaddeti'° pasu phálañ ca hirhsati 
kim tattha Brahmadattassa уай по garahato'' bhavan ti 531, 
bráhmanena gāthāya vuttāya puna'* tisso gāthā abhāsi: 
з. Gārayho brahme Pañcálo, Brahmadattassa га}їпо 
arakkhitā jānapadā adhammabalivā hatā. 332. 
a. Rattimhi сога khādanti, divā khādanti tuņdiyā 
ratthasmim kuddarájassa '° babu adhammiko jano. 333. 
зо. Candā atanakagávi'' уат pure па duhámase 
ta дарі ajja dohama khīrakāmeh’ upaddutā ti. 334. 
Tattha canda t! pbarusā, atanakagâriti 15 palāyanasilā, khiraka- 
mehiti addhammikerañüo purlsehi bahurh kbīram ābarāpentebi upaddutā 


duhüma, васе hi во dhammena rajja kāreyya па по evarüparn bhayai 
âgaccheyyä ‘tl. 


1 Се bhattagārih, Ck -bhariro, °’ Bs add tena. >? Ва Ck tarass. * Bd pu-. 
5 Che вакћїгепа, * Bd -ttesi. ? Rds hato. ° Ске pavatthi-, Bd pevatti. ° 
Bds add porobito. 10 Rd chaġdetvā. 1! во Ске for -te? Bd-hito. !@ pa 
punar so. ?> Bd koța-. !* С. а{акапёвёхї, Bd akatanā-, Bz акаќапё-. 15 
Cs atanakenägāvitl, R& aketanāti. 


15 


25 


30 


106 ХҮІ. Tirseanlpšta- 


Те ,,yuttam kathetiti* tamhā раша nikkhamitvá таһй- 
maggam йгпуһа nagarābhiwnkbā gamihsn. Ekasmiñ ca 
gāme balisādhakā’ asikosatthāya ekam  tarunam kabara- 
vacchah’ māretvā саттагп ganhimsu, vacchakamatá dhenu 

s puttasokena {паш na khbādati pāniyah* па pivati parideva- 
mānå āhiņdati. Таш disvā gāmadārakā rájanarn akkosantā 
s. Evam kandatu Pañcaëlo viputto vippasukkhatu 
yathâyarù kapaņā gávi viputtā paridhāvatiti р. а. 335, 


Tattha paridhavatit[ рагїйөташапа dhâvatîti. 


10 Tato purohito itararn gātbam aha: 
es. Yarn pasu pasupálassa* pabbhameyya` 'raveyya vå 
ko n' idha aparâdh’ atthi Brahmadattassa rājiao tì. 336. 
Tattha pabbhameyya’ raveyya vā ti bhameyya vā viraveyya vå, 


i. v. h.: pasu Лёша pasupšlsssa rakhhantasa' eva dhāvati pt viravati tinam 
5 рі па khādati pániyam рі na pivatl, idha гаййо ko nu aperādho ti. 


Tato gamadárakë dve gāthā abhāsimsu*: 
вз, Арагёаһо mahábrahme Brahmadattassa rājino. 
arakkhitā jánapadaá adhammabalinā hatá. 337. 
ч. Rattimhi сога khādanti, divā khādanti tundiyā, 
зо ratthasmim kuddarájassa' bahu абһаттіко jano, 
Каат по°* asikosattbā khirapë haññate pajā ti, 338. 
Tauha mahšbrahme t! шаһаһтёһшапа, rājino ti гаййо, katharb no 
ti kathan nu kena пасла Кёгапепа, khîrapă haññate раја ti рёрагајаѕѕа 
вечакећ! khirapako vacchako baññati, ійёп eva вё dhenu puttasokena рагійетахі, 
25 so pi гёјё ayam dbenu viya paridevatū "і ráJšnarh akkosithsu yeva. 
Te’ ,káranarn vadathā*“ і vatvā pakkamimsu. Ath 
antarāmagge ekissā sukkhapokkbaraniyā Кака '° tuņdehi vij- 
jhitvā mandüke'!! khādanti. Bo. tesu саф țhānam sampattesu 


attano ánubhávena mandukena 


* Ске balihsâîdhako. > Bd -akarh. 3 Ске pšni-, Bd păņi-. * Ва -pha-, + Bd 
sambha-. * Ck abhšsurn. * Bd kuta-. ° Bd по. ° Bde add sādbu vo. "° 
Сів ыйа. !! Ck Bd -uke. 


20. Gaņdatindujātska. (520.) 107 


ss. Evar khajjatu Pañcālo bato yuddhbe saputtako 
yatháham ajja khajjāmi gāmakeħi' araññajo ti 339. 
rëjënam akkosāpesi. 


Tattha дашакеЬї 1! gamavasibi. 


Тат sutvā purohito mandukena’ saddhirh sallapanto: 
зв. Na sabbabhütesu vidhenti rakkharh 
гёјасо mandüka manussaloke, 
п’ ettavatá гаја adhammaciári 
yar tādisarn јїуат adeyyu' 4һашКа ti р. а. 340. 
Tattha jivan ti jivantab, айеуупп“ t: Иһїйеуу\шї?, дһатиё kākā. 


Еиатаі гаја adhammiko пёша na hoti, kim sakkš araññarn pavisitvë rañña 
tarn гаййһашепа caritun ti. 


Tam sutvá mapduko dve gāthā abhāsi: 

вз. Adhammarüpo vata brahmacári 

апирріуаф bhásati khattiyassa, 

viluppamánáya puthuppajáya 

püjesi гаја* рагапаррауййий'. 341. 

se. Sace imam brahme surajjakarh siyā 

phitam rattham muditam уірраваооат 

bhutvá bali aggapindañ са kākā 

na mádisam jivam adeyyu dhamka ti. 342. 

Таша brabmacāriti purobltarn garabantarn aba, khattlyasaā ‘u 
evarüpassa рёрагайбо, vilumpamānáyã?’ tí viluppamanaya!t, ayam eva và 
р&{һо, putbuppajāyā 'tl vipulāya рајгуа vinësiyaminaya, pūjesíîti pasarhsi'!, 
surajjakan ti chandšdivasena адап!та!# dasa rājadbamme акорешепа!? 
rakkhiyamšnarn васе idaro surajjarn !! bhaveyya, phitan ti devesu 1° -osmma 
dhšrarn' anuppavacchentesu’7 яашраппазаявага!®, па mšdisan {[!# evam sante 


madisarh jivamšánarn yeva kākå па khadeyyum, eva chasu thënesn akkosanari 
Bodhblsattinubbavena ahosi. 


) Bds -ml-. ° Bd -ehi. > Ске adheyya, Bd айеууші. * Ck adbeyyun. ° С 
-4һе-. 6 Сіз Bd гаја. ° Ва -даш. ° Bdr eto. °? Bd viluppa-. !0 Са 
viiumpa-. !1 Ck .sayarh, С° -sayih. !? Bd ag-. 1# Bd adde тайба. !* pd 
-akarh. 15 Ch deve, !* Ck ватша-. J! Bd -va-. 1* Bd -saslsarn. !° 
Ck khādiyan, Сә khadisan. 


15 


108 XVI Timsanipšta 


Тат sotvā гаја са purohito са araññe уёвібігассһёра- 
mandukam ' upádáya sabbe amhe yeva akkosantiti. Tato ув 
nagara gantvë dbammena rajjam Кагеќуё М-азза ovëáde thitë 
Ч4апайїаї puññápi Кагігрѕо. 

S. Kosalarañño i. d. ñ. ,.maháršja raññë пёта agatigamanar 
pahāya dhammens rajjam karetabban* ti vatvā j. s.: ,.Теда ganda- 
tindukadevatã” aham езй, ‘і. Gandatindukajātakam”. Tim- 
sanipātavaņņanā nitthita “. 


1 Cha všsarn-. 2 Bd zgsndutinduka-. > Rd gandutindukajštakarn пића. “Bd 
omita tisa- < tå. 


ХҮП. CATTALISANIPATA. 


1. Тевак ипајасака. 


Vessantarantam pucchāmiti, Idam S. J. Козаіагапбо 
ovñdavasena ' kathesi. Tamh hi гајапат dhemmasavanaıthāya йёаїаш 
S. атапіеітё ,„mahārāja гаййаё пата dhammena rajjarm kāretabbam, 
yasmim hi samaye rājāno adhammika honti rajayuttàpi tasmim? samaye 
adhammikā hontiti* Catukkanipāte šgatayuttanayena  ovaditvë agati- 
gamane ca agamane ca Gdinavap са апіьатваб ca kathetvë supina- 
küpamā‘ ti йфїпё nayena kāmesu adinavam ittháretva” „шаһй- 
таја їшезат* 

Массипё samgaro! п’ atthi lañcaggšho па vijjati 

yuddham п’ atthi jayo п’ atthi, sabbe maccuparšyanë, 
tesam paralokam gacchantānam thapetvā atianā katakalyanakamnmnam ° 
аййё' райиһа оёта n` atthi, evam ібатарессирайһёпаф avessar 
pahātabbahn, yasam nissāya pamëdam kātu na vattau!?, appamat- 
tena !! hutvā dbammena rajjam karetum vațțati™, porānakarājāno '? 
&nuppanne pi Buddhe panditanam отаде thatvā dhammene г. Кагеітё 
devanagara рйгаунтапё gamihsū" 'ti vatvā tena yācito а. ã.: 


A. В. Вг-о r. k-o aputtako abosi, patthento puttan vā 
dhitararnh vā na labhi™. So ekadivasar шаһапїепа parivārena 
uyyánam gantvá divasabhăgan uyyáne kilitvá maūgalasāla- 


3 Bd adds árabbha. °? Bd adds hi. > Сі -wuttausyena, Bd -vuttanayenova. * 
Ck -ku-, Bd -kupamā каша, 5 Bd vivaretvá. * Ва -sañhi. + Bd sawka- 5 
Ва katarn-. "° Сїеайймї. 10 Ске vattatiti. !! Bd аррашакепа. 1t CL 
pšránakaá. 13 B4 -ati. 


- 
= 


t 
e 


110 ХҮП. Cattālisanipāts. 


rukkhamüle sayanarh attharāpetvā' thokarh niddāyitvā pabuddho 
sãālarukkharh olokento' tattha вакипакшаёуакат passi, saba 
dassaneu' ev' авва sinebo’ uppajji, so ekar purisah раккова- 
petvā „imar rnkkharn abhirühitvá* etasmińh* kulāvake kassaci 
atthitah vā natthitarh vā jánáhiti“ aha. `So abhirūhitvā* tattha 
tipi andakáni disvā rañño ārocesi. „Tena hi etesah® upari 
пйёвйуйїатї'” mā vissajjesîti“ vatvā camgotake° Каррёварісот 
attharitvā „tatth’ etáni° andakāni thapetvā ѕапікат otarš'%“ 'ti 
otarāpetvā carhgotskarn'' hatthena gahetvá ,katarasakunanda- 
káni'' nām’ etānîti“ ашассе pucchi. Те ,mayam па јёоёша, 
nesádë janissantiti“ vadirmsu. Rājā nesāde pakkosāpetvā 
pucchi. Nesādā ,mahëárája' ekam nlükandarn “*, еКаш sáli- 
káya andar, ekar sukandan'*“ ti kathayimsu, „Кїї рапа 
ekasmir kulāvake (їрпаш sakunikáuam апдап! hontiti“. 
„Аша deva paripanthe авай sunikkbittáni na nassantiti“, 
Rājă tussitvë „ime тата pnttá bhavissantîti“ (арі tIni aņdāni 
tayo amacce pațicchāpetvā™ ,ime mayhan puttā bhavissanti, 
tumhe sādhukarh patijaggitvá andakosato nikkhantakále шата 
āroceyyāthā“ ti аһа. Те" së&dhukarn rakkhirmsu. Ра(ћатаҝћ "* 
ulükandarm bhijji, amacco eka nesádarh pakkosápetvš „itthi- 
bhávam vā purisabhāvarh vā jānāhîti“ vatvā tena vlmamsitvá 
»рогіво“ ti vutte rájënam upasamkamitvá „potto te deva játo“* 
ti аһа. Баја tuttho tassa bahurn'' dhana datvā ,,putta- 
Кат "9% sádhukarn patijagga, Vessantaro ti с" авва námarh 
karohiti“ vatvā uyyojesi. So tathā акаві. Tato katipáhacca- 
yena sālikāya апдап bhijji, во pi amacco (аф nesādena vi- 
marnsápetvë „itthiti“ sutvā rañño santikarn gantvá „dhbītă 
deva jātā“ ti аһа. Rājā toțtho tassápi dhanarh’™' datvă 


* Ва attharitvā. 2 Dd -etvā. 3 Ckssneho, * Rd -ruyhitvā. ° Bd ekasmim. © 
Ва tesan. ? Bd пёза-, 5 Bd cañkotake. ° Bd eva. 19 Ва -ähl. "! Ва 
cañkoțakaro. 1% Cks -кё. 1? Bd adds tesu. 14 Bd -kaandaro. !5 Bd вотака- 
andan. '6 Bd -detvā, 7 Bd adds (арі '* Bd tesu ра-. '° Cs Bd -u. 2° 
Ва adda me. 31 Bd bahudha-. 


1. Tesakupajataka. 1521.) 111 


„Чагай тле sadhukam patijagga, Kundaliniti с' азай 
паташ karohiti“ vatvā пууојеві. So’ tath& акаві, Puna 
katipāhaccayena випкапдаш* bhijji, во рі ашассо tam ne- 
вайепа vīmarńsāpetvā ,,puriso' ti vutte rañño santikarh gantvñ 
„putto te deva jāto“ ti аһа. Rājā tuttho dhanam  datvá 
„puttassa me mahantena рагіуйгепа marhgalarm katvā Jam- 
buko tit nāma karohîti“ vatvā nyyojesi. Зо! tathā akāsi. 
Te tayo рі sakuņā (іппаф ашассапаї gehesu rājakumāra- 
parihárena vaddhanti. Каја „ташта putto, mama dhitá% ti 
voharati. Atha’ атассё aññamaññarn avahasanti*: „pàssatha 
rañño kiriyam, tiracchánagate' ‘роо dhitáë те’ ti vadanto 
vicaratiti“ Rājā cintesi: „ime ашассй еїезаш pamáënarm' 
paññšsampadarn па jënanti, pškatar nesah karissāmiti“. 
Ath' ekan amaccam Vessantarassa santikam ревеві: „tumbe' 
pitā pañham pucchitakámo, kadā kira ägantvā pucchatiti*“. 
Ашассо ёрапіуаё !° Vessantaram vanditvā ќат 5йвапагп йгосев?, 
Vessantaro attano patijaggakarn'! amaccam pakkhositvā '* 
smaybarh kira рій тат '? pañham pacchitukāmo, tassa idhá- 
gatassa sakkāro™ Кабат vattatiti'"4 „kadā agacchatiti'*“, 
россћі, А тассо „ito sattame divase ёрассћа(п“ ‘ti &ћа. Tarh 
sutvā Vessantaro ,,рія те ito sattame divase āgacchatū“ ti vatvā 
оууојеѕі. бо gantvë'' rañño агосеві'. Rājå вайате divase 
pagare bherim carāpetvå puttassa тавапапіуевараф !* agamāsi. 
Vessantaro rañño mahanta sakkárarm kāresi, antamaso dāsa- 
kammakaršdinam ° рі sakkārar кагареві’!. Rājā Vessantarasa- 
kunassa gehe bhuñjitvā mahantarn уазаш anubhavitvá sakani- 
Vesanam ёрапіуё rājahmgane mahámandapam kāretvā™ nagare 
bheriñ carāpetvä ајафкаќашарјаре mahājanaparivăro nisfditvā 


з Ad adds pi. 3 Bd suvaandar. ! Rd bahudha-. * Bd adds cassa. * Bd athassa, 
* Ске abbhassuti. 7 Bd mama ройёпат in the place of рашїпаш. ° Bd 
-hākèàù. ° Bd -tūų. 10 Ва gantvā. ™ Вё-пей. 1? Bd pakkosāpetvā. '* 
Bd omita mam. !# Bdz -rarh. — 15 Сі замай, 1 Bd ršJa āgaechatūtl. 1? 
Ва ар-. 18 Bde acikkhl. '° Bds omit vasana. ?° Bas -kārāņnsi, ?! Bd 
kāresl. 2 Bd karapetva. 


- 


10 


112 XVIIL Cattšlisanjpšta. 


»› Vessantaram йпеїї'* `ti amaccassa santikar ревевї. Amacco 
Vessantararh suvannapithe nisīdāpetvā ёпеві. Sakuno pitu 
amke nislditváë pitarā saha kilitvá gantvšë' tatth' eva pithe 
nisidi. Atha паш гаја mahajanamajjhe rajadhammar puc- 
chanto ра{һашатп gátham aha: 

1. Vessantaran {аш pucchâmi’, sakuna' bhaddam atthu te, 
rajjam karetukámena Кий su kiccarm katah varan ti. 1. 
Тайһа вакораё 'ti taù älapati, kirhaü.l ti Шасагаіссаго, katarh varan ti 

uttamatb hot, kathehi me tāta sakalarn ršájadhamma ti етап) kira паш ё 
во pucchi. 

Таш sutvă Vessantaro pañham akathetvë va гајёпаф 
(ауа pamádena сойерсо dutiyarn gātham аһа: 

з. Cirassarn vata тат ° tato Karhso Bārāņasiggaho 
pamatto appamattam mam: pitā puttar acodayiti. 2. 
Tattha {ато “ü pita, Kamso t! idaro tassa пашага, Bārāņasiggaho 

ti catühi sarüugahavatchühíi Haránasirn gahetva vattauto, рат ао ti everüpšnarh 
papditānam santíke тавапіо pañhassa apucchanena pamatto, appamattan ti 
siladigunayogena шага appamattarh, pitá ti posakapliā, acodayiu ашассећі 
tiraechšnagate putte ketvá voharatiti avahasiyamāno pamādarh äpajjitvä cirassatis 
ajja codesi райһал! pucchtti vadati. 

Imäya gāthāya codetvá „wmahārāja raññā náma tisu“ 
dhammesu thatvā dhammena rajjam karetabban“ ti vatvā 
rüjadhammarn kathento аһа: 

s. Pathamen' eva vitatharu Кофһат hāsam” піуйгауе, 
tato Кіссапі Кагеууа, tah vata" āhu khattiya. 3. 

«. Yam tvah (аса tape. kammari pubbe katam asamsayarh 
ratto duttho ca уаш kayiră ua tam kayirā tato ропа”. 4. 

s. Kbattiyassa pamattassa ratthasmim ratthavaddhana'° 
sabbe bhogā vinassauti, rañüo tah vuccate арћаф. 5. 

з. Siri са (ёха Lakkhi ca pucchitā etad abravurh: 
uttháqaaviriye'' pose ram’ ãbar '* anusuyyake. 6. 


1 Ва omits ga-. * Ске -ma. 3 Сіз pam. * Bd uch. 5 Ві ше * Ck 
паёшёЧеп. ? CE harsar, Cs һаваш, ° B&s тааш. ° C% Bd puna, 1° pa 
-vaddhana, '! Bd utháue-. 13 Ск ramaharh, Bd ташётаћега, 


<). Тевакипајётака. {521.) 113 


z. Ussuyyake duhadaye purise kammadussake 
kšlakanni mahārāja ramati cakkabhañjani. 7. 
s. So [tvan] ввЬһевагї! suhadayo sabbesarh rakkhito bhava, 
alakkhirn? nuda maharája lakkhi*' bhava nivesanam. 8. 
э. Salakkhi dhitisampanno puriso hi* mahaggato 
атійќёпаф Kásipati mülam ардай са chindati. 9, 
зо. Sakko pi hi bhütapati utthšne' na-ppamajjati 
sa kalyāņe dhitih katvā uttbāne kurute mano, 10. 
а. Gandhabbā pitaro devā ѕайјїуа honti tādino, 
| utthahato appamajjato snutitthanti devatā. 11. 
1з. So appamatto akkuttho táta kiccāni kāraye 
vāyaınassu ca‘ kiccesu, nálaso vindate sukha. 12. 
u. Tatth' eva te vattapadā евё са! апиайвапї 
alah mitte sukhápetum amittānah dukkhāya сё? 'ti. 13. 


Таһа pathameneva vitethan ti tata гаја пїша āditọ va musāvidai , 


nivšraye, musëvāädino ħi rañňo rațțharh nirojah boti, patbaviyš оја? komma- 
karapatthāänato eattaratanamattah bețjhā bhaessti'?, tato ahárell telamadhu- 
phāqitādisu vā osadhesu'? оја" na hot, nirojābārabbojino'? mapussi bavbā- 
bädhä 1% honti, гаће thalajalapathesu ёуо n' uppajjati, tasmim anuppajjanto 
тајёпо duggsta honti, te sevake sahganblturh па sakkonti, asargabită та}їпаш 
garucittena olokentl, eva Ша musāvâdo паш’ esa пігојо, во jivitabetu pi 
пе 15 kàtabbo, aaccaro pana ašdhutararh!t rasãnan ti tad era parlagübetabbarn, 
арі ca шивёуёбо піша gupaparidhamsako vipattipariyosano dutiyakacíttavāre 
aviciparäyanarh karoti, ітаѕтій pan’ atthe 'dhammo bave bato hantiti' Сейўа- 
Jätakarn kathetabbarn, kodhan ti tāta гаја пата pathamam eva kujjhanalakkha- 
раф kodham рї nivāreyya, tata аййевып hi kodbo khippar matthakan па 
pâpupātl råjūnah!? pipunaáti, гајёпо паша jvācāvudhā kuJjbltva olokltamatte- 
пёрі рагеваб vinšsenti, tasmë raññā aññebl manussebi atireksterarb nikkodbena 
bhavitabbarn khantitnettšunddayasampannena attano piyapattah viya lokarb 
volokentena, tšta atikodbano Ш гаја орраппаф yassrh rakkbitum na sakkoti, 
dmassa pan а: (Һава dipanatthah Khantivadijštake-Culladhanimapálajštakánj 
kathetabbäul, Culladbemmapšlajitakasmirn hi Mabāpatāpano'® гаја ронаш 


t Hd sabbe. 2 Ске -i, Bd .1. ° Rd -1, Ве -khyá. + Па са. 5 Ca -no. t Hds sa, 7 
Bd va. * Che vā, ? Che ojo. '° ao Сг ; СЕ Һаззай, Bd bhavissau. 131 Ca -ro, 
Bda -ro vā. 12 Bd adds va. 31 Па -Janš, 1 Се bahmā, Ва Башта, 15 Ва na 
во J. pl musávàdo. !* Ck sādburasa, Сг sidurasarn. © Bd ráJšnamn. !° pd 
mehbštšpano, Jāt. JII 2,7,7 mahāpatâpo. 

huk. V, 8 


10 


30 


10 


15 


20 


#5 


30 


114 ХУП. Cattšlisanipšta, 


gbātetvā’ puttasokena badaye? phallte matäys devlyš взуазтп pl devin anuso- 
canto badayaphālanen’ eva! mari, atha ne tayo pi ekašlšhanen' eva* }һарезшп, 
tasmā тайп& pathamam eva m; адәт vajjetvā dutiyah kodho vajjetabbo, 
авап ti bessai t, ayam eva уй pštho, tesu (ввп kiceesu ubbillāvitacittatāya? 
kelisilatarn рагіһаяиф nivåreyya, tšta тапйї пата kellsilena na’ bhavitabbarn, 
+mparapattiyena' butvë sabbakiccănl 10 attapaccakkhen eva kātabbāni, ubbllā- 
vitacitto'! bi гаја atuletva kammānl karonto laddharh уават vināseti, ішевоігі 
рап" atibe Sarabhañgajātake purohltassa racanath gahetvā тайпо!®? kisavacche 
aparajjhitvā saba ratthena uccbiJjitva'3 Kukkhulaniraye nibbattabbāro!® Mā- 
take Majjharañño brāhmanņānah kathsrb gabetvā Mâtañgatâpase арага); 
saha’ ratthena mcchijjitva!3 niraye nibbattabbāvo'* Ghatajātake desa- 
bbšáukaršJadarakšnarn lobhamūlhānam 1! Капћадірёуапе aparajjbltvā Vāsudova- 
kujasaa näsitabhāvo ca kathetabbo, tato кіссапі kšreyya? '11 eva (4а 
patbamarh musāvàdah dutíyarh kodbarh tatiyah adhammahbsem vajjetvë tato 
paccbā тёјё rattbavasinaih katebbakiccâni kâreyya 1! tah vatah'™® аһа 
kbattiyš el khattlya глаһагаја yain mayā vuttah etan rañño vatasamādănau 
ti porāņakapanditā kathbayirhsu, na tar kaylirš ti yam teyå pāgādivasena 
рассһа!арайагай kammarb kataro boti tato pubbe katai tato!° puna tšdisarh 
kammaih na Кзуігё 0 гоё kareyyàei?' tätâ "4, vuccate ti tam rañño aghan 
ti vuccetl, еға@ poršnakapanditi katbaylıhsū ti, eiri са '(1%? Vessantara- 
aakune ?? pubbe Bārāņasiyarh pavattitarh kāraņań áłaritvā dassento šha, tattha 
abravun ti Suciparivārasettbinā pucrbltë katbayirnsu, uțțtbāânaviriye?? ti 
yo poso п{{һапе са viriyo ca patitíhito na са psresarh вашраиій дізтё usuyyati?* , 
Савті abarh abbiramámiti3$ evam’? tâta Siri kathesi, ивцууаке 2% ti Alakhhi 
pana täta pucchitë аһатї parasampaitiusuyyake ducelte39 kalyšnakamrpadussake, 
yo?° kalyšnakammarh dussento’! appiyäyanto atilyanto% na karoti tasmirh 
abbiramâmîti аһа, evan så kalakanni глаћёгаја геше patirūpsdesavāsādino 
kasalacakkassa bbañjeni, suhadayo (1 sundaracitto ħltaeittako, ппда?? ч 
пїһата?%, nivesanan ti Јакћуё 5 рапа *% пітевапаф. bhava patitthë hohi, 
веі аккћї dhitisampanno tl шаћагёја Kâsipati во рогіво paññāya с’ ova 
vlriyena са яарраппо, mahaggato ti?? гаћајјһавауо, согёпаф paccayabhüte 
вепћапіо ашїнїпаш шаг 2° соге ganbanto атіцёлаг 19 aggarh chindatiti тайап, 


1 Bd gháte-. % Ck -уа, Сә -yarm. 3 Bd Һайауепа phallleneva. * Bd ekšlñhana, 
s Ва ha-, * Bd ћа-; 7 Ва uppilàya cittakBya. ° Ске kellallarn nšma, * Cha 
-рапа-, 10 Bd sabbhni-. “!! Bd uppilpita-. '? Bd2 dandakirañño. !! Ch 
ucehlnditçš. 1. В4» add се. !5 Ва saka. :* Ріг moha mullbanarh vacensrb gahetvè. 
17 Rd ka-. !% Bd vattarh. !# so Bd; Ckz kataro in the place of hatarh tato. 
30 Ске „га, 31 СЕ -ratl, Сә -га. 32 Bd adda idarn, Bzsimar. 2: Bd -по. 
324 Вав -пе-. 35 ра ussuysti. „%* Bd adds аһ. 37 Bde add tāra. 29 Rd 
uesuya-. 19 Rds duhadaye. 20 Cks во, 5! Çs Ва dussanto. >? Ck atthi-, 
ВӘ ati-. 22 Ck nudbā. 24 Chs add 11. 3: СЕ -а, Cslekhya, Ва lakkbā 26 
Pd панањ. 2? Che omit ti 35 Che -la. 3? so Ad; Che omit amittšnam. 


`l. Tesakunsjštaka. (521.) 115 


Ѕекко ti Indo, bbütspatiti гајапийћ šlapati, uttbane ti uțthānaviriye na- 
ррипа}}а1! sabbakiccšni karoti, sa? kalyane ti so devarājā utthanavirlye 
manam karonto pišpakarpmam akstvë kalyana puññakarpmasmim беха dhitim 


katvš appamatto uttbāne manam karoti, tassa рапа kalyánsksmmme тігіуе аба-` 


bħhâvádassanattharh? деїәш devalokesu devatšbi saddhim Kavlthai 
âgantvā pañharn pucchitvá dhammassa sutabhšëvo Mabākanhajâtake attano апо- 
bhávona janar tàsetv& osekkantsssa pavattitabhãvo ti әташ Bdinl vatthüní 
kathetabbanttl, gandhabbā ti ейіотгоаһагајікапат hettba catuyonikadevë 
catuyonikattá yeva kir’ ete? gandbabbš паа jātā, pitero tí brabmaganadevš t 
ti uppattivasena! chakâmävacarā", сёбіпо {1 tathāvidbassa kusalābhiratassa” 
тайбо 19 (0 sejivā bonti samänajirikë upajiritabba, tādisā М ri 
puñðāäni Шагоп!о!! devatšnar pattih denti, tš'2 tar  pattih’?” anumodítvš 
sampaticchitvā dibbeyasens vaddhanti, апос алий, tādlesa 1* rañño vlriyarb 
karontasse арраош8 аг špajjantassa devstë anutlithanti anugacchanti '? dhsmmika- 
rakkharn sarnvidahanti, so tl во (тї, vàyamassq сё!* `1 {#п] та!{һа- 
kiccãni karonto tulanavasena tiraDavasena paccakkhakammavasena 1? tesu’? kic- 
cesu viriyarn karasesú, tattheva te vattaepadi tl tâta yam mam trah 19 kim 
вч 29° kiccarh katah varan ti pucehi tattha vata?! pañhe уе?# ete maya ра(һа- 
теп’ eva vitathan t| `šdayo vuttš ete vattapadš vattakotthšsa otiha та!!авап, 
ева (| уа te mayā Каі өзї vata?’ anusšsani,.alan ti evarh vattamāoo 
Ы rājā айапо mitte sukhšpeturo swittānsā са dukkhšya alarn pariyatto 3* 
samatto** tl. š | 


Evan Vessantarasakunena еКйуа?* gāthāâya таййо pa- 
шада codetvā ekádasahi gāthāhi dhamme kathite Buddha- 
П1һауа райһо kathito ti. Mahājano acchariyabbhutacittajāto 
sādhukārasatāni pavattesi, Rājā somanassappatto amacce 
Āāmantetvā „„Ыһо'* amaccă тата puttena Vessantarena evam 
kathentena kena” kattabbakiccarn* ti™” „mahăsenaguttena™ devā‘‘ 
ti „tena hi "вва mahāsenaguttatthānam™ dammiti“ Vessantararn 
thānantare thapesi. So™ tato pattháya mahāsenaguttațthāne™ 
thito pitu kammari akásiti. Vessantarapañho nitthito. 


! Bd -titi. 2 Ске omic ea. ° Bd adde sarabhañgajātake. * Bd kapițhā-. 5 
Bd kira te. * Ck bra-, Bd brahmšáno devā, Вг brêbmagaņpā-. ? Bd upattideva- 
vasena. ° Bd айде deva. ° Bd kuaslavasenšbhiratassa. ° Bd adda tādlsassa 
таййо virlyah karontassa rañño. !! so all three MSS. !? pd (е '' Che 
ратаі. !* Bd tādisassa. 15 Chs gsechanti. !$ Ске vā, 17 Ck paccakhhaya- 
4һаштшатавепа, C? paccakkayadh-, !* Bde repeat tesu. 1° Bd omits tvarb. 7° 
Bd kl su, Ck omits kiro su. *!! Bde tava, °? Bd yeva. 32 Bd vatava. "t во Bd 
for samattho? Cs -anto. 35 Bd ettakaya. ?* Bd bhonto. ® Bd kin. 2° Ch 
omit mahäsenaguitena devā 01 tena bissa. 3' Bd -senañgutta-. 2 Cts omit во. 


8* 


10 


15 


95 


30 


116 XVII. Cattšàlisanipšta. 


Puna гёја Ка(іраһассауепа purimanayen' eva Корја1іріуё 
santikarh @йїаїй раһеїуй! sattame divase tattha gantvā расса- 
gantvë tath' ета? mandapamajjhe nisiditvá Kundalini йһй- 
petvā' suvannapithe пївїппагї rājadhammai pucchanto 

14. Sakkhī (шуат Kundalini maññasi khattiyabandhuni: 

rajjarn kāretukāmena kim su kiccam katarh varan (і р.а. 14. 


Tattha sakkhîti mayá puțthar pañharn kathetur sakkhlagasîti pucchati *, 
Kupdaliníti saliñgato* āgatanâmenâlapati, tassā kira dvisü kannepitthesq 
кардайзар!һїпё* dve lekhá ahesurh, tene tassă’ Kundalinîid nšámarb kāreti, 
mañüasiti jinissasi mayá pultbepañbassa atthan ti, khattiyabandhuniti 
khattiyassa mahāsøonaguttassa? bbagiribhávena nam levan šlapati, kasmë pan’ 
ева Veseantarasakuņarn evan apucchitvå imam eva pucchatfti Itthibhävena, 
ittbiyo bl” рагі(сарайбё, tasmā aace sakkot! pucchisaāmi по ce па pucchissá- 
miti’? vimarhéanavasena evam россћіёта taro беа pañharh puccehi. 


ба evarh гайда rájadhamme pucchite „tāta marh “itthiká 
пата kir kathessatiti’ уїтагпвавї!' maññe, sakalan te rāja- 
dhammam dvīsu yeva padesu pakkhipitvā kathessámiti“ 
vatvā™ aha: 


is. Dve va tëta padakāni. yesu `' 


sabbar patitthitarh 
aladhassa ca уо lābho laddhassa anurakkhapá'', 15. 
16. Атассе tëta }йпаһї dhire atthassa kovide 
anakkh' ákitave tāta gsoņpde avinásake. 16, 
ит. Yo са tarn tāta rakkheyya йһапат! уай c' eva te'` siya 
зй(0'* va rathain ватрапһе so te kiccani kāraye. 17. 
зв. Susamgahitantajano'' вауаш cittarn avekkhiya 
nidhiñ са inadánañ са na kare parapattiy&'". 18. 
1, Sayah āyavayar '" ]аййй, sayam jaññā katškatam, 
nigganhe niggabārahah, pagganhe paggahárahar, 19. 


3 Bd ревет. 2 Bå tattheva. * Bdzšbarkpe-. Bd pucchi. ° Bdz tassšllü- 
gato. * Ско „паю. 7 Bd тепаввё. ° Bd -senañgutta-. " Ске рі. 19 Сіз -mi, 
11 Che vtmarhsati. 12 Cis omit vatvë, !1 Bds yattha. '* Bd -рё. 15 Cha 
vano. !* all tbree MSS. su-. ' Сг -antajano? Ck Bd -айћајапо. ™ so all 
three MSS. 1? Bd: Byarbvayarh, CEt ayavayarh. 


1. - Tesskunajataka (521.)' 117 


о. Sayarn jānapadarh attharn' апивӣва rathesabha, 
më te адћаттікё уана dhanarh ratthañ са nësayürh.. 20. 
з. Mā са vegena kiccáni karesi kārayesi vā, 
vegasā hi Ка{аї kammarh mando pacchánutappati. 21. 
as. Mü їе avisare*' тайса? subálham adhikodhitarh, · 
kodhasš hi bahü рі tā kulá akulatarh' раќа. 22. 
se Ма таба іѕѕаго 'mhiti апа уа patārayi, Ç 
itthipam purisänañ ca таё te āsi dukhudrayo'. 23, 
a. Apetalomahamsassa rañño kāmānusārino | 
sabbe bhogá vinassanti, rañño tarh vuccate арһап. 24. 
‚зэ. Tatth' eva te vattapadā езй ca' anusásant, 
dakkh’ assu дёпі puññakaro asondo avinásako, 
sīlav’ assu" mahārāja, dussilo vinipātako’ ti. 25. 


Tattha padekaniti kSraņapadāni, yesü9 № yesu dvisü padesu верба 
аба jātarh!? hitasukhar t райна, а1а44һазва чі yo pubbe aladdhassa 
lëbhassa lëbho уй са!? Jaddhassa anurakkbanā, tšta auuppannassa hi lábhassa 
uppādanah паша na!) bbšro uppannassa pana anurakkhanam!i eva bhāro, 
ekacco М yasarb !* uppādetvåpi yase pamatto тёпаїй!* uppšdetvá pāņātipātāí- 
dini karoti mabâcoro hutvá га! Багц vliumpamāno cáratF, аа пап тајапо 
gibāpetvā mabšvlnásarh pāpenti, athevā рапа!? rūpādisu kimagunesu pamatto 
ayaniso dhanarn nāsento sabbasapateye!" khinsa kapano һиш!уй cirakavasano!* 
kapšlam2° ādāya caratl, pabbajito vå?! pana gandhadhuradivasena lâbhasakkārarn 
nibbattetvë pamatto Їіпаув vatteti, nibbattetvâpi 
mutthassatitāy: tatbārūpe šrammane bajjhitvá Jbaná'paribayall, evarn иррапиавзв 
уазавва vå jhänädilābhassa vā rakkbanam25 eva dukkararh, tadatthadipanattbarh 
pana2t Devadattasea vatthurn Mudulakkhana-Lomasakassapa-Hiaritajataka-Sari- 
Каррајаќакаші ca kathetabbšnl, еко pana lābhasakkārah uppādetvā аррат?де 
thatvä kalyanakammarn karoti, tasea во yaso sukkapakkhe cando viya pavaddbati, 
їа@ша mahárája?" appamatto payogasampattiyã tbatvë dhammena т. kšrente tava 
чрреппеат yasari?'? anurakkbāhiti, Jšánahiti bbandagarikakammadikaranattharb 
upadhárehi, anakkhakhitave ti anakkbe akitave ejūtskare?® c' ота akerštlko 


! Ска тайба, Bd janapade апа, Hz апһып, “ Ска асівега, Bds adhisare, ? 
Cke шисёа * Bd kusalš akusalah, 5 Bd asi dukkbindriyo. ° Rd уа, 7 Bd 
milavissu, Chk2h;ajavassa, ° Hd -tiko ° Rds yatthā. 10 C? attbajātah, Ck 
вцрајіга !' Bd bitane, !# Che va, 75 Bd omits па. !4 Bd -nam. !$ Bd 
вауат. 1% Bd pamâdañi. !? Bd appanna, !° Ске -patiyye. !9 Bd pilotlka- 
vesano. 20 Bd kapalam? °?! Bd omita vā. ?? Bd muthassatitaya, Ске muttha- 
зацуа. ™ Bd -nam. ?* Bd omits рапа. 2?5 Bd айде tvan. 2* Ck sayah. 37 
Ва ajuta-, Ckz adūta-. 


10 


15 


#0 


35 


30 


10 


15 


118 ХУЛ. Cattalisanipšta. 


ca, asonde ti Ppüvasuragandbamšlàsondsbhšvsrabite, avinasaka а tava 
santakanarh dhanadbaññadinarn anšsske). yo ti уо ашассо (аф c' eva? yañ са 
to gbare dbatiarh віуа {ай rakkheyya, sūto? vā `'t| rathasárathi viya yathā 
siratbi visamamagganivāäranatthain® asse? вагпдапһап!о rathan sarhganbeyya 
evar yo saha bhogebi tarn rakkhitam sekkoti во te ашассо паша, tâdisar: gabetvâ 
bbandágārikakiccāni* karaye!', susumgabitantajano® ti (аба yassa bi rañño 
attano antojano ап}ота!ай)ап арагјапо? са danšdihl авардаһісо hoti Савва 
antonivesane зитаппајігабйадїпі (езагі 10 asamgahitamanussånarh тавепа nassanti, 
antomanto babi gaccbatl?’', (ашё tvah’? autthugehitasntojano'? butvā etta- 
kar hi!f пата me vittan ti sayah attano dbanamh avekkhitvë asukafthšne 
nāms uidhirb nidhema asukassa Inah demā ' idam ubbayam pi, ne Кате 
parapattiyä’’ t)! parapattiyëyitva!7” mâ kari, *abbsrn!" айарассайШһеп' 
eva)? kareyyšsit] vadati, ауачауан 20 ti lato uppajjanakaih ?! äyañ ca”? tesar 
teaarn dàtabbavayañ ca вауаш eva jänoyyàsîti, katàkatan ti sarmgame vi 
Davakamme vâ aññesu vā kiccesu iminë ida пёша mayhan hatari Iminë na 
katan ti ovau? рі saysm eva vē?! јапеууаві 25 mā ратара{йуа?* ahos), 


. pigganhe ti таа таја лаша sandbicchedakārakain ` nlggahāraham ânetvå 


20 


25 


30 


dassitah upaparikkbitvā sodbetvà porâuakerājūhi thaplıadandarńı oloketvà 
dosānurūpah niggaņheyya, pagganbəe ti уо pana рарраһагаһо hoti abhinnansa 
vā parabalassa bbettã?! bhinnassa vā sekabalassa ёгёйһако?% aladdhessa vā 
rajja ako?® laddhassa và thāvarakārako yena vā pana jīvitah dinnarm 
boti evarüparh раввепЬвууа 20 mabantah sakkàrasamwânain kareyya, erain hi 
"ава kiccesu аййеви?!, рі шгай datvë .kattabbsr .karissanti,. Janapadan ti 
janapadavāsīinain аһа yasai aultapaccakkhen ” eva а a, adhammikă 
yuttā ti адћаштіка tattba tattba nlyuttå ayuttskalañ gahetvā vinicchayar 
bhindantă tava dbanañ са ratthañ ca mà nāsayuin, ішіпё Цатапепа appamatto ` 


hutvà .вауаш eva anusass, vagen '(1 sahasñ atuletvā atīretvā, vegaaâā ti 
atuletvë cbandăādivasena ваһавё katah kawmarh?? na hi sáadhukar 235 па 
випбагаф, kirnkaraná: tådisan hi katva mando расса vippatisäravaseha z 
idbaloke apāyadukkhāni®‘ anubhonto?’ paraloke ca auuutappati'*, ayan pan' 
attho 37 'Isīinam aptarah katvā Bharuršjš 5% ti ше sutan’ 1i Bharujátakena’? 


1 Ваз avinā-. ? Bd yañcevā. 2 all tbree MSS. su-. * Bds -maggagamanani-. 
° Cha asesu. ^ Bde kādikiccāni, 7 Ваг këreyya, Cks hāraya. ” Ck -atthajano, 
Сг -attajano? Bd -attajano. ° Ck -antojana-, Сә rañño anne antovalañj-, Bd 
-antojano valañe-, '° Cka tesu. !1 во Càs; lid anto bahi са gaccbantā. € 
Bd tam.” 18 Bd sarhga-. !' Ва omits М. '% во all three MSS, '* Cke omit 
ti. 31 Ck -pattbiyšyitva, Сә -patitlyidhitvš, Bd -pattlyāpltvah. !* Bd tabbar. 
19 Ck „рассахекићелеча,. Са antopaccavekkheneva, Bda sttapaccakkhaneva. 3 
Ске aya-, Ві ayam. °! Cke-ka. 32 Bd syañca. 23 Bd etah, 34 Bd omil vai, 
33 Che і, 26 во Ва; Ске -уо. #7 Ва tinno. 3° Bd adhărako, 19 Ско &ћа-. °° 
Ваз радраріёғакаф paggabetvå in the place of pagganbeyya. t Cka аййо. ™ 
Ва kappañbi. 22 Cr sādukain, 2* Bd am. 25 Bd -bbavanto. ?* Bd -tapsti. 
3 Ва adda tl. 22 Bdz gayu-, Vol. үр. 39 Rd garurājājāt-. 


1. Tesskunsjštaka. (521.) 119 


dipetabbo, mā ќе атівате шийса! subilhamadhikodhitasu ti tšta tava 
һайдауаїй? kusalarp ахівагієтё 2 atikkamitvā* pavatte рагеваћ akussiadhammesu 5 
` воъёћат < adhikodhitarh kujjhāpitarn? hutvë mā muüca° mā patltthayatü? "1 
attho, i. v. h.: (аа узда te vinicchaya (hitasss iminā poriso’? vā bato seudbi 
vå chinbo!l ti’? corah dassent1!5 (айа te paresarn vacanell sutthu kodhitarn!* 
рі hadayarn hodhavasena mā muñra ° apariggahetvā mā dapdárn рапеві !°, kiin- 
Låraņä: асогаш рі hi’! coro ti gabetvā änenti, tasma akujjhitvà!! ubhianarh 
Aattapaccskkhikánam! kathan sutvà suttba sodhetv5 attapaccakkhena tassa 
corabhāvam ñatvā paveniyā tbapltadandavasena kattabbarn karobi, тайпа bi 
uppanne pi koddhe badayah sītalah ekatvā kammaiı ña kåtabbah, yadā 
pau авва badayarù nibbutah hoti mudukah tadā vinicchayakammamh kā- 
tabharn, pbarusehi cittehi!)" pakkatthite?? udake mukhanimittarh хув kiranarh 
na paññāyatl, kodhasābiti?' {Ма kodbane bl bahüni рі tāni?? rājakulāni 
акшаға ?? g 
nattharn Khantivádijatakain 24 NálikeraraJassa vatthurù sahassabšhu-Ajjunavatthu- 
ваї 25 katbetabbinl, patārayiti tāta sharh pathaviesaro ti mā mabājanaro 
patárayi?*t otārayi, yatbā “tari апа(!һиїп samādāya 


ni, mabāvināsam eva pattāniti, ішавва pan’ айБаәва dipa- 


kayaduccearitadianatt] 
зацац mā өғаш akāsîti attho, mā te āpiti?’ ї1йїа?5 tava vijile шапйава- 
jätikänain vë tiracchănajàtikānain vā jtthipurisánarh dukkbudreyo?” dukkbuppatti 
mā âsi, yathâ bi adhammik mh vijite manussā kàyaduccaritadiul karitvā?! 
niraye uppajjanti tava ratthavšsinain dukkharo yathš na boti tathë karohîtl 
attho, apetalomaharhsas "ti attanuvadadibhayebi nibhbayessa, imiņā 
idam даввесі: (аба уо гаја Кізшійсі asarhkarü [ака(‹& attano kammarm 22 eva 
anussarati chandavasena уат yain lechati tarü tain karoti vissatthayațth] viya 
andbo nirarhkuso viya caņdakarthi hoti tassa sabbe bhogš vinassanti, tassa 
tarh bhogavyasanaih dukkban ti у0сса(і 22, çatth' eva te vattapadá (12% 
purimansyen` eva veditabbarn 2°, dakkhassu danitl (йа tvah inah anusš- 
ari karanena puññskaro suršdi- 


бап 26 sutvá idāni dakkbo snalaso рий. 
pariharanena asondo dittbadiammikasamparšyikassa attbassa avināsanena avÍna- 
вако bheveyyåsi, 511ауаввй?! 'ti в1ауа 69 acarasarppauuo bhava, dasasu rāja- 


dhammaesu patittbaya r. kirehi"*, dugssilo vinipātiko ti dussilo bi mabš- 


vitis. > Bd -kamme, * Bd sutbu-. 7 Che kujjha-, Bè kujhšmituh. 5 Che 


mucca, * во Chs; Bd patitha. 19 Н” ssena, 1! Bd сһінпаф. 12 Bd ці. 26 pd. 


daasisaantl. 1° Cke kotam. 15 Cs pane-. !% Ck асогашћі. !! Bds add va. 1% 
Bd -paccstihikánarh. 2° Cks өсө, 2° С^ pakkatthate, Bd pakkutike, Вг pakku- 
thi, 33 Cks hi, omitting ti, 22 Сё bahunipitë ti, Cs babūni, Bd bahūlt pi 
чє. 32 Bd akusala-. 24 Cka -vādajātakah, Ва -dijātake, 25 Bd -añcuna-. 
3t Се adds mā, Bd ha. 3! Bd asiti. 28 Вә adds аһапп patbavissaro. ?9 Oks 
dukkbadrayo? Bd dukkhindriyo. 20 Bd dukkbuppattamakāsi. 3! Bd -tāoi katvá, 
39 Dd кашаш. 3 Ск» -anti, 34 Cks omit ti, 35 Bd yaJetabbarh. 36 Bd -nar 
21 Cka -үаввё, 28 Ске add ce. 59 Ck ka-. #0 Bd adds айз. * Bd -tiko. 


10 


15 


30 


15 


20 


25 


30 


120 XVII. Cattšltsantpšta. 


Evam Kundalini рі екёдазаћі gātbābi dh. девеѕі. Raja 
tuttho amacce Āmantetvå. риссћі: ,,bho' атассё mama dhitáya _ 
Kundaliniyáë eva kathayamánáya kena kattabbakiccam katan‘ 


` ti, ,Bhandágárikena devā“ 'ti. „Tena hi. "вва bhaņdāgāri- 


katthánarm damriti“ Knndalinimn* thánantare țthapesi, Sā 
tato pattháya bhandág&rikattháne thatvā pitu kammath akāsîti. 
Kundalinipañbo nitthito. | 

Ропа rājā katipāhaccayena purimanayen' eva Jambuka- 
panditassa santika: йат pesetvá sattame divase tattha 
gantvā sampattirn anubhavitvá paccagato' tath’ eva mandapa- 
majjhe nisīdi, Атассо Jambukapanditam kañcanabaddha- 
pithe* nisidápetvá pitharn sīsenâdāya agañchi' Pandito pitu 
amike“ -nisiditvë krlitvë gantvā kañcanapithe yeva півїді. Atha 
nam гаја pañharh pucchanto 
з. Apucchamhápi' kosikarn“ Kundaliniñ са tath' eva’, А 

Jambuka (хат dáni vadehi'° balānath бајаш uttaman ti g, ё. 26. 

Tass’ attho: tata Jambuka аһап tava bhštarah koslyagottarh Vossantarain © 
bhaginiñ cs te Kunqalinirh räjadbammerh pucchlhii!!, (е attano balena katho- 
sumh, ysathá pana (в! pucehirn': tatl’ eva idšnl риаш Jambnukari puechim), 
{зат me rājadhammañ ca uttamabalañ ca kathehîti. 

Evarh rájë M-am райһат pucchanto аййезат риссћіќа- 
niyāmena apucchitvā visesetvā pucchi. .Ath’ assa pandito „tena 
hi mahārāja ohitasoto зипа'*, sabban te kathesamiti“ pasarita- 
hatthe sahassatthavikarn thapento viya dhammadesanam ärabhi: 

"т. Balah pañcavidharh loke porisasmih mahaggate, 
tattha Баһабајат ° пата carima vuccate balar, 
bhogabalañ ca Чїдһйүп dutiyarh vuccate balah, 27. 

зв. Amaccabalañ са dighāvu tatiyam vuccate balar, 
abhijaccabalañ c' eva™ tarn catuttbarn asamsayam, 

у&пі! с” etāni sabbáni adhiganháti pandito 28. 


1 Bd bhonto. .2 Bd -niyava. 3 Віз рассћа-. * Rd -handha-. ! Bd agacchi. * 
Hd añge. 7 Ck: -hšsl, Bd špucchimha, ° Bd kosiyagottarn. ° ¿o all MSS. for 
tatheva ca? !0 mo all three MSS. for vada? !' Bd ápucchlmbi, Ck puechl, Cs 
pucchin. 1!” Bde panete. 13 Bd pucchitá. !* Bd sunāhl. '’ Bd -hu-. !% СЕ 
ahimejjaccabalern, Сг abhimajjabalarh, Bd abhijjaürabs-. 2? зо all three MSS. for yena? 


1. Tesakunajitaka. (521.) 121 


зә. Tar balānarh bala settharn ардатп- paññābalah Бајат’, 
paññabálen' upatthaddho абћат vindati pandito. 29, 

зо. Арі ce labhati mando phitarn dharaniim' uttamarh 

аКатавза разауһап!* уй añño tam patipajjati. 30. 

Abhijāto pi ce hoti rajjarn laddhāna khattiyo 

duppañño hi Казіраќі sabbepa pi па jivati. 31. · 

з. Paññá sutaviniccbini рапйй [kitti] silokavaddhanī, 
paññāaahito naro idha [api] dukkhe* sukháni vindati. 32. 

вз. РапПай са kho asussüsarh па Косі adhigacchati 

bahussutar anágamma dhammatthaií avinibbhojarn' 33. 

‚ se: Yo dhammañ са vibhāgañňū kaálutthëyi atandito 
апобћаһаќі kālena kammaphalarñ tassa ijjhati. 34. 


as, Nâoăyatanasilassa® nànšyatanasevino * 
па nibbindiyakárissa samma-dsattho 'vipaccati. 35. 


зв. Ajjhattañ са payuttassa tatháyatanasevino 
anibbiodiyakārissa samma-d-attho vipaccati, 36. 
эт. Yogappayogasarmkhëátarm sambhatassânurakkhanarh ! 


(апі (уай táta sevassu, mă akammāya randhayi', 
akammanā’ hi dummedho nalágáram уа sidatiti. 37. 


Tattha mahaggato ti mabārāja imanmirh sattaloke mahajjšsaye purise 


pañcavidharn balah hotli, bahšbalan 10 tl kayabalarii, cariman ti tah atl- 
mahantam рі satpënain lšmakam eva, kiikäranā: dandlabdiathāvena !', maco bl 
kāpabalarí mahantain nāma bħaveyya váranabalato latukikšya '2 Бајага khudda- 
kah bhaveyya váranabalarn рапа andləbālabhāvena'® maranassa psccayo 
Jštarh, latukikā'® attano ñāņakusalatāya vāraņah jivitakkhayari pápëstt 1%, 
imasmih pan’ atthe па h’ eva sabbattha balena kiccam, balari hi bâlassa 
vedhäya һо” sutten -âharitabbap, bbogabslen ti upatthambhanavasena 
забһат!% hiraññasuvanpâdiupabhogajâtarn bhogabalarıi пата, tah kāyabalato 
mahantatarah, amaccabalan ti abbejjamantassa sürassa subadassa!f ашасса- 


mandalassa ашһћієя 17, tath balah samgāmasūratāya purimebí balehi mahanta- 


{агай '#, abhiJaccabalan! ti (101 kuláni atikkamitvi khattiyakulavasena 


1 Ck -balabala, C? -balarnbala. 7 Bd dhā-. > Che акёшаза-‚ Rà akamapakë-" 


sayha, Вә akimassa разеуһат. * Cks add рі. > Ваз -ijain. * Bds enāya-. 
1 Ck sambhakassšë-, Cs sambakassš=, Ва sambhüta-, ° Nd raddhayí, Ова ru-, 
* Ве una. 10 Bd -hu-. 1! Ва andabāla. ?'? Ва [6-. 13 Сг -ра-. Bd -sl. 

„39 Chs sebbe, 18 Bd» -dayassa, !? Bds „дуа. 1° pd Cs шаһмиагай. !* 
Bd abhijja-. ` š 


10 


15 


30 


‚ ñutapariysttakarh)i, tam М pa 


122 XVIL Cattālisanipiu, 


Jātisampattl, tarh itarehl balobi mahantatatarn!, jâtlsampanuā eva hi учени 


па itare, yšnicetšuiri yšni са еіёпі” cettšrÍ рі balani papdito раййёши- 
bhavena 2 adbiganhâti * abhibhavati tarn sabbabalânarn paññabalatn ае!{һап ti са 
aggan ti ca vuccati, kihkāraņnā: (епа М balen’ upatthaddho pandito attharb 
vindati vaddhlin pāpuņātil, tadatthsjotanattharh ‘pugnar nadiü yena са реууа- 
таһй' чі Punnanadijštakar Sirikšlakannipañho* Pañcapanditapañho* Sattu- 
bbastajätaka - Sambh. ini kathetabbăni, mando ti 
шапіарайіо bälo, pbītan’ ti tāta mandapañüo puggalo sattaratanapupnarh ce 
pi* uttama 4Вһатапїї! Jabbi’ tasea апіссђари eva раваућакёгаі !0 vă 
pana katvā айбо ра ampanno taim patipajjati mando?! laddham pi'? yasar 
Takkhiturh kulasantakani và рапа paveniågatam рі r. adhigantur па sakkoti, 
tadatthajotanattharn “addbá Pådañjalīi sabbe раййайуа atirocatid" Pàādañjali- 
jšlakain!5 kathetabban, laddhānā "1 jâtisampattim nissāya kulasantakarh 
т. labbitvåpi, sabbana piti!t sakalena pi гајјепа (add: па) Jivati апирёув- 
husalatáya duggato va hetiti, evan М. ettaka {Låne apangíitassa agunan 
katbetvā idāni paña?!” pasarisanto paññā ti ādim aha, tattba sutan. 1i 
а'7 vinicchinati'®, kittisilokavaddba niel 
kittighosasaa ca jābhasakkāressa ça vaddhani, sukhàni vindatîti dukkbe 
uppanue рі nibbbayo hutvā upāyakusalatāya sukha patțilabhati, tadatthadipa- 
nattharn ‘yasa’ ete caturo @һашишй vânarinda yathâ taval?' ‘alam etehi jambūbi?? 
ambehi?! panasehi сё 22° "і ädini jātakäui katbetabbšnl, asussüsap ti 
penditapuggsle apayirupasauto asunanto, йһашта!!һап ti sabhavakárane 
{һиал, bahussutary” anāgamma tassa’? asaddahanto, avlinibbhujan?’ ti 
attbánattharn kāraņpākāraņan anogāhanto atirento na koci раййагі ** adhlgacchati 
са6024, dhamimavibhàagaññü3 ti dasakusalakammapathavibhagakusalo, kâ- 
luttfh5šyiti viriyaij» касог yuttakale уїтїуа&ва?® кагако, anulthashatitl tasmim 
1авшіт kàle tar tain kiccarh karoti, t 
samijjhati nippajjati, anāyatanasilassă ’ti anāyatananı vuccatl lábhayasa- ` 
sukhšánarn anākaro?? dussilyakammamh?! tarbsilassa tena dussilyakammena sa- 


"0029 tassa puggalassa kammaphalam 


Inannagatassa anàyatanabhütarn dussilapuggalaiù sevantaasa, kuaalassa kamunasss 
karanakále nibbipndiyakāriesā 'ti®? nibbinditvā ukkanthitva 66 karontases, 
етагйразза?®* puggalassa kammënath?t atiho вароё na vipaccati na sam- 
pajjati?®, tīni? kulaggāni cha kšmaggšni na upetÎti?™® attho, ajjhattañ сї 


1 Ва mahantaram. 2 Chs add ea. 2 Bà paññaánabhšá-, Ck? yassānu-. _* Ско 
Cha asathganbāti. 6 Cks-omit ca. * Bd -am. 7 СЕ» jivitan, © Ck» cetipi, 


-Bd'ce, ° 84е jabhati. '° Bd разеууйШагап. 1! Bd adda hi. !° Dd omilta pi. 


18 Bd adds vā. !* Вёз add tena. 1$ Cks parmña, 16 Ck -santakaih, Bde 
pariyatti. !? Bd pañūāva. !* Ва -сеМлдасі. '” Ске add yasset= tayo dhamma 
vënarlnda yathā tava. 20 Bd appebi. 31 Ck jambehl, Bd jappuhi. °? Ck vā. 
35 Ваг taio, 3! pd -bbhajan. 5 Ce -ā, 28 Cs паці or tàu. ?#' во Се Bd; 
asussusat ti-- - ññü wantiug in Ck. 75 Ва riya 3# Cke omit (аван. 80 
Bs апёсёто, Bd anacoro. 31 Сќг -an, 33 Cke -гівве, omitting ti. 22 Ck ukkatthi-, 
Ва ukkanitvš corr. to ukkandi-. 5! Bds add tata. 25 Вё-аш. %% Сё -u, Bd 
ошиа па sampajjati. 37 Ck tinî, Сг хіпі, Bd kinl. 38 Dd upaneyyatiti. 


1. Tesakunajataka. (521.) ` 123 


"і attano niyakejjhattarh aniccabhāvanādivasena payuttassa, tathayatana- 
revino ti tath’ eva вЏатапів puggala четашіпавва, vipaccatîti! sampajjati, 
mahantar yasab detl, yogappayogasarmkhatan ti yogayuñjltabbayuttake? 
Магтапе payogakotthāsabhūtah paññam", вашһзїавва* і rasikatassa anu- 
Takkhanań 5, tâni tvan ti etâni ca dve purimāni ca maya vuttakāranâni* 
gabhbānl tāta sevassu, шауа vuttarh ovšdarn hadaye ka(vš sttano gbare dhanamh 
Takha, ‘mâ’ akammāya randhayiti  ayuttena акёгапепа må randhayi, 
tah дһапа må jhāpayi mā павау!, klihkāraņā: akammanā’ 141 ayutta- 
Кашшаййгепепв 279 dummedho puggalo sabbari'! dhanarh nāsetvā pacchà dug- 
gato nalšgšrar va aîidatiti!? yathā nalagararn mülato pațtbāya jiramšnarh 
appatittharn patati evarh akāraņena dhbanamh nāsetvā apšyesu nibbattstiti. 


Evam pi Во. ettakena thánena райса 'balāni vannetvš 
paññábalarh ukkhipitvā candamaņdale ® paharanto'' viya ka- 
thetvá idāni dasahi gāthāhi rañño ovādarn deti: 
за. Dhaminañ cara mahärāja mātāpitusu khattiya, (IV р. ası.) 

idha dhamma caritvána гаја sagga gamissasi. 38, 
ao, Dhammañ сага mahārāja puttadáresu khattiya -pe-. 39. 
«о. Dhammaü cara mahāräja mittāmaccesu khattiya -ре-, 40. 
a, Dhamma cara maharaja vāhanesu balesu ca -ре-. 41. 
a. Dhammañ cara таћагаја gāmesu nigamesu са -ре-. 42, 
«s. Dhammañ cara mahárája гацһе'* janapadesu са -ре-. 43. 
«‹. Юһаттай сага mahārāja samanabráhmanesu ca -ре-. 44, 
«в. Dhammañ cara. maharàja. migapakkhisu khattiya -ре-. 45. 
<. Dhammañ сага mahārāja, dtiammo cinno'" виКһйуаһо!!, 

idha dhammam caritvāna гаја saggam gamissasi. 46. 
<. Dhammañ cara maháraja Indo!" деуі sabrahmakā 

sucinnena divarh раа, mā dhammain гаја pamado " ti. 47, 

Tattha pathamagšthšya tava ааа ti matupatthánarh pltupatthšnarh, 
dhamman kialsss' eva vutthšya matapitupuain wuklodakadantakatthadararn 


вда katvä sabbarn sarirapariharaparh © karonto са?! pürehiti тайа, putta- 
dšáreaü 


1 Cks vipajja-. “ Ck» yoga -- ko, Bd yoga - - tabhake, omitting yutta, Be уове-. 
3 Сы раб. * Вә asmbhü-. 5 Bd: -паб. © Cks -Каге-. 7 Hd adds nai. 
s Ва raddha-. ° B2 -unā. !9° СК. „Бага-. 1! Bds кака. !? Cks sidau. !? 
Bas Дага. !* Ваг sarnba-. 15 Bd rathesu. '* Bd висіппо. 17 Bd sukhamavaha. 
1% СЕ Ва indā, 1% read pāmado, с/г. ЈУ р. 422. 2° Ва sabba sarirapatijagga- 
һагапатп. °?! Ва va. 22 Ва nisevanto. 


ti puttadhitaro tāva pāpā nivāretvā kalyāņe піғевеніо 2 sippar. 


10 


15 


20 


25 


30 


10 


25 


30 


124 XVI Cattālisanipāta. 


ugganhäpento vayappattakala рацгӣракшатаѕеге ! švšhavivšharh karonto samai- 
чазепа 2 dhanain dento putíesu dhamma carati паша, bhariyah samānento* 
anaticaranto !ssariyarn  vossaljanto alabkārah snuppādento daresu dhamma 
carati пёша, mittšmaccesü 'ti mittāmacce catūb! sañgabavatthūhi sargen- 
hanto’ avisarhvädento* tesu” dhammamh carati пёта, vähanasa balesu 
сё 'ü hatthiassādinah văhanānarn balakāyassa® dštabbayuttskarn dento sakkā- 
гаф Кагопіо? hatthlassšdayo mahallakakāle kamme? ayojento tesu dhamumarm 
carati näima, gameasu nigamesu са 'ti gimanlgamavasino dandabalihi api- 
lento va tesu dhammam carat! пёша, та(!ће? Janapadeaq са 'ti га Њай 
са jsguspadañ са ahšranena kilamanto hitacittarn accupatthapento'2 tattbe adham- 
шаш carsti паша apilento рапа hitacittena plbaranto!3 tattha dhammarh caratl 


паша, samaņnabrāhmapesu са Чі tesu cattáro рассауе depto va tesu 
dhamiaarh carati пата, migapakkhilsü 'ti sabbacatuppadasakunānah ahhayarh 
dento tesu дһатртаг carati nëma. dbammo сїппо!* ti samacariyadhammo 
cinno nisammecsriyadhammo сїппо!5, sukhăvaho’® tl tisu kusslasampadisu!" 
chasu kâmasaggesu sukhar ârabati’®, sucinnenë “(í idha ·сіппепа kayasu- 
dinä өосіппепа, divam pattã tl devaloksbrshmalokhasarhkhštarmh бітага 
B tattha dibbayasepatjlābhino ја, mā dhammarh таја рашадо (і 
tasmā tvar maharšja jîvitain Jahanto pi dhamma тё рашв}}їн. 


Evar dasa dhammacariyagāthā'’ vatvā uttarim pi ova- 
danto osānagātham āha: 
эя. Tatth’ еу" ete” vattapadā esā ca аппвавапї 
зарраййе?! sevi”? kalyáni? samattarn sāãmatarn’® vidū ti. 48. 
Tattba tatthevete2 t vattapadā tl idah purimanayen' eva yojelabaa, 


варраййе seci kalyšáni!° вашабФа0?* sämatain?” vidū ti mabārēja 
tarh maya vuttsriñ ovâdamh (тат пїссай@ө варраппо?* puggalasevi kalyâneguna- 


sainannäāgato hutvà samatta paripunnarn sāmamh vidū attapaccakkbato va 
jānitrāă узћапаз (Бақ 2% patipajjā ’ti. 


Evar M. аКйзаратпратп otārento viya Buddhalilhāya dh. 
d. Mahājano mahāsakkārarn akāsi sādhukārasahasşānņi adāsi. 


1! Bd -kusala-. * во Сіз for samena? Bd’ лашауе. 3 Bd adds anavamānento. 


„4 Chs -ràyab. * Bd omite sah. 6 Bd omita аті-. ! Bd etesu. ° Dd adds са. 


* Bd omits s. k. 10 Bd -esu. '* Bd -езц. !? Che apaccupa-. !2 Ck ра-, Bd 
ramanto. '* Bd suce. !? Bd sucaritadhammo іп the place of sama - - - - сіппо. 
18 Çks sukhāvahati, Bd sukhamiāvahatī. 17 Bd adds са. 1° Ba -tju, !* pd 
-&уо. `10 Ba tartheva te, CÈ? tatthete. 31 во Ске for sappañña? Rd sabhaññu? 
32 so all three MSS. *5 Bd samam:tah corr. to вашай, Bs sinta. 2 Ck 
tatthete, Dd tatbeva te. 25 Bd adds И. ` ?# Fd sāmattab. 27 Pd siman tam, 
3% во Ске for варрайПа? Bd seppaññu-. 3° Bd -setharh. 


2. Sarabhañgajātaka. (522., ‚ 135 


puttena tarunajambuphalasamšánatundena' Jambukapanditena 
evam katbentena kena kattabbakiccarh Каќап“ ti. ,,Senaápatinë 
devā“ ti. „Tena hi ‘вва senšpatitthánarn даттібі“ Jambukarh 
thánantare thapesi, во tato pattháya' senāpatitthāne thatvá 
pitukammāni akāsi. Tinnam sakunánarh mahanto sakkāro 
abosi, tayo рі јапа° atthañ са dhammañ са апиваѕітви. 
Mahášsattass' оуййе thatvá гаја dánádini puññani katvā sagga- 
parāyano abosi. Amaccā rañño sarirakiccarh kāretvā' заКипй- 
pam ārocetvā „sāmi Jambusakuna гаја tumhākahm chattar 
ussāpetabbath аказіі“ vadiñsu. М. „na штауһаш таў]еп' 
attho, tumhe appamattā r. kārethā" `1 mahájanarh silesu 
patitthäpetvā ,evarh vinicchayarh pavatteyyāthā‘““ "і viniccha- 
yadhammarh suvaņņapatte likhāpetvā araññarh рйу1зї.` Таза’ 
ovádo cattšlisa vassasahassāui pavatti*, 

S. таййо oväādavasena imam dh. desetvā j. s.: „Tadā гаја 


Anando ahosi, Kundalini Uppalavannā, Vessantaro Sáriputto, Jambu- 
kasakuno aham evä“ 'ti. Tesakunajatakam. 


2. Sarabhañgajataka. 


Alamkatā kundaliño suvatthā ti, . Idah S. Veluvane 
+. Mahamoggallanattherassa рагіпібуёпоф ā..k. Sariputtathero °“ 


T-tam ' J. viharanta” parinibbāuarn anujānāpetvā gantvā Nālagāmake ` 


jātovarake’ parinibbāyi. Tassa parinibbutabhāvan sutvà S. Rāja- 
gabam gantvyā Veluvane vihās. Tadā thero Isigilipasse Kalasilayam 
viharati, so рапа iddhibalena” kotippattabhávena devacâārikañ ca 
овввдасёгікап са gacchati, devaloke Вийдһазёғвкёваш mahanta 
issariyah ussadanirayesu са tilthiyasăvakānam mahantah dukkha 
anuhhavantam disvā manussalokam āgantvā ,asukaupësako asuka- 
upāsikā са'° asukaamih nama devaloke nibbsttitvā mahāsampattih 


anuhbhavanti?’' tittbiyasāyakesu asuko са asukā ca’ nirayādisu 


1 Ck -pala - - tuccena, Се -pala - - tudhena. * nd adds tutho. 3 Bd adds rañño. 
4 Bd katvā. 5 Bd -uayi. ê Ва adds hi. 7” Bd -tene. ° Се -vāraka, ° Сіз 
=le. 19 Bd asukā уа upasikā. 11 Çhə-vati, 12 Ck -ko ca, Сг omite asukā ca. 


10 


15 


90 


95 


30 


126 XVIL Cartalisanipšta. 


esukaapāyesu' пёта nibbattā™%" ti manussñnarh katheti' Manyssā 
sāsane Ppasidanti titthiye parivajjenti‘. Виддһазатакапаш sakkāro 
mahanto ahosi, titthiyanam parihāyati, Те there āghātam bandhitvā 
„imasmim jīvante amhákam upatthëküë bbijjanti, sakkāro parihëyati, 
måārāpessāma nan“ ti therassa māraņattham samanaguttakassa' пата 
согввза sahassam adamsu. So ,theram тйгезьйтїї`' mabantena pari- 
vārena Ка|аз$йаш agamāsi., Thero tam âgaccbantam disvā iddhiyā 
uppatitvā pakkami. Coro tam divasam (Беат adisvā nivattitvā 
punedivase pi punadivase рі ti cha divase agamāsi. Thero рі tath’ 
eva iddhiyā pakkāmi. Sattame divase therassa pubbe katam врвтй- 
pariyavedaniyakammam okāsam labbi“, so kira pubbe Ыһагїуйув va- 
сараш gahetvā mātapitaro māretukāãmo уйпаКепа агаппаш netvā 
corānam utthitākāram katvë matapitaro potheti paharati, te cakkhu- 
dubbalatāya rüpadassanarahita' puttah esañjānantā „corā ета" ‘і 
sanñaya ,tüta.msuká' nāma сога no mārenti, {уап раККкаша!°'* ‘ti 
etagss' eva paridevirhsu, so cintesi: „ime mayá та" pothiyamānā ' 
mayham бета atthäya paridevanti, ayuttarn karomîti'®", atha ne аззй- 
setvā corünam palátškšram katvā hatthapšáde sambahitva't „amma 
tàta, та bhāyittha, сога раа" ti vatvā puna attano geham ета 
ünesi. Таш kammam ettakam kālam okāsam alabbitvā bhasmā- 
paticchanno аёрїгйзї!? viya {һауа '* imam antimasarirar upadhavitvë& 
ganhi, thero (азва nissandena &аказе uppatitum nàsakkhi, Nando- 
рапапів-Ратепа-Ұејаувпќавва'!' kampannsamattha " рі `ssa iddhi kamma- 
halena dubbalattam рана”. — Coro therassa atthipi вайсиппебуй 
palălepițthikakāraqam *% nāma katvë „mato“ ti saññüya зарагітёго '' 
раккёті. Thero pi? satin Iabhitv&” jhānavethanena ** sariram 
теіћеіт&'° uppatitvā Satthu santikam gantvā vanditvë „bháote āyu- 
вашЕһаго me ossattho, parinibbāyisəāmîti" parinibbānam eanujânãpetvă 
tatth' eva parinibbāyi. Tamh Еһапаш ñeva chadevaloka ekakolâhalarn 
аһевші ?*, „amhåkar kiråcariyo’ parinibhuto“ ti dibbagandhamālā- 


vāsadhūpe’” с' eva’ nāņādārūni™ с' eva gabetvā agamimsu, eküna- 


1 Bà -niraye. 2 Bd nippatto. 3 Bd -si, * Bd -valjantl. ° во Сіз; Bd -rattasse. 
6 pd -aul. 7 Chs „зува. * Вёз’ ела. "Cts -ka. 10 Cks „тї, Bd раккашё corr. to 
pakkamá. !! Chs ca, Bd omits va. !? Bd adda са. '° Rd a. mo katan ti. 14 
Bd -atvá. 15 Bd айдагаві, !* Pd adds sineruršjarh vijbitvā pathavi nimmujjitvš. 
17 Cs Ва га. '9 Ck -tibam. 9 Ck рана, C? рабат. #9 Bd -pitakaranarn. 
21 Ва adds уаварагітёго. ?? Bd omits pi. ?° Bd раШа-. 24 Bd -vadhanene. 
35 Bd vedhitvë. t зо all three MSS. 37 Bd kira š-. 2° Bd дапдһа-- dhumehi, 
omitting dibba. 2? ' Hd adds тапиѕеё. "° Ck -dāru, Bd -diruni. 


2. Sarabhañgajataka (522.) 127 


sataratanacandanacitakā аһоѕі, S. therassa santike thatvā sarira- 
nikkbeparn Кйгезї. ālāhanasse samantā yojanamatte риррһатазваш 
` vassi, devānam antare manussā manussānam antare бета atthamsu', 
sattadivasāni sadhukiar kiNisu. S. tberassa dhatum раһареіта 
Veluranadvārakotthake cetiyam Кагареѕі, “ada dh. k. з. ‚‚атизо 
Sariputtathero T-assa santike aparinibbutattā Buddhšënam santikā 
mahnantam sammanam па labhi, Mahāmoggallānatthero рапа? samipe 
parinibbutatta mabāsammānam labhiti*, S. ëgantvë „kāya nu `ttha 
bhikkhave e, k. s. ti puechitvë „imāya nāmā" `Ч vutte „па bhik- 
khave Moggallāno idān’ eva mama santikā sammanam labbi? pubbe 
pi labhi yevā" "і vatvā a. й.: 

А. B. Вг. г. k. Bo. purohitassa огаһтапіуё kucchimhi pati- 
sandhirù gahetvá dasamāsaccayena paccūsasamaye mātua kuc- 
chimhā nikkhami. Tasmih Кһапе dvādasayojanike Bārāņasi- 
nagare sabbāvudhäni- pajjalisu. Purohito puttassa jatakkhane 
bab nikkhamitvā ākāsarù olokento nakkhatteyogarn disvā" 
»iminā nakkhattena jātattā esa Котёго sakala- Jambudīpe dha- 
noggahânarh арро bhavissatiti“ ñatvā kálass' eva rüjakulam 
gantvā гајёпат sukhasayitabhāvarn pucchitvā „kuto me ācariya 
sukhar °, ajja sakalanivesane ávudháni pajjalitaniti* vutte „mā 
bhāyi deva, na tumhākarn nivesane yeva sakalanagare pi’ 
pajjalihsu yeva, ajja’ amhëákam gehe kumārassa játattë etad 
ahositi“. ,,Асагіуа evara játakumárassa рапа kih bhavissa- 
úti“. „Na kiñci maháraja'°, so pana sakala-Jambudipe agga- 
dhanuggaho bhavissatiti“. „Sādhu ācariya, tena hi пап” 
patijaggitva vayappattakāle . amhākarh dasseyyāsîti““ vatvā 
khiramūlarn'* sahassarnh dāpesi. Purohito tam gahetvā nive- 
sanam gantvā puttassa пйїпараһапайїуазе játakkhane ёуціћёпі'? 
pajjalitattā Jotipālo ti патат akāsi. So'' mahantena pari- 
уйгепа, vaddhamāno soļasavassaķāle uttamarūpadharo аһові. 
Ath’ авва pitā sarīrasampattih olokento' „tāta Takkasilarh 


1 Bd» ahesurh. . 3 Ва -assa. * Bd omits рапа, * Pd labhauti. > Ed labhati. 
* Bd oloketvā. 7 Bd omits su-. * Bd omits рі. ! Bd omits а-. !0 Ва -jāti. 
n Ва каа. '> Bd айде tāra 33 so all three MSS. for -nah?, '* Bd adde 
рала, '* Rd -etvå, 


10 


15 


90 


95 


128 XVII. Сабёйвацірата. 


gantvā disapámokkhassa ісагіуаѕѕа santike sippar ugganhā'“ 
‘ti аһа. So „sädhū“ "і äcariyabhāägarn gahetvā mātāpitaro 
vanditvā tattha gantvā sahassarm datvë sippam pațtbāpetvā’ 
вайаһеп` eva nipphattih pëáponi. Ath' assa ёсагіуо tussitvā 
attano santakam Кһардагаїапай sandhiyuttamepdakasiñga- 
dhanum? sandhiyuttatunhirarh* attano sannáhakañcukarn' 
unhisañ са datvå „tāta Jotipāla, aharn mahallako, idāoi tvar 
ime mánavake sikkhāpehîti* pañcasate māņavake, pi tass’ eva 
niyyadesi. Bo. sabbar gahetvā acariyain vanditvā Bārāņasim 
eva âgantvā mātāpitaro passi. Atha nam vanditvá thitaih риё 
ауоса: „uggahītaih te tāta sippan“ чі. „Ата tātā“ 'ti, So 
tassen vacanar sutvā`rājakularn gantvā „putto me deva ѕірраф 
sikkhitvā“ āgato, Кї karotiti™ аһа, „Ācariya ашһ&Ка* 
upatthahatū“ "і,  ,„Paribbayam assa janatha' deva“ 'ti. 
„Devasikain '° ваһаѕѕаш labhatū“ ‘ti. So „sādhū“ ‘ti sampa- 
ticchitvá geha gantvā kumaram pakkosāpetvā ,,tëta rājānam 
upatthaha“ "і аһа. So tato patthāya devasikarh sahassarh 
labhitvā rājānarn орабћаһі'". Rājapādamūlikā ujjháyimsu"; 
„mayath Jotipālena katakammarh па passáma, devasikarh sa- 
hassan рапһаі'*, mayam assa sippa passitukāmā’*“ "i. 
Баја tesarn vacanarh sutvá purohitassa kathesi. Purohito 
n„sādhu devā“ "і puttassárocesi. So „sādhu táta, ito sattame 
divase dassessámi, гаја attano vijite dhanuggahe ааппїрйїйреїї“& 
"1 аһа, Ригоһио gantvā tam attham rañño агосеві. Raja 
параге bheriñ carāpetvā dhanuggahe sannipātāpesi '°. Satthi- 


`sahassá dbanuggahā sannipatihsu. Ваја tesam sannipātita- 


bhāvarh ñatvá va" „парагауйзїпо Jotipšlassa sipparh passantū“ 
и" bheriñ сагаре!уй гајайрапаћ ѕајјаресха mahājavaparivuto 


L Ва вапћам. è Сә -ар-, B3 upatha-. `з Bd seandhimendlka-. 4 Ck -tumbi- 
тат, Ad -yuierh tundilarn or tuphilam. 5 СЕ -hamukharp, Bd -hakaccukarh, 
* Ва sikkbapetvá. 7 Ва дап. 5 Bds amhe. # so Bd; Ck jānapa, С? jana, 
10 pd so де-. !! Bd -аһай. © CE upsjjha-, Bd ujjhiyisu. P Ba „5. 14 Bd 
-mamhá, 15 Rd -pštesi, !$ Bd omita va. 1: Bds add nagara. 


2. Sarabhañgajātaka. (522.) 139 


pallarhkavare nisīditvā dhanuggahe Pakkositvá' ,,Јобра1о 
&рассһа!й“& °'ti pesesi. So асагіуепа dinnāni dhanutunhira- 
sannāhakañcukauņhīsäni?’ nivāsanantare thapetvš khaggam gāhā- 
petvā pakativesen’ eva’ rañño santikah рапбуй* ekamantarh 
atthāsi. Рһапирааһа „Jotipālo kira dhanusippah dasseturn 
āgato, dhanu agahetvā° pana āgatattā amhákam hatthato 
dhanu gahetukámo bhavissati, оёвѕа* dassãmā“ ‘і katikam 
karimsu, Raja Jotipalarn āmantetvā „вїрратї dassehiti“ аһа. 
So sšánim parikkhipāpetvā antosaniyarmh thito sñtakarn apanetvá 
ваппаһатї ваппауһа kañcukarh pavisitvá' unhīsarh slge_pati- 
muñcitvā mendakasiñgadhanumbhi pavālavaņņarh jivarn āropetvā 
tunhiram ° pitthe bandhitvā Кһаррат väāmato katvā vajiraggarh 
närācah nakhapitthe parivattento' sápim vivaritvā pathavirh 
bhinditvā alarhkatanāgakumāro viya nikkhamitvá'" габйо apa- 
сїйїї ,dagsetvë atthási. Tarn disvā mahājano vaggati nadati 
appoțheti". Баја ,„dassehi Jotipāla sippan“ ti аһа. „Deva 
tumhákam dhanuggahesu akkhaņavedhivālavedhisaddavedhisara- 
vedhino, caturo dhanuggahe pakkosaápehiti“ Ваја pakkosā- 
pesi. М. гајайрапе caturassaparicchedabbhantare maņndaparh ” 
katvā catūsu Каппеви cattāro dhanuggahe thapetváë ekekassa 
Ива tinsa kaņdasabassãni dāpetvā ekekassa santike kanda- 
ЧауаКе thapetvā sayar vajiraggarh пйгйсаг! gahetvá mandala- 
majjhe thatvá „mahārāja, іше cattāro dhanuggahā еКарраһагепа'* 
ваге khipitvā тат vijjhantu™, etehi khittakandāni vāressā- 
шї“ аһа. Raja „evar Каго(һа“ ‘і âņāpesi. ,„Mahārāja, mayam 
skkhanavedhivalavedhisaddavedhisaravedhino, Jotipālo taruna- 
dārako, па mayarn vijjhissāmā“ 'ti. М, „sace sakkotha vijjhatha 
шай“ ti аһа. Те „sādbūō“ "{1'° екарраһагепа'* kandani khi- 


pimsu. M.™ tāni оёгасепа paharitvā paharitvápa ” yathë vā . 


» Ва -añpetv81. ? Bd -tunhisarasannāhakaccukaunhissâdini. !Bd -na. “Dd ag-. 
6 Csag-. 5 Bd -titl na. ? Bè kaccukari pavesetvá. ® Bd tuņhisarain. ” Dd 
parivatte galitvā. 10 Bdz add šgarntvë. 1! Bd vagganti nadanti appotenti. ™ 
Bd тапдаїаш. !? Bd -пета. !* Bds add shain, !? Bd adda sampaticchitvā. 
38 Ва bodbisatto. 17 so Сї»; Bd omits paharitvā pa. 

hun Ç. 9 


130 ХУП, Cattālisanipita. 


tathë vā pātesi, Bodhisatto kotthakarh' parikkhipanto viya tālena ' 
tāla’ dandakena dandakarh vájena vājah anatikkamanto‘* 
khipitvā* saragabbharh akási, йһапирраһапаш Капйапї khīņāni, 
so tesah khinabhávarn ñatvāà saragabbharn avināsento va‘ 
uppatitvā’ rañño ввойке atthāsi, Mahājano unnadanto vag- 
ganto’ appothento' mahākolāhalah katvā vatthābharaņāni 
khipi®, evam rāsibhūtarh atthárasakotisarhkharh dhanam ahosi. 
Atha пат rájá pucchi: „kin sippar nām’ etan Jotipālā“ ‘ti. 
„Sarapațibāhanah паша дета“ ’ti. ,,Апбе р' etam jánanti'' 
atthiti“. ,,Sakala-Jambudipe таш thapetvā п’ atthi devā“ 
*ti. „Aparar dassehi tātā“ `{1'', „Deva™, ete tâva catvsu 
kapnesu thatvā cattāro pi janā mam vijjhitam nëásakkhimsu, 
aham pana te catūsu'™* kannesu thite'™ eken' eva sarena 
vijjhissāmîti“. Dhanuggahā tháturn ра ussahirnsu ™*, М. catūsu 
kannesu catasso kadaliyo thapetvš'!' náršcapurhkhake'' ratta- 
suttakarn' bandhitvā ekam kadalir sandhbāya” khipi, nārāco 
tam™ vijjbi? tato dutiyańh tato tatiyarh tato catuttham, tato 
pathamam™ viddham** eva vijjhitvā puna hatthe yeva patit- 
thahi”, kadaliyo sottaparikkbittā*™ attharnsu. Маһа}апо 
nādasahassāni™ pavattesi. Баја ,kim sippam nām’ etar ™ 
tātā“ 'ti. „Cakkaviddhath nāma devā“ 'ti. „Aparam pi dasse- 
Ы", M. saralatthih пате sararajjam nama saravenim *° 
оёта dassesi, sarapāsādah пйта ѕагашаојараш '! saraso- 
pānar оёта sarapokkharanirh nâma akási, вагарайшпаш пата 
pupphāpesi, вагауазвап пата vassāpesi. Iti añúehi asādhā- 


1 Све bodbl kotthakarn. 7 Ck» іа-, 5 Bd adds všlena та. * Bd ай-. 
5 Rd repeats khi-. * Bd omits va. ? Bd adds дайа. 6 Cha omit va-. "Bs 
-tento selento acchararn paharanto. 1° Rd khipisu. !! Bd айпо ova Jánanto. 
12 Ва adds vadatl. 12 Ва во. !* СЕ pana te catusu, Се рапа te casu. !5 Bd 
panetesu catüsu kannesu thitesu. '* Bd -banti. !? Се thapāpetvā. !# pd 
Daršcapokhe. !* Cke rattasuttaka. 3° Bd kadalikhandharh, "i Bd adde kadali. 
аз Cks vijjbitvà. 29 Ck Bd patha-. ?* Па vijhem. 35 Bd patithati. 16 Ва suttarh 
parlkkhipitva. 3! Bd ипрёйа-, ?° Bd пзше(ап› slpparn. 3? Bd dassebl tātā ti. 
20 ao Ске; Bd sarapavedhani. 5! Bd adds sarapikirar nima, 


2. Sarebhañgajataka. (522.) 131 


ranani ішёпі dvādasa зіррёрі dassetvā рипа aññehi asādhā- , 


гапе yeva satta mahákáye padalesi, atthañgulabahalarh udam- 
barapadararh vijjbi, caturañgnlabahalarm asanapadarah duvañ- 
gulabahalarh tambapattarn' ekañgulabahalarh ayapattarn' еКй- 
baddbarh phalakasatarh vinivijjhitva  palálasakataválukasakata- 
райагаваКа{йпай purimabháge вагап khipitvā pacchima- 
bhágena nikkhámesi', рассћађћёре* khipitvā purimabhágena ° 
nikkhámesi', одаке catuusabharn thale atthausahham thānarh* 
kandar’ ревеві, vtiñganasaññáaya usabhamatthake valarm 
vijjhi. Tassa ettakáni sippāni dassentass' eva suriyo attham- 
gato" Ath’ assa гёја senüšpatittháanam patijánitvë ,,Jotipála, 
ajja vikálo, sve senápatisakkararm” ° ganhissasi, masgur '° kâre- 
tv& nahātvā ehiti“ {ата йіуаѕаф paribbayattháya satasahassarh 
adāsi. M. ,iminë те! attho n`atthiti“ atthárasakotidhanarn '* 
ватпікапаф бета datvá mahantena parivārena nabāyitarh 
gantvā шаввшйћ '° kāretvā nahātvā sabbālamkārapatimandito 
anopamāya siriyā nivesanarh pavisitvā nānaggarasabhojanarh 
bhbuñjitvā sirisayanam abhiruyha nipanno, dve уйше sayitvā 
pacchimayáme pabuddho'° pallamkam абһой)іүуё'* sayana- 
pitthe півіппо, attano sippassa adimajjhapariyosánarn olokento 
‚шата sippar '° šdito' param шагапаћ " paññayati, majjhe 
КПеварагіЊћоро рагіуовёпе nirayamhi. райѕапдћі '°, påāņātipāto 
hi'' kilesaparibhogesu са adhimattappamādo™ piraye раёі- 
sandhim деб, raññë mayharh senāpatittbānam dionari, mahan- 
tan me issariyam bhavissati, bhariyā ca pvttadhītaro са bahü 
bhavissanti, kilesavatthuh kho pana vepullagatarm daccajarh 
hoti, idán' eva nikkhamitvá ekako уа" агаббат pavisitvā isi- 


1 Bd -pattanarn. %# Bd -vijjhi. ê Bd nikkbamāpesi. * Cks -депа, Bd adds 
sarab. © Bd -ge. * Che -bbattbānam. 7 Са апат, Bd omits ka-. ° Bd 
añgamito. " Bd -tithánarnsakhárarn. !° Ва kesamassurh. !1 Bd mayhan. !* 
Bd -kotləsnkhyadhanarh. 12 Bd adds uthëys. !* Сә šbbuj-, !5 Chs „пава. !* 
Ва adds va. Y Сг ратафша-, Bd рагаша-. !° Ске -dhim, Bå adds parari- 
рїтёпаш, Ве рагатарага. !* Hd omits Ьі. ?° Chr -dā, Bd adhimpattippamādo. 
91 Сиз okena. 
9* 


p 


m 


10 


95 


132 XVII Catutšlisanipëšta. 


pabbajjah pablajitum yuttah mayhan“ ti M. sayanato' ut- 
{Һауа Кайсї* ajānāpetvā pāsādā oruyha aggadvárena nikkha- 
mitvā ekako va агаййатї pavisitvá Godhávaritire* tiyojanikarh 
Kavitthavanarn * sandhāya рауаві°. Tassa nikkhantabhāvarh 
ñatvā Sakko Vissakammam‘* pakkosāpetvā ,„tāta, Jotipălo 
abhinikkhamanarh nikkhanto”, mahāsamāgamo bhavissati, Go- 
dbāvarītīre Kavitthavane° assamaro māpetvā pabbajitaparik- 
kbāre patiyadehiti“ аһа. So tathā akāsi, M. tar thánam 
patvā ekapadikamaggarh disvā „pabbajitānarh уаѕараһёпепа 
bhavitabban“ ti tena maggena tattha gantvā kañci apassanto 
pannasaálarhn pavisitvā pabbajitaparikkhāre disvā „Sakko deva- 
гаја тата nikkhamanabhāvarh’ aññāsi, maññe'°“ ti cintetvā 
ваќакат apanetvā rattavākacīrarn nivásetvá са pārupitvā'' ca 
ajinacammarh еКатпвара{ат!'' akāsi, jatāmaņndalah bandhitvā 
khārikājah amse katvā kattaradaņdaıh gahetvā раппава1а{о 
nikkhamitvā camkamarn āruyha katipayavāre® арагарагатӣ 
carnkami! Pabbajjāsiriyā vanah upasobhayamāno so kasina- 
parikammarh katvā pabbajjato'" вайаше divase аһа samā- 
pattiyo pañca abhiññá са'* nibbattetvā uñchacariyaya vana- 
va vihási, Mataëpitumittasuhajjañati- 


1я 


mülaphaláháro!' еко 
vaggo™ рі ‘вѕа tar: аравѕапіо rodanto carati” Ath’ еко 
vanacarako' Kavitthaka-assamapade” М-аф diavā sañjánitva 
tassa mātāpitunnņarh агосезі, te гаййо árocayirhsu, Raja „etha, 
nam passissãāmā“ `'ti iuátápitaro tassa” gahetvā mahajana- 
parivāro vanacarakadesitena maggena *! Godhavaritirain pāpuņi. 
Bo, пайїїїгаїп ёрапќуй акаѕе nisinno dh. desetvá te sabbe 


1 d mahäsattho sayanato, Ске mahāsayanapitthah. f Bd kiñcl. 2? Bd -rinadi- 
tire. * Ck hapittba-, Bd kapithanavanarhp. 5 Bd väsivapāvlsi, Bš pāvāsi. * pd 
vlsu-. 7 Ске nikkhamanto. ° Bd kapitha-, cfr. vol. Ш p. 463. * Bd nikkhanta-. 
10 Bd omits maüñe. '! Bd parump-. 1? Bd ekarnsarn, !? Bd -paye-. !“ Bde 
-itvā. !* Bd раррај! tato. 1% Bd -ауо, omitting ca. 1! Rd omita vana, !6 
Bd ekako. 1# Rd -јја - - узра. 20 Bd -tā rodanta paridevantā vivaranti, 2! 
Ва adds araññarn pavisitvā. 23 Bd kapithaka -- de nisjnnarp. 3" Dd omits (а-. 
3 pd vanacarikona maggadesakena. 


7. Sarsbhañgajštaka. (522). 133 


assamarh pavesesi', tatrápi teseh ākāse nisinno уа kāmesu 
ädïīnavarh ракӣвеіуё dh. d. Rajánam айі Ка{уй sabbe va 
рерЬајіфви. Во. isiganaparivuto tatth' eva vasi. Ath' assa 
tattha vasanabhāvo sakala-Jambudipe pákato аһоѕі. Бајапо" 
rațthavāsīhi saddhirhn ёрапіуа tassa santike pabbajanti", sam- 
āgamo mahâ ahosi, anupubbena апеКазаһазва* parisa. Yo 
КашауйаККаш уй? vyāpādavitakkah vā vihimsaávitakkam vā’ 
vitakketi M. gantvā tassa purato ākāse nisīditvā dh. deseti°, 
kasiņnaparikammarh ácikkhati. Tass’ ovāde thatva samāpattiro’ 
uppādetvā mipphattiñ раќа Sālissaro Mendissaro Pabbato 
Kaladevalo Kisavaccho Anusisso Nārado ti satta jettbante- 
уйвіпо аһевит. Aparabhage Kavitthassamo° paripüri, isiganassa 
vasanokāso п' gtthi°. Atha M. Salissararn āmantetvā ,,Salissara, 
ayar assamo isiganassa na-ppahoti, (уат imam isiganarh ' 
gahetvápa' Candapajjotarañño'!'” уйе Lambacūlakam™” ni- 
ашат! upanissāya уазй!*'* "і аһа. So ,sšdhü“ 'ti tassa 
vacanarh sampațicchitvā apekasahassarm isigapam gahetvā !* 
tattha gantvā vásam kappesi. Manussesu āgantvā pabba- 
jantesu puna assamo pūri™., Bo. Mendissaram āmantetvā " 
„imar isiganarh ādāya Suratthajanapadassa'" sīmantare Sato- 


20, 


dikā'’ пата пайї atthi, (азва tire уава?°* 'ti uyyojesi”™'. Eten’ 


eva прйуепа tatiyavāre Pabbatah ‚‚таһаа{ауїуагп?? 


Añjana- 
pabbato пата atthi, ќат прапїзвауа vasā™“ `1 pesesi. Ca- 
tutthavāre Kāladevalah ,,Dakkhinapathe Avantiratthe Ghana- 
selapabbato nāma atthi, taħ upanissāya vasāå™“ `ti pesesi. 
Puna Kavitthassamo püri”, `райсави thānesu апеКаваһазво ** 


isigano ahosi. Kisavaccho pana M-ar apucchitvá Dandaki- 


1 Cha -setvā. ? Bd añüepl rā-. " Bd -jihsu. * Bd anakasatasshassa. 5 Bd 
omits vā. * Bd -si. 7 Ва -íyo. ° Dd kapithakassa ārāmo. ° Bd nappahoti. 
10 Ва omits isl. jt Bd -tvā. 1? Bd tattha garhtvā MejbakaraĀño. 1% Bê ka- 
lamba-. !* Bd уавівваћі. !5 Ce -evāna, 1% Bd paripūri. !! Bd adds mendis- 
вага (чат. 18 Bd suratta-- !* Cks ве-, Bd sātodakā., 20 Ba чава. ?! Bd 
adds puna kapijhaassamo paripuri. > Bd pappstamëába atta-, Вг psbbstarh 
miha аќа-. “°° Rå kspitha ka ārāmo paripüri. 2* Rd -а. 


10 


134 XVII Сайїпдашра. 


rañño хіјќе Kumbhavatinagare senāpatirù орапіввёуа пууйпе 
vihâsi, Nārado Majjhimadese' Arañjaragirináiake* pabbata- 
jšlantare vihāsi, Anusisso pana M-assa santike va' ahosi. Tas- 
mim Ее Dandakirājā ekar laddhasakkáram ganikam (Һапа 
cšvesi, så attano dhammatáya vicaranti uyyánam gantvā Kisa- 
vacchatápasarn disvā ,ayarh kālakaņnņī bhavissati, ітавѕа 
sarire‘ kalih pavāhetvā pahātvā gamissámiti** dantakattham° ° 
khāditvā sabbapațhamarnh tassa bahalakhelarn nitthubhanti 
Kisavacchatāpasassa jatantare nitthubbitvā dantakattharn' рі 
"вва зїзе yeva khipitvā sayah sisah’ nahbāyitvā gatā’, rājâpi 
tam вагістё" päkatikam eva akāsi, sã mohamūlhā hutvå ,kāla- 
kannisarire kalir pavāhbetvā mayá yaso laddho' ti saññam 
akāsi. Tato nacirass' eva гаја purohitam thánato сёмеві, во 
(авва santikarn gantvā „(уап kena kaáranena puna thánarh 
Jabhiti!°“ риссһі. Ath’ assa sā ,„rājuyyāne kaálakanpisarire 
kalissa pavāhitattā“ ti агосеѕі. Purohito gantvā tath’ eva 
tassa sarire kalin pavāhesi, tam pi гаја puna (апе thapesi. 
Ath’ assa aparabhāge paccanto kuppi'', so senañgaparivuto 
yuddhäya nikkhami. Atha nar mohamülho purohito „mahā- 
rāja tumhe јауаф icchatha рагајауап“ ti pucchitvā jayan‘, 
ti vatte „tena hi rājuyyāne Кајакапої vasati, tassa sarīre 
Каі '? pavābetvā yāhíti“. So tassa katharn'° gahetvä ,,mayá 
ваййһїп gacchantā uyyāne kalakannisarire kalih pavăhentū“ 
'ti vatvā'‘ оууёрат pavisitvā dantakațțbah" kbāditvā sabba- 
pathamarh sayam eva tassa jatantare khelañ са dantakatthañ 
са khipitvā sisam naháyi, balakāyo рі `ssa tathë akāsi. Tasınirh 
pakkante senšpati'° gantvā tšpasarn disvā dantakațthāoi ni- 
haritvā sādhukarh n»ahāpetvā'* „таййо kim” bhavissatiti“ 
pucchi'®. ,,Аушѕо mayham manopadoso n° atthi, devatā pana 


1 Bd paccbima-. ? Bd añcanagiri-. 3 Ch ca, Bd yeva. * Bd imaseupari. 
Bd dandakotharn. 6 Rds taasupari. 7 Bd omits si-. ° Bd gami, * Bd adde 
рапа. 19 Bå labhasiti. 1! Bd kupito. 12 Cha -Шш. > Bd adds sutvā. !* 
Ске _hetü ti gantvā. 15 Ске -tim. 1 Dd nbāyitvā bhante. !7 Dd ki rañño. 
16 Сы puccehltva, 


2. Serabbañgajitaka. 1522.) 135 


Кора, ito sattame divase sakalarattharn arattharp bhavissati, 
tvarù sigharn paláyitvā aññattha yāhîti™. Бо bhitatasito 
gantvā rañño ñrocesi. Баја (авва vacanarh aganhi' бо 
nivattitvá attano реһаш gantvë puttadáram адёуа palâyitvā 
айпай rattham аратӣзі,  Sarabhañgasattb& tam Кйгапаш 
ñatvā dve taroņatāpase pesetvā Kisavacchar mañcasivikāya 
ākāsena йпйревї*. Баја yojjhitvā core gahetvā nagaram eva 
paccágami. “asmirh agate devatá pathamarh devar vassa- 
резші, vassoghena sabbakupapesu avahatesu* suddhavëáluka- 
matthake dibbapupphavassarn vassi, pupphamatthake mâsaka- 
vassarh, masakamatthake kahapanavassam, kabápanamatthake 
dibbábharanavassarh vassi. Мапиѕва somanassappattā hirañña- 
suvannábharanáni рапһїїшї ārabhirbsu. Atha pesar sarire 
pajjalitarn' nānappakārarh ávudhavassar vassi, manusså 
khandaákhandikarn chijjinsu'. Atha nesam upari mahantá 
vitaccikañgārā patirhsu, nesar upari mahantáni pajjalita- 
pabbatakütšni, tesa upari satthihatthattháuarn рйгауап!аш 
sukhumaválukavassam vassi. Evar satthiyojanatthânarn ага{- 
thai ahosi, tassa' evam vinattbabháavo' sakala-Jambudipe 
paññayi". Ath’ assa ratthassa antararatthádhipatino Kaliñgo"' 
Atthako Bhimaratho'" tayo rājāno cintayirhsu: „pubbe Вёгапа- 
siyarh Kalābu™ Казігаја Khantivāditāpase aparajjhitvā pathavimn 
pavittho ti sūyati, tathā М№а]іКктго '* tāpase sunakhehi khādā- 
petvā sahassabāhu Ajjuno ca Айрїгаве aparajjhitvā idāni 
Dandakiršjá Kisavacche aparajjhitvā saha ratthena vinësarmn 
райо ti süyati, imesarp'° са{иппаш rüjünam nibbattatthánam 
mayah па jänäma, tar no thapetvá Sarabhañgasatthárarn 
añño katheturm_ samattho™ n’ atthi, tam upasamkamitvā ” 


1 Ва addsiha. > во Ск; Bd naganhi. ? Bd anebitiapapesl. * Bd apabarantesu 
suddbavšlukari vassarh vassapesur. * Bd sampajjslikamn. * Bd-nar. ' Bd 
bbiljiirihsu. ° Bd omits tassa. ° Bd omits па, t° Bd -yati. '! Bd kas. 1 
Bd bbimparatho. '% Bd -pu. '* Bd nålikerarājā. ?* Dd adds рапа. !* Bd 
adds năma. !? Bj adds ime pañhe. 


136 XVII Cattalisanipšta. 


pucchissámá“ 'ti tayo рі mahantena parivārena pañharh 
puccehanattháya піккһатіћво. Те! рапа” „asuko рі nikkhanto“ 
ti’, „asako pi nikkhanto“ ti па jānaoti‘, екеко „aham eva 
gacchamiti“ maññati, tesa Godhāvarīto avidüre samāgamo 
ahosi, te rathehi otaritvā tayo pi ekam eva rathan abhiruyha 
Godhávaritirarh sampápunimsu. Tasmim khane Sakko Pandu- 
kambalasilásane nisinuo satta райһе cintetvā „ime райһе 
thapetvá Sarabhañgasatthāram аййо sadevake loke katheturp 
samattho айта п' atthi, tah pañharn` pucchissami, ime pi 
tayo rājāno Sarabhañgasatthárarn pañharn pucchituńn Godhā- 
varitiram pattā, etesah рабће рї ahah pncchissamiti“ dvisu 
devalokesu devatāhi parivuto devalokato otari. Таш divasam 
eva Kisavaccho kālam akāsi, tassa sarīrakiccarh Каби catūsu 
thānesu anekasahassā ° івірапа Kisavacchassa candanacitakarn 
katvá вагїгатп jhapesurn, álahanassa samantā addhayojanamatte 
{һапе? dibbakusumavassam уаваі. М. tassa sariranikkhepar 
Каге!уй* assamarh pavigitvā tehi isiganehi parivuto nisidi. 
Tesam pi rājūuań пайїїїгатпї? āgatakāle mahāsenāvāhanaturi- 
yasaddo'° аһові. M. tah sutvā Anusissatápasarn ámantetva 
„tāta рапіуа {ауа jänāhi: kirnsaddo nām’ eso!“ ti аһа. So 
рёпїуарһаќат ādāya tattha рапіу& te гајапо disvá риссһй- 
уазепа pathamarn р. â.: 
1. А1атКаїа kundalino suvatthā 

veluriyamuttā tharukhaggabaddha 

rathesabhā titthatha, ke'" nu tumhe, 

kathah уо jānanti manussaloke ti, 49. 

Tattha veluriyamuttã tharukbaggabaddhâ tl veloriyamanibi с eva 


muttolambakebi !? са alarbkatatbarübi kbaggaratanehi samannāgatā, titthatha 
701 shasmirh rathe titthatha, ke’? nū "і ke1? pu tomhe, katha vo sañjānantiti, 


1 Cs товат. 2 Ck omita te pana, 2? Cis omit ti, but add tesah рапа. * Che 
janati 5 Ва tah ime pañhe. * Dd adda issayo tattheva garntvë pañcasu thā- 
nesu mapdappam kâretvā anekasahassa. 7 Cka omit håne. * Bd -rapetva. ° 
Hd -re 10 Ck „ат, Bd sdds mabå. '! Bd kim nāmeso saddo. !2 C% ko, 
13 Bdr шона. 


2. Sarabhañgajātaka. (522) _ 137 


Те tassa vacanarh sutvá rathë otaritvā vanditvā attharnsu. 


Tesu Atthakarájë tena saddhirn sallapanto dutiyam g. й.: 


„. Aham Atthako, Bhimaratho panáyam, 
Kāliñgarājâ' pana uggato ayar, 


визаййаїйп'* isina?’ dassanäya 


idhâgatā pucchitāyêmha pañhe ti. 50. 


Tattha uggato ti cando viya suriyo viya са pškato paññāto, susañüa- 
tânam’ івіпап? ti bhante .na mayah® idba vanakiádinar stthāya āgatā, 
atha kho kaáyadibi susaññetšnarp silesampannânem lsinarh dassanatthâya ldhá- 
ваа, pucchităyemhba pañhe ti Sarabhañgasatthärarh pañhe puccbitoh omha 
авас amhä 'ti attho, yakāro vyañjanasandhikaro tÍ veditabbo. 


Atha te’ tápaso „sādhu mahārāja, ágantabbattháparh ñeva 


ägat' attha, tena hi nahātvā vissamitvá assamapadarh pavisi- 


(уа isigaņarh vanditvā satthárarn pañhah pucchatha“ `1 tehi 
saddhiro patisantbārah katvā pëániyaghatarn ukkbipitvā uda- 
Кассһеуе* puñjanto '° ākāsarh oloketvā Ѕаккаф devarājāvarh 
Чеуарапарагїуйгат1 Eraávanakkhandhagatarn otarantarn disvā 
tena sallapanto tatiyar g. а.: 

з. Уеһазауат titthati antalikkhe 
pathaddhuno раппагазе va cando, (IV ^^“) 


pucehámi tam yakkha mahānubbāva: 


kathah nam jānanti manussaloke ti, 51, 


Tattha vebäsayan ti’? antalikkhe!? patbaddhnno ti pathaddhagato, 
addhapathe gagausmajjhe thito ti attho. 


Таш sutvā Sakko catottharh g. а.: 


+ Yam šhu devesu Sujampatiti (IV 392 


э 


Maghavā ti nah“ áhu manussaloke, 


за devarājā idam ajja ™ patto 


susaññatán ° isinam ** dassanāyâ "і. 52. 


1 Ва ka-. 
adds idha. 


katheve. :° Bd muücanto. 


13 Bd tari. 


2 Chs е, Ваз tāna. > Сә isinai. < Сло „бе, © Ck isie. © Ва 
T Bd ne. ° Bd sarabhañga-. ° so Cka; Сг udaccbeve, Bd uda- 


14 Сы idhamajja. 


1 Rd adds abbhuggarptvšá. 13 Ва adds ākāse tithasi. 


18 Ck -te isinā, Се -te lsinarh. 


10 


35 


15 


138 XVI Cattālisanipāta. 


Таба sa devaraji ti so аһап› Sakko dervaršja, idamajja! patto ti 
idah thënar ajja gato, dassanăyă ' dasi tthīya vandanatthāya Şara- 
bhañgasatthārañ ca райһат pucchanatthayá 'u aba. 


Atha nam Anusisso ,,šdhu mahārāja tumhe pacchâ- 
gacchathá?“ "і vatvā pániyaghatam ádăya assamarh pavisitvā 
pānīyaghațarn pațisāmetvă tinnarh гё}йпап devarëšjassa ca 
pahe’ pucchanattháya agatabhávam M-assa árocesi, So isi- 
ganaparivuto mahāvisālamālļake nisīdi. Tayo гајапо gantvšs 
isiganarh vanditvñ ekamantam nisidinsu. Sakko pi otaritvā 
isiganarn upasahkamitvā añjalim pagayha  isiganarn уарреёуё 
vandamāno pañcamar g. й.: 

s. Dūre sutā по isayo samāgatā 
mahiddhikš iddhigunüpapanna, 
vandami te ауїге” pasannacitto 
уе jivalok' ettha manpussasetthë ti. 53. 

Tatthe düre suta no ti bhaute amhehi tumhe düre_devaloke tbitehi 
yeva suta5, mamayanto evam аһа, í.v.b.: іше idha samjgatà amhâkarn івауо 
düre sutë ууа Brahmalokă vissutš рёКаіё ti, mablddbikš 119 mahānubhāvā, 


iddhiguņnûpapanuâ!'® ti pañcavidhena iddhigupena samannëgatš, вуіге? ti 
ayye!!, уе ti’? ye tumhe imasmirh jivaloke manussassettha. 


Evarh isiganam_ vanditvá Sakko cha nisajjadose pariharanto 
ekamantam visidi, Atha nam іѕїпагі adbovāte nisinnam disvā 
Аппаївво chattham р. Āā.: 

в. Gandho іѕіпат ciradakkhitánam 
kaya cuto gacchati malutena, 


ito parakkamma ' sahassanetta 


gandho isīna asuci devarājā 'ti. 54. 
Tatha ciradakkhitānan ti cirapabbajitānaib, ратаккашша 14 'e 


parskkama’'? apehi, sahassanettā "і šlapanam etah, Sakko hi amacca- 
sabassehi?? cintitah atthah'* akako'? ха passati, tasmā sebasssnetto ti 


t Сә idhammajja. ? Rd pacchā šg-. ° Bd -erù. * Ва -Iake. ^ Ва ag-. * Bd 
adds (іо. 7 Ра аууаге. ° Che sutam. ° Ck omita ti. 20 Bd -guno-. 
11 Схе аууз, Ва аууака. !? СЕ# уо, omitting ti. 13 Bd patlkkamma. !* Rd 
patikammā. !% Bd -ввела, !* Ва omits асса. !? Ва ekameko. 


2. Sarabhañgajātaka. (522.) 139 


Yuccatl, asucîti sedamslšdiparibhšvitetta duggandho, tumhe са sucikimiš, tena 
vo вва Randho khadatii!. 

Таш sutvá Sakko Кага g. å.: 

т. Gandho isfnarn ciradakkhitânarh 
kāyā cuto gacchato málotena, 
vicitrapuppharn* surabhirn va málarh 
gandharh etarh pátikarhkháma bhante, 
па h' ettha deva patikkülasaññino ti. 55, 

Tattha gacehatü 'tt yathásuklarñ pavattatu, павёрп(аш no paharatü 'ti 
atiho, pštikarhkhamia 'ti icchama patthema, @tthš 't etasmlin gandhe devā 
jegucchasaññino? па honti, дивеїе 4 yeva b! детё jigucchanti na silavanta ti. 

Evañ ca рапа vatvá ,„bbante Anusissa, aharh mahantena 
оввйёһепа pañham pucchitur agato, окават те karohiti“ аһа. 
So tassa уасапат sutvá utthayásanšë isigaņarn okāsarn karonto 
gāthadvayam аһа: 

в. Purindado bhütapati yasassI 
devënam indo Maghavā Sujampati 
ва dẹvarājā Asura[zana]ppamaddano ` 
okāsam akarhkhati' pañha'pucchiturn. 56. 
ə Ко п’ ет’ ітеваш”° idha panditánarn 
pañhe роо” піропе vyākarissati, 
орай са raññam manujadhipánar 
devānam indassa са Vasavassa ‘і. 57. 

Tattha рогіпдайо ti айїп1 Закказв eva бапепёшёпі, so М роге daánarh 
diunatta purindado, bhūtesu?’? је{{ћакасеё bhüpati, parivārasampadāya yassssi!!, 
paramissarataya derānam indo, явйаппат хаіавашёдёпапат sutthukatattë Sakko, 
purimajštivasena Maghavā, Sujāya '? patibhāvəna Sujampati, rañjanatšáya!! гаја, 
ko nevš ‘ti ko nu eva, nipune ti ѕапЬаецкћотарабће :<, гаййап ti rājū- 


пап, imesarh catunnarh јапёпат !' menam gahetvë ko imesarm papditānar isi- 
паш рапһай kathessati, райһе!* nesam katheturn samatthah jānātbā 'tl vadati. 
1 Cs khādha-? Bd badha-. 2 Bd vicittern-. ? Bd jiguechi-. * Rds -іло. 5 
Ва asüršnappa-. * Ckhs-sl. 7 Cz-he, Bd pañain. ° Сз потішева№ћ, Віз nera- 
бай. * Chr pnttho. 1° Cks santesu. !! СЕ -daya ват, Се -resampadaya sassi, 
Bd -гавешрадёуа yassi, 13 Bd sujšsuiya asukañĀūāya.  !? Ck rañjantāya. 14 
Cha -harh. !° Bd rājūnah. !# Bd -ham. 


15 


20 


10 


15 


20 


35 


140 ХҮП. Cattålisanipāta. 


Tam вшуй isigano , arisa Anusissa, tvah pathaviyam 
thatvá pathavim apassanto viya kathesi, thapetvā Sarabhañga- 
satthāra ko аппо ete pañhe katheturñ samattho*“ ti vatvā 

10. Ayam ist Sarabhañgo tapassi 
yato jāto' virato methunasma 
ācariyaputto suvinitarüpo 


во nesam райһйпї viyákarissatiti g. а. 58. 


ekena sarena te ваге pātento bhaggavibhagge * аказіі Sarabbañgo, methu- 
павша ti methunadhammato, во kira methunarn ssevitvë va pabbajito, асагі- 
yaputto ti rañño šcariyassa purohitassa putto. 


Evañ ca рапа vatvā isigano Anusissam аһа: ,,marisa 
{уаш eva sattháaram vanditvā ізіраравѕа vacanena Sakkena 
pucchitapañharm kathanāya оказа karohiti% So ,sadhü“ 
ЧЇ sampaticchitvá satthárarm vanditvā okásam karonto anan- 
tara р. а.: 

и. Копдабба райћапі viyákarohi, 
yācanti tam ізауо sadhurüpa, 
Kondañña eso manujesu dhammo 
yam vaddham ° āgacchati esa bharo (і. 59. 


Тайһа Kondañña ’ti tah gottenâlapati, dhammo {1 sabhävo, уай 
vaddhan!? ti yam paññaáya vuddhari5 purisarn esa pañharn? vissajjanabhavo 10 
паша ägacchati, esa!1 manujesu sabbšvo, ќавша candasuriyasahaesarn !? uttha- 
pento viya pškatarh Каха devaraüño pañharh kathehiti. 


Tato Маһаригїзо okásarn karonto апашїагаш g. а.: 
12. Katāvakāsā pucchantu bhonto 
уаш Кїйсї pañham manasâbhipatthitarh, 
ahah hi tan tarn vo viyākarissam 
ñatvā зауатп loka imar рагай сё ‘ti. 60. 


1 read: Jšto yato? 2 Bd adda bhante anusisse. ? Ck! -pāsādinl. * Са -ggo, 
Bd bhañgsvibhañgo. ° Dd kāre-. * Bd buddbem. 7 Bd buddhsen. ® 84 
buddhan. * Bd -Һёпаш. !° Ba -bhāro. 11 Bd ево. 1° Bd candima-. 


2. Sasrabbañgajštaka. (522.) 141 


Tattba yam kiñcit[ na kevalarn tumhakam eva sadevakassa lokasss yaro 
manasñbhipatthitari tam maro bhavanto pucchantu аһа bi' idhalokanissltarh 
vā paralokanissitah và! sabbapañhar imañ са рагай cat lokar sayar 
abhiññaya sacchiketvā kathessamitl sabbaññü ратагарата paviresl°. 

Ехат tena okáse kate Sakkc attano‘ abhisarnkatam pañ- 
ham pucchi. 

Tam attham ракаѕеріо S. aba: 

1з. Tato са Марата Sakko attbaddassi purindado 

apucchi pathamam pañbarh yañcâsi abhipatthitam: 61. 
14. Kim sü vadhitvë па kadāci socati, 

kissa-ppahünarm ? isayo° vannayanti, 

kass' idha vuttam рһагизаш khametha, 

akkhāhi те Копдаппв etam atthan ti. 62, 


Tettha yañcastlti уап (авза manasñ abhipatthitam 481 tam Ppuccuiti 
attho, otan ti etah mayá pucchitam аат akkbāhi me ti ekagštháya tayo 
райһе pucchl. 

Tato’ райһаш vyakaronto 

16. Кофйһат vadhitvá па kadāci socati, 
таккћарраһёпаћ isayo vannayanti, 
sabbesarn vuttah pharusañ khametha, 
etah khantim uttamam āhu santo ti āha, 63. 

Тыа kodharn vadhitvā ti socanto hi patlghacitten'evar'socati, kodua- 
bhāvä kuto soko, tene vuttah па kadâci воса(ій, makkhappabānan ti 
pucchi attano katagunamakkbanassa akatanñübhavasarhkhšátassa makkbassa pa- 
bánarn јвауо vannayanti, sabbesan ti bīnamajjhimokkațthānarh 0 sabbesarh 
pharusavacanarn kħhametha, santo tÍ poranakapandita evar kathenti. 

18. бакка hi dvinnam'! уасапат titikkhiturn 
sadisassa vā setthanarassa vápi, 
kathan nu ћіпавѕа vaco khametha, 
akkhāhi me Kondañña etam attharh '®. 64. 
зт. Bhayā hi setthassa vaco khametha 
вёгатЬћаћһеба '* pana sādisassa '*, 


) Bd adds vo. 3 Ске omit para- vā. 2 Вё sabbari-=. *Сїё para. 5 Dd sampa-. 
* Bd -nā, ? Bd kihau-. ® зо all three MSS. for isi? *# Ва tatopararn. 10 
Bde -mukka-. 11 Bd sakkā ubhinnarb, 1? Bd adds: aarabhañgo Зћа. ??C? Вё 
aârabbha-. 1t Bd sae, 


10 


15 


30 


80 


15 


142 ХҮП. СайїПаап1р&а., 


yo c' idha hfnassa vaco kametha 

etah khantińh uttamam áhu santo ti 65. 
еуатйёйїпай gāthāvah  vacanapativacanavasepa sambandho 
veditabbo. 

Tattha akkhāhîti bhante Kondaññs tumheh!! dve рабћа sukathitñ, еко 
cittarn me? na ganbati katharn sakkáš attano’ hinatarassa vacanarhb adhiváseturhb tam 
me akkhâbît! pucchanto evam ába, etarb khaptin (і yam р’ starb Játigottadihi 
hinassa vacanarn khama nar, etah kbantih uttaman ti poršQgakspandita va- 
danti, ума рап' etar jătiädīibl setthassa һһауепа sadisassa kârsnuttariya- 
lakkhane sšrambhe šdinavadassanena khamanath п' езй adhiväsanskhanti пёюё 
"tl attho. 

Еуаш vutte Sakko M-arh āha*: ,bhante pathamar tumhe 
“sabbesarn vuttarm рһагивап kbametha еќаф khantin uttamam 
khantirn uttamam šhü' ti vadatha, па vo purimena рассһїшаш 
вашей“, Atha nam M. ,,Sakka, рассһітаф mayá ayar 
hfno ti ñatvá pharusavacanam адһіуйвепіавва vasena vnttam, 
yasmá pana na ваккё rüpadassanamattena ваіќёпаф setthádi- 
Ъћато ñáturn tasmā purimarntvuttan*“ ti vatvā sattánam aüñatra 
вашуүйв&ё rüpadassanamattena setthádibhavassa duviñňeyyatarn 
ракӣверёо 

is. Каћа уіјабба catumattharüparh 
sethan ѕагіккһат athavápi hinam, 
virüparüpena сагаоќі santo, 
tasmā hi sabbesarh vaco khamethá ‘ti р. а. 66. 

Tattha catumattbarüpan ti catübl Iriyāpatbeh! pațiechannasabhāvam, 
virūparūpenā "И virūpänah lamakapuggalánarh rūpona пашадппа* santo 
рі caranti, imasmiro рап’ atthe Majjhantikatherassa yatthurh kathetahbam. 

Тат sutvā Sakko nikkamkho hutvā , bhante etaya по 
khantiyá апіввтзат kathethā“' "і уасі. Ath’ assa’ M.: 

19. Na һ' etam atthah mahati рі senā 
sarājikā yujjhamānā labhetba 


1 Chs „Һе, ? Сіз omit пө. > Bd -nā “ Ck omit šba. 5 Bd adds santo, * 
Bd -nena. ! Ck atha. 


э. Sarabhañgajātaka. (522.) 143 


уат khantinā sappuriso labhetha, 
khantibalass' üpasamanti' verā ti р. а. 67. 


Tattha otamatthan ti etam wveravüpasamanarh nippatighabhšvasarn- 
къабат attharh. 


Evah M-ena khantigune kathite te гаўйпо сїпїауйїви: 
„Sakko attano pañham  pucchati, amhákarm pucchanokāsamh 
“ na dassatiti“. Atha nesar ajjhāsayarh viditvë ° attanábhisarh- 
khate' cattāro pañhe thapetvá уа tesarh karbkh&° pucchanto 

so. Subhāsitan te anumodiyanamn 
aññarh (аг puccbāmi, ќай imgha brūhi, 
yathā аһа Dandakī Nalikiro 
ath' Ajjuno Kalābu сёрі* гаја 
tesarh gatih brühi supáapakamminam 
katth' üpapanná isinarh vihethaká ti р. а. 68, 
Таа апишой!уёпап ti idah maya putthënuh рпа райһапат 


vissajjanasarnkbštarn tava subhásitah anumaditvâ, yathá abū ti yo nama 
ahosi!, Kalābu сё 'ti Kalābu ca гёја®. 


Ath’ assa vissajjento' M. pañca gāthā abhasi: 
тп. Kisam pi'° Vaccham avakiriya Dandaki 
“ucchinnamülo вајапо sarattho 


" nirayamhi paccati, 


Kukkulanáme 
tassa pulliñgáni'' patanti kāye. 69. 
ss. Yo saññate pabbajite avañcasi'* 
dhammarù bhanante samane adüsake 
tam Naálikirarn зиракћа parattha 
sarngamma khàdanti viphandamšnam, 70. 
t. Ath’ Ајјопо niraye sattisüle '* 


avarhsiro patito addbapado 
1 во Ošs for üpasammanti? Ва upamanti. ° Bd -e. 2 Bd adds sakko. * Bd 
attano abhisañkhāte. ° Bd ar. ° read: cpi kalābu? 7 Bd cattšro Janë ca 
ahesurh In the plece of уо -ahosi. * Che omit таја. ° Bd viaajja-. 1° Ba 
kissañhi? Се kisarhvi, 11 Сїё-а 29 СЕ puli-, Bd phulit-. !# во Oks; Bd 
acchedayl. !* Bd satta-, 


10 


10 


15 


95 


50 


144 ХҮІІ, Cattšlisantpata. 


Angirasarn Gotamarh hethayitvá 

khantim tapassih cirabrahmacárirm. 71. 
s. Yo khandaso pabbajitarn achedayi 

khantim vadantarm вашапагп аййзаКатп 

Kalābu vicim upapajja paccati 

mahabhitápam ' katukarn bhayānakarn. 72, 
sas. Etani sutvā nirayāni pandito 

айпап! pápitthataráni”c' ettha 

dhammarn care samanabrahmanesu, 


evarnkaro saggam upeti {һапап ti. 73. 


Tattha kisan ti appamansalohitatti klsasarirati, avakiriyā 'tiavaklrltva 
nutthubhanadantakattbapitauena? (авва satire kalim pavābetvā, иссһїппа- 
mülo ti chinnamülo hutri, sajano ti sapariso, Kukkulanamei nira- 
yamhíti yojanasatappamāne kappena santhite unhacbārtikaniraye, pulliñgā- 
niti‘ vītaccikargărā* tassa klira tattha unhakukkule nimuggassa navahi ча 
mukbeh! uņhachârikā pavisanti®. sise malantamahantá amgärâ patanti yesam” 
patanakále sasrirarb  diparukkho viya jalati, balasedanà vattauti, ат? adhl- 
väseturn asakkouto mahāravarh ravati, Sarabhañgasattbā pathaviri bhindítvá tam 
tathā'? paccamānamh dassesi, mabājano bhayasantāgam ёрәјјі, tassa atita- 
bhåvarh!' паќеа M. (ай nirayan antaradhapesi, dhamuarm bhanante tl 


dasakusalakammapathadhammaih bhäsante, samane ti samilapape, гдйваке 
niraparādhe, Nšlikiran ti evarnnamakaršjànarn, parattha "і paraloke niraye 
nibbattarn, аапдашша ‘И ito с" ito са salnšgantvü!2 mahantà sunakhá khá- 
dantl, tasmir kira Kāliñgarattho Dantapuranagare Nālikire rajja kārsyamāne 
еко mehâtêpaso Pañcasatatapasaparivuto llimavantë акашта rājuyyâne vāsarù 
kappetvā mabājanassa dbaumarh desesi, dhammikatāpaso чууйпө vasatiti raüño 
ñrocayirhnsu, гаја рапа adhammiko adhammena rajja kăroti, во amaccesu 
разатвапќеви aham рі фһашшаїй sunissamiti чууйпаш gantvå tapasarh vanditvā 
nisidl, tāpaso raññš saddbih patisantbārah karonto kim ајагёја dhammena 
Tajjah kāresi јапат {2 па!* pilesiti аһа, so tassa kujjhitvà ayari kūtajațilo 


ettakarh kåjain nāgarānetii santike mamah ñava арорат kathesi шаббе botu 
jānissämiti cintetvä sve amhākah gharadvararb agaccheyyatbi 'ti nimantetvš 
punadivase purānagūtbassa саќіуо pūrāpetvā tāpasesu agatenu tesarn hhikkhā- 
bbājanāni gūthassa pürapetva dvārah pidahâpetvā musalłāníi са lobadaņnde са 


* Bd mahapa-. ? Bd nuthahhitadauta-. > Cke -ma. * Cks puli-, Bd phulli-. 
3 Rd vitacchitañgārā. * Che -sati. ? Bd tesarn. * Bd sakalasarire. * Bd во. 
10 pd tattha. ?! зо Ck for atibhita-? Bdz ativiyabbitabhāvarı, Сә anibhīta- 
bhāvah. 2 Bd adds chinditvā. !*# Cks jana, 1* Bdr па ratham in the place 
of janana. 


2. Serabhañgajātaka. (522.) 145 


gšhšápetvšana isinarb зївапі bbiudapetvš Јафұћаво ! gabetvā kaddbāpetvā suna- 
khell khādāpetvā bhinnarh pathavirn pavisitva Sunakhamahaniraye nibbatti, tatr’ 
авза tigšvutikarn вагїгагп ahosl, atha nam mabantā battbikucchippamana райса- 
заппавплайһа ? anubandhitvā dasitvā navayojanaya Jalltaayapathaviyarñ pātetvā 
makhapürain 2 luñcantā \їррһапдатшапап khadirsu, М. раат dvidhā 
bhetv3 tam nirayah dassetvá mahë 
дһйревї; всһајјипо ti sahassabāhur; 
niccharanato eva 1з344һапатат, hethayltva ti vihethetvë visapitakandeua 
viljhltvë Jivltakkbayarb pápetvš, во kira? Mahirhaskaratthe Kekarājedbāniyar * 
rajJjarn karento migavah gantvi mige vadhitvë айдагатетватћ ' kbādanto уісагі, 
ath’ ekadivagarñ migarnarni agamanatthšne kotfhakarñn katrā mige olokayamāno 
at(hësi, tadă so tāpaso (авва таййо аў1ййге ekam kàárarukkhar abhirübitvá 
phalaui ocinanto ocitaphalan® sākhaw шобсі, (авва vissetthšya' tah thàánarh 
pattā migā palšáyirhau, т8)а kujjhitzá tāpasaro visena sallena vwljjbi, во pautva 
galanto! matthakena khadirakhánuri!l äsādetvā sülagge yeva kilam akáni, гаја 
tah Крапа Āeva dvidbåbhinnarn pstbavirh pavisitva Sattisūlaniraye nibbatti, 
tlgāvutappamāņarı sarirarn aboj)l, tatra ќай !š пїтауар&!8& jalitebl āvudhbobi 
hoftetva)2 jJaelitarh ayapabbatarh aropenti, pabbatamattbake thitakåle '* таѓо 
paharati, so vātappabārena patitvā рагіғајац 1%, tasmirn khane Һебһа nava- 
yojanāya jaliteayapathavíto'® mahštšlakkhandbappaminarh'? jalanta! aya- 
зйа utthahati, so sülaggarh matthaken' eva āsādetv lavuto titjhati, (ават 
Шапе pathav! jalatl, aülar Jalati™”, sarīrarh?? Јаја, во tattha mahâ ї 
ravanto paccatl, М. pathavirh dvidhā katvā рігауаго *! dassetvë mahijan 
bhitabhá 
аппа! 


авва hhitabhšverh ñatvā puna antara- 
Añgīirasan ti añgeb! rarbainarh 


arı Лаа antaradbăposi, kbandaso ti cattšro2? cattáro hatthapāde 
ай са khanqákhapndarh Кабуд, adüsakan ti niraparādbain, баа che- 
Чаре{уй dvihl kasāpabărasahassebi?” tālāpetvā jațāsu gablta?’* äkeddbāpetrā 
petikujjarn nipaljāpetvā pitthiyah panhiyā pabariteā mabāädukkbasamappitaro 
akāsi, Kalšábuvicin ti Kalābuaviciù, katukan ti tikhinavedaparh, evarh 1 


nirayam upapajjitva channarn Jalanarn antare paccati, vittbārato pana Kalăbu- 
таййо vatthurñ Kbhantivādajātake kathitam eva, pàpltthataršáni cettbā 'ti 
etebi nirayeb! pāpitțhatarāni са айбёиі nirayáni sutvà, dhammar care ti 
Вакка devaršja pandito kulaputto na kevala ete’? cattšro nirayà ete yeva са 
тё]апо пегёуіка atha kho sññe рі niraya айбе рі rājāno пїгауеви upapannā ti 
widítva catupaccayadšnadhamrikarakkhëvaranasarbvidhanasarnkbštarh вашапа- 
brāhmaņeau dhammarb careyya. 


t Bde _ghadisu. 3 Ва -ппё-. 2 Ck repeats mukha-, Се mukbapuranrmoka, * 
Ck hetvā, Dd bhinditvá. * Bd adds ajjuno пата гаја, ° Bd kevaka. ! Bde 
айдаёгарайКашашвап. 6 Сг ocati-, Не осіпарћаја. > Bd adds saddena, !0 
Ba рагїр- '' Dds khadirakhanuke, Cts khārakbāņurm. ?? Ско tatrayarh. 1? Ck 
kottbe-, Bd kote-. 14 Bd patitakāle. 5 Ске -leti. '* Bd -pathaviyā. !?! Ck 
=n, Са -па 16 Сё jal-, Сә jalintarh, Bd jalitarn. !* В gülšni Jalanti. 20 
Bd tassa ѕа-. ?! Bd саф ni-, 2! Ck varo, Bd omits cattāro. #8 Rd kasšhi ра-. 
З* Rd gahitvā corr. to gabetvā. 25 Dds evarūpai. 2% Bd adds yeva. 

haka. V. 10 


16 


20 


95 


80 


95 


10 


146 


ХҮП. Carršlisanipata. 


Evam М-епа саїпппаш гйёўйпаш nibbattatthāoe dassite 


tayo rājāno nikkamkhaá аһезшї, 


pañhe россһаоќо р. ā.: 


Subbāsitan te anumodiyánarn 

айпаш (аш pucchámi, tad igba brūbi, 
kathamvidharh sllavantam vadaoti, 
katharnvidham paññavantam vadanti, 
katharmvidhbam sappurisarh vadanti, 
kathamvidharmh no! siri по jahëtiti. 74. 


Tattba katharnvidham nol siri no jsbištiti katbarhvidban 
purisam patiladdhasiri?” na jabāti. 


Atb’ assa vissajjanto М. catasso gātbā abhāsi: 


зэ. 


Кауепа vācāya са уо” са* saññato 
шапаза са kiñci па karoti papam 

па attahetu’ alikarm bhanáti 
tathavidbam silavantarm vadanti. 75. 
Gambhirapañham manasábbicintayam* 
пассаһиаш kamma ' karoti luddam (IV $$ 
kalabbatarh'atthapadarn па riñcati 
tatbávidbarn paññavantam vadapnti. 76. 
Yo ve Каїаййй” katavedi dhiro 
kalyāpamitto dalhabhatti'° са hoti" 
dakhitassa'' sakkacca karoti Кїссаш 
tathávidharn sappurisarm vadanti. 77. 


‚ Etehi sabbehi guneh' upeto™ 


saddho mudü зашу!һһйрї vadañňū — 
samgahakam sakhilam'* sanbavacam (IV 19 
tathavidharh no siri по јаһаікі. 78. 


1 Bd nu. 
for eü? 


Tato Sakko avasese cattāro 


з Bd -зїп, Cè» -sirih. 3 Cs во. * Rd? dha, ` зо all three MSS, 
6 Ва -tiyab. 7 Bd arm. * Bds -даќай. # all three MSS. -u. 
10 Chs -bhanui, Bd -bbitti. '' so all theo MSS. for hot са? '? Bd dukkbi-, 
Uk dukkbi- corr. to dukbi-. 1: Ck -bipeto. 't Сх sakh;-. 


2. Sarabhañgajataka (522.) 147 


Tattha kāyenā '(1 sdipi tiridhasucaritadvaravasena vuttāni, па attahetū 

111 desanšsisam, etarnh attsheta và parahetu vā yasahetu vā dhanahetu vā lahha- 
hetu vā айкай па kathetiti attho, kāmañ с' өза? або vácšsañnñato ti ішіпа va 
siddho, musavšdino pana akattabbarn pāpakammarn паша n' atthiti garuka- 
bhävadīpanatthah puna evam aba 'ti reditabbo?, gambhirapañban й! 
atthato са райо са gambhirar gulharm paticchannam Sattubbastajātaka- 
Ummaggajātakesu āgstasadisarh pañhah, manasšbhicintayan tl! manasâbhj- 
cintento atthapadarh’® palivijjhitvā candasabassarn utthâpento vlya pàkatam 
katvā yo katheturh sakkotiti attho, nāccãbitan ti na atishitarn* bitatikkantarb 
luddam pharusarn sāhbasihakammañ ca yo па karotitl attho, ітавва ca pan’ 
atthassa vibhavanattharn 

Na panditā attasukhassa hetu 

pāpān! kammani samācaranti ?, 

dakkhona phuttbë khalltâpi santā® 

chandā ca dosš оа jahanti dhamman ti 
Bhürlpañbo kathetabbo, kālābhatan? ti tattba дапа diatabbakšle ва 
rokkbanakāle!®° uposatbavăsakāle saraņesa patltibapabbajjakšle!! samana- 
dbammakaraņakâle vipassanācārasmirn yuñjanakāle’? ca imāni™ dānādini sam- 
pšdento!* kaálabhatarn ? stthapadarn па riñcati pa galāpeti nâma, tathā- 
-vidban ti sabbañãl Buddbä ca Paccekabuddbá са Bodhiaattë ca раййатап(аш 
katbentā етагйраїй puggalarn kathenti, yo ve ti gātbāya parena attano kata- 
кїйай jJānātîti kataüñü evah Ďatvā pana yen’ авва guno kato tassa gunari 
patlkaronto katavedi nâma, dukhltasaā’* 'ti айапо saháyassa dulkbappattassa 
dukkha attani āropetvā уо tasea uppannain kiccarn sahatthā заккассаг karoti 
Boddbādayo evarûparn sapparisarn katbenti, арі ca sappurisă nima kataññü 
katavedino hontiti Satapattajātaka-Cullaharnsa-Mahāharnsajātakādini ! kathe- 
tahbäui 17, etebj sabbehiti Sakka yo etehi betthëvuttebl sīlādibi sabbebi рі 
gunebi upeto ойаррапавай@һауа вашаппёдаїо mudu’? ріуаЬЬёні! sarnvibhāgā- 


bbiratattā ašrnvibhšg1 yäcakánaro vacanarh Āatvã’? dānavasena vadañūū catūbi 
Barpgahavatthühi tasah teseh sarnganhanato?' ssrngabakarn madburavacanatàya 
aakhilarh mattavacanataya запһатасап tatbávidharn no puggalah”? adbigata- 
yssasobhagganarphhëta siri no Jahāti, пёзва alri viuassatiti. 


1 mitto dalia- - -na attabetü t! wanting in Cs. 2 Bd ceva. 2 Bd adds tah 
poggalarn silavantarh vadanti, * Bd adds bho sakka уо gambhirapañhan. Š$ 
Bd ацћаго. * Chs atibitaùw. ? СХ samāha-, Rd ваштёса-. 5 Bd pilitāpi-, Ck 
khalinantanisanna? C” balitatattānisantā? ° Bde kālāga-. 10 Ck Bd -па-, 1! 
Ва» patițhānakāle pabbajitakāle. 12 Ck puñjana-, Bd yujjana-. !3 Ch idāui, 
34 Bd samšdento. }% Ck Ва dukkhi-. 16 Ска „аты. © Cha .bbam. !° Bd 
mudu ti. '° Bd adds samvibhāgi ti silasahvibhâgadšna. 2° Bd sutvā. 2! 
Bd -gaņhato. ?7 Bd tatbāvidhanti tathāvridbab mudupuggalarh. 


10* 


10 


15 


20 


95 


30 


148 


XVII Cattšlisanipata. 


Evah M. gaganatale candam utthápento viya cattāro 
райһе vissajjesi. Tatopararh sesapañhānarh pucchā са! vissaj- 


јаоай ca hoti: 


эи. 


Subhasitan te аротойіуёпаф 
aññarh ќат pucchāmi, tad imgha brùhi, 
sllarh зїгї* сарі satañ са dhammá' 


раййй са* — kam setthatararn vadanti, 79, 


Paññā hi setthá kusalā vadanti (Ш +49 
nakkhattarájá-r-iva tšárakánam, 

allar siri' сарі satañ ca dhammá 
апуйуіка paññavato bhavanti. 80. 


. Subhāsitan te аоопойіуёпаф 


aññarn tar pucchámi, tad imgha brūhi, 
kathamkaro kintikaro kirh ácaram (IV 52°) 
kim веуатапо labhatidha раййатп, 
paññáya дап! patipadam vadehi, 
kathamkaro paññavā hoti macco. 8]. 


‚ Sevetha vaddhe' nipuņe bahussnte, 


uggāhako vă paripucchako siyá, 
suneyya sakkacca sabhāsitāni, 
evarhkaro paññavā hoti тассо. 82, 
Sa раййауй Катарипе avekkhati 
aniccato dukkhato rogato са, 
evarhvipasst pajahāti chandarh 
dukkhesu Катеви mahabbhayesu. 83. 
Sa vritarágo pavineyya' dosam, 


mettarh "° сійат Ъһауауе!! 


арратӣпат, 
sabbesu bhütesu nidhāya йдапдат (ІУ *22) 


anindito Втаһтат ирей {ћапап ti. 84. 


1 Oks omit са. 2 СЕ girin, Се Bd slriñ. > Bd am. * Che pahñā vi, 
$ Che -riri, Bd -гіп. * Bd -о. ! Bd buddhe. ° Bd -bato са. 


paññañra. 


Bd aavineyya. 10 Bd -а. N Rd -veyya. 


Ba 


2. SarebhaĀgejātakı. (522. 149 


Tattha silan ti šcšrasilarn vā issariyssilarn! vā sappurisadbammaŭ: vā 
paññarh vë ti шева dhammānset kataradbammarh setthatararn vadanttti pucchati, 
pasanña hiti Sakka etesu catüsu дћаттезо уй esā paññša пата sā? va ве!{һа 
iti Buddhšdayo kusalā vadanti, yethā? hi tšrska сепдат parjvërentl cando va* 
tnesarn* nttamo evarh «Пай siri сёр! satañ ca дћешто tl ete tayo pl anvā- 
yikā? paññavasto bbavanti paññāvantam eva anugacebanti5, paññaya eva parivārā 
hontîti ао, kathahkaro ti ёйїлі aññamaññavevacanán' eva’, hathah 
karonto!° kirb nâma kammar karonto kim ёсагапќо кі sevamāno Ъћајашёпо!! 
idhaloke рабба '? labhatt, paññayam eva patipadah vadehl, Jānitukāmo 'mbi, 
khatharbkaro шассо paĀñavā паша hotìti pucchatl, vaddhe'’ ti paññaya vud- 
dhippatte pandite nipune sukhumaki nanssamettbe. evamkaro d! уо 
puggalo evarnvuttappakare puggalo sevati bhajati рауігирёвей pàálirn ugganhāti 
рчпаррчпа айћаф pucchati равапе Јекћаго khananto viya kañcanenšliyë siha- 
таваф раіссһапіо !* viya ohitasoto makkaccarn subhisitáni suņāti eyarı отап» 
Каго macco раййауВ hotitl evan M. pācīnalokadhātuto suriyarn utthëpento viya 
раййауа patlpadarp kathetvā idāni tesså paññaya ипе kathento ва раййа+йё 
Ч adim aha, tattha kšáamagune ti кашакоцћаве hnutvë аһһата((һепа!® апіссе(о 
ditthadbammikasamparayikšnarn dukkhānarı vatthubhāvena dukkhato attha- 
navutiyä rogamukhánai Кате missiya uppattisambhavena rogato avekkhati ’! 
oloketi, во evarıvipassī!® eteh! Катапећі kāmānamh aniccádítari passanto kāmo 
піввёуа uppajjanakadukkhánari!? anto n’ atthi kăwānah раһапат eva sukhan 
ti viditvā dukkhesu kâmesu mahabbhayesu chanda pajahati, ва vitaršàgo ti 
Sakka во puggslo evar vitarāgo navsāghätavetthuvasena uppajjanakabhārari ?9 
doearh vinetvå?! mettacittari bhšveyya, appamāņasattā rammanatta appamanan 
tah 22 bhávetvë aparihinajjhëno agarahito Brahmaloke uppajjatitl. 


Evam M-e kaámanam dose* kathente yeva tesam tinnam 


** звђајакёудпагт tadañgappahānena kāmagunņarāgo”* 


pi гајапаф 
раһїпо. Tam ñatvā M. tesar раһатпзапауазепа 
e. Mahiddhiyarn аратапаћ ahosi 
{ауа-т- Аїсћака'* Bhimarathassa сёрі 
Кайїпрага}азва са uggatassa, 


sabbesarn vo Катагёро pahino ti g. а. 85. 


1 Ва -yasiri. > Ba пёшева. > Ске tathā. Bd са, * Bd te- “al three MSS. вігіб, 
7 Ске „ко. % Bd omita pafiña - -- gacrhantl. ° СЕ aññamaññamevamipaneva. 
10 Ва -karotl. 11 Bd omits bha-. !? Ске -5. 19 Ва vuddbe '* Cis omit tl. 
"5 CE -сћаппо, Се уарссћашо, 64 sampaticchanto 16 Hd -tthena ' CE ape-, 
Са àve-, Bd атеккћеби. 15 Bd -вваі. °? Cs uppajjanadu-, Bd оррајјашёдака-, 
20 Ваг -kasabbāäveh. 3: Ва viditvi, #8 Bd -narh, omitting (ап. 22 Bd -am, 
2% Сіз -nampi. 2° Bd pancakš-. 2° alt three MSS. -ka. ` 


10 


15 


90 


30 


150 XVII Cattšlisanipšata, 


Tattha mabiddhiyan tl mahattbarn mabšvipphšram шаһ аап, tava- 
та{(Һака tcl tava Atthaka), pahino ti tadañgappahánena раһїпо. 
Таг sutvá mahārājāno -M-assa thutim Кагоп!й* 
вв. Evam etarh' paracittavedi: 
5 вађеватӣ по Катагёро раһїпо, 
karohi okāsam anuggahāya 
увіћа раїїї te abhisambhavemá `ti р. йһатївп. 86. 
Тайһа anuggahäyā '(1 pabbajjatthāya no окёваф karobi yathā mayah 
pabbajlitvă tava gatirb nippbattim abhlsambhavema papuneyyama tayā pațl- 
по laddharn * gunar pațivijjheyyämâ* 'ú vadirhsu. 
Atha nesarh okâsarh karonto M. itaram р. à.: 
зә. Karohi okāsam anuggaháya 
tathā hi vo kāmarāgo раһїпо, 
pharātha‘ káyarh vipuláya pītiyā 
5 yathá дайт1 me’ abhisambhavethā “і. 87. 


Tattha pbarātbā’ ‘ti jbšnapitiya vipulaya kāyah pbarathā 'u. 


Tarh sutvë te* sarnpaticchanta'. 
e. Sabbah karissáma tavánusásanirh 
уві yarh tuvarmh?' vakkhasi bhüripañña, 
20 pharáma kāyarn vipalāyā pītiyā 
yathā раб te abhisambhavemā `ti р. ёһафво. 88, 
Atha nesan balakáyánarn'' M. pabbajjah dāpetvā isi- 
апап! uyyojento 
a, Каійуат Vacchassa Kisassa pūjā, 
25 gacchantu bhonto isayo'' sādhurōpã, 
jbāne ratā hhotha вада samahita, 
ева гаќї'" pabbajitassa setthá ti р, š. 89. 


Tattha gacchsntü "tl attano attano vasanattbānëni gacchantu. 


l Си -ka. 1 all three MSS. -(0. 5 зо ali three MSS, for evam рі etai? 
* Bd patividdba ° Bd -viddhe-. * Bd рһага- 7 Ck gatimeva, Bd gati me, 
* Ва omits te. ° Ва tarn- corr. to sarh-. 10 Сёз yarh tvah. !! Da sabbaba-. 
13 so all three MSS, бог 181? 15 Ck тий, C# Bd -(. 


Isayo 


&Кйват uppatitvā sakatthánáni'” gamirmnsu. 


2. Serabhañgajātaka. (522.) 


tassa' vacanarh sirasā sampaticchitvá' vanditvā 
Sakko pi uttha- 


151 


yåsanā М-авва thutirn katvā añjaslim paggayha suriyah na- 


massanto viya М-м патавзатёоо варагїзо pakkāmi. 


Etem attham vidiivā S. ima раа аһа“: 
a. Sutvāna gāthā paramatthasamhitā * 


subhësitë isinā panditena 


te vedaja(ë anumodemânā 


pakkāmu йеүй* devapuram yasassino. 90. 


+. Саша imā айћатвії suvyañjanā 


subhāsitāâ ізіша panditena, 


уо koc’ ітё utthikatvá зипеууа 


labhetha pubbāpariyam visesam, 
laddhāna puhbapariyam visesam 
adassanam шассигё}азва gacche ti, 91. 


Tattba рагашаќ авз hitë? ti” aniccšdinl dipanepa nibbinanissltü, 
ti idah S. Sarabbañgasattbuno nibbänadäyakath 
таппецќо аһа, (айа atthavatiti nibbànadåyskatthena paramatthanissitá, su- 
vyañjanā ti suparisuddħavyañjanā*, subbisitá ti sukathitá, atțbikatvā t! 
attano atthikabhšvarb katvā atthiko butvā sakkaccarü suneyya, pubbāpariyan 
ti ре{ћашајјЬёпаћ pubbaviseso dutiyajjhānarn aparavieeso tatlyajjbanam apara- 


&ätba ima 


vjaeso ti evam 


attbasamipatticatutnaggavasena pubbâparabhävena 


subbšasítarh 


tbitarn 10 


Yisesarn, adassenan ti рагіуоѕёпе арагауівеватї srahattarn labhitva nibbšënarh 


раропеууа, nibbănappaito hi puggalo maccurājassa adassanam galo паша hotîti, 


Evah S. агаһайепв desanakütam ganhitvë „Da bhikkbave idān’ 
eva pubbe pi Moggallanassa alahane риррһатаззаш авз" vatvā 
8, p. j. samodhënento 

аз. Salissaro Sāriputto Mendissaro са Kassapo 
Pabbato Anuruddho се Кассёуапо ca Devalo 
Anusisso са Anando Kisavaccho са'! Kolito 1? 
Sarabhango Bodhisatto, eva dhāretha jātakan ti аһа. 92. 
Sarabhangajatakam,. 


1 Ва» sarabbañgasatthuno. ? Ске paticeb-. 


gštháyo abhāsi. > Rd -saññitā. * во СЕ Bd for te? 


+ Ва закат! vasanatbáninl. < Bd 


-запйиз. 5 subħåsltà--- t wanting In C#. ° Bd omits su, 


11 Ске pana. 


19 Bds add nëBrado udāyitthero. 


7 Ck -mattharh-, Bd 


10 Ва tam. 


10 


15 


20 


?5 


90 


a 


15 


20 


95 


30 


152 ХҮП. Cattilisanlpāta. 


3. Alambusajataka, 


Atha braviti. Idam S. J. v. puršnadutiyikapalobha- 
паш! а. к, Vatthum Indriyajātake vitthāritam eva, 5. рапа (аш 


bhikkhum „васса kira (уаш bhikkhu Sukkanthito*“ ti? pucchitva 


„saccah bhante' ti „kena ukkanthëápito siti”. 


purāņadutiyikāyā ti 
vutte „bhikkhu eså itthi tuyham anatthakārikā, ғат etam оіѕѕёув 
јһапаш nāsetvā {їшї samvaccharāmı mülho уіѕабӣї* nipajjitvā uppan- 
naya вейбёуа maeháparidevam parideviti'" vatvā а. ё.: 

А. B. Br. r. k. Bo. Kasiratthe bráhmanakule nibbat- 
{Чуй vayappatto sabbasippesu* nipphattih patvā isipabbajjarh 
pabbajitvā araññāyatane vanamülaphalšáháro yāpesi. Ath’ ека 
migī tassa passávattháne sambhavamissakarn tiņah khadi' 
udakarr pivi, ettaken' eva tasmim pațibaddhacittā gabbham 
patilabhitvā tato pattháya tattha ágantvá° assamasámante' 
yeva carati. М, pariganhanto tarh káranarn aññāsi. Sā apara- 
bhāge manussadārakam vijāyi, M. tarn puttasinehena patijaggi, 
Isisiñgo ti ‘вва námam ahosi. Atha nar viññübhávarh patta" 
pabbajetva attano mahallakakāle tam ādāya Кагуапат nāma 
gantvā „tāta їтазтїїї Himavante imehi pupphehi sadisā itthiyo 
пата honti, tá'' attano vasagate mabāvināsarh pāpenti, tāsam 
vasan пата gantur na vattatiti“ ovaditvā aparabhāge Brahma- 
lokaparāyano ahosi. Isisiñgo pi jhānakīļarn kilanto Himavanta- 
padese vāsarb kappesi ghoratapo, parimāritindriyo ahosi, Ath’ 
assa silatejena Sakkabhavanarn Катрі. Sakko ёхајјапіо tarn 
káranarm ñatvā „ayab mam Sakkattā cšveyya'*“ чі „ekar 
accharar ревеїуй silam assa bhindāpessāmîti““ sakaladevalokarh 
upaparikkhanto attano addhateyyakotisamkhánarn'"” рагісёгікё- 
nam majjhe ека Alambnsarñ паша ассһагаш {ћареіуё аббат 
tassa silarn Ыһїпйїшї samattham adisvā taib pakkosāpetvā 
tassa silabhedah Каїшї anapesi. 


` Ва ukkanthitabbikkhum: 3 Bar esiti. 2 Скә ар + В -0. > Cka в. * Bd 
-&. 1 Bd іста. ° Bd katthaci agsntvš, adding tattheva tina khādi. * Bd 
assamassa-. 1 Bd vñülütappattarn. !' Cks tam. 12 Cks сёре-. 1! Ck sam- 
їһашат, C? -sarhkanarh, Hd -rañkhatanari. 


3. Alambusajštaka. (523.) 153 


Ftam ! attham avikaronto S. imei’ g. а.:` 
1. Ath’ abravi Ьгаһа Indo УаїтаЬһй? јаувіат pitā 
Чехакаппаш parābhetvå Sudhammayam Alambusan: ti. 93, 
Tattba brahā ti маһа, Vatrabbū tí Vatrassa nama asurassa abbl- 
bbavitā, jayatampitā tl Јауапёёпат sesšnarn tettirnsāya devaputtánarh piti- 
uiccasādhanenat рїї, paršbletvš t! hadayarh bhinditvë olokento viya tamı 
patibalā ayan ti natvā Ц attho, Sudhammaysn ti Sudhsmnmaya devasabhaya 
Pandukambalasilšsane nisinno tarh Alambusarn раккозареіуё idam aha: 
a. Misse devā tai’ уйсаоі Тётабийзё saindaka: 
isih palobhike gaccha Isisingam Alambuse ti. 94. 
Тайһа Misso ti (ат alspati, idan  tassë namerh, sabbâpi pana і уо 
puríae' kilesamissanena  miseatato шіѕеё ti vuccanti, tena sâdbāraņena náme- 
nñlapanto ' evam ha, isl palobhike ti isinarn palobhanasamatthe, 


Isisiñgan t tassa kira matthake miganlñgškšárena dve cūlā utthahirnsu, tasmā 
ета vuccati. 


Sakko'° ,gaccha lsisiñgarh upasarhkanjitva attano vasar 

ānetvā silam assa bhindā“ ti АЈашіиѕатћ āņāpesi. 
s. Puráyarn amhe acceti'! vatavā brahmacariyavā 

nibbānābhirato vaddho" 

tassa maggāni йсага'' iti vacanam à, 95. 

Tattba puršyan ti ayaiñ tàpaso vattasampanno са brahmactariyavñ са, во 
kho pan’ esa digháyukatáya nibbšnasarhkháte magge abhirato gunavuddhiyá са 
vaddho!t (авшё yāva езе ашһе nñtikkamati па abhlbhavitvā mamba thanë 


сїзөїї!? бітай ета (таты gantvā tassa devaloksgamanani maggāni acara!t, yatbā 
idba nâgacchati evarh karobiti attho. 


Tam ѕшуа Alambusa gathadvayam aha: 

+. Devarāja kim eva (хат, шап’ eva tuvam” s' ikkhasi'°: 
“ейп palobhike'* gaccha’, santi aññápi accharā 96. 

6. Madisiyo pavará c' eva asoke Nandane vane, 

tāsam рі hotu pariyāyo, tâpi yantu palobhikā ti. 97. 


1 Bd tam. 3 Віз pathamain. 3 so all three MSS. and Abhidhēnappadipikā 
for -hū hā? * Ске piti-, Bd pitukiccarnsë-. * Сёз nah. * Ва idañca. ! Bå 
-зепа. * Bd -шіввепа, ° Bd guņanāmenā-. !° Bd iti sakko. t Bd nâceeti, 
12 Ва buddhbo. 1% Rds švara. 2* Bd vu-, 25 Ck сёреві, Bd cāvesi. !® Bd ava, 
1? Oks tvah. 18 во all three MSS. for yikkbasi? ?° Bd -bhake, Bš -bhane. 


10 


15 


20 


35 


10 


15 


20 


95 


154 XVII Cattšlimanipata. 


Tattha kimeva tvan (1 Кій nam' etah tvarb Каговій dipeti, mameva 
tuva’ slkkhasiti? Imasmirh sakaladevaloke шаш eva tuvarh іЕкһазі? абба 
па passasiti adbippayena vadati, sakāro* рап’ ейһа vyanjanasandhikaro, Isir 
palobhike gacchă 1 kirbkárapa шәй пеха evarh vadasiti адЫррвуо, pa varë 
cevā 1 mayš uttarilarñ c eva, авоке ti ғокагаћіќе, папдапе ti nandi- 
}апайв, рагіуёуо t! varo. 


Tato Sakko tisso găthā abhāsi: 
e Addhă hi saccam bhanasi, santi aññápi accharā, 
tādisiyo pavarā c' eva авоке Nandane vane, 98. 
т. Na të evarh pajánanti pāricariyam ротаф gatā 
уйёЧїзат tvarb pajānāsi nāri sabbaügasobhane', 99. 
s. Tvam eva gaccha kalyāni, itthinarn pavarā с' asi, 
tam eva уаппагйрепв vasam āvāmayissrasiti®, 100. 


Tattba puma gatš ti purisah upassrbkantë samšnë purisspalobhsni- 
рёгїсапуаго па jānanti, уаппагйрепа "(1 sarirsvanpeu' eva са rüpasampattiyá 
ca, šnamaylsaasiti! tah їаразага attano уават ânessasi. 


Tarh sutvā Alambusā dve gātbā abhāsi: 
» Na у" аһа na gamissāmi devaraájena pesitā, 
vihemi’ с” etah ásadum, uggatejo hi brāhmaņo. 101. 
зо. Aneke nirayarh pattā isim āsādiyā’ janë 
арапоё '° iohasarhsárarm, tasmā lománi harsaye ti. 102. 


Tattha па vähan ti па ve abar, vibemiti!! bhayñmi, šsšàdun ti ав% 
ditum, i. v. h.: пёһага deva (ауё резієа па gamlssāmi, па у аһа tarh їзїї 
silabhedanattháya ауф !! bháyami, uggatejo bi so tl, š8 š diya ti āsādetvā 
mohagarhešran ti тпоһепа!* sarbsšrarn, mobana isim palobhetvë sarhsararh 
ñpanpš!5 vattedukkhe petitthlta satta gaņauapatherh atikkantš, tasmā t| tena 
karananšharn lomanil bamhsaya (і lomani utthapemi, tassa kirâbarn silam 
bhindissamiti cintayamšnëya me 1ошапї harnsantitl vadati, 


11. Idah vatvāna раккёті accharā nama vannini 
missñ missetum icchapti [sisingam Alambusā, 103. 


1 Сә tvah. 2 во all threo MSS. for yikkba-? 3 Сіз sikkhasl. * Cis yakåro, 
> Ва -ne. * Bd anaylssasiti. 7 Ске апа-. ° so Cks for bibhemi? Bd viromi. 
9 Bd -ya '°С-а 1* Bd viromiti. '? Bd арі саһап in the place of na 
vāhańm. 25 Ck illji-. !* Ck? moba. !* Ck Bd -а, C# -a corr. to -à. 


8 


Alembussjataks. (523.) 


п. 88 са паш! vanam ogayha Isisiñgena rakkhitam 


bimbijalakasañchannam samanta addhayojanam 104. 


1в. Рёќо va pātarāsambi udanhasamayarm ° pati 


aggittham parimajjantam Isisingam upāgamîti 105. 
imë abhisambuddhagatha. 


155 


Tattha pakkamiti tena hi devarājā avajjayyasi man (1 attano sayana- 
gabbbarn pavisitvā slarnksritvë lsisiñgarn КПевепа шіввесот Icchsnti раккаші, 
bbikkbave sš accherā tassa азвашат раќа (12, bimbijšlakasañchannan (1 


rattakuravakavanena’ вабсћапраф. рё со та pšátaršsambit bhikkhave рёќагё- 


вате1аув раќо та page уста Шїтараре? (1 ойапћавашауаћ ё раї? suril- 


yuggamanaveläyam ета, aggittban И aggisšlarn тайїрайһїпаг® enuyuñjlitvā 


рабо va паһа{уа udakakiccarn katvā раппава!аул 1Ьокат јћапавокћепа vīitinā- 
етуд nikkbamitvā aggiešlarh sammajjantah’ isih в& upágami, itthiçilasarh 
dassenti 2° tessa purato atthšsl. 


Atha пат tápaso pucchamāno аһа: 
1. Ка nu vijju-r-ivábhási osadhī viya tārakā 
vicitrahatthábharaná'' āâmuttamanņikuņdalā 106. 
з», Adiccavannasarnkásá hemacandanagandhanī 
saññatürü mahámëyá kumārī сагодакѕапа 107. 
1. Vilākā mudukā suddhā, рада te suppatitthit&, 
Кашапа'* катапїуё te haranti'* ñeva me mano. 


эт. Anupubbā уа'' te ürü nāganāsasamūpamā, 
vimatthë tuyharn susson akkhassa phalakarn yathā', 109. 
19. Uppalassêva kiñjakkhā nābhi te sādhusanthitā 
рога карћайјапаввёуа dürato patidissati. 110. 


з. Duvidhā jātā urajā ауап{а!* sādhupaccudā " 


payodharā appatītā addhalābnsamā'* thanņā, 111. 


зо. Dighë kambutalābhāsăā ” gīvā eņeyyakā yathā. 


pandaršvaranë vaggu catutthamanasaonibhā. 112. 


! Bd taio. 


3 Ва unbesa-. 


Ва udanbe-. 7 Che pati. 


all thres MSS. -i. 


Bd са, 
pandu-. 


3 Bd omits Ч. * Bd -vannens. 
5 Ca тайип-, Bd rattipatanam. 
11 Ва vicitta-. '? Bd gamanê. 


18 Ва adds atha nar tāpaso pucchamāno. 


18 Bd adaphilu-. 


19 Ва kappukalš. 


108. 


5 На atlipage. 
* Dd adds ќаш. !° 


та Ва t, Ске otii, Н 


1! Bd ачарда? 


п сы 


- 


0 


15 


20 


#5 


10 


30 


156 XVII. Сапайван1рё. 


тп. Uddhaggā са adhaggā са dumaggaparimajjită 
duvija nelasambhūtā dantë tava sudassanā. 113. 
sa. Арапдага lohitantë jiñjukaphalasannibha' 
āyatā ca visālā са nettā tava sudassanā. 114, 
з. Nátidigha susammattha?* kanakagzāsamocitā’ 
uttamañgaruhá tuyharñ kesā candanagandhikë' 115. 
з.. Үйуаїа kasigorakkhā vanijánañ ca yá gati 
isinañ са parakkantam sañüñatanam ќараѕѕіпат — 116. 
as. Na te samasamarh passe asmim puthuvimandale °, 
ko vā (уат kassa vā putto, katharn janenu (ат mayan ti. 117. 


Tattba vicitrahatthabharanat ti vicitrehi® hatthābharaņebi вашапоё- 
gatš, Lamacsndanagandhiniti suvapnavannacatidansgandhavilepana, 


Ne- 
türü ti suvattitaghanaüru sampannaürulakkhana?', vilākâ ti sarhkhittamajjhaá 6, 
muduka (1 mudusukhumålä’, suddhå ti nlmmalà, зирра(1{{Һ1{В ti кашаю 
ра|һат1й phussantā висо patitthita, Kamana) ¢i gacchamānă!', kamaniy á 
U kantë kámetabbayuttakš, harauti!? бета me mano tl ote evarūpā" 
рагашепа ittbivilàsena camkamamtiyā tava райй nama citta harauti yeva, 
vimatthë tÍ visëlšà, виввоп1її ѕипдагавоії, akkbassá 'ti suvannaphalakarii tf 
vlya vieMā te sopiri vadat), up palasseva kiñJakkhša)5 ti niluppalakanņikā 
viya, капћайјапавяеуд !є '{] süqkhumakanhalomacitattá өғаш ába, duvidhâ 


ti gāthā thane vannern vadanto!! šha, te h! dve hutvâ ure Jātā vantassa abhāvā 
avant ure lsggñ eva hutvā sutfthu nikkħantattà sádbupaccuda' ° payassáidhá- 
гапаіо!? payodhari, appatītā (1 Ha-ppatitš amilštatàyañ? ға anabbhunnatatáya!l 


và na anto”? pavitthà t| appatitā, зиуаппарђаіаке thapitasuvannamayavattá- 


làbuno25 addhena sadisatiya addhalābusamânā than 


eneyyakk yathá ti 
enlmigasea ћі1* dīghå са зана ca givá воЬһап! evari tava giva 2 thokarn dighë 
kambutalábhšsa ?  suvanušliñgatalasannibhá gīvā (i attho, paņdarāvaraņā 
ti дап(ауагепё, catutthamanasanunlbhā ti cstutthamano vuccati catuttha- 
vatthubhūtà ?' jivhā, abbirattabbāvena Jivhšsadisan te otthapariyosânən tÍ vada, 
uddhaggà ti hetthimadanta, addhaggā (1 uparimadanta, dumagga pari- 


‹ Bd -на, * Dd pathavi.. * Bd vicitt-. 7 Ско „пе, * Cha -majjhe, Rd -majha, 
Ch e. !® Cs káamána, Віз дашапй. !: aoalltbree MSS. !? Ско garabantii, 
13 Rd epena. !* Bd sundaravannassasuvannassapalakarn. ! Bd kiñcikkbā, 14 
Ск kanħāja-, Сә kantabhaja-. '7 Ck ваа ne vanparn-, Bå katbam thane 
vannayanto. 16 Ске pandudå. !" Bd -вва-. ?° Chr amiyamarnatáya. °! С4 
-tatayá, Bd snubbhannatatšya. 32 Ска add na. 25 Ске -mayàeabundo. 2! Сіз 
omit hi. 3° Cks omit gìvă. 2% Rd adds ti. 2 Се catuuhabbūtā, Bd catuttha- 
manavatthubhūtā. 


3. Alambusajštaka. (523.) 157 


majjitā 0 dantskattbaparimajjitā’ parisuddhā, duvijā 1! dvijā, nelasam- 
bhüta ti niddosesu hanumarhsapariyomānesu sambhūtā, арапйагВ ti kanha, 
lobitantš? ti rattaparlyantš, Jiñjukaphalasannibbā (1 rattatthšáne jiñjuka- 
Pphalenadisá, sudassanā (і passantānain atlttakarš ° rañcappasidasamanniëgatš, 
natiíidigha 11 pamanayuttë, susemmațțhā ti sutthu sammaițhâ, kana- 
kaggš ° samocitā ti kanakaggāâ* vuccati suvannaphanikë tàya 5 gandhatelari * 
&dšyas раһагік&? suracitàa , kapmigorakkha t! iminā Кавій? са gorskkhaü са 
піввёуа Jivanasatte'? daseeti, уй расї сі?! yatulka!? nipphatti, parakkantan 
ti yattakah isinəm parskkantarn’?, vittbšrikatá !t Imasmih Himavante yattakā 
lssyo vasantlii attho, па te samassman ti tesu sabbesu ekam pi rüpalilšá- 
vilāsādisamatāya'’ taya!" samar ла passimi, ko và tvan tl Idar tassë ittht- 
bhāvarh na Jšánanto pl puriaavohšñravasena pucchi. 


Evam pādato patthāya yāva kesā attano vannarm bhāsante 
tāpase Alambusā tunhi hutvā tassa kathāya yathánusandhim 
gatāya tassa sammülhabhávam ñatvà 

ы. Na pañhakálo bhaddan te Kassap' evan gate sati, 
ehi samma ramissãma ubho ап›һаКатп assame, 
ehi” tarn apagūhissarh гаїїпагт kusalo bhavā ‘ti р. й. 118. 


Tatha Кавварета!й gate ваії сі Kassapagoita ехат !% tava cltte 
pavatte eati pañbakālo na boti, sam më ‘і vayassa!’, ratinan ti рабса- 
kämagoparatinarh, 


Evar vatvá Alambusā cintesi: „uâyar тата țhitāya °° 
hatthapassam *‹ āgamissati, gacchanti viya bhavissāmiti’™‘ sà 
itthimāyāya kusalatāya tšpasam kampetvá āgatamaggābhi- 
tnukhi?" páyási, 


Tam attham ракаѕепіо Satthā: 
зт. Idam vatvâna pakkami accharā kamavannini 
missă missetum icchanti Jsisinpam Alambusā ti g. 8, 119. 


1 Bd dantaothapari-. 2 Bd lohitan. ? Па atitti-. * Bd» „аһу, 5 Cke -рћапі- 
Кёуа, Bæ -palikātāya. “ Ck -tela, С° -kelain, Bd -tesam. 7 Bd -kā. ° Bd 
восагііз. * Ck -і, Сә -ï. 10 Bds jivanakssatte. 11 Ck gati, Се gani. '? Bd 
yattba. 15 Ck -ta. 10 Bd -тНакасеа? 15 Bds -lîlbà-. !% Bd tassa. !! С! 
adds са, Ck ша. !5 ohl samma--- eva) wanting in Bd. 19 Ck cayassa, 
Bd piyavacanarh mà Іарапеше(ат. 30 Cke (азва, Bd mayi tbitāya, ?' № 
-pāsam. 32 Bai gamisašmlti. 23 Bd -kharn. 


10 


15 


20 


10 


15 


20 


во 


158 ХҮП. Сасвапіріа. 


Аа nar tāpaso gacchantim dievā „ayah gacchatiti“ 
attano dandhaparakkamarn' mandapamanarh chinditvà vegena 
dhāvitvā kesesu hatthena рагатазі. 


Таш attham ракёѕепќо Satthë aha: 
sa. So са vegena nikkhamma chetvā dandbaparakkamam ' 
tam uttamāsu venisu ajjhāpatto parāmasi. 120. 
зә. Таш udávattam Кайуапї palissaji ° susobhanā ' 
саті tamhi° Ьгаһтасагіуё* yathā ќат atha tositā. 121. 
во. Малаха‘ āgamā Indam чаѕапќаф Nandane vane, 
tassā samkappam anñaya Maghavâ devakuñjaro 
реПаткеш pahini khippam зотаппаш sopavāhanam 122. 
и. Sauttaracchadapapñásam `  sahassapatiyatthatam”, 
tam enam tattha dhāresi ure katvāna sobhanā. 123, 
и. Yathā ekamubuttam va Өш vassāni dharayi 
vimado tihi vassehi patibujjhitvāna !° brābmaņo. 124, 
яз. Addasāsi harirukkhe'' samantá '* aggiyayanam 
pavapattayanam phullam kokilaganaghositam '*, 125, 
a. Samantá paviloketvü'* rudam assüni vattayi, 
пв juhe па јаре mante, aggihuttam в haápitam, 126, 
вв. Ко пи me рӣгісагіуёуа pubbe cittam palabhayi 
вгайбе те viharato уо ше ќеја ha sambhatarn '* 
оёоёгаќіапарагірігаф патат va ganhi annave ti. 127. 


Tattha ajJhapatto t! sampatto, ќашидатассаг !6 kalyšaniti tarn 
kese parñrpasitva thitari їзїп udavattitvá nivattitvë kalyànadasssaná så вп|!һи 
ворћаоё, palissajiti šliñgl, саті tamhí!! brabmaceriyë yathëá ќа 
atha {08118 ti bhikkbave tassa івіпо tāvad eva jbānah aptaradhayi, tasmim 
tambi Jbanà brahmacariyā cavite yathā tai Sakkena patthitarh'® tath’ eva 
ahosi, atha Sakkassa pstthanāsamiddbəbbāvamh '® viditvá sā devakañāâ tositā, 
tassa tena brahmacariyávinšsena 20 sañjanitapili рїто]]айа!&1! ti attho, manas 
agama ti sà tarb allngitvë (1а aho vata Sakko pallarùkarn ревеууё ’ti етагп?* 
pavattena шапаай Indah agama, Naudane ti nandijananasamatthatāya 
Nandanavanasarhkhàte Tavatirhasbbavane vasantarb, devakuñjaro ti Dova- 


` Bd daddhu-. ? Ва daddha-. ? Ck pallssapi, Bd palisajji. * Bd ssaaobbani. 
5 Bd tehi.  Cks -yaya, ? Cks së ma-. Š Bd -за. *# Ck -вайаїый, Cè -yatta- 
tan, Bd yattbakah, ?° Bd parivijhitvānas. 1: Bd baritaru-. 11! Bd samannā. 
13 Che -lā-, 18 C%s pați-. '5 so Ck; C? teJjabhasam-, Bas tejahasambhü-. !* 
all three MSS. -tta. 1 Bd tebi. 15 во all tbree MSS. !# Bds -nāyasami-. 
20 Ба -yavauñsane. 2! Bà -шејја, omitting katā. 2° Cts eva. 


3. Alambusajātals. (523.) 159 


settho, pahiniti! pesesl, pābinîtl? рі pāļbo, sopavšhanan t| sapari- 
уйата, sauttaracchadapañĀāsan tl paññasšya uttaracchadehi paticchadítarm, 
sahassapatiyatthatan ti sahassadibbakojavatthatarn 5, 1ашепаш tatthā 'Ч 
tar Ieisingarn tattbe dibbspsllarhke nistnoā sā иге* kstva dharesi, (ipi 
vassāniti? екат ё mmnhuttarn viya manusssgananiya tīni vassāni tah оге 
nipajjāäpotvā tattha пїзїппат ? dhāresi, vimado ti pimmado vigatavlsaññabhavo, 
во hi tini вабғассћагіпі тіваййо sayitvā paccba patiladdhassñño pahujjhi", 
tasmih pabujjhamane hetthádipbandanarm disvā va Alambusā tassa pabujjhana- 
bhāvarù Āatrā pallarokahn antaradħāpetvā sayam pi апаға а!{һаз|, 
addasāsîfti!? аззатарайап olokento kena nu kho 'mhl siNavinásanam '! 
pšplto ti cintetvā mahsntena saddena paridevamāno addasa'?, bariruk kbe?’ 
ti aggiyāyatanasarnkhātarh ™* aggieālah ватапі& parivāretvā (bite haritapatta 15 
rukkhe, navapattavanan i taraņehi navapattehi sarnchannarh тапаг, 
rudan ti parldavanto, na јиће па }арв!* mante?!” tí ayam азва pari- 
devanagâātbā, shāpitan ti bapitarñ, акато! upasaggamattarh, pāricariyāyā 
"1 ko nu Hilesapáricariyaya lto pubbe mama cittah pelobhayiti paridevati, 
yo! me tejšhasambhetan30 ti hakāro?! nipātamattah уо mama samana- 
tejena вашЬһа(апп?? }Һападппатп nānàratanspunņpah’® mabappave пата viya 
ganhi vinäsarh pápesi ko лёт’ ево tl регійез! "4. 


Тата sutvā Alambusá сїшїезї: „„вас` āhah na kathessāmi 
ayah me abhisapissati, hand’ assa kathessāmiti‘ sā dissa- 
тоёпепа ?* kăyena {һаїуй 

s. Ahan te pāricariyāya devarājena pesitā 

avadhī™” cittarn cittena, ратада tvam na bujjhasiti g. ё. 128. 

So tassā kathah sutvā pitarā dinnaovādah™ saritvā 
»pitu уасапатй akatvā шаһйуїпйзат! patto 'mhiti“ paridevanto 
catasso gāthā abhāsi: 

вт. Imäni kira marh täto Kassapo anusásate ™:; 
kamalāsaris’ itthiyo **, tayo bujjhesi māņava, 129. 
ве. Оте gandayo bujjhesi, tāyo bujjhesi тапаха, 
ісс-аповёзі тап (а(о yathā шаш anukampako. 130, 


1 Ва рё-, Cha раћіпїй. 2 Ck pahimiti, Сг pahinlti, Bd pabiņiti. ° Bd -kam. 
* Bd uttare. ° Cks omit vassënitl. * Bd ека. ? Bd -прё. ° В -itvā adda- 
sāsiti. *# Ва -Hvi. 10° Bd adds so. !' B2 -nāsah. !? Bd -вёзі. 3 Bd 
haritaru-. !* СЁ# eggiyāyana-. 15 Bd -tte. !* Bd Jappe. !1 Chr -40. !® 
Ва а-. 1% Сіз уе, 39 Ска -bhesamabatan, Bd -hasambbutan. >°! Сэ bbakaro. 
з Bd һат. 33 Rd -pari риппат mahantarn. %# Bd -vatl. 3: Ck disasa-, 
mënena, Ck dissssamšnena, Bd disamānena. 2 во Ct for -dhirhn? Ck Bd -dhi. 
a pd д\ппаш-. 15 Ва sti, 2° Ске kamma-, Bd kamalšsirlplttlso. 


10 


30 


25 


30 


10 


15 


20 


30 


160 XVI). Cattšlisanlpëta, 


зо. Tassáharm vacanam nákarh pitu vaddhassa' sàsanam, 
агаййе nimmanussamhi sv-ājja-jjhāyāmit ekako. 131. 

ао. S0 `ham (аһа karissãmi, dhi-r-atthu }їуйепа me, 
puna уй tādiso hessa, шагапат* me bhavissatîti. 132. 


Tattha imanttl imšni vacanani, kamalāsarisitthiyot ti kamali’ 
voccai! nari phullatšya°, pupphasadisā itthiyo, tāyo bujJhesiti? māņava 
tàyo Jäneyyāsl, бача dassanapatbarh agantvā” рајауеууазі?, yāni evarūpāui 
тесапёпі (айё шат tālo anusāsati imâni lra tānîti'®, ure рардёуо ti 
uramhi dvibí dvibi!! gandehi samannágatayo, tayo bujjbesiti!3 tayo attano 
таввраќе '5 viušsarh păpentiti janeyyšsi!4, пёкап ti nêkarih, јһауёшін 
pajjbâyām! '* paridevâmi, dhiratthu Jivitena me tl dhi-r-attbu garabitarh 
mama jivitarn)%, Jivitena ше ko attho, puna уп {1 tathë Кагівваші yathá puna 
(50180 {7 па bhavissãmi, natthajjbanarn !° uppādetvā vītarāgo bbaviseāmi, 
шагапагп!? me bhavlssaliti. 


So Катагаратћ °° pahāya™ jhānain uppādesi. Ath’ assa 
samaņatejarh disvā jhānassa са uppăditabhāvarh ñatvā Alam- 
busā bhitā khamāpesi. 


Тат attham pakāsento Satthâ dve gāthā’”’ аЫһазї: 

ат. Tassa tejañ са viriyañ са dhitiñ ca ñatvā svatthitam 
зігазё aggahi pāde Isisiñgan Alambusãā. 133. 

+з. Mā me kujjhi?* wahāvīra, mā me kujjhi?*' mahāisi '*, 
mahā attho шауй сіппо tidasanam yasassinam, 
tayā pakampitam āsi sabba devapuram tadā ti. 134. 


Atha nam so „kbamāmi te bhadde, yathásukham расеһа“ 

‘ti vissajjento 
«в. Tāvatihsā ca уе devā tidasānañ ca Vāsavo 

tvañ ca bhadde sukhi hohi, 

gaccha kaññe yathasukhan ti g. š. 135, 

Sā (аф vanditvā ten’ eva suvannapallañkena deva- 
рогат раќа. 
3 Bd vudb-. 3 Ва sçajjajhš-, 3 Скв add уа, * Ске kamma-, Bd kamalāsiripittiyo. 
5 Све kammalā. 6 Ck phalla, R phullatātāsarh. 7 Bd bujjha-. ° Bd ā-. "Ba 
malāpeyyãsiti. !9 Hd ламі '! Bd omits опе dvibi. 12 Bd bujhasiti шапата. 
13 Rds vagare. !* Bd omita jā-. 1% Ck omite pa-, Dd bas sajhā-. !* Che 
omit ji- !? Ва adds та !# Bë nathahjhā-, 1" Bd adds vā. 239 Ске egar. 
351 Bd adds puna. 7? Bd -вуо. 22 Bd -a. 24 Bd -в. 


1. Sarkhapšlajitaks. (524.) 161 


Tam atthan раказепіо S. tisso gāthā аЬћазі: 
44. Tassa раде gahetvana Ката са nam padakkhinam 
añjalim' paggahetvüana ќвтһа thánë враккаті, 136. 
a Yo са tass&si?pallarnko ѕотаппаѕорвтёћапо? 
sauttaracchadapaññâso ° sabassapatiyatthato ° 
tam eva pallamkam aruyha ара детара santike, 137. 
в. Тат okkam iva āyantih‘ jalantaih vijjutah yathā 
patito sumano vitto devindo' adadā varán ti. 138. 


Tattha okkamivā 'її dipam viya, patito ti ādīhi pi tutthākâro va 
давчісо?, a dada varan ti agantvë vanditvā tbitaya tuttho vara adāsi. 
Sā tassa ѕапііка'° vara ganhanti osānagātham ā.: 
«. Varañ се ше ado Sakka sabbabhñtánam issara 
па isipalobhiyarm'! gacche, etarn'* Sakka vararn vare ti. 139. 


Tass’ attho: Sakka детагаја sace me (тага varan ado puna isipalobhikāya 
na дассһеууат mi marb etadatthäya pahineyyāsi etan varam varemitl, 


S. tassa bhikkhuno i.d. а. s. р. ј. в. (Saccapariyosāne so bhikkhu 
sotëpattiphale patitthahi): „Тада Alambusā purānadutiyikā ahos, 
Івівібдо ukkanthitabhikkhu, pitā mahāisi aham еүй" ‘ti. Alam- 
busajatakam. 


4. Samkhapálajátaka, 

Атіубувказо вій, Idam S. J. у. uposathakammam а. k, 
Tadā bi S. ,uposathike орёваке sampahamsetvā porāņakapanditā 
mabatirn '* nagasampattim '* pahāya ирозайһаш. upavasihsu yevš“ ti 
Yatvë tehi yācito a, Āā.: 


A. Rājagahe Magadharājā r. kāresi. Tadā B. tassa rañño 
aggamahesiyā kucchinihi nibbatti, Duyyodhano ti 'ssa пашай 


karirhsu. So vayappatto Takkasilāya'* sippah™ uggaņhitvā 
āgantvā pitararh addasa. Atha nari рїїй rajje abhisiñcitvë isi- 


1 Bd л. 2 Ва tassābhi. 3 C? -pnāso-, Ва -ппово-. * Bd sarm-, > Bd -ko, * 
Се Ва -і, 7 Ch cino, C? citto, © Bdz dipakarh, * Cka va ssito. '° Ві -ke. 
Yt Ваг Gitar. — 12 Cks ета. 4. Cfr. В. & Carlyšp. by R. Morris pe 91. !? 
Ске „ti, Bd ti. 14 Ck -1, Bd -i, 15 Ва „уат, '* Bds sabbssippāni. 

ГТА 11 


10 


162 ХҮП. Carttšlisanipšta. 


pabbajjam pabbajitvā uyyáne vasi, В. divasassa' tikkhatturn 
pitu santikarn agamáësi', maháláabhasakkáro udapädi, So tena’ 
palibodhena kasipaparikammamattam pi kātu asakkonto cin- 
tesi „mahā ine lābhasakkāro, na sakkā mayā idha vasantena 
imat }а{аш bhinditurh, puttassa anārocetvā va aññattha ga- 
missāmíti“ во kañci‘ ajānāpetvā uyyānā nikkhamma Magadha- 
rattham atikkamitvā Mahimsakaratthe' Sarnkhapáladahato 
пата nikkhantāya Kannapennaya  nadiyá піуа(ќапе Candaka- 
pabbatarh nissaya' раппавй!аш katvā tattha° vasanto kasiņpa- 
parikammam Ка{уа jhanabbiññam'"  nibbattetvë uñchācariyāya 
уёрезі. Тат ерат Samkhapšálo пёта nágarájá mahantena 
рагіуёгепа Каппареопапайіќо '° nikkhamitvā antarantarā upa- 
sarhkamati, so tassa dhammar deseti", Ath’ assa putto 
pitararn datthukámo Kkvatatthánarh ajānanto anuvijjāpetvā "° 
„asukatthāne nāma vasatiti“ ñatvā tassa dassaoatthāya 
паћапѓепа parivárena tattha gantvà ekamante !* khandhāvāram 
nivesetvá?)' katipayehi amaccehi saddhirn assamapadabhimukho 
pāyāsi. Tasmińh khane Sarnkhapaálo mahantena parivárena dh. 
sonanto nisIdi, so tarh rājānah āgacchantarh disvā isih van- 
ditvā uttháya” pakkámi, Rājā pitararh vanditvá pațisanthārarh 
Касуа nisīditvä pucchi: ,bhante katararājā nām’ ева tumhëkarh 
santikarh agato“ ti. „Tāta Samrkhapālanāgarājā nām’ ево“ 
ti, So tassa sampattih nissāya nägabhavane lobhar 
katvā katipāham vasitvā pitu bhikkhāhāram nibaddham dā- 
ребќуӣ!* attano nagaram eva gantvā catūsu dvāresu dánasálarm'' 
kāretvā'” sakala-Jambudipam khobhento™ дапаф datvā silah 
rakhhitvá ороваћакагттат °° katvā nágabhavanam patthetvā 
ауорагіуовёпе nëgabbavane nibbattitvā Sarnkhapālanāgarājā 


1 Bd divase dlvase. 9 Bd а-. > Bd teneva. * Bd kiñci. ° Сіз mahlseka-. * 
Ва каппатарпёуа. ? Ce Bd upani-. % Ско omit tattha. ° Bd -pü&. '° Bd 
kanpavanna-, !! Ва „в. !3 Ске -vljjhā-, Bdz апихісёгіректё. '? Bd -tarb. '* 
Ва nivā-. 15 Bd uțbāyāsanā. 1% СЕ nibaddhāpetvā, Се nloddhāpətvā, Bd 
шіЪардћа ds-. 17 Bd „уо, 1° Bd karšpetvá. '% Bd sañkhobbhanto, %° 
Ва -tbavāsaka-. 


4. Sswrkhapilajataka. (524.) 163 


ahosi. So gacchante' kāle tāya sampattiyā уірра(івёгї hutvā 
tato patthëya manussayonirm patthento uposathavāsarh vasi, 
ath’ assa nāgabhavane vasantassa uposathavëso na sampajjati, 
sīlavināsah рарорай, во tato pattháya nāgabhavanā nikkha- 
mitvë Карпареопёуа’ avidūre таһашарразва са ekapadika- 
maggassa ca antare ekar vammtikarn parikkhipitvă uposatharn 
adhittháya samādionasīlo , mama cammena айћіка’ camma- 
шагйайф@їһ1* atthikā marmsadini' harantū“ "і attánam dana- 
mukhe vissajjetvā vammikamatthake nipanno samanadhammarh 
karonto cātuddase’ раппагазе уавієуа pátipade' nágabhávanam 
gacchati. Tasmih ekadivasar evarh silam samüadiyitvá ni- 
panne’ рассап{арйётауйвїпо solasa janë „mamsar aáharissámë““ 
‘ti āvudhabatthā araññe carantä’ kiñci alabhitv& nivattá'!" tarn 
vammikamatthake пїраппагп disvā „mayar ajja godhapotakamn 
рї па labhimha, imah nāgārājānarn vadbitvā khadiss&mëš“ 'ti 
ciutetvā „шаһа kho pan’ eaa, gayhamāno paläyeyyāpi'', yathā 
nipannam eva tar '* Ьһодева sülehi vijjhitvā dubbalah katvā 
ganhissšmá“ "і варі adàya upasarmkamimen. В-азвёрі 
sariram mahantam ekadonikanávappamënarh vattetvā’`’ thapita- 
sumanapuppbadámam viya jiñjukaphalasannibhehi akkhthi 
jayasumanapupphasadisepa sisena зашаппвйёраїап!!* ativiya во- 
bhati, во tesarn solasannam janánarm райазаййепа bboganta- 
rato sisarn niharitvá rattakkhini ummiletvë te sülahatthe 
āgacchante disvá cintesi: „ajja тлаућат manoratho matthakarn 
pšpunissati, ahah attānan dānamukhe niyyādetvā viriyam 
adhittbahitvá nipanno, ime те вагїтай sattIhi kottetvá "“ 
chiddavichiddah karonte kodhavaseua akkhini nmmiletvā na 
olokessāãmîti'*“ attano silabhedabhayena dalbarh adbițtbānarn" 


1 Сә Bd rapeat ga-. # Ck -ріппауа, Bd -vaunaya. ? Bd omits cammiena atthikà. 
* Сёз сашшаш-. ° Bd cammamamsā-. * Chs si. ? Ce -pade, B2 patipada. 
Š Ске -о. ° Bd vicaranto. '° Hds nikkhamantă. !! Bd -u, Ba palapeyyšte. !? 
Ck ета паш. !2 Cs таце-. !* Ва" to. 1$ Сг Bd kote-. '* Bá -oyyämiti. 
17 Ва omite adbi-. 

11* 


15 


=” 


164 ХҮП. Cattālisanipāta. 


adhitthāya sisarb bhogantare yeva pavesetvá пірај)і. Atha 
nam te upagantvā nañgutthe gahetvā kaddhantâ bhümiyam 
påtetvā tikhipasüúlehi' atthasu thānesu vijjhitvā sakantaká" 
kálavettayatthiyo pahāramukhehi рауевебуй atthasu thānesu 
Касеһ” ādāya'° magga patțipajjihsu. М.' sūlehi vijjhanato 
patthāya ekattháne рі kodhavasena akkhini ummiletvá te na 
olokesi, tassa atthahi kāceh’ ādāya* пїууашйпавза аїват olam- 
bitvā bhümiyarn pahari. Atha nam ,sisam assa oJolambatiti“ 
mahāmagge орірајјареіуй taruņasūlena nāsāpuțe vijjhitvā 
rajjukah pavesetvā sisah ukkhipitvā ca kotiyah’ laggetvā 
puna” ukkhipitvá magga pațipajjihsu. Тазший khane Vide- 
haratthe Mithilanagaravāsī Āļāro nāma kntumbiko pañca sa- 
kațasatăni аёййуа sukhayānake nisiditva gacchanto te bhoja- 
putte В-аш tathā ganhitvá gacohante disvā tesan во]аваппаш 
рі solasahi vāhagoņehi saddhim разаќаф pasatan suvanna- 
müsake sabbesam nivâsanapârupapāni bhariyánarm рї tesam 
vatthābbaraņāni datvā vissajjāpesi. So nágabhavanam gantvā 
tattha papañcarn akatvā mahanteoa parivārena nikkhamitvā 
А}ёгатй upasaikamitvā nāgabhavanassa увппат kathetvā tar 
ādāya nāgabhavanarh gantvā tīhi’ nāgakañňāsatehi saddhirn 
mahantam assa yasarh datvá dibbehi kāmehi santappesi. 
Āļāro nāgabhavane еКаш'° уавваф vasitvā dibbe' kāme 
paribhuñjitvá ,icchám' ahah samma pabbajitnn“ ti nāgarä- 
jassa kathetvë pabbajitaparikkhāre gahetvā págabhavanato 
Himavantapadesah gantvā pabbajitvā tattha ciran vasitvá 
арагабһаде сёгікат сагапїо Bāraņasih patvā'° гајоууйпе va- 
sitvā punadivase bhikkhāya парагаф pavisitvā rajadvaram aga- 
шаві". Atha nam Bārāņasirājā disvā iriyápathe pasīditvā 
pakkosāpetvā paññattāsaue nisīdāpetvā nānaggarasabhojanarn 


t Bd акы. ? Bd ~ia, * Cs kācehā ādāya, Ваз рајепайауа. * Chi -e > 
Ва kājshi ā-. 6 Ва nāsapuțsn, 7 Ва кајако. ° Rd adds pi. * Ck (пі. 
о Bd а. 1 Bd dippa. ?° Bds рапіті. !* DA -4. 


4. Sarnhkbapëlajataka. (524.;, 165 


bhojetvá aññatarasmirn nice йвапе nisinno vanditvë tena sad- 
dhirh sallapanto pathamarm g. &.: 
з. Ariyāvakāso si pasannanetto 

maññe bhavarñ pabbajito kulamhā, 

kathan nu vitt&ni' pahāya bhoge 

pabbaji' nikkhamma ghará варайпа* ‘ti. 140. 


Й 


Tattha агіуётакёвовіі niddosasundarasariršávakšso abhirüpo sit attho' 
pasannanetto tí pañcabi pasâdebl yuttanetto, kulamhā tl khattiyabrah- 
manakuls vā setthikuls vā pabbajito sit! шаййаші, kathan nū `Ú kena nu 
kåraņona kirb arammanarh каста dhanañ ca upabhoge ca раһауа gharā nikkbs- 
mitvš pabbajlto в! варайПа* panditapurisã® `1 pucchati. 


Tatoparam tāpasassa са гаййо са vacanapativacanavasena 
gāthânain sambandho veditabbo: 

з. Saya vimānarh naradeva disvå 
mahānubhāvassa mahoragassa 
disvána puúüánam mahāvipākarh 
saddháyáharn pabbajito 'mhi гаја. 141. 

з. Na kāmakāmā па bhayā па довё 
vàcam musš pabbajitā hhananti, 
akkháhi ne pucchito etam attharn, 
sutvána me jâyihiti-ppasādo*. 142. 

г. Vanijja ° ratthādhipa gacchamāno 
pathe аддававіт hi milaácaputte' 
pavattakáyarnh' uragam mahantarh 
ādāya gacchante pamodamane'". 143. 

s. So "ат ввшаратта janinda tehi 
sarhhatthalomo '° avacasmi'' bhito: 
kohin ayam niyati bhimakáyo, 
năgena kih kāhstha bhojaputtā. 144. 


1 Ва el-. 2 Сёз pabbajja > Bd -о. * Rd -o ti. * Ck mebi jäyibiti-, Bd me 
Jšyld. © Bd хапа. 7 Cs bbīlāca- corr. to calāca, Bd Ыһо]апа ри-. 5 Bd 
pavadba-. * Bd -о, !0 Rds pah-. !! R avacasi, Cks avscasmim. 


зо 


15 


20 


35 


30 


166 


ХУП. CattalissÇnlpata. 


Маро ayam niyati bhojanattharn 
pavattakayo' огаро mahanto, 
вёдий са thülañ са muduñ ca marmnsam 


па tvarh ras` amñási Videhaputta. 145. 
. Ко шауаш gantvā sakai niketanarh' 


ādāya satthāni vikopayitvá 
marhsarh thokkhāma pamodamānā, 


тауаш hi vo sattavo pannagánam. 146. 
. Sace ayam niyati bhojanatthamn 


pavattakáyo' пгаро mahanto 
dadāmi vo balivaddani -во!ава, 
падат imam muñcatha bandhanasma. 


. Addhā hi no bhakkho ayarn manāpo 


bahü° ca по uragā‘ bhuttapubbā‘*, 
karoma te (атф уасапаш Alara, 

mittañ ca no hohi Videhaputta. 148. 
Tad assu te bandhaná їосауїїйви 
yam natthuto patimokkh' ussa pāse, 
mutto са so bandhanā nāgarājā 
pakkāmi расїпатикһо muhuttath. 149. 


‚ Gantvána pācīioamukho muhuttarh 


punnehi nettehi ра1оКауї mam, 
tad авв’ abam pitthito anvagañchim 
dasañgulirm añjalih paggahetvā. 150. 


. Gacch' eva * kho tvar taramānarūpo, 


mā tarh amittā punar aggahesum, 
dukkho hi luddehi punë samāgamo, 
adassauam bhojaputtána'gaccha, 151. 
Agamāsi so rahadarh vippasanuam 
utlobhasam ramauniyarmh sutittham 


` Bd ратафћа-. > Bd niketarn. > CH -uñ, * Bd -o. * so all three MSS. 


Сиг gaccheca. 


` Сг Bd -nam, CE -namna. 


147. 


4. Samkhapilajataka. (521.) 167 


samotatam' jambuhi vetasáhi *, 
pšvekkhi nittinnabhayo?’ patīto. 152. 
16. Зо tarh pavissa  pacirassa паро 
dibbena° me pātur ahü }апїпда, 
upatthah! mam pitarah va putto 
„һайауайдашаг kannasukharh bhananto. 153. 
в. Tva me ві mātā ca pitā са А]ага" 
abbhantaro pánadado saháyo, 
sakañ са iddhi patilabhito вті, 
Alāra passa me піуеѕапёпі 
pahātabhakkharh bahuannapānarh 
МаѕакКкавӣгат' viya Vāsavassā “і, 154. 
Tattba vimänan ti Sambkhapălanigarañño anakasatanatakasampatisam- 
pannan kañcanamanivimšnain, puññanan ti tens katânah puññanain ma- 
Һешат vipškarn disvā kammañ ca рһа!ай ca paralokañ са saddabltvā pavattāya 
saddhäya аһа! pabbajito, na kāmakāmā ti na vatthukâmena na р! bhaya- 
dosehi? гоовё bbananti, jăyihititl’? bbante tambäkaro vacanarh sutvå mayham 
рі равёдо somanaseaih jäyissati, vanijjan ti vanijjakammari, karissámitl gac- 
cbanto, pathe addasāsin t| pañcannam sak: гапаг purato sukhayáuake 
nisīditvā gacehanto пуаһйшаррв janapadamanusae addasah, pavajțtakāyan?! 
«і vaddhbitakáyarn, adá yá 'ti st(hahi kicebi!% gabetvë, avacasmin'® ti аһ 


bbimakišyo tl bhayajanakakëyo, bhojaputtā ti Juddake piyasamudācārenâla- 
pati, Vedohaputta)4 "і Vidoharatthavásitàya '* AJârarb '® álapirhau, vik opa- 


віть, 


yievā И cbinditvå, mayarh bl vo sattavo ti mayah pannngànarh verino 
пата, bhojanatthā ti? kbadanatrtbšya, mittañca no hohiti tvarn ambškarh 
mitto Lohi, ketagupamh jina, tadassu te ti таћагаја tebi bhojaputtebi erai 
vutte sharh tesao soļasavāhegone'® nivāsanspārupanāni pasatam рава(а!й au- 
vanpamâsake bhariyanañ ca tesari !* vattbālamkårarn ladšsirh, atha Sarhkhapala- 
nāgarājānam bhümiyarh nippajjâpetvă attano kakkhalatāya kanțakäcltā kålavetta- 
latā’®’ kotiyain gahetvá škaddhiturn arabhirnsu. а{һйһатп п arh kilamantarn 
akilamauto va авіна tā latá |chinditvā dārakênsh kannavedhato vattini- 
paniyāmena 99 adukkhāpento saplkah nīharib, tasmib kāle ta bhojaputtă 
yah Һапһапей: assa natthuto pavesetv pise patimokkhari tamā bandhanā 


) Bå sammonstah, 2 Сёз ceta-, Bd vedisābi. 2 Сё -yā, C? -yọ. * Oks -{вгагп, 
Bd -iseati. 5 Ске -ehi. * во all three MSS. for с Alāra? ? Bà pasakkararh- 
гіта. 5 Bd -a. ° Bd bbayəna pi dosena р! !° Bå jāylhiti, Cksjayihitl, 
Cs Jaylhiti. 1? Bd pavadba--. 13 Bd kājøhl. 13 so all three MSS. = avacariı 
asmin? '* so all three MSS. 15 Bd се. 1‹ Bd á-. !? pd adds bbojanattbâya. 
19 Chs -gopena, ° Bd пе-, 20 во Che; Bd sakandakacitakālavettalatāya. %! 
Dd atthilära. 


15 


35 


10 


15 


25 


168 XVII. Cattālisanipāta 


tah uragarn mocayirbsu, tassa nšseto saha рёвепа narh rajjukah пїһагїшай 'ti 
треп, iti 10 uragan vlasajjotvā thoharn gantvš ayah arago dubbalo matakala 
nar! gahetvë va gacehissâmā? `Ч niliyihsu, риппеһї во pi mubuttah pã- 
cinamukho? gantvā assupunņebl nettehi marn palokayi, tadassahan* ti tadā 
assa abah, басс ота '11 eva tah avacan tÍ vadati, rabadan 11 Kanna- 
реппадаһап®, samotatan® ti ubhayatiresu jamburukkhavetasarukkhebi? ota- 
tah? vitatah’, nittinnabhayo patito ti so kira бай rahadarñ 10 pavisanto 
Alāraasa'! nipaccâkārarņn dassetvā yāva nañgutthā otari, udske pavitthapa- 
vitthattihanam!2 ev’ авва nibbaņnarn'? ahosi, taamā nittinņnabbayo patito һа!!һа. 
tuțjho рётекКЫ (<, pavissā ' pavlsitvā, dibbena те ti nāgabbavane ра- 
шёдат anāpajjitvā mayi Kaņnnapennatīireri!* anatikkamante!® yeva dibbena 
parivârena mama purato påtur әћові, upatthahiti upëgami, abbhantaro ti 


hadayamarhsasadiso, passa me ti tvab шаша babūpskāro sakkiram te karis- 
sāmi passa mo nivesanšni!? mama nigabhavanarn passa, Masakkasăārain 
туё "1 Masakkasāro vuccati osakkanaparisakkanabbšvena għanasšratāya'® cx 
Sinerupabbatarājā, aysh рапа tattha maritarn T3vatihsabbavanam sandhay' 
ovam ába, 
Maharaja evarm vatvā во nāgarājā uttarih attano bha- 
vanath vannento gáthadvayam aha: 
зв, Tam bhümibhëágehi upetarüpam, 
азаККһаг&!* c° eva mudü subhā ca 
nicatiná ° apparajā *' ca '* bhümi 
pāsādikā yattha jahanti зокап 155. 
i. Апауакиа ?° veluriyüpantla, 
catuddisah ambavanam surammam, 


ракка ca ревї*“ 


са phalá зирһи!&”*, 
niccotukë dhārayantī рһа!йпїїї, 156. 


Tattha asakkharā ti? yë tattha bhūmi рёвёпавахкћагегаһћіа °?, mudu 
ата]аїашапїшауа sattaratanavėlikākinņă, nicatlnë3° ti Indago- 


subba Кайс 
pakepitthisadisavannehi mnicatinehi” samannāgatā, аррагаја ti рафвигаћіхё, 
yattha jahantl sokan ti yattha рат! алайа va nissokā honti, апёув- 


! Bd рһайзай. 3 Bd gami-. > Bd päcinābhi-. * Ck? tassahan, Bd (адаввёһап. 
5 Bd -vennudahar), * Bdz -natan, ? Ck -rukkheve-, Cs -rukkhece-, Bd jam- 
buka -rukkhavedisš-. 5 Сёз -(а, Rds onatarn. ° Bd vinatah. !° Bd daharb. 
11 Ва а-, !2 Ва omilta one pavittha. 12 Bd nippannam. !* Ckr ра-. 15 Bd 
-чаппа-. !* Bd -kknte. Y Hd .nantl. 16 Cke -tä. 19 Cha „ārā. 39 Ch, 
enar, Ве nicca-. °! Ске -jain. 32 Ckt va. 82 во all three MSS. for anuk- 
kula? 94 Chs kesi, Bd pesi, 95 Ске du-. 25 Bd adds parosurahita. ?? pd 
оша sakkhara. *° Bd nicea-. 


4. Samkhapšlajftaka. (524.) 169 


kulā tl na avakulā? akhanimá% ukkulabhāvarahitā’ та* samasapthitā, veluri- 
уйрәпў!а ti veluriyena прапїЇа, tasmirh nāgabhavane veluriyamaya pasanna- 
зав nilobbšsš anekavanņnakamaluppaleseñthannā pokkharanitl attho, catudd tł- 
san u tassā pokkbarapiyā catüsu disšsu, pakka сё 'ti tasmlrh ambavane am- 
barakkhe3 pakkaphalā ca addhapakkaphalā® са taruņaphalā ca раш yavå 
'ti attho, піссосика? ti channam рі utūnah anurūpeh! pupphaphaleh! 
samannägatā И, 
18. Теват vanānarh naradeva majjhe 
nivesanarh bhassarasannikásarn 
rajataggalarn sovanņamayarh ularam 
obhásati vijjur іу’ antalikkhe 157. 
w. Мапйпауй' ѕоуаппатауй&" ulárá ° 
anekacittë° satatarh sunimmitá ° 
рагїрйга* kaññahi alarhkataáhi 
suvannakáyüradharáhi гаја. 158. 
зо. So Samkhapalo taramanarüpo 
раѕадат āruyha '° 
sahassathambham аїи!айппЫһауаг 


апотауаппо 


yatth’ assa bhariyā mahesī ahosi. 159, 
м. Ека ca пйгї taramānarūpā 
ādāya veluriyamayam mahaggharn 
subharh manim jJatimantüpapannarn 
acoditä āsanam abbhihasi. 160. 
н. Tato тат urago hatthe gahetvā "" 
пївїдауї pamukharhäsanasmith '*;: 
idam '? āsanarn atrabhavarh nisidatu, 
bhavam hi те'* aññataro garünam. 161. 
эз. Аййй ca пагї taramānarūpā 
ādāya үйёгїїї upasahkamitvā 
рёЧапї pakkhăālayi™ me janinda 


vā, ° Bd apparukkhā. * Ва адһа-, ' Cks .dukā, ® во al! three MSS. for 
-wn? # В4 -5, '° во all three MSS. '! Ckz -tvina. !3 Bd -namhi. '9 Rd 
imam. ™ Bd те, !5 Cka egi. 14 Bd va. 


20 


95 


30 


10 


15 


90 


35 


30 


170 XVII. Cattalisanipërta, 


тя. Арага са пёгї taramānarūpā 
paggayha вотаппатауё’ рацуа 
апеКавйрат vividham viyañjanam 
upanāmayī bhatta тапаййагйраш. 163. 

as. Turiyehi inam Bhá-ata'bhuttavantarn 
upatthahurm bhatta mano viditvā 
tatuttarim mam nipati mahantarh 
dibbehi kámehi anappakehiti. 164. 


Tattba піуевапап ti рёвіїо, bhassarasannikäsan t| pabbassara- 
даввапат, rajataggalan ti rajatadvarakaršfarh, шапішауё ti evarūpā tattha 
kütágšra са gabbbā ca, paripūrā (1 аашриппаш?, so Samkhapãlo t| шаћё- 
таја ahah evarn tasmih nagabhavanarn vanpnente баг datthukáamo ahosirn, atha 
лат < tattha гөсуб so Sarnkhapšlo hatthe gahetvë taramāno valuriyathambhebi 
mahassathambbarn p; rh āruyha* yasmirn thšëna авза mahesi ahosi (атп thānam 
{зї * dipetl, aka сё ' mayi рёввдат abbirülhe ekā itthi aññehl рі? manii 
Jštiunantehi upetarn sabbar veluriyásanarh tena nägarājena avuttë va, abbhibá- 
siti’ abblhsri, attbariti vuttarn hoti, рашщһа:ї ёвепавтіп ti pamukha- 
sanasmirh, uttamasane nisidapesiti attho, garūnan ti mātāpitunnai) me їй 
añüataro ti vatvā nlsīdāpeti, vividham viyañjanan ti тітідһатуайјапай, 
bhattamanuññarüpan ti bhattah manuññarüparh, Вһага(ё? 'ú гајапага 
ñlapati, bbuttavantan ti bhuttávirn!° katabhattakiccarh upatthahanti, anekasa- 
tehi turlyehi gandhabbarn Кигитёпа upatthahlmsu, bhattumano viditvā ti 
attano распо cittar Јапівуа, tatuttarin ti tato gandhatbakaranato циагий. 


ma nipastiti во пёвагајё mam?’ apasarhkami, шайап(ат dibbebiti!” 
mabantehi ulārehl dibbeh; kániehi tehi са рапа ua appebl па appakebi'!'5, 


Evain upasamkamitvá ca pana 

зс. Вһагіуё mam’ etë tisatā А|ага 
sabb’ atthamajjhā padumuttarabha, 
Aļāra etā su te kamakaro " 


15 >, 


дадаші te tā paricārayassū ° "і gātham аһа. 165, 


Tattha sabb’ atthamajjbā t| sabbā айћатајјЬа!*, pâņinā gahitappa- 
māpamajjhā ti аило, attbakathāyah pana aumajjbā ti pāțbo, padumutta-. 


1 Ва su-. > Bas -tba, 5 Rd sappannā. * Ске omit mam. ° Bd abhirūyha. 
© во Ch; Bê netitl. т Bd omita] pi. ° Ck gbhibhšësid, Bd mabbbiyäsiti. 
* Ваг һа 10 Bd gantabbaro. !! Bd nam. !* Сёз add mahantarn dibbehi. !? 
Ва anappakehl in the place of ла sppehi. !* во Bd for -rā? Ог -karo. '* 
Ва -сагі-, Ска -vàra-. !* Hd atta- A 


3. Sarhkhspalajataka. (524.) 171 


Tābhā ti padumavannauttarabbš, padumavanpacchaviyo 1 ti attho, рагісёга- 
yassū "1? pādaparicārikā karqhiti vatvā th) itthisateb! saddhirñ шаһёваш- 


pattiin? таућат adâsi. 

So аһа“: 

эт. Sarnvaccharam dibbaras' ānubhutvā ` 
tadass' аһа? uttarińh paccabhāsirh °: 
паравз' idarh kinti’ kathañ ca laddhah 
kath' ajjhagamāsi уїтйпазе( ай. 166. 

зя. Adhicca’ laddharh pariņāmajan te 
sayarnkatarn udāhu’ devehi dinnarh, 
pucchāmi te'° падагё]а!' tam attharm, 
kath' ajjhagamasi '” vimanasetthan ti. 167. 

Tattba dibbarasānubhutv: ti dibbakâmagunarase 12 anubhavitvā, ta- 
dassahan 't ti tadåssa 15 ahah, nāgassidan ti bhadramukhassa Samkba- 
pšlsnagassa idar sampsttijātah, klin ti him паша Капаю katvā laddhar 
katham etarn vimānasettharn tvan? ajjhagamāsiti'™, itl nam abarh риссһїп, 
adhicca laddhan ti shetunā laddhah, parinBmaJlante tì Кепасі tava 
atthāya paripamitattë pariņāmato Jštarn, sayamkatan ti kārake pakkositvā 
tatanåni datva kāritan tl. 

Tatoparā dvinnam pi vacanapativacanagāthā ca 

2% Nâdhicca laddharn na parinámajam me 
па sayarnkatam na pi devehi dinnar, 
sakehi kammehi apåpakehi 
ройдећі me laddham idah vimánam. 168, 
so. Kin te vatar ™” Кий pana brahmacariyarn 
kissa sucinnassa ayam vipako, 
akkhāhi те nāgarāje tam atthaiħ : 
kathan nu te Јаддћай idan vimanam, 169, 
s. Rājā аһовїїї Magadhánam issaro 
Duyyodhano рата mahānubhāvo, 


! Bd -iko. > Bd? add tà attano. 3 ali three MSS. -I * Сә аһаф. 5 Ba tadi- 
muteharh, ^ Сёз рассаһаайй, Bd pajbabbāsi. 7 Сл” kiñel. ° Rd ауісса. * зо 
all tbree MSS. for ädu? 10 Bd tarn. 1! Dd „је. 13 Сё tadajjha-. !° Bd 
dibbe- gune-. !' Bd tadāsuban, Вг tadassuhan. !* Bd tadasu, Bz tadšssu. !6 
Che tei, 3? Bd pajba-. !56 Bd vatta. 


10 


15 


20 


35 


30 


зо 


172 ХУП. Cattšlrsanipata 


so’ ittararn jivitarn sarnviditva 
азавваіат уірагірётадћаттат 170. 
ss. Annañ са рёпай са pasannacitto 
ваккасса dānarh vipularh адзі !, 
орёпаъћаќат me gharar tadási, 
santappitá samaņabrāhmaņā* ca". 171. 
sa. Tam me уаѓат* tarn pana Ьгаһтасагіуаф 
(азва sucinnassa ayar vipáko, 
ten' eva me laddham idah vimanarh 
pahütabhakkham * bahuannapānarh 172. 
зз. Naccehi gitehi upetarüpam 
сіга Ыскат °, na са? sassat' ауа, 
appánubhavá tam таһапиЪһауат 
tejassinarh hanti atejavanto, 
kim eva dāțhāvudha” Кіт paticca 
hatthattham āgañchi” vanibbakānaro. 173. 
as. Bhayan nu te anvagatarn mahantarh 
tejo nu te пйпуадатп dantamŭlam, 
kim eva'° dāthāvudha "' kim paticca 
kilesam āpajji vanibbakānarh. 174. 
зв. Na me bhayarn апуадаїагї'* mabantarn 
tejo na ѕакка mama tehi hanter, 
satañ са dhammani sukittitāni 
samuddavelā va duraccayāãni. 175, 
зт. Cātuddasih pannarasiñ с’ Alära™ 
uposatharh пїссаїп upāvasāmi, 
athâgamur зојаѕа bhojaputtá 
rajjum gahetvāna dalhañ са рйваї. 176. 


! зо all three MSS. 3 su all three MSS. for -në brà-? * Rds add målañca 
gandhañca тЙерапабса pacipayarn yänamupaasayañca ассһаЧанап› sayaramathanna- 
рёпат sakkacca dānāni adanma tattba + Bd vattam. ° Bd babia. * ао 
Ва, Сә -tirbka, Ck -tikā. 7 Cha уа. " Ck: kimmeva-, Bå kímeva dhšvudha. 
? Ва āgacchi. 10 Cs kameva, Bd kih meva. '! Bd dhāvudha. '° Сїб anvaga- 


mam. 19 Ck са ulàrs, Сз саіатз, Hd сёге. 


пе 


3 


t Bd арй-. 


4. Seunkhapalajataka. (521.) 


. Bhetváng пйзат atikassa' rajjurn 


пауіфво шаш sampatiggayha ' loddâ, 
etüdisarn” dukkham aban titikkhirn 
uposatham appatikopayanto. 177. 


‚ Ekáyane tar рае addasásim * 


balena vannena upetarüpam, 


вігіуё ca’ paññáya ca bbāvito si, 
kimatthiyam пада tapo Кагові. 178. 


‚ Na puttahetu па dhanassa hetu (:1V $$$) 


па yuno cápi Alára hetu, 
manussayonirh abhipatthayãno 

савтӣ parakkamma tato karomi. 179. 
Tvar lohitakkho vihatantararhso 
alarhkato kappitakesamassu 

воговісо" lohitacandanena 

gandhabbarājā va disā pabhāsasi’. 180. 


. Deviddhipatto si mahānubhāvo 


sabbehi kámehi samañgibhüto, 
puccbâmi tam парагёје tam attham: 
веууо ito kena manussaloko. 181. 


Ала 


. Alára пёйПаїга°* manussalokā 


suddhi са? sarnvijjati ваййашо và, 
аһап са laddhāna manussayonim 
kābāmi jatimaranassa antam. 182. 
б$ашуассһаго me vusito!° tav' antike, 
annena pånena upatthito 'smi, 


āmantayitvāna palemi'' ийра, 


cirappavuttho "вті aharn janinda. 183. 


. Рана са дага с’ апијїуіпо '' са 


niceánusitthš орай ћаќе tarh, 


3 Ва samparipaggayha. 2 Che „п. * Ваё addasarnsu. 
Ва eiriyā, omitting са. Š СЕ sure-, Ва surohi-- 
481." Cks пв añ-. * СЕ -Ійса, Сә -ihñce, Ва suddbivā, !° Rd -ro va me 


vasato. 1! Che pha-, Rd раје-. 12 Ck: са апо-, Bd са manu-. 


173 
` 


3 Cko -уёуг, 


1 Ck sasi, C: pabhassi, Bd 


z0 


10 


15 


174 ХҮН. Cattālisanlpāta. 


kaccin' nu te nëbhisamsittha' Косі, 
piya hi me dassanam tuyh' Alára. 184. 
«. Yathā са mātā са рий с' арагеў 
putto piyo pativihito va seyyo 
tato pi mayharh idha-m-eva seyyo 
citta hi te пара mayi pasanna. 185. 
4, Mani mama‘ vijjati lohitamko° 
dhanáháro ° maniratanam шагаш, 
ādāya tah gaccha sakam niketarh 
laddhā дһапа tarn manim ussajassū’ ‘ti. 186. 


Тапа kinte vatan ti Ший tava vatasamadanari, brabhmacariyan tt 
mettbacariyarn, opšuabhütan ti catumahāpatbe khatapokkharani” viya dbam- 
mikasamanabrëbmapanarn yathšásukharn paribhuñjitabbavibhavarp, па ca sassa- 
tāyen ti ciratthitikah ssmāänam рі katan’ mayhai sasatam па botiti me 
kathesi, appānabhbāvā ti bhojaputte sandhāyâha, hantiti stthasu thānesu 
айе vijjhantë kińhkāraņā hanirmau, kim paticcã 'ti kirn sandbāya trar (айа 
tosarh hatthatthern '° ёбабсһі 1! vasan upagato, vanibbakânan ti bbojaputā 
idha vanibbakà ti vuttā, tejo nu te nānvagsm dantamülan ti kin uu tava 
te19 bhojaputte disvā (айа Ъһвуагтю mabautarb апуараїат!* udáhu visah danta- 
mülərb па asnvšgstsrn 22, kilesan ti dukkha, vsnibbakanan ti bhoja- 
pultånaiiı вап{Ше, bhojaputte niseñyâ "і attbo, tejo na sakkā mama təbi 
hantun ti mama visatejo абба tejena abbibantum pi па sakkā, satan ti 
Видаһадїнап 4һашшВпї(1 sllasamadhipaññakhantianuddayamettabhavanásarh- 
kbâtadhammā’*, sukittitāniti suvannitāni sukathltânt, kin tl Каста ti samudda- 
volā val, tāni hl'“ tebi sawuddavelā viya'! sappurisebi jīvikattham'® pi duracca- 
yānîfti vannitani, tasmā aharn sīlabhedabbayona khantimettäsamannägato hutva 
mama kopassa !° ajlavelarn 20 atikkamiturs nêdāsin ti аһа, imissā pana Samkbs- 
pšladbammade а dasa рагаш!уо lsbbhanti, (аё bi М-епа sarirassa paric- 
cattabhšvo dšnaparami паша hoti, {а{һагйрепа рі visatejena silassa abbinnattë 
silapšáramj), oágabbavansto nikkbamitrê зашапайһашшайагапа 
parami33, ideñ с' idañ са Шасито vattatiti sarbvldabanam pañ 
sanaviriyarn viriyšpšárami, adhivšsanakhanti hhantipšrami, saccasamâdānam 
enccapšrami, mama silah пе bhindisssmiti адь (һёпар 22 adbitthänapärami, 


āramī, adhiva- 


1 Bd kiñci. >? Сіз -sidba, Bd -sambbittha. > Bd са адат. * Hd шауһап, 
С mama, > Bd -tañgo. % во ај] three MSS. for -haro? ! Сё magimusa-, 
В шерітёвва-. ° Ck Ва khanae. ° Ві» cetarn. "° Bd -ttah? 1! Bd -acchi. 
t: Bå tejo. !2 Bdanvs-. !* Ва -tanl dbammâni. #* so Bd; Сё kintikatvë 
samuddavelarb, С? - - velava. !1 Bd duraccayā ti in tbe place of tëni М. '? 
Сіз вашоддепе velaya-. !#в0В4; СЇ jivitam. ° Ва kopathassa, B# gopayasa ? 
20 Bd jantar. 2?! Cke -dhammarm-. ?? Bå nikhbama-. °’ Bd omits ады. 


4. Samkhapišlsjataka. (524.) 175 


anuddayabhšvo mettšpšarami, vedanaya majjhattabhāvo upekkhāpāramī, асһа- 
gamun t] ath'ekadivasarn vammikamatthake п]раппап› disvšë sojasa bhojaputtă 
khararajjuñ ca dalhapāsañ са sülani ca gahetvà шата santikarm араб, bhet- 
vānă 'ti mama sarira atthasu (hanesu bhinditvë kantakslata pavesetvi, nā- 
ваф atikasñsa! rajjun fti thokarh gantvë sisarn  olambantam disvà ma 
magRe nipajjāpetvā рипа пёваш p! me bhinditvā rajjurn 5 atikassa' kicakotl- 


yah * laggetvá samantato pariggahetvā mam пауййвп, sddasarhsü 'ti samma 
Sarhkhapila ta bhbojaputtā ekëyana ekagamana  Jarnghapadikamapge (агі balena? 
vanņena® upetarüparh passihsu, tvarii рапа lssariyssobhaggasiriyë ca pañüšya се 
bhávito vaddhito, so (хаг evarúpo samšno? kímattharn tapam Кагоз1®, kir tecbanto 
uposathāvāsarh vasasi’, sllarb rakkbasiti'° рі раїһо, abam ekāyane mabāmwaggo 
Tam addasan ti autho, abhipattbayšáno ti patthento, tasmā ti yesmā 
manussayonlih patthemi tasmā viriyena parakkamitvá tapokammarnh karomiti, 
aurosito ti susnulitto!'!, ito t imambā nāgabbavanā шаша manussaloko 
kena uttaritaro 0 13, suddbîtl maggapbalanibbânasarnkhäta’* visuddhi, sarm- 
yamo tl silarn, idah so manuessaloke та!* Buddhapaccekabuddhënarb uppattirb 
wandbáyñha, kabamiti attano appalleandhbikabbšvarh 15 karonto Játimaranassa 
antar 16 karisamitl!?7, evam mwahšrāja so Sarnkhapálo mapuseslokarn vanne- 
кіі!" ваштассһаго me ti ova шаһёг8)а taswih manussalokarn vannente 
аһаф раһһа]}дуа sinebarn katvš etad avocarn, tattha upatthito 'вшїа 19 
аппарёпећі 20 с’ evaj dibbebi са kamagunehi ратісіппо шёпіќо ?!, paļemîti?? 
рзгеті вассћаші, cirappavuttbo ’smîtl?® sbar manussalokato cirappavuttho, 
nābhisamaittbā?t ti Касе! ^5 nu3* mama puttádisu koci. tah nu alkos) 
paribhásiti риссћеб 27, nšbhleajjerbā?* °t pátho, na kopeafti attħo, pativl- 
hito tl patijaggito, mani maman t sace samma’? А]ага 5 gacchasi yeva 


evan eante mama lohitarhko3' дһалёһагапо 22 sabbakamadado mani sarnviljatl, 
tar) Шага тап/теќапаф адёуа tere geba gaccba, tattha imaseânubhävena 
yâvadicchakarn laddhš dhanaro puva iman maniro ossajassu?! ossejanto*? ca 
aññattha апоявајі‹уё 54 attano udakacátiyarh оввајеууёзї 25 vatvā mayharh 
maņiratanadı upanesiti vadati. 


Evah vatvā А]аго % „а{һаһаш mahārāja tara” падагй- 
jānam*™ ‘samma npáham dhanen’ atthiko, pabbajiturn рапа 


1 Bd antikassa. # Bd siramme. © Bs vattarajjurn. * Bd kāja-. > Bd omita 
#Ка-. * Bd adds са. °? Bd adds зі, ° Bd adds ti. * СК” уазат, Bd vasi. ° 
Rd -asi addasšsinü. !! Bd suthu-, !# Bd omits tt. !? Ck -lahnibbāuana-, 
Се -larh nibbánarn-. '* Bd yeva. !5 Cks -tikasan-. '* Bde Jštijarimaransssan- 
тай. 17 Cks -mātl. 16 Bd -esi. '? СЕ -amirhti, Bd -sminti. 2° Bd -пепа, 21 
Ck mànato, Bd banito, 32 Сёз phale-. 1% _aminti. 2* Ckz páhisaristbha, С 
парЫваттатса. °? Bd кабсі. °?’ Bd adds kbo. ®? Bd рассћі. 29 Ch abhiya- 
jethš, Се а, Ва nābbisajjetā. 2° Ck mema, 20 Вёа-. 31 Bàs -tañgo. 32 
Ва -ko. . 79 Bd овв-. >»! Bd manussajjetvë. 5 Bd omits tar. 35 Bd adds 
etadavoca. 


15 


23 


30 


10 


s 


176 ХУП. Caralisanipata. 


icebámiti' pabbajitaparikkháre yācitvā ten`eva saddhirn nāga- 
bhavanā nikkhamitvā (атп! nivattetvā Himavantam pavisitvá 
pabbajito“ ti vatvā гайпо dhammakatham kathento gātha- 
dvayam ā.: 
<a, Dittha mayá mapusikapi Ката 
asassatā vipariņāmadbammā, 
айїшауаш kāmaguņesu disvā 
ваййһау' aham pabbajito 'mhi гаја. 187. 
+. Dumapphalān’ eva? patanti mänavā’ 
daharā са vuddbā‘' са sarirabheda, 
etam рі disvā* pabbajito 'mbi гаја 
apannakam sámaññam eva seyyo. 188. 

Tattha saddhâyá `!! kammañ са phalañ са nibbânañ ca saddabitvā, du- 
Mmapphalānevā 'ti yathā rukkbaphaláni pakkāni pi apakkāni pi patauti tathā 
Чаһага са vuddbš са pstanti, араппакап ti aviruddharn niyyšnikarn, sü- 
и aññamava seyyo ti рађћајја va uttamā ti pabbajjāya ропа дівча pab- 

ajito 'mhi mahárājā 'ti. 

Tarh sutvā гаја врап(агаф gātham aha: 

во. Addhā have sevitabbā sapaññā 
Ъаһизвиїй ye bahuțhānacintino, 
nāgañ са sutvāna tavañ c' Aļāra 


karomi* puññáni anappakaniti. 189. 


Tattha ye bashutbšánacintino ti ye са? bahüni kiranšëni° jananti, 
иван? ti tatbà appamädavibărirh {0 падагёјёпаћ са tava са!! vacaparh sutvà. 
Ath’ assa ussabam janento tāpaso osāoagātbam â.: 
si, Addhā have sevitabbā sapañīā 
babussutā уе babuțbānacintino, 
падай ca вшуапа шашай са гаја 
karohi puññáni anappakānîti. 190. 


1 Ске omit ќаб. 3 во all tbrae MSS. for -niva? ° Cks -na-. * Bd vuqhá. > 
во all three MSS. for disvâpi tah? * Bds kābāmi, ? Ck va, Bd omits ca, 
Ск käraņakārarnņpāni, С° karanakiranani. *# Bd nāgañcā. 1° Bd -rinaùi. !1 
Cks tava, Bd (ат, all three MSS. omitting ca. 


5. Culesutasomajātaka. (525.) 177 


Evar во rañüo dh. desetvā tatth' eva cattāro vassāua- 
тёве vasitvá' puna Himavantarm gantvā yāvajivah cattáro 
brabmavihāre bhávetvà Brahmaloküpago ahosi. Samkbapālo 
рі уёуајїуат uposathavágam vasi’, гаја са dānādīni puññāni 
karitvā yathākammarh gato. 

5.1, 4. а. j. 93.: „Tadā риё tāpaso Kassapo ahosi, Baranasiraja 
Anando, Alro Saáriputto. Samkhapālio aham ета 'ti Samkha- 


pālajātakam. 


5. Cullasotasomajātaka. 

Amanteyāmi nigaman ti, Idam S, J. v.nekkhammaparamim 
8. К Paccuppannavatthum Mahānāradakassapajātakasadisam eve, 

А. pana Báránasi' Sudassanam nama nagara ahosi, tarh 
Brahmadatto паша rājā са* ajjhāvasi. B. tassa aggamahesiyā 
kucchimhi nibbatti, tassa punnacandasassirikarn' mukham 
ahosi, ten’ авва Somakumāro ti nāmam karirmsu. So viñāū- 
tar patto’ sutavitto° savanasilo ahosi, tena nam Sutasomo 
ti вабјдпіфви. So vayappatto Takkasiláya" sippar '° uggahetvā 
āgato pitu santikā setacchattarn labhitvā dhammena r. karesi, 
mahanta іввагіуаф ahosi, tassa Candadevi-pamukhāni solasa 
itthisahassáni ahesurn. So aparabhāge puttadhitáhi vaddhento 
gharāvāse anabhirato araüñam pavisitvā pabbajitukamo ahosi. 
So еКафїуавай kappakañ āmantetvā „уада те ватта siras- 
тїї рһаііќат '' раввеууӣѕі аһа те aroceyyasiti“ аһа, Kap- 
pako tassa vacanam sampaticchitvá арагађһаде phalitarh '' 
disvë ārocetvā ‚{епа hi nah вашта kappaka uddharitvā 
mama hatthe patitthápehiti“ votto'™ suvannasandšsena ud- 
dharitvā batthe thapesi. Тай disvā M. ,jaršya me sarira 
abhibhūtan“‘ ti bhīto tam phalitarn gahetvā va’ pãsādā otaritvā 


1 Ba pavisetvā. 3 Ва .itvā, ? Gk» .siyam, * Bd omits еа. > Bd adds pana. 
€ во all three МЭЗ. ? Bd -tappatto. ° Ck -citto? ° Bd -yah. !0 Bd gabba- 
эїррїп}, '1 Bd pa], '? Bd -e. 18 Bd pl. 

Jumua. V. 12 


10 


20 


178 ХҮП. Cattālisanlpāta. 


mahajanassa dassanatthane paññattarājapallarhke' nistditvā 
senāpatipamukhāni asitiamaccasahassáni purobitapamukhāni 
satthibrāhmaņasahassāni аййе са’ ratthikanegamádayo bahü 
pakkosāpetvā ,,вігавтіф me :рһаііќаш játarh°, mahallako "вті, 
mama pabbajjabhāvar‘* jānāthā“ Чі pațhama g. ā.; 
1. Amantayámi nigamarn mittāmacce parisaje ': 
sirasmirb phalitam játam, pabbajjam dāni roc’ ahan" ti. 191. 
Tattha amantayšámiti jānāpem!, госаһап" ti rocemi shar, (авва mo 
bhonto pabbajanabhavarn t janüatha 'ti. 
Tarh sutvñ teau ekeko visádappatto' hutvā 
з. Abhumme kathan nu bhanasi 
sallam те deva urasi kampesi, 
sattasatā te bhariyā 
kathan пп te tā bhavissantiti р. ё, 192. 


Тана abhumme ti атаў, urasikampesiti urasmi nisitars 9 
sattlrh caresi!0, sattasatà (1 samajátikë khattiyskañña sandhây' etara vuttarh, 
kathannu te tå bhavissantiti tata tava bherlyšyo!! tayi pabbajite anāthā 
nippaccayā kathah bhavissanti!?, etā anāthā katvā tumhākarn pabbajjā пёша 


учка t? ti, 
Tato М. {айуаш gātham ёћа: 
s Paññāyihinti etā, 
daharā, aññam рі tā gamissanti, 
варрай са'* patthayāno '* 
tena-m-aharh '* pabbajissāmiti. 193. 


Таа paññayihintiti attano kammena pañðāylssant!, abarh едва Кі 
Lomi, sabbā p' еїа daharāyo, аййо!? гаја bhavissati, tan ега gamissantiti. 


Атасса'* B-assa pativacanarh dātuń asakkontā’' tassa 
тап santikarb gantvā ќаш абат йгосевип. Sā turitaturitā 


1! Cs -ttah-, Rd -tte- ° Сіз айба. omitting са. > Bd adds abarh. * Bd 
pappajita- * Che pārlsəjje ca, Bd parisajje * Bd rocšhan. T B4 visirappatto. 
6 Сї „7, Bd avudhl ° Fd sunisaftatetarb. !9 Ck va-, 1 Bd -гіуё, !Ó Bd ttl. 
12 Bd nayuttá. !* Bd сазва, !% Rd рауа!һауашЁпо. '* Bd tena aham. !! Che Bê 
=e. 1# Bd -ccadayo. !* all three MSS, -(0. 


S. Caullasutasomasjataka. 1:525.) 179 


ëgantvë ..saccarh kira tvarh (ёа pabbajitukāmo“ ti vatvā dve 
gšthá' abháësi: 
«. Dulladdham me āsi’ 
Sutasoma уавва te ahah’ matá 
yam ше vilapaatiyá 
anapekho pabbajasi deva. 194. 
*. Dulladdham me isi“ 
Sutasoma уат tam ahar уіјёуівзат 
yam me vilapantiyā 
anapekho pabbajasi deva. 195. 


Tatha dulladdhan ti yah ебат тауа? labhantiya ринат Jammarh 
laddhan ti dulladdbarb, уаш me ti yena kšranena mayl nšusppakárarh vila- 
pantiyä {тап pabbajiturh icchasi tena kāraņnena tädisassa pultassa labhauarh 
mama? dulleddhar пёта. 


В. evarn paridevamānāya pi mātarā' saddbih kiñci na 
Каеві. 58 roditvā sayam ета ekamanta abosi. Ath’ assa 
pitu árocesum. So āgantvā’ ekan (ауа р, й.: 

s Ko nām’ eso dhammo 
Sutasoma Кй'° пёша pabbajjá 
yam no ambe jinne'' 
anapekho pabbajasi devā "і. 196. 


Tattha уай по amhe ti yar tvah ашһацаї! рибо samšno атһе!? 
Jinne psiljaggitabbakâle apatijaggitvë papāte silarn'? pavattento viya chaddetvá 
апареАһо pabbajasí, tena taù vadāmi: ko пёт' ево tave dhammo ti adhippâyo. 


Tam sutvā М. tunhl аһові. Atha namh рий ,„tāta Suta- 
soma васе pi te mātĀpitusineho ™ n’ atthi puttadbītaro te bahü 
tarunë, ne ™ (вуй тіпа vattiturh na sakkhissanti, tesam vuddhip- 
pattakale'* pabbajissasîti“ sattamarmn g. й.: 


' Bd —ayo. 3 Cs Ва ав. 5 Вёһотаһаш. * Bd as, Се аі. 5 Сів adds ай 
еба. * Ва -гапај. ! Bd omits mama. ® Chr -räya. ° Bd да-. '° Bd айде 
са. 11 Ое 0, 13 Ске айа hi. 15 all three М8. si-. !* Bd -tūsu si-. °° 
Rd omits ne. !* Ва vudhi. 

12+ 


5 


15 


180 XVII Cattâlisanipāta. 


т. Puttápi tayham bahavo 
dahará appattayobbana, 
mañjü їе! tam apassantā 
maññe dakkharñ nigacchantiti'. 197. 

Tattha mañjü tl madhurevacanā nigacchantiti nigacchissanti kâyika- 
cetasikadukkharh patilabbissantiti maññâmi. 

Таш sutvā M. gátham aha: 

s. Puttehi ca me etehi 
daharehi appattayobbanehi 
mañjühi sabbehi pi tamhehi 
ciram pi katvā vinābhāvo’ ti. 198. 

Tattha sabbebi рі tumbebîti tšta na kovalent putteb' ета atba kho 
tamhehi pi? sabbasarhkharebl ciram рі katvā" digbam addhānath thatvâpl vina- 
bhávo' va niyato, sakalasminı piè lokasannivāse ekssarhkbāro pi nieco пата 
°' апы. 

Evarm М. pitu dh.' kathesi. So tassa dhammakatham "° 
sutvá tunhi аћозі. Ath' assa sattasatánam bhariyánam ároca- 
yirhau, të pāsādā oruyha tassa santikam арапќуё роррћакево r '' 
gahetvā paridevamāoă 

s. Chinnam uu tuyham hadayarh 
ādu Кагипй са n` atthi amhesu 
yam no pi™ kandantiyo 
anapekho pabbajasi devā `ti g. &. 199. 

Тавв' sttho: sāmi Sutasoma воће bi!5 vidbavā katvá вассђапіазва appe- 

mattahasea рі sinebassa abbšvena chinnan nu tava amhesu һайауа!й udšhu 


karunaya abhšvena kàáruññarb vā п’ atthi уат по evam Капдаоуо!* раһзуа 
pabbajasiti. 


М. ідваш pádamüle pavattetvá paridevamánánam tam '* 


paridevam ™ sutvā anantaram g. å.: 


1 Cksadd рі. 3 Ck dukkhānigacch-. ? Bde thatvā vipnüsabhávo. * Che 
-lañca. ° Bds add aññehi рі. * Bd omits cirampl katvā, 7 Bd vināsa-. * 
Cks add bive. ° Bde dhammakathah. !° Bd omits dhamma. !! all three 
МЗ. goppa-. '” Сә Bd vi. '!' Bd omits Ы. '* Bd vik-, 15 Bd omits тай. 
16 Bd -vasaddarh. 


5. Cuhlesutasomajátaka. (525.) 181 


зо. Na ca mayharh сһіопат hadayam 
atthi karunápi mayham tnmhesu, 
saggañ са ра ћауёпо! 
tena-m-aharn* pabbajissāmîti. 200. 

Tattha өардабсі 'ti ahah saggañ са pattbayano? yasmā сёуаф * peb- 
һај! оёша Buddhadihi vaņpņitā tasmā pabbajissëmi tumbe mā cintayitthë ч 
tā вевавеві. 

Ath' assa ардатаћевіуй йгосевші, sā garubhārā pari- 
punnagabbhápi зашёоё äāgantvā M-ar vanditvā ekamante 
thitā tisso gāthā' abhāsi: 

и. Dulladdham me ñsi* 
Sntasoma yassa' te ahah bhariyā 
yam me vilapantiyá 
anapekho pabbajasi deva, 201. 
з. Dulladdham me āsi' 
Sutasoma уавва te ahar bhariyā 
yam marh kuccbimatirh santirh “ 
- anapekho pabbajasi deva. 202. 
1s. Paripakko me gabbho 
kacchigato, yåva nam vijayámi 
máham eka vidbavă 
рассһа dakkháoi addakkhiu ti. 208, 

Tattha yamme ti yasmüë mama .арапуя (таш апар»&һо pabbajasi 
tasma yah mayš tava santikā aggamahesijthâner laddbarn {ап dulladdhan me 
dutiyagšthëya? yasmā msi tvaw kucchimstih santim’? pabāya anapekko pabba- 
jasi tasmā yar mayá tava blariyattah tarh dulladdham me ti attho, yáva пап 
ti уёта sbarn!! саф gabbharn тіјёуёті tšva adbivāsebîti. 

Tato M. gātbam аһа: 

14- Paripakko te gabbho 
kuçchigato, irngha nar vijayassu 


t Bd pathayamino. 3 Ck tena mayharh, Bd tena aham, * Bd pathayauto. * 
Ва ayan. ° Bj -зуо, * Bd asi, 7 Сё sassa, Bd passa. ° Bds me kucchlpati- 
sandhi. * во Ске; Bd -kathaya? !° Bd kucchipatisaudhi. !! Bd уёғаһап. 


10 


10 


10 


20 


95 


182 XVII Cattšlieanipats. 


роќќат anomavannam, 
{ат hitvā pabbajissāmîti. 204. 

Tattha puttan ti bhadde tava gabbho peripskko ti јёпаші, (тай pana 
vijayainana puttam vijāyissasi na dhitararh, sā tvarh sotthiná vljàayaseu puttsi, 
аһа pana saddhir tayá tah puttarh hitvë pabbajissami yevš И. 

Sā tassa ғасапаф sutvā sokam sandhäretum asakkonti 
„ito дат patthāya deva атһакат siri nāma п' atthîti'' ubhohi 
hatthehi hadayarn dhárayamaná' assüni puōjanti mahasaddena 
paridevi. Atha nam samassāsento M.: 

1. Mā tvah Cande rudi’ 
më восі vanatimiramattakkhi, (IV 352) 
Вгоһа? са pëásšdam, 
anapekho аһат gamissāmîti р. а. 205. 

Tettha mâ tverb Cando гчёї* bhadde Саод& devi (таю ша rodi 
mā восі, vanatimlramattakkhiti glrikannikasamananette 3, Paliyarn pana 
kovilšáratambakkhíti likbhitarn, tassa” kovilšrapuppharn! viya tambanette ti attho. 

Sā tassa vacanar sutvā tháturh asakkonti pāsādarn āruyha 
rodamānā nisīdi, Atha nam B-assa jetthapntto disvā „kin 
nu kho me mátá rodantī nisinná“ 'ti tam pucchanto : 

16. Ко ќат amma kopesi, 
kim rodasi pekkhasi' ca mar bāļharh, 
ghátemi kam avajjharh 
ñatinarm udikkhamānānan ti g. á. 206, 

Tattha kopesiti amma ko nāma teri kopesi, ko te appiyah aküsi, 
pekkhasi  cš "і шап bālham pekkhanti!? kirhkáraná годав1й adhippšáyo, 
ghatemi Каф avajjhan!! ti aghatetabbarh рі karn attauo бёцпаш qdikkha- 
mananam 12 üeva аккЬёіі me ti риссһа!! 

Tato devi раат йһа: 

ит. Na hi во вакка hanturh 
jivitāvī yo™ mar [tātā"‘] kopesi, 


1 Bd тага-. 3 (ha rucei. 3 Cha „Һай, Ве -bih. * Cte ruceiti. 5 Ске -netta, 
Bd -nnakapuppasa-. * Bd -rarattakkhiti. 7 so Cka; Bd -ā * Сз. 9 
Ok -shh, Cs -si. © Bd -teb. © Bastai avajjhsrp ghštemi. !? Cke ude-. 


5. Cullasutasouajataka. (525.) 183 


pitë te mam tata avaca: 
anapekkho ahah gamissāmiti. 207. 
Tattha viJitë viti täta уо mari imissā patbaviyë vijitavi kopesl арріуа- 
ватюодасёгепа me һадауе kopañ са вокей са ратевегі во tayá hanturh па sakkñ, 


шат hi täta (ауа piti аһа rajjasiriñ cs (ай са раһауа arsüna pavisitvā 
pabbajisešmiti avaca, ida me годапаййтапап ti. 


So tassă vacanarn sutvā ув! „amma, kin пата {уап 
kathesi, nanu еуап sante тауаф anāthā’ Ыһауївзйёта“ ‘ti 
paridevanto 

зв. Yo 'ham рођбе niyyámi 

uyyánarñ mattakuðjare* са yodhemi 
Sutasome pabbajite 
kathan nu dāni karissámiti g. &, 208. 

Tase’ attbo: yo sbarn pubbe csturajaññayuttari * sabbšlarrkárapatipanul- 
(аф ratharh abhiruyba uyyānaro gacchámi mattakuñjare yodhemi aññehi са 
aseskijädibi kīlâmi sv-ahari idāni Эшавоше pabbajite kathah kariesåmiti. 

Ath’ авва kanițthabhātā sattavaasiko te ubho рї* rodante 
dievā mātarath upasarbkamitvá „amme kirnkáránë' года(ћа“ 
‘ti pucchitvā tam абат sutvā „tena hi mā rodatha, аһәт 
(80 авва? pabbajiturn na dassāmîti“ ubho pi te assāsetvā 
dbātiyå saddhih pāsădā oroyha pitu santikam gantvā ,tāta 
tva kira amhe akāmake раһйуа ‘pabbajāmîti’ vadasi, ahan te 
pabhbajitorh па dassāmîti“ pitaram gīvāya dalham gahetvā 

з. Мёшс ca" me rudatyá'° 

jetthassa ca bhātuno akāmassa 
hatthe pi te gahessarn, 
па hi gañchisi’' по akāmānan ti р. а. 209. 

М. cintesi: „ayam me paripanthakaro ti, kena пш kho 

nam ирӣуепа райккатареууво“ ti, tato dhátirn oloketvā „amma 


` 


dhāti band’ imam тапіккһапдһариаодһапа ‘1 {ау` ево 


1 Ск са, Bd omits уа. * Bd adds піша. ° Ске omit шаа * Ске -4, Bas 
catuâj-. ` Chs mi. 6 Се -а, Bd amhe. ? Bd: ада tumbe ° Bà іёразвв, Ве 
távassa " Bd -tuñca, !0 Ck rudamiyà, Bd rudetyāsi. '! Bd дассһаѕі, Cks 
вайјіві. 18 Oka -arnpil-. 


a 


95 


30 


ЫЛ 


184 ХҮП. Cattšlisanipšta. 


hoti’, puttan apanehi, тё те autaráyarm kariti“ вауаћ puttar 
hatthe gahetvā apaneturh asakkonto {авва lañcarh pațijānitvā 
зо. Utthehi Фуат dhāti, 
imam Когтёгат ramehi aññattha, 
më те paripantham акё 
варрат mama patthayánassá ‘ti р. а. 210. 

Tstiha imam kumaran ti amma dhàt! {зат utthebi, imam kumara 
apanetvā âgantvā [marh maniri» gahetvā aññattba narb abhlramehi. 

Sā lañcam labhitvë* kumáram saññapetvā ādāya aññattha 
gantvā paridevamána 

s. Yan пйа' imam jaheyyam' 
рабһатКагат, ko uu те п' attho‘, 
Sutasome pabbajite 
kin nu me narh karissámiti р. а. 211. 

Тазз` ettho: yan nüna abarh imam lañcatthšáya gahiù (ат pabhainkara 
suppabhäsara məni jaheyysrb 5, ko nu mayhara Sutasomanarinde’ pabbajite 
imlná attho, kin nu me tant Кагівзёші", ahar tasmih pabbsjite imam 
labhissámi, labhanti рі ca kin nu etah karlasâmi, passatha me kemman ti. 

Tato mahësenagutto cintesi: ,,ayam гаја ‘gehe me dhanam' 
mandan’ ti saññam karoti maññe, bahubhävam assa'° Ка{һезва- 
mîti“ во uttháya vanditvā 

эз. Ково ca tuyharp vipulo, 
kottbāgārañ са tuyharh paripürar!", 
pathavi ca tuyhárh vijita'*, 
ramassu mā pabbaja !? devá ‘ti р. а. 212, 

Таш sutvā M. gātbam aha: 

s, Козо maybarn vipulo, 
kotthagárañ са, гоаућаћ paripüram, 
pathavi са тауһаш vijitā, 
пат '* bitvå pabbajissámiti. 213. 


t Bd -tu, ~ Ва gahetçë. “ Bd dadeyyain. * so Сїз for me {вп' altho? Bà 
те iminá attho, Be -iminattho. * Bd -me-. * Cs nari, Bd па, ? Ва „піц. 
* Сі ай па. ° Bd vana? Сә дапет. !* Bå bahutāpassa. !! Chs edd sarò. 
13 Che да, Ва даті. 13 pde-Ji. 16 Ca.Bd rh. 


5. Cullasutasomsjštaka. (525.) 185 


Tam satvā ќавтіб apagate Kulavaddhanasetthi пата 
uttháya vanditvā р. â. 

s. Mayham pi dhanam pahütam 
ватпйһаїшї no pi deva sakkomi, А 
tan te dadámi sabbam', 5 
ramassu mā pabbaja* devā ‘ti. 214. 

Tam sutyā М. gātham аһа: 

зь. Jānâmi dhana pahátarn 
Kulavaddhana püjito tayā c' asmi, 
варрай са pattbayāno 10 
tena аһаш* pabbajissämiti. 215. 

Тай воќуа Kulavaddhape apagate' Somadattam пёта 
kanitthabhátararn ámantetvá ,„tāta aham pañjaraparikkhitto ° 
vanakukkuto viya ukkanthito, mam дһагйуйёве arati' abbi- 
bhavati, ajj’ eva pabbajissámi', (уат imat г. patipajjšë%* '1° 15 
г. niyyádento 

з. Ukkanthito вті bálham, 
arati пат Somadatta āvisati’, 
bahukápi' ап!агйуй!', 
ajj' ev' ahar ™ pabbajissāmiti g. á. 216. 10 
Тат satvă во рі pabbajitakámo tam" dipento itararn д.а. 
w. Idaü са tayhar rucitarn 
Sutasoma ajj' еү& dāni (ғат '* pabbaja', 
abam pi pabbajissāmi, 
na uesahe tayā vinā abam thātun'* ti. 217. "s 
Atha nam во patikkhipitvá upaddhag. а. 
зв*, Na hi вакка pabbajitumn, 
nagare na hi paccati janapade vā” ti. 218. 


1 Ва -mpi. °” Ra -ji, 5 Cie meybah * Bd adds mahšsatto. * Bdz -pak- 
късо, ! Bd anabhirati. 7 Ck» -mīti. ° Bê patlecšdihi. ! Bd аріваай, Вг vis- 
sati. 10 Bdz add me 1) Cia -ya. !% Ва, аһа, '# Ch -рашаі. !* Cha 
omit tvah., 1% Ck: pabbajjarii, Bdz pabbajja !% Ва kātun. !!1 Ві? cà, 


95 


30 


186 XVIL. Cattalisanipata. 


Tettha na hi paccatiti idari п' eva (ёха! mama раоһа)]4йҺМ1ррауэт 
sutva va imasmirh dasayojanike” Sudassananagare са вакајајапарайе са na 
paccati, косі uddhane агі na jaleti', amhesu рапа dvisu pabbsjltesu апаа 
ca ratthavasino bbavissanti, (гета na hi sakki (ауё pabbajirurn, abam ova 
pabhajissëmiti. 

Tam sutvá mahājano М-авва pādamūle pavattitva!* pari- 
devanto ' 

1>. Sutasome pabbajite 
kathan nu dāni karissámë `ü аһа, 218. 

Tato М. „alah, má socittha, аһаш ciram рі thatvā tum- 
hehi vinā bhavissāmi, uppaonasarhkbāro hi пїссо пйёша v 
atthiti“ mahájanassa dh, desento* 

зе. Upapiyat' idan maññe (IV 22%) 
parittarn udaka уа carhgaváramhi*, 
evarh suparittake jfvite 
na-ppamajjitukālo’. 219. 

Upaniyat' idah maññe 

parittarn udakarh va сатрауёгатћі“, 
еуат suparittake јїуіќе 

atha bālā pamajjanti. 220. 

и. Те vaddhayanti’ nirayarn 


60 


Игасеһёпауопій са pettivisayañ са, 
tanhábandhanabaddha ° 
vaddhenti asarakāyan ti áha, 221. 


Tettha орапїуасібат шаййе ti täta idab Jivitarh upaniyatiti аһа 
шабййті, aññesu auttesu upasarnharanattho upanayanattho!° 1йһа рапа parti- 
yādānattbo, tasmā yathë parittam ийайага rajekšnarh КЬёгасабқатёге!! pak- 
Инаш sighañı рагіуадјуац tətbå jivitam рі, evam euparittake jirlte (ат 
parittakarn ayusarmkhšraih gabetvâ vicarantānah ваиёпат na puñĝakiriyâya 
pamajjitum'? kšlo, appamišdo va!) kātu» valtatiti ayam etha attho, atha 
balš pamajjantîti ајагатагё siya huteă güthakalale ейкагё viya kštnaparhke 


1 во Bd, Chs idar nevatava. 3 Bd dvidasa-. 3 Bd jālebi, Cke jaleti, * Bd 
pavattetvā. 6 Bd kaibento. * Bd cahka-. 7 Bd na са papajjitu-. ° Bd 
vadbanti * Bd caghayabandhaparn-. '° Bd -niyya-, © Bj -carbka-. '*# Bd 
рарајј-. ©“ Bd са. 


5. Cullasutasomajštska. (525.) 187 


nimojjantš! pamajjanti, asurakāyan ti’ kšlakanJjskaasurayopiñ са 5 хаўфћепе 
titit айһо, 

Evah М. mahájanassa dh. desetvā Puúpphakam pâma 
pásádar агпуһа sattamāya bhūmiyā thito khaggena cülam 
chinditvā „ahah tumhākar kiñci па bomi, attano rājānam 
ganhathā“ ‘ti savethanacūlanm mahājanassa antare khipi. Та 
gahetvă mahājano bhümiyarn pavattento° уїррауа{{еп(о* pari- 
devi, tasmirù tháne mahantaro rajaggarn utthahi, patikkamitvā 
thitajano tah oloketvá „raññā’ cūlarh chinditvā вауе(ћепасӣ]а" 
mabājanantare khittā bhavissati, (епйуап pāsādassa avidūre 
rajavatti uggatā“ ti paridevanto 

в. Uhaññate rajaggam 
avidüre Pupphakamhi ° рёвёйе, 
maññe по kesá'° chinnë 
увзазвіпо dhammarājassā ‘ti р. а, 229, 

Tattba übañ ñate ti utí(hahat), rajaggan ti гајаккһапдЬо, avidūre 
ti ito ambākain thitatthānato avidüre, РиррМайатЬ1(! Pupphakapăsādassa 
samipe, maññs no tl ambëkah duamməarájsssa Шева chinnë bhavissantiti 
тайбе. 

М. рі рагісагакат ' pesetvā рађіајіќарагіккһаге āharā- 
реіуё kappakena kesamassum оћагёресуа alarkáram sayana- 
рие pátetvá rattapațtănarh " dasāni chiuditvá tàpi kāsāyāni 
nivásetvë mattikāpattah'® vāmamsakūte'“ laggetvë kattara- 
дапдаш ādāya mahātale aparšparam carnkamitvá pāsādā ota- 
ritvā antaravithirh patipajji, gacchantah pana tam! na koci 
вайјёоі, Ath' assa sattasatā khattiyakañña рйвйдатп abhirū- 
hitvā ќат adisvā šbharanabhandam eva disvā otaritvā avase- 
зёпаф solasasahassápam itthinam santikarh gantvá „(атһа- 
kah piyasāmiko Sutasomo mahissaro pabbajito“ ti mahā- 
saddena paridevamānā’'* bahi nikkhamirhsu. Tasmib khane 


1 Bd adds viys. ? Cts оши asu-. ® Bd -kañeika-. * Ске vaddħantj-, Rd 
vadbanti-. ` Bd -tt-. 6 Ва omits vi-. 7 Аа -о, “ Bd -па-. * Bd adda са. 
10 Cka .ọ, 11 Ва sikar, 1° Ck -ttha, Bd -patà-. '? Bd -ka-. ' Bd vima- 
arhsa-. 8 На omits tarn. 1 Bd adds va. 


15 


95 


188 XVII. Cast uilisanipata. 


mahajano tasea pabbajitabhāvarh aññāsi, вакајапарагаф sam- 
khubhitvá „rājā kira no pabbajito“ ti' rājadvāre sannipati, 
mahājano ,.rñj& idha bhavissati, ettha bhavissatiti“ pāsādä- 
dini’ paribhogatthānAni gantvā гаёўйпаш adisvā 
в. Ayam assa pasado 
вауаппо* pupphamalyavitikinno 
yamhi-m-anuvicari rājā 
parikinno itthāgārehi. 223. 
s. Ayam assa päāsådo 
зоуаппо* pupphamalyavitikinno 
yamhi-m-anuvicari гйёўй 
рагікіооо ñåtisamghena. 224. 
ss. Idam авва Каќарёгат 
вотарпаћ pupphamalyavitikinnar 
yambi-m-anuvicari гаја 
parikinno itthagárehi. 225. 
. Idam авва kütágáram 
sovannam pupphamalyavitikinnarh 
yamhi-m-anuvicari rājā 
parikinno üñátisarmghena. 226, 


вт. Ayam авва asokavanikā 
вироррііќа sabbakālikā rammā 
yamhbi-m-apuvicari гаја 
рагікіпро itthágárehi. 227. 

зв. Ayam авва авокатапіка 
supupphitā sabbakālikā rammá 
yamhi-m-anuvicari raja 
parikinno ñátisamghena. 3238. 

зо. idam авва пууйпатп 
supupphitarn sabbakalikarn гатташ 


' hd adds tedå. > Ck -e, Bd -а. 3 C.e, Bd -а. 


40. 


a. 


45. 


44. 


47. 


5. СоПавоќавотејаќака. (525.) 


yambi-m-anuvicari гаја 
рагікіпро itthāgārehi. 229. 
Idam азва оууёпаф 

supphitar sabbakälikah rammarh 
yamhi-m-anuvicari гёјё 
parikinno ñátisarmghepa. 230. 


. Idam assa kanikáravapam 


supupphitarm sabbakālikah rammarin 
yamhi-m-anuvicari rājā 

parikinno itthāgārehi. 231. 

Idar assa kanikaravanam 
supupphitam sabbakālikah rammar 
yambi-m-anuvicari rājā 

parikinno ñátisarnghena. 232. 
Idam assa pátalivanam 
supupphitar sabbakalikárn rammar 
yamhi-m-anuvicari raja 

parikinno itthāgārehi. 233. 


‚ Idam авва pátalivanarh 


sopupphitaro sabbakālikan rammarh 
yamhi-m-anavicari гаја 
parikinuo ñátisarmghena, 234. 


. Idam авва ашбауапаш 


supopphitarn sabbakálikarmn rammarn 
yamhi-m-anuvicari гаја 

parikinmo itthāgārehi. 235. 

Idam assa ambavanam 
supupphitarh sabbakálikarh rammar 
yamhi-m-anuvicari гаја 

parikinno ñátisarnghena. 236. 
Ayam assa pokkharani 

sañchannā andajehi vitikinná 


189 


16 


190 ХҮП. Cattālīsanipāta. 


yamhi-m-anuvicari raja 
parikinno itthāgārehi. 237. 

з. Ayam assa pokkharapi 
sañchanná andajehi vitikinnë 
yambi-m-annvicari гаја 
parikinno ñātisamghenā ti 238, 

imáhi gatháhi paridevanto vicari. 


Tattha vitikinno ti sovannapuppbehi ca оёпатаіуећі са samokilnno, 
рагікіппо ti parivšrito, itthāgārehîti! dāsiyo upådåya itthlyọ itthăgāro 
nāma, ПЁ{1вагїрһепй 'ti атассёрі idha ñāliyo evs, küțägåran t! sattara- 
tanavicitto ssyarakürágšáragabbho. asokavanikā ti asokavanabbümi, sabba- 
Кака ti sabbakālapartbhogakkhamā niccapupphità vå, uyyšánan ti Nendana- 
vana-Cittalatavana-sadisain пууапаш, sabbekālikan ti 060? pi utūsu up- 
pèjjanakapupphapbalasampannarh kanikāravanādisu sabbakālikan ti sabbakāle 
pupphltaphalltam ета, вайсһапп5 ti nānävidbehi јаіајакавшреһі2 suhu 
вайсһапоё, andejehi vitikinna ti sakunasarhghehi окіооё. 


Evari tesu {ези thānesu paridevitvā mahājano pupa rājañ- 
gaņarmh āgantvā 
4, Баја kho pabbajito 
Sutasomo rajjarn їшатї pahatvšna 
käsāyavatthavasano 
nāgo va ekako сагайєі 239. 
gāthah vatvā attano gharavibhavahm pahāya puttadbftaro 
hatthesu gahetvā nikkhamitvá B-ttass' eva santika aga- 
тпйві, tathā mātāpitaro puttadabarā* soļasasabassā са náta- 
kitthiyo ti sakalanagararh tuccham viva ahosi, јапарайауёвіпо 
pi tesarn pacchato' agamarmhsn, В. dvádasayojanikam  parisam 
gahetvā himavantábhimnkho pāyāsi. Ath’ авва abhinikkha- 
mapah дбаіу& Sakko Уіввакаттаг' атапќебуй ,,tšta Vissa- 
kamma’, Sutasomarājā abhinikkhamanarn nikkhanto', vasa- 


1 Сіз „еца (1. 3 Bda chasu. 2 Bd jalajathalajaku-. “ Bd -дага, Сїз -dahsro. 
> ра repeata pa-, * Ck -ke, Bd -пїуап, ? Bd visu-. Š Bd adda са. 


5. Cullasutasomsjataka. (525.) 191 


пе апап laddhurn' vattati, ватёрато mahë bhavissati, 
gaccha Himavantapadese Сайрёхїге tirhaayojanáyamam райса- 
yojanavitthatarn assamapadah māpehîti“ ревеѕі, so tathā 
katvā tasmim аззатарайе pabbajitaparikkháre pațiyādetvā 
ekapadłkamaggarh niharitvë devalokam eva gato. М. tena 
таррепа* tah авваша'* pavisitvā pathamarh sayan pabha- 
jitvä pacchā sese pabbājesi, aparabhāge bahü pabbajimsu, 
timsayojanikatthanarn' рагірӣгі. Vissakammena’ рап’ авва 
азватап тёріќапіуйдшо са bahunnarm рађһајіќапіуйло са 
B-assa авватарадат sarvidahananiyåmo* са Hatthipāla- 
jātake йрв{апауеп` eva veditabbo. Tattha М. yassa yass’ 
eva kāmavitakkādimicchāvitakko uppajjati (аф tam йїйзөпа 
upasarhkamitvá ákáse pallarnkena pisiditvá ovadanto' gātha- 
dvayam abhási: 
so, Мӣзво° pubbe ratikilitani 

hasitáni anussarittho °, 

тё vo катй һапїїва 

rammarin hi Sudassanam парага. 240. 

м. Mettaúñ ca cittañ ca bhāvetha 

appamāņarh divā ca ratto са, 

atha gañchittha ™ devan purarh 

&ёуйваш puññakammānan'' ti, 241. 


Tattba ratikilltšnit! kimaratiyo ca kiüyavaácakllavasena!? pavatta- 
Каші ca, mă vo káimă hanihsū 'ti më tumhe vattbukámakilesakáma 
hanirhau, ram mar hitl Sudessananagarain пётла ташапїуагп. tah mă апивзв- 
тіцћа, mettan t idah desanāmettaw sva, во pana caltāro рі brabmevibāre 
āeikkhi, аррашапап ti appamånasattārammansm, gacchittha 'ti gamissa- 
tba 18, devapuran ti Brahmalokarb. 


Y Ва adds ca. 9 Bd adds garntvš. * ВФ-шарайаш. * Bd -kerb thā-, Ck 
-каћа- — 3 Bd visu-. 6 Bd -dabita-. ! Bd ovādo-. * Bd misu. 9 Bd 
-ittha. 1° Ck gañji-, Bd gacchl-. ?!1 Bà -тіпап. 12 Bd -kbida-. !? 
Ch: _lssarh, 


- 


0 


192 XVII. Санајікапіраќе. 


So pi isigano tassa ovāde thatvë Вгаһтајока-рагёуапо 
ahositi sabbam Hatthipālajātakanayen’ eva kathetabbam. 


S. і. d. ё, „na bhikkhave idën' eva pubbe рі Т. mahánekkham- 
шаш nikkbami уета "і vatvā j. s: „Таййё mātāpitaro шећагаја- 
kulāni shesum. Candā Rāhulamātā, jejthaputto Sariputto. kanittha- 
putto Rāhulo, аһа Kbujjuttarā, Kulavaddhanasetthi Kassapo, mahā- 
senagutto Moggallāno, Somadattakumāro Anando, Ѕоќавотагёјё abam 
етй "і. Cullasutasomajatakam, Cattšlisenipütavannana 
nitthita. 


ХҮШ. PANNASANIPATA. 


1. Nalļlinikājātaka. 


Uddayhate janapado ti. Idah S.J, v. puranadutiyika- 
pèlobhanam а. k., kathento са tam bhikkhum „kena ukkantha- 
pito sîti™ pucchitvë ,„purāņadutiyikāyā“ 'ti vutte „esã kho bhikkhu tava 
anatthakārikā, pubhe {тат etah піззауа jhanë parihāyitvā meahāvi- 
обкаш patto" ti vatvā а, й.: 


А, B. Вг, r. k. Во. udiccabrāhmanņamahāsālakule nib- 
battitvā vayappatto` uggahitasippo isipabbajjarn pabbajitvā 
jhānābhiññah' nibbattetvā Himavantapadese уйзат kappesi. 
Alambusajátake vuttapayen' eva (атп paticca ekā migā gab- 
bham patilabhitvë puttan уіјёуі, 1sisiñgo t' еу’ assa námam 
аһові. Atha паш pitā vayappattarn pabbājetvā kasinapari- 
Кашштшат* ugganhapesi. So nacirass' eva jhánábhiññam nib- 
battetvā’ Himavantapadese* jhápasukhena kili’, ghoratapo 
parimáritindriyo ahosi, tassa sllatejepa Sakkabhavanam kampi. 
Sakko āvajjanto tah kāraņah ñatvā „ирйуеп' assa silar 
bhindissâmiti“ ¿(Ini samvaccharāni sakala-Kásiratthe vatțhir 
vāresi, rattharn aggidaddharn viya аһовї, sasse asampajjamëáne 
duobbhikkhapilit&á mannssā sannipatitvā rájañgane upakkosimhsu. 
Atha ne rājā vātapāne thito „kim etan“ ti pacchi. ,„Mahārāja 


1 Bd á. * Bd adde vatrā. > Rd -ā uppādetvā. * В4 omita hi. * Bd adds so. 
aaka V. 13 


15 


25 


194 ХУШ. Pannasanipata. 


tin вашуассһагапї devassa avassantassa sakalarattharn' ud- 
dayhati, manussá dokkhitā, deva?’ vassāpehi Пета“ "і. Баја 
silah samëdiyitvñ& прова{һатп upavasanto vassñápetum násakkhi. 
Tasmirn kále Sakko addharattasamaye tassa sirigabbharh pavi- 
вііуй ekobhásam katvë vehësarn atthšsi. Баја (аго disvā „Ко 
ві tvan“ ti pacchi. „Sakko ‘ham asmiti". ,„Кеп’ atthená-. 
gato siti“ „Vassati te таһага}а rajje? devo“ ti, „Na vassa- 
titi. ,Jënësi рап’ авва avassanakáranan“ ti. „Na jāni- 
miti“. „Mahārāja Himavantapadese Isisiñgo nāma tāpaso 
vasati gboratapo parimāritindriyo, so nibaddham deve vassante- 
kujjhitvā ākāsarh olokesi, tasmā devo па vassatiti“, Idän’ 
ettha kim kátabban“ ti. „Tassa tape bhinne devo vassatiti“, 
„Ko pan’ assa {араш bhinditurn samattho“ ti. „Dhitā te 
шаһагё}а Naliniká* samatthā, taù pakkositvá' ʻaenkatțhānaii. 
nāma рапбуй tāpasassa {араш bhiodā’ 'ti pesehiti“, Evam so 
гёјбоаф apusšsitvá sakattbánam eva agamāsi. Баја puna- 
divase amaccehi saddhir mantetvà dbftarah pakkosāpetvā. 
раћашат g. å.: 
1. Uddayhate janapado ratthañ cápi vinassati, 
ebi Nalinike gaccha, tam ше bršhmanam naya ‘ti, 1, 


Tattba tamme ti ќаш шаша anetthakărih Ытаһшапаш attauo vasaio 
ënebl, kllesarativasen’ asea silarh bbindà ‘ti. 


Tar sutvā së dutiyam р. й.: 

s. Nâhah dukkhakkhamâ rāja, пёһаш addhānakovidā, 
kathan ahah gamissāmi vanah kuñjarasevitan ti. 2. 
Tattha dukkbakkhamā ti aban mabārāja dukkhasss Шһаша na homi, 

addhënam pi na jánáml, s&harh katha gamissšmit!. 
Tato гаја dve gāthā abhāsi: 

s. Phitan janapada gantvā hatthină ca rathena са 

dărusarnghāțayānena evan gaccha №а]їпіуе. 3. 


1 Bd adda pi. 3 Ва vaasan. ? Bd rathe. * Bd millka. * Bd pakkosāpetvi. 


J. NalinikšsJštaka. (526). 195 


+. Наст assarathā patti — gacch' evádáya khattiye 

tav’ eva' vannarüpena vasarh ќат ёпауіѕвавіі. 4. 

Tattha dšrusamghštayanena 'ti amma Nalinike tvah padasi па 
gamlesasi, phitarif pana subhikkham khemarh attano janapadamh hatthivšbanehi! 
кепїта tatopsram рі ajjhokāse patlcchanneus vaybādinā udakațțbāne navisarh- 
вћаќепа: darussarbghalayáanena gaccha, vannarüpenë (1 етап akilamamárnat 
gantvā tava ° vannena c' eva rüpasampadiya са іа һтаһшапаги attano таваф 
šnaylssaníti. 


Evain so dhīitarā saddhim akathetabbam pi ratthapari- 
pšlanaí nissāya kathesi. Sâpi „sădhū“ “і sampaticchi. Ath’ 
assā sabbar dātabbayuttakarn datvá amaccehi saddhim пууо- 
jesi. Amaccā paccantarh gantvā tattha khandhavárarh піуё- 
setvä rajadbitararm ukkhipăpetvā vanacarakadesitepa maggena 
Himavantar: pavisitvá pubbaphasamaye tassa assamasamipam':' 
pápunimsu. Тавтіф khane Bo. puttan assamapade nivattetvā 
sayarin phalâphalatthāya araŭñarh pavittho hoti, Vanacarakā 
sayarh assamarh ăgaotvā tassa рапа dassanattháne thatvâ 
Nalinikāya taù dassetvā' dve gāthā уаййийви: 

s. Kadalidhajapaññáno ābhujfparivāraņo" 
eso padissati rammo Isisiñgassa аввато '°. 5. 
e. Eso арр! ‘вва samkháto, eso dhümo padissati, 

тайбе по aggim hëpeti Isisingo mahiddhiko ti. 6. 

Тайһа kadalisahkhätā dhajš paññanam!! asəā "1 kadalidhajapaññano, 
šbhujiparivšrano2)) ti bbūjapattavanaparikkbitto, ваф КһаФо Н ево aggl 


азва Iolsiñgassa йапепа!* sarbkhšto paccakkbato jalati, шапйе по aggin ti 
па 26610 hapeti Jubati'‘ pariceratìiti 1° шайбе !*, 


Апассёрі" В-авва arañar pavitthavelayam eva assa- 
таф pariváretvá агакиһаш thapetvā rájadhitararñ isivesarh 


1 Ck tadveva. ? Ва adds са ratbavāhanehi са. 2 Ске -пё. * Bd akilllmana. 
5 Ск (абса, 6% СЕ ци, Ceta, 7 Bd assamāpadassasa-. ° Ва dassanto. ° 
Ска -Jim-, Bd -Javārito. 10 Ско в, ?! Ск опа. 12 Rd šëbhüjaparivirito, 
Сї зһһйјіфрагіћагапо. !* Bd ЈЬёпепа. !* во В4; Cts додай. 125 
Сю -bəra-. !$ Ва -ёші. | Bd adds kho. 

13* 


30 


96 


10 


196 КҮШ. Рарпёваніріса, 


gāhāpetvā suvaņņacirakah' піуёвапарёгорапеф' katvå sab- 
bëlarnkšárehi alarhkaritvā tantubaddhan" cittabhendakamh* раһа- 
petvā аввашарайаш pavesetvā sayarb bahi rakkantā attharnsu. 
58 tena bhendukena'* kilanti carnkamanakotirh ^ otari. Tasmirh 
khane Isisiñgo panpasāladvāre раппава!арһа!аКе” nisinno hoti, 
во tam йрассһап{їй disvå Dhitatasito utthāya paņņasālarh 
pavisitvă atthási. Sápi 'ssa раппавй1вйуйгатп gantvā kIli yeva. 

5. бай ca tato са uttarim attbam pakâsento tisso gātbē аћћазі: 

т. Тай са disväna äyantih šámuttamanikundalar “ 

Isisiñgo pāvisi bbīto assamam раппасһёдапвш. 7, 

s. Assamassa ca вё dvare bhenduken' assa kiati 
vYidarmsayanti айдап! guyham pakāsitāni’ са. 8, 
э. Тай са дівтапа kilantinm pannasšlam gato jati, 

assamā nikkbamitvána idam vacanam abrarviti. 9, 

Тайћа bbendukenassë '(1 авва Jlelsiñgassa аввашадуёге bhendukona 
kilau, ідей вауао!ї і dassenü, guyhar paskasitšni° cë 'ti guyhañ са 
rabassañgarh pakāsitāni’® ca pškatáni mukbahatthidini, аһгаті 17 во kira 
pannaešlšya thatvë cintesi: вас" ëyarh yakkho bhaveyya panuasšlam pavisitvë 
mar 1! muramurapetvš khideyya, пёуаф !? yakkho tāpaso bhavissatiti, tasmă 15 
nikkhamitvā puechissámi nan ti vatvë дааш !< šha. 

зо, Ambho ko nāma во rukkho yassa távamgatam phalam, 
` düre pi khittarb pacceti, па tarn оһйуа gacchatiti katbesi. 10, 

Tattha yasasa levarhgatan ti yasasa fava rukkhassa evatgatikarn 
тапогашаш рһаіер ko nāma so rukkho ti citrabhepdukena aditthapubbattë 
Tukhkhaphalsn'¿etena bbavitabban ti maññamano evarh puccbhi. 

Ath’ assa ва rukkham cikkhanti: 

з. Assamassa шата '° brahme samipe Gandhamádane 
bahavo '* tádisá rukkhā yassa tóvarhgatam phalarn, 

dūre рі khittarn pacceti, na mam '' oháya gacchatiti g. ё. 11. 


1 Bd -kona. ? Ck -паф, C*? -рарпгапап, Ba nivšsene páruppanam. ? Bd 
-bandharn. * ñd citrage-. ° Bd ge- throughout. * Віз -tiyarh. ! Hd рївапарһа-. 
* Ваг „Шт. * Che -kāni. 19 Bd adds pucchlssšmi nanti, В» pucchissámi nanti 
gâthamäha. !! Che (аф. '? Сіз пасдуап. >? Bd (зета corr. to asami, !* 
Сіз omit pucchlssámi nanti vatvš gātham. !5 Сг са шат, CE са, omitting maw. 
16 Ors ve. 1? Bd тапап іп the place of па mar. 


1. Nalinikšjatska. (526.) 197 


Tattha samipe Gandbamadane t! Gandhamadanapabbate mama asss- 
masamipe, уезза tevarhgatan ti yassa evarbgatarn, (акёто sandhikaro 1. 
Iti за musā’ abhási, itaro papa saddahitvă ,.tápaso ево“ 
ti вайййуа patisanthárarhn karonto: 
1. Etü bhavarn assam’ iman adetu, 
pajjañ ca bhakkhañ ca paticcha dammi, 
idam sanam atrabhavarn nisidatu, 
ito bhava mūlaphalāni bhuñjatü ‘ti g. а. 12, 
Tattha левашірап ti assamsri imami hhavain pavisatu, adetü 'tl yatha- 


sannihitah ābārah bhuñjatu. pajjan t! pādabbħañjanah. bhakkban ti 
madhuraphalāphalarn, ра!1сеһй '1 patiganha. idam sanau ti pavitthakšle 


evam гђа. 


„Кіп te idan“ ti (авей? pannasálarn рахізі(тё katthatthare* 
півїдапбуа suvannacirake dvidhāgate* sarira appațicchannarh 
ahosi, tápaso mëtogámasarirassa aditthapubbattá disvá ,.vano 
eso" ti вайпйуа evan йһа: 

1». Kin ќе ідаф ürunam antarasmim 
supicchitam kanha-r-iva-ppakasati, 
akkháhi me pucchito etam attharb, 

Козе* nu ќе uttamañgam pavitthan' t, 13, 

Tauha supicchitan ti dvinnar ürünarn samagamakile  suphassitarh * 
sippimukhasanthšnarn © aubbalakkhanena Һ 1! asamsnnågatăya tah (hanan 
ñvštadhšátukarh boti samannaágatšya abbbunnatan?? alppiputamukhasanthanam- 
khkauharlvappakasatiii! ubhosu passesu kalskarn !! viya khâyatl, ko'se* 


nu te uttamalgarn pavilthan ti tava uttamañgam lJliñgasanthanam па 
раййауайн, kin пи tah tava sarirasarhkháte кове pavilthan ti puechi, 


Atha nam så vañcayanti gáthadvayam ёћа: 
14. Ahar vane mülaphalesanam сагат 
üs&dayirn acchah зирһогагїрат'*, 


1 Ck karena, C? -karona, Б@ byañjausssudhikiro. 3! Bó musšávšdari. 2? Ck pd 
(аваа. * Bd katbantare, 5 Bd -kate, 6 Сёз „во, 7 Che -ttho. ° Bd -gamana-. 
* Bd .рһа-. 1° Bd sippiputamukha-, Bz eippibalamukba-. !! Bd -ne t. '? 
во Сї; Bd abbhantararp. !% Cts -kšstu, Bd -kisaniti. !* Ck kšlamkarp. 15 
Си omit во. 


- 


0 


95 


198 ХУШ. Pamnpašsanipata. 


зо mam patitvā sahas’ ajjhapatto 
panujja mam abbahi' uttamañgar. 14, 
1в. бу-йуаш vano khajjati kanduvávati, 
sabbañ са Каат па labhāmi sāta, 
paho bhavam kanpdum imar vineturh, 
kurute' bhavarh уёсієо brahmanatthan ti. 15, 

Tattha авад ауіп ti ghattesirn?), āgacchantarn diavå laddans paharin’ ti 
attho, patitvă t| upadhávitva, sabasajjhapatto 15 sabasà ејјһара((о 
mampatto, pauujjš ‘tl atha mah påtetvä, abbshíti* mukhona шата utta- 
mañgarh luñcitva раккаші, tato ра!!Вауа Imasmirb (аре vano jāto, svayan tu 
зо ауага tato ра{{һауа шауһгш vano khajjati c' eva kanduñ са karoti, їаррас- 
cayà сёһат? sabbakšlatn káylkacetasikasukharn оа labhämi, paho’ «l pabû’ 
зашайһо, brābmanattban ti bhavah mayā уёсісо idam!” bràbmanassa 
attbarh karota idam me дик һал harš'!! 'ti vadati. 

So tass musavádarn sabhāvo ti saddahitvā „sace vo" 
evam sukha hoti karissāmîti“ tarh райевага oloketvá anan- 
tarah g. й.: 

16. Gambhirarüpo te vano salohito 
apütiko pannagandho'' mah са, 
karomi te kiñei kasãyayogarh '* 
yathā bhavarn paramasunukhi Бһауеууё'° ‘і. 16. 

Tatthe salohito tí rattobhšso, aputiko ti pütimarmbsarabito, panoa- 
gandhol1 ti (окат duggandho, kasāyayogan?? ti aharn kecikecirukkha- 
kasâyo '” gahetvā teva ekari Казйуауодапп!! karomiti. 

Tato Nalinikā gātham аһа: 

и. Na mantayogā па kasāvayogā 
па osadhá brahmacárI kamanti, 
yam te mudü tena '* vinehi kandukarmn 
yathā ahai paramasukhi bhaveyyan ti. 17. 


1 Bd-bu-. 3 Bds қагшаф. ? Bd ghšáte-. * Ске -rau, > Bd adds mamai. * 
Сіз avyahiti, B4! abhuhiti. ! Bd khohar. ° Ск -ū, * Bd -о, '° Bd ішаћ. 
11 Ва -áhi, Вг -rāpebl. !? Bd (о. 15 во С; Bd vauns- corr. to vaņa-. '* 
Cha ki-, 15 Che -ууао. !* Bd таппа сол. to vana-. |7 Che ká-. 26 во Cis; 
Bd keclruk-. !3 Ва ghațjena mudnukena. 


1. Nalinikäjātaka. (526.) 199 


Tattha kamantju bbo brshmacšri jmpssmir mama vane п’ ета mants- 
yogā na kasavayogš na pupphaphalādini osadhāni kamanti, anekavšrarh katebl 
pi tebi otassa phasubhavo па bhütapoubbo, yan рапа te etsrü mudu añgajātatn 
tena Ehat(iyarninass” eva! tassa handu па hotl, tasmåasa tena vinehl? 
kandan ti. 


So „sacca езй bhanatiti“ sallakkhetvā „„ше!һипазаш- 
вардепа silat bhijjati jhánarn antaradhāyatíti“ ajánanto mātu- 
gāmassa aditthapubbattë methnnadhammassa ca ајёпапаЬћёуепа 
bhesajjan ti vadantiyā tāya metbunah patisevi’, tāvad ev’ 
assa silai bhijji' jhānar parihāyi, so dve tayo үйге sam- 
saggam katvë kilanto hutvā nikkhamitvā saram огпуһа nahátvá 
patippassaddhadaratho āgantvā раппава!йуа півійііхё puna pi 
tam {араво ti таййатйпо vasanatthánarn pucchanto: 

и. Io nu bhoto katamena assamo, 

kacci’ bhavarm abbiramasī* araññe, 
kacci'te mülaphalam pahütam, 
kacci' bhavantarh па уіћітвапіі у&)& ti g. à. 18, 

Tattha katamenā ‘ti lo kataniena disabhšgena bhoto aasamo, bhavan 
ti šlapanam atai. 

Tato Nalinikā catasso gātbā āha: 

ат, Мо ujur uttaráyam ' disãyarh 

Кһетё пайї Himavantá pabhāti, 

{авай tīre assamo тауһа* rammo, 

aho bhava assamam mayharh? passe. 19. 
зо. АтЬё ca sālā tilakā са jambuyo (IV *%°) 

uddālakā pātaliyo ca phullā, 

samantato kimpurisábhigitarh 

aho bhavar assamarh шаућа' passe. 20, 
a. Tālā са mūlā са phal]á ca mêttha, 

vannena gandhena upetarüparh 


» Ва ghattay-. ?* Bd təsmë vi- 5 Bd райветай. * Cts -иуё. ° Bd kiñceli. 
* Ва іва. 7 Ва kicci. ! Cka ujuttarāyah. * all three MSS. шауһап, 
зв Cs hd ап. 


30 


15 


35 


30 


200 XVIII. Panmnsssnipata. 


tah bhūmibhāgehi ареївгйрат 

aho bhavarh assàmamh тауһа! passe. 21. 
зз. Phalā са mūlā ca pahta mêttha’ 

vannena gandhena rasen’ upetå, 

йуап{1* ca luddakā tarn padesar, 

тё me tato mülaphaler аһашвй* "ti. 22, 

Tattha uttariyan tl uttarâya, Khemă tl етафлат(ка nadif, Himavant ë 
pabbätiti Himavantato pavattati, aho tt pattbanattbe nipāto, uddālakā ti 
våtaghätakā, kim purisšbhigitan ti sasbbadà  parivšretvë тадЬогаваддепа 
gšyantebl kimpurisebi abbigitarn, tālā ca mūlā ca рһаі& са metthā 'tt 
ettba шата assame pāsådikā tšálarukkha ca (еғеш уета vanDšdibi б sampannë 
kandasarbkhátš tālamūlā са tšlš са mūli са pahütamettha 'ti пёпёгоккћа- 
phalāphalā” са rukkhavaliimūlā са pahūtā etths, mā ше tato ti {ай mame 
assamapadesarh pahütaluddakš ägacchanti, тауа c' ettha âharitvā thapitarh 
babun шадЬогагазаф mūlapbalah* абі, te meyi ciråyante mülapbslšphalarh 
һагеууша, ta tato mama mülapbalaphaisath mā ahaerirhsu, (аата sace mayá 
вайд āgantukāmo ehi noce ahah gamissámitl āha. 

Tam sutv& täpaso уйға pitu йдатапй* адћіуйзёреіий g. й.: 

sas. Рі& татай mülaphalesanam gato 
idäni ñgacchati säyakāle, 
ubho va gacchámase assamam tam 
удта pita mülaphalato'° etü ‘і. 23. 

Tattha ubho va gaccbšmase ti mamam’! pitu ärocetvà ubbo vs 
gamissama. 

Tato sā cintesi: „ayah tāva агаййе vaddhitabhāvena 
mama itthibhāvarn па jānāti, pitā рап' assa mamh'’ disvë va 
janitvë ‘tvarn idha Кій karosîiti’ kājakoțiyā'” paharitvā slsam 
pi me bhindeyya, tasmim anāgate yeva тауё ganturù vattati, 
āgamanakammam pi те nitthitan“ ti sā tassa ñgamanülpáyam 
ācikkhantī itara g. à, 


1 Bd „ат. ? Ck -tamattba, Сг Bd -tamattbe corr. to -tšunetba. ? so all tbree 
М58. for са. * Вія qamantato. ° Bd vannagsudhšádi. * Вә phalš ca, Bd 
mülš са phalā ca in tbe place of tālamūli---. 7 Bd only one phalê, * 
Bd bshü madbū rasspbalāpbalah. ° ВӘ adds tāva, '!° so all three MSS. for 
-läto? !! Che mam. !% Che mama. !# Che -yàya. 


1. 


Nalinikājātaka. (526.) 


s. Аййе Ьаһй isayo sādburūpå 
гёјівауо anamagge vasanti, 


te yeva pucchesi mam’ assaman tarh 
te tah nayissanti татат sakñse ti. 24. 


201 


Tattha rājīsayo tl samma па sakhā mayā ciršylturh, añĀe paua sšdhusa- 
bhāvå brâhmanīsayo са ràjisayo ca anumagge mama assamamaggapasse vasanti 
abah te temi? ācikkhitvā gamissêmi, tvah te puccheyyšsl, te teab таша 


aantikei naylssantitl. 


Evah så attano ра1йуапйрйуагї katvá pannasaálato nikkha- 


mitvá olokantam' eva „tvarù nivattā“ ‘ti vatvá ágamana- 


maggen’ eva amaccănar santika agamāsi, te tam gahetvā 


khandhávárarm gantvá anupubbena Bārāņasim sarhpápnunirhsno, 


Sakko pi tam divasam eva “tussitvá sakalaratthe devarn 


Vassüpesi' Іѕізійда(ёрававвёрі* taya pakkantamattáya sarīre’ 
dāho пррајјі, во kampanto pannasšlam pavisitvā väkacīrarh 


рагорісуё socanto nipajji. 


Во. вйуатї āgantvå puttan apas- 


santo ,kuhin nu kho gato“ ti Касат otāretvāå paņņasālarn 
pavisitvë' nipannakam disvá „tāta kim karositi“ pitthin pari- 
majjanto tisso gáthë abhási: 
æ. Na te katthāni bhinnāni, na te udakam ābhatam, (ТҮ 231) 


aggi pi te na hāpito, kin nu mando va jhāyasi. 


зе. Bhinnāni kattháni buto ca’ aggi 


tapani pi te samitā brabmacárI 


pithañ ca mayharh udakañ ca hoti 


ramasi tuvarn brahmabhüto puratthá. 26. 
sz. Abhinpakattho ві anábhatodako 
ahápitaggI si° asiddhabhojano' 


па me (пуаш šlapasi mamn ajja, 
natthan nu kim cetasikañci"” duakkhan ti. 27. 


1 Bd te ваъ. 3 Rds tarn olokentain. ? Bd -t. 


6 Bd adds tar. ? Bd va. 
Chs for -kañ ca? Hd -ka. 


° Ва ahoaltagRi pl. 


25. 


4 Ске -go-. 5 Віз evathkáye. 


* Се anitiha-, Pd aslitha, 


КАР 


5 


10 


20 


95 


10 


20 


25 


202 XVIIL Pannasanipšts. 


Tattba bhinnānitl araGüato uddhatäni, Da ħhīpito ti na Јао, bbin- 
nānîti pubbe (ауё mamågamanavelâya katthani пййһа{ап' eva honti, huto 
са aggiti aggl ca huto! hoti? tapaniti? visivanaaggittbasankhātā* tapani 
pi te samitā vat sarnvidabltš va boti, pītban ti mama ñaanattbáya рї!һап са 
paññattam eva boti, udakañ сё ° pidadhovanodakañ са upațjbltam* eva 
hoti, brahmabhūto ti {таю hi? jio purattbā sețtbabbūto Imasmirh агаййе 
ahbbiramasi, abhinnakhattbo siti sa dāni ajja anuddhatahattbo', asiddba- 
bbojeano? ti na te kiñcl ambâkəh kandemūlarn vă раппапп vi sedita, 
mamajjā "і mama putte ajja na ше tvah šlapasi, națtbannu kin ti kin 
te nattharh, kim cetaslkadukhbarh, akkhābi me nipanpakëaranan ti puccbati. 

So pitu vacanarn sutvā (ага káranam kathento ā.: 

зв. Idhâgamā jatilo brahmacārī 
sudassaneyyo виїапй vineti 
n' evátidigho na punátirasso 
sukanhakanhacchadanehi'° bhoto. 28. 
1. Amassu jato аригйпауаппї, 
šdhararüpañ ca рап’ assa Кап{һе'!, 
dv’ āssa ganda ure" sujātā 
sovanņapiņdūpanibhā'’ pabhassarā '*. 29, 
Mukhañ ca tassa bhusadassaneyyar '*, 
Каппевп'* lambanti са kuñcitaggš, 


te jotare carato тёпауавва 
suttañ ca уап sarnyamanam jatánam. 30. 
s. AĀÕĀ ca tassa” samñamani catasso 
пїЇёрї їй lohitaká са satā 
tā рїїйзаге '* carato māņavassa 
ciritisamghā-r-iva' pāvusamhi. 31. 
ss. Na mekhalarm тпайўатшауаш dhareti, 
Da santacarh™ no? pana pabbaj’ азѕа?", 


Ске айй са. ? Ве Jahšáti. * Cks -ціуа ú. * Bd vislbbana aggi sañkhātā. Š 
Ва adde sayameva. * Bd2 upatbapi-. 7 Bd tuvampi. ° Ck anutțhava-, Сг 
anuddhava-. ° Bd asitha-. !9 Cs Bd omit one kanha. '! Се -о, Bd -hanhe. 
"2 read: duv'šsesa апда urato? Bd Jvayamšgsndhá-, ' Bd suvanpatindu-. 1“ 
Cks -bbâsare. 1° Bd bhüsarh-, Ске bbuja-. !* Сә -osu, Bd -šsu. 17 ва all 
three MSS. !* Chr sihsare, Bdz pisare. 19 Ck viriti-, Сә сірці, Bd tiritt-. 39 
во С^; Ck aantamam, Bz sanhare, Bd sanhare corr. to nantare. ’i Сіз vo, 
35 Сі, свз. 


ва. 


1. Nalinikājātaka. (526.) 


ї&! јосаге jaghanavare?' vilaggā 


sateratë vijjur-iv' antalikkhe. 
АКЪПакапі° ca avanțakāni 
Һебһё nabhyá katisamohitāni 


32. 


avighattita пїссаш kilirh* karonti, 

han tāta kim rokkhaphalāni tāni. 33. 
Jatšë ca tassa ЪЫһивайаввапеууй* 
раговаќат vellitaggā sugandhā, 


dvedhāsira s&dhuvibhattarüpo, 


aho on kho mayha tathā jatássu. 34. 
Yadā ca во parikati tā* jatāyo 


уаппепа gandhena upetarūpā 
niluppalam vātasameritam va 


tath’ eva samkhëti' vanassamo ayam, 35. 


Ратко ca tassa bhusadassaneyyo` 
n° etādiso yādiso mayha kāyo, 


во vāyati erito mālutena 


“апат yathá sggagimhesu phullam. 36. 


Nihanti so rukkhaphalam pathavyā 


sucittarūparh ruciram  dassaneyyarh 


khittañ ca nassa’ punar ебі hattham, 
han tëta kir rukkhaphalan по kho tam. 


Dantā са tassa Ъһовайавѕапеууё° 
suddhá вата sarmhkhavarüpapapná 


mano pasãdenti уїүагїуатйпа, 


па ha'° nüna во sākam акћасі tehi". 


Akakkasam ара[ісаф '* muhurh mudurh '2 


203 


37. 


38. 


[uju] anuddhatarm '* acapalam авва bhāsitar, 


1 Chs aa. 


2 Bd jañghatane corr. to jañghanantare? 


* Bd kila. * Bd bhusari-, Ска hhuja-. *¢ Bd pakirati tš. 


corr. to -váti, Hs -vātl. ° so Bd"; Сё? auci-. * Bd ta.. 


Ct kehi. 


19 Ci араја, Се agala, Bd aggațitarn. 


13 Cka mubum. 


з Сї» abile-, Bd akbila-. 


7 Ва sarnvåyatl 


19 Cs bha, Bd hí 1 


14 Bd -tarh. 


15 


20 


204 


4 


46. 


XVIIL Раппёзапіраќа. 


rudah manuññam Кагауїкавоѕвагаћ 
һабауайдатат raújayat' eva те mano. 39. 


. Віпдоѕваго nátivissatthavákyo 


па пйпа sajjháyamatippayutto, 
icchāmi kho tam punar eva datthum 
mittarm ' hi me mánav' áhü poratthā. 40. 


л. Susandhi sabbattha vimatth'imam увпага 


puthur’ sujātarn kharapattasannibham — 
ten’ eva marb uttariyána' mëánavo 
vivariya отша * jaghanena pllayi. 41. 


‚ Tapanti šbhapti' virocare va 


звѓќегаі&* vijjur-iv' antalikkhe 
bāhā mudü айуапа]отавёйїв& 
vicitravattañgulikássa ворћаге, 42. 


‚ Akakkasañgo na ca’ дїрћаіото 


nakháesa' dighá арі lohitaggă, 
mudühi báháhi palissajanto* 
kalyanarüpo ramayarh'° орабћаһі. 43. 


‚ Dumassa їйїйрашЫһа* рађћаввагё '' 


suvapnakambütalavattasucchavI 
hatthá mud, tehi mam sarhphusitvë'* 
ito gato, te mam dahanti tāta. 44. 


. Na ha" ойра во khárividhar ahási'!'*, 


па пйпа'* katthëni sayarh abhañji'*, 

па nüna во hanti дате koțbāriyā ”, 

па рі ‘вва '* hatthesu khiláni'*'atthi. 45. 
Accho ca” kho tassa уапаш akási, 

во mam bravi: sukhitar шат Кагоћі, 


' Rd .о, 


* Bds-ri-. 


Ве -5. 1 Chr-ü, Bd-u. > Сіз yaya. * Che ўга, 5 Ске ñhanti. 


T Che та. ° Chs negh-, Bde пакћазва. ° BÈ palissajjanto, CH 


pajslissajapto. ?° Сә marayarni, Rd ramayharh, Bs ramayan? '! Ске pabhë- 
ватё, "> Cks шетафрћо-. 1% Bd omits Һа, !* Chs abhàal, Bd ahosl. 1? 
BA adds so. !® B2 abhu-, 1? Bd kumā-. !* Bå hissa. !# Ве kħllāni, Che 


khinani. 


30 Ckrajjeva. 


1. NashunfkšJjštaka. (526) 205 


t' ñ&harh' karin’, tena татёрі" sokhyarn. 

so ca bravi sukhito smiti brahme. 46. 
a. Ayañ ca te máluvapannasanthatë 

тікіспагӣрё va mayá са tena ca, 

kilantarüpá udake ramitvāå 

ропарриоаћ с" assa kutim тајёша. 47. 
в. Ма m` ajja mantă patibhanti‘ а 

па aggihuttarn ра рі yarhña tatra, 

па сёрі ќе mülaphaláni bhuñje 

уёув па равваті taù brahmacárin, 48, ` 
a, Addhë& рејёоаѕі tuvam рі táta 

уаввагп disáyarh° vasate brahinacári, 

tam таш disan papaya táta khippam 

mā (е ahah amarirn assamambi. 49. 
so, Vicitrapuppbarn hi vapa вшат mayá 

dijabhigbuttharn' dijasarnghasevitarmh, 

(аф mar disarn'pëpaya tšta khippam 

purá te pánam vijahámi assame ti. 50. 


Tattha idħâgamâà tl tata imara 5 assamapadarh šgato, sudassaneyyo 
ti sutthu dassaneyyo, воќапӣ ti sutthu tanuko nëtikiso nêtltbOlo, vínetlti 
attano sarirappabhšya assamapadarn ekobhāsarh viya pūreti, sukanhakan- 
bacchadanebií bhoto ti tšta tassa hho(o Кепћеһі Капһассһадапеһ! bha- 
Inaravanpehí kesehi sukanhasisarn sumajjitamanimayarh viya khäyati, samassu- 
3Мо tl па tšv' азва maseu jāyati, taruno Jeva, apuranavanníti acirapabba- 
jito, ädhārarūpañca panassa kanthe ti kapthe са pan' авва amhškarh 
bhikkhabhajanathapauapannadharasadisarn” pllandhanarnh ак muttābharaņarh '° 
sandhāya vadati, gan dš 1! t| thane sandhšyñha, uresujātā ti urambi sujátš, 
urato t| pi ра{һо, pabhassarš ti pabhšsampsnna, ређћазаге ti р! pātho, 
obhäsayantîtt attho, hhbhusadassaneyyan!? Ц ativlya dassaneyyarh, Кийс1- 
taggāâ™ ti sihakundalelt sandhšáya табай, suttañcā ’ti yah tassa Ја(ё- 
һапдһапавцап!# tam pi ]оїзЧ!#* pabbeñ ce muücati, ssūñūāāmani!” 
Catesso И imina тшап!айтаппарата|ата}аїашауап1 рі сабат! р!!апдВапап! 
Е: <=. = Аа 
1 Cks пёћат, Bd tëmahaih. 2 all three MSS. kari. 5% Ва „ві, * Ch» shanti. 
5 read: Чї? 6 Che -ghuttš, Bd -ghujhah. ? Bds vanar. * Bd ide, ° 
Ваз -рапайһага-. '° Ні» muttābārah. !' Bd kaphš. !3 Che bhuja-, Bd bhusqarb-. 
1» Ва kiñcl-. !+ Bd -lah. 15 Cke -arbsu-, 16 Bd -teti-. 1? Bd ауашіһі. 


10 


15 


10 


15 


35 


206 XVII. Panntisanipata. 


dasseti, tš plisare! ti tšni pilandhanāni pāvasena va vatte? дете cirti- 
marhghš ° туа viravantl', mekhale’ ti møekħalah, ayam ата vā pățbo,: 
idah’ nivatthakañcanacirarn” esndhāyâbe, па santace® ti na vāke’, i. v.h. 
tšta yathā meya tlņnamaysih vā väkamaya vā våkacīirarn 10 katvš!! dhārema 
па tathā so'? so репа вотаппасїгаф dhâretiti, akbīlakāníti'® акёсёні ! nik- 
kapțakāni’’, kalisamohltšaniti Шауа nibaddhāini!$, niccam kilib Y 
karontitl aghattitšnl p! nlecarh kilikilāyanti'’, shantšta 19 ti ambho?? tšta, 
кїй rukkhaphaláni3! tšníti tāni tassa?’ шёпауавва 2° suttàrülhëni ketiyarh 
baddbáni katararukkhaphalšni pšámš 'ti manjsamghani"t sandhayáhə, јаја u 
jatāmandalâkârena baddhëá ratanamissakakesavattlyo sandhayáha, vellitaggâ ti 
kuñcitagaš 2°, dvodhāelro ti tasea sisarn drodhā Ка(уё baddhánar j ї 
rasana’? suithu vibhattarüparb, tathš tl yathă tassa minavassa jață tathë 
tumhehi mama па baddhā?’, abo vata mamiápi tathā азай 'ti patthento”, 
upetarüpā t| upetasabbävä, vštasameritam vā ti ystba пёша niluppalarn 
vätona samiritarh tath’ eva ayah imasmih vauasande assamo sarhváti, noti- 
diso ti па etădiso, mama?’ kāye parinko n’ etādiso tases, so hi dassaniyo с' 
ova augandho са, aggagimhesü `(1 vassntasamaye, nibentitl pabarati, ki rh 
Tükkhaphałamh nu kho tan ti katararukkhassa nu kho ќар phalarh, ваш- 
khavarüpapanni?? ti sudhotasamkhapațibhāgãā, в&кашакЬа01сі2! nüna ro 
māpavo maya viya tehi dantehl rukkhapapņnàni с' eva mūlaphalāni са na 
khādi, amhškarm Ы tānl khbādantānam”? карапдатаопабапіх 22 ti дїрей, 
akakkasan tÍ tata tasaa bhšsitarb apharusarh agalitarb, puneppuna vadan- 
tassñpi madhuratāya muhum mudu 2* amammanqataya?5 ujum acikkhittataya?⁄ 
anuddhatarn3! patitthitatiya асара!атї?%,‚ rudan tí bhhsamanassa pan' assa”? 
ñarassarbkhštarn rudam рі Тлапоһагагп karavikassa viya 6 sumadhurai, 
raüjJayatevš "і mama mano raüjetl 2 yeva, bindussaro ti pinditassaro, 
mapavahü tt so hi manavo рогаќћауа mama mitta‘! abū, susandhií sab- 
battha vimatthimarm +апап ti tšta tassa minavassa ürünam antaro okami 
Yanan atthi, tab susandbir supbussitarn*" sippiputamukhassdisarh sabbattba vi~ 
mațjharn samantato mattharn, puthun'? ti mahantarb, snjātan ti вовап(ћай, 


1 Che të sisare, Bd tà рі ваге. ? Bd ратш!һе. ° Ck ciri-, Dd tiritisañkhāghô, 
Вг tirati-, Сіз -ghāti. * Bd тайап. 5 Bd mikbalan, Вә malhalan, * СӘ 
idanıl. ? Bd vattba-. ° Bd аапһаге? В» saudbare. ° Bd nivāte. 10 Се cirarh. 
11 Ва omita Ка-. '? Cks omit so. '? Cke abīla-, Bd akbi-. 14 Ck akāmāni, 
Bd вй. ?’ Ck pikkhanthakani, Bd nippannāni, С nibsnta-. '% Bd bsndhâni. 
1! Bd kilah. 19 Bde nicca kšlarm kilā-. !* Chs зама *0 Chs ашһе. 3! CH 
-kkhe-. 32 Ско sea. 23 Ck paminamassa, Сз -nacassa. 2* во Ck; Сг -пі, Bde -ti. 
15 Ck kundinaggā. 2% Bd bandhšuar vasena, omitting Jatánarn, 2? Bd mani- 
bandhá in (Ье place of mama-. ?* Bd assuti pathento. * Bd to tàdleo 11 Ша 
yādiso шарша, 29° Bd sapkhš-. 3! Bd -mañkbāditehitine. 2° Bd -u, 35 Bd 
sapañkápannavanpšádanti. 2* Ске торот. 9° во Che; Bd apamussatâya, Bs 
âpapussatiya. 2? so Сіз; Вг аті-, ВА omita u- tāya. 3% Bd (аф, *' all 
three MSS. -ррајаф 3° В4 omita panasse. 4° Bd -Ја-, 41 pdo. * pd 
-pbuppasitah, Ch -passitam. **% Che -6, Bd -u. 


1. Nillnikšjšëtaka. (526.) 207 


kharapattasannibhan! ti padumamakulssannibharh, uttariyānā 'ti utta- 
ritvā avatibaritrā, рїїауїїї pilesi?, tapantiti tasaa māņavasse вагїгаќо 
niccharantā вотарпатаппё ® гатавїуо jalanti* obhásenti° virocenti* са, bāhā ti 
baha pl! ‘зва mudū, añjanslomasadisā ti añJanasadisehi romebi? samann5- 
Rata, vicitravatțañgulikāssa? sobhare? ti hattbåpi ‘вва dhuvalakkbaņa- 
vicitrābit pavalsrpkurssadisšhi' vattañgulībi samannāgatā sobhanti, akakka- 
вабдо ti kacchupilakidirahltañgapaceañgo, ramaya upațthahtti mam 
ramayanto!' upatthasi paricari, tülüpanibha ti mudubhavassa upamå, su- 
Yannakambutalavattasuccbaviti suvaņnamayarn adasatalarn viya таја са succbavi 
ca parimandalš c’ eva аолдагасспатї сй 'ti attho, sam phussitvša ti за 
phussitvë attano hatthasarnphassatn mama sarire pharāpetvā'?, ito gato tl 
mama olokentass’ eva lto gato, te mam dabantiti te tassa hatthasamphassš 
1даш mam dahanti, tatbā Ы tassa gatakilato patíbšya mama sarire фаро 
(Ыі со, їөп` amhi domanassappatto піранро 1° ti, khārividhan ti (йа nüna 
so müënavo na khāribhärah ukkbipitvë vicari, khilšnit!t kbināni’’, ayam 
eva vā pitbo, вок ћуап ti sukhar;, santhatā ti santbáro, vikinnarüpava 
'tl täta ayarh tava mäluvapanņnasanthāro ajja mayá ca tena са aññamaññaih 
parâmasenäliñganavasena sammä parivattanteht vikiņoā vlya ākulavyākwā jati, 
puoappunamhcassâ?’ 'ti tita ahañ са ао ca abhiramit»ā kilantarūpā panna- 
salato nikkbamitvà пйайаш pavisitvë ramitvš vinitadarathë!' punappuna imam 
ova Коул ° pavisämā 'Ч vadatl, manta! ti ajja mama tassa gatakšlato 
pattháya п’ eva manta pațlibhenti?? па?! upatthabanttti®! па raccanti, па 
aggihbuttain na рі yapam tatrš '122 mahšbrahmuno šridhanatthšya 
kattabbam hevyadbūmādiyañūakiriyåpi* ше ра pastibhatii na гиссай, na 
сарі te tl {ауё ābhatamūlapbalāni рі na bbuüJissëmi, уазваш®* disayan?” 
уачнап "9 disšyarn, vanan ti tassa mäņavassa абватей parivšretvë thitavanarb. 


Tass’ evarh vilapantassa Фаш vippalšparb sutvš M. ,,ekáya 
itthiyá imassa sllam bhinnarh bhavissatiti“ баѓуй tam ovadanto 
cha gëthá аһһазї: 

ы. Imasmë * har jotirase уаоатюћі 
gandhabbadevaccharasarhghasevite 


3 Ске khura-. 2 Ваа pațipī-. # Cs Bd -а, * Bd 205. $ Bd аці. * Ddlo-, 
7 Ck -kassa, Bd -tassa. Š Bd -пе, * Chs -narhvicitrabi. 10 Css sabi. !! 
Сів add тай. !? Bd paršmasitvá. 15 Bd omita nl-. 34 Сёз khipa-, Bd 
khina-. 19 ao Со; Bd klnanl, Ck omit kbiņāni. 2* Сг чаваб. 17 Bds vigata-. 
"в Ва -. 19 Ва namajjamantă, 30 Ске -hanti. 3t Cha neh, $? pd -antl. 
3% Che pljyarhñatantranti, %*+ Ch: bhavyš-, Bd kattabbahopividbumanadi-. 2° Ва 
adds па upathahati. 32 СЕ, уавва, Bd yassā 237 Cke disan for disa? 55 Ва 
узма. 29 so all three М95, for imasmi? 


10 


15 


25 


30 


10 


15 


20 


95 


208 ХУШ. Рапоёвапірёќа. 


ївїпатї йуйзе sanantanamhi 
n° etšdisarh aratih pāpuņetha. 51. 
ъз. Bhavanti mittāni atha па honti, 
ñátisu mittesu karonti pemam, 
ayañ са jammo kissa vë nivitthbo' 
уо n’ eva jānāti: kuto 'mhi араќо. 52. 
вз. Sarnvësena hi mittëni вапаћуапіі punappunam, 
за са metti asañgantu* аватйуйвепа j)irati. 53. 
м. Sace tuvarh dakkhasi brahmaciárirh 
sace tuvarh sallape brahmacārinā 
sampannasassar) va mahodakena 
tapogoņarh khippam imam pahassasi' 54, 
ss. Рипар-рі* се dakkhasi brahmacárirh 
рипар-рї се sallape brahmacárinë 
sampannasassshh va mahodakena 
usmágatarm khippam ішаф pahassasi' 55, 
ъв. Bhütáni еїйпї caranti (ёха 
virūparūpena manussaloke. 
па {йпї sevetha' паго sapañño, 
åsajjanam’ tassati“ brahmacāriti. 56. 

ТабБа Imasmā’ ti Imasmir, ban ti plpšátamattarh, Jotirase ti büya- 
mänsssa Jotino rarbsíobhšsite!°, валапіапатЪї 1 poranake, pāpupethā'? 
"tl pëpuneyys, 1. v. b.: {а evarūpe vane vasanto уай атай!!! tvar petto 
etadisarn na păpuņeyya pandito kulsputto, patturn!* па arahatíti attho, bha- 
vantiti imesh g. M. antagatam ета ;bhāsati, syarh b' ettba)!° adhippayo: loke 
aattinern mittënl пата bont! рі na honti pl, tattba yesam honti te attano 
Āātiru ca mittesu са решат karontl, ауаб ca jammo migasiñgo kissavëšni!- 


т10(001* 1117 kens пата kiáranena tasmih mātugāme mittaseññaya nivitțho, 
во migiyā knucchimbl nibbattitvā агаййе vaddhitattë kutomb] âgato ti igatalihá- 


1 Rd klesavāninivitho, Ck» klssarivšnivittiho. 9 СЕ уй ca menti asaggantuth, Bd 
втета mitto asañgantu. ? СЇ pabha-, Rd hessasi? Вә pahissasi. “ Bds puna pi. 
5 Bd pabissasi, Ck? pabha-. * Cke na tšdiso cetha. 7” Bd āsajja пай corr. to 
āpa-. 5 Bd: па-. * ао all tbree MSS. for imaami? 19° Сіз tena. '! Cie 
sanantamhbitl, Bd sanantaramhiti corr. to -tanambiti. '? Bd -pitthk. '? Bd 
anabblratib. '* Bd puttur corr. to ракот, Cks vattuib, !5 Hd syaññettha. 
16 Che kissarinl-. '? Се omit tl. 


2. Ummadentijātaka. (627.) 209 


паш! eva na jänātl pag eva пайтіќе tl’, punsppunsn ti tàol?’ ша 
nima ропарропа 6arbpvšsera samsevanena sandhiyauti*, sā ca mettin’ al 
ета metti" assñgautu! assmágacchantassa purissssa tena азаёдашапаваћ- 
khštena ssarnvšsena jirati vinassati, sece ti’ tasmā táta seco tva puna pl 
taro dakkbasi (епа vă sallaplesasi atha yathë néma впап!ррһаппатп sassarp maho- 
ghena bariyati етап imam аапо tapogunar pahassasi' раһагевзав!! ео, 
пашё&аїап ti satmanatejarn, virüparüpenš 't! vividbarūpena. i. v. h.: Ша 
manussalokasmirh hi etåni yakkhinisarnkbštánl bhütšni viridbarüpapaticchan- 
nenat? attano rüpena attano vasemgate КЬёдіций carenti, tāni зараййо паго па 
seveths, tădisah hi bhütarb åsajjanarn 1! patvā nassati brabmacàári, dittbo sl 
täya?’? yakkhiniyá na khádito ti етаф робат ovadt’?. 


So pitu каа sutvā ,,уаккһіої kira sà“ ti hhfto citta 
nivattetvā „tāta, etto na gamissámi, khamatha me“ ti Кһаша- 
pesi. So рі паш ватаввёве(уа „ehi tvan māņava, metta 
bhävehi karnnarn'' muditam™ upekkhan“ ti brahmavihárabháva- 
narn ácikkhi. So tathā patipajjitvá puna }һапаш nibbattesi'*. 


S. i. d. а. в. p. j. в. (Ѕессарагіуозёпе ukkapthitabhikkhu яо(й- 
pattiphale patitthahi): ,„Tadā Nalivikā purāņadutiyikā '' ahosi, Isisiūgo 
bkkanthitabhikkhu, pitā aham ета 'ti, Nalinijātakam '*, 


2. Ummadantijātaka. 


Nivesanamhn kessa пидаш 5 опапдё 'Ч. Idem S. J. v. uk- 
kanthitabhikkhum й. k. So kir’ ekadirasem Savatthiyam pin- 
дёув caranto ekam alarmkatapatiyattam uttamarüpadharam ittbim olo- 
ketvā patibaddhacitto hutvë cittam nivattetum esakkonto vibáram ета 
āgantvā teto patțhāya saliaviddho viya rāgāturo bhantamigapati- 
bhāgo`™ kiso dhamanisanthatagatto uppanduppaņdukajāto anabhirato 
ekiriyapathe cittassadam alabhanto ācariyavattādīni pabāya uddesaperi- 
pucchākammatthānānuyogavirahito vihāsi. So saháyabhikkhühi*'° ,,pubbe 
{таш üvuso pasannindriyo’’, vippasannamukbavanno idāni, па?* tathā, 
1 Ва attano gatathë-. 3 Bd hi. 5 Rds tita, * Bå: add ghattiyanti. ° Bd 
sveva mitto ti. ® Bd sovs mitto, ? Bd ssagantu, Chrasañgapturn. 5 Сї 
omit ti. * Ске pabba-, Вг раМ-. 10 Ске ада са. !! Bds ёзајјавап. ' Сіз Bd 
tā. 18 Rd -diti. J: Bd kaáruñüari corr. to kárupam, Скә karuņā. 15 Cus «tā. 
1 Ва jhànábblnñš-, Сї jhānain pabha-. 17 Ске -{1-. ' во all throe MSS. 2. 
сіт. ТЬ. Zachariae: Die 1бїө Erzähl. der Vetšlap. іо Beltrāge 2. Kunde d. Ig- 
Sprachen IV. 1° Bd bbanda-. 7° Bd -yobhikkbuhi. !! Вә вапїпйг-. 32 Bd ро-. 

мака. V. 14 


10 


15 


15 


910 ХУШ. Pannëssnjpita. 


kin nu kbo karangn!% ti puttho „ruso snabhirato "вті aha. Atha 
nam ќе „вЬмгаша йтиво, Buddhuppado пата dullabho, tathë sad- 
dhammasavanam menussapatilšabho са, so {уаш manussapstilábharmn 
labhitvā dukkhassa antakiriyah раићауатёпо assumukham ñátijanarh 
pabáya saddhāya’ pabbajitvā kimkāraņā kilesavasarn уёзі, КШезё nām’ 
ete ganduppšdapüanam ° орёйёув sabbabišlajanasšdhárana, ye tesar 
Yaútthubhütë te рі арразаёда, каша bahudukkhā һаһирвуйва, адїпёто 
ettha bhiyyo, atthikamkaliupama kama, mamsapesüpamā kama *, tinukkü- 
реша kama“ , añgārakāsūpamā Ката, supinakūpamā kāmā, yācitakū- 
pam  rukkhaphalüupamë ввійівШбрата* sappasirūpamā* Каша, {тай 
паша етагіре вёзапе pabbajitvā eva anatthakārakānam’ kilesánarn 
тазар gato" ti° ovaditvā attano ketken’ gāhāpetuh asakkontā Setthu 
santika dhammasabham netvà „kim bhikkhave апїссһатёпаКаш bhik- 
khum anayittha“ "ti vutte „ayam kira ukkapțhito“ ti ābamsu. S. sac- 
cam Кіга“ 'ti pucchitvå ,.saccam bhaate“ ti vutte „bhikkhu poranaka- 
panditë гајјвф snusasnptàpi kilese kilese uppanne tassa yesam āgantvā 
citteh nivāretvā na eyuttah karimsū“ 'ti vatvā a. а.: 

À. Siviratthe Aritthapuranagare Sivi оёта rājā r. kāresi. 
Во. tassa aggamahesiyā kucchimbi aibbati, Sivikumaro t’ 
еч’ assa пйшвгцп karirnsu. Senāpatissâpi putto ™ vijāyi, Ahi- 
рагако '"! ti ‘вва пашаш karimsu. Te ubho рі sabāyakā hutvā 
abhivaddhantā soļasavassikā hutvá Takkasilarh рапїуй sippar 
ugganhitvá арашїїїви. Raja tassa г. adāsi, во pi АМрагакаш 
genàpatitthane thapetva dhammena г. kāresi. Tasmińn yeva 
nagare Tiritavacchassa'" nāma™ asitikotidhanavibhavassa set- 
thino dbītâpi nibbatti nttamarāpadharā sobbaggappattā su- 
bhalakkhanena samannāgată, tassā pëmagahanadivase Umma- 
dantiti патат karimsu. Së војавауаввакаје atikkanta- 
münusakavannë devaccharā viya abbirūpā'" аһозі, уе уе 
puthujjanā tarh passanti te te sakabhávena' ° santháturn' na 


1 Cha -пепа. ? Che saddha, Bd omits sa-. * СЕ -na, Bàs -nakam. “ Bd 
tinikkupamā kama, efr. М. N. 1,130; Ско omit tinu-. * Bd adds шапа. * pd 
Yisasappabhirü-. 1 Сіз -rahkânarn, Bd -гапйпай. ° Rd віш. * Bd gåtarù. 19 
Ска -аш. 11 Ва abbl- throughout. '? Bd tiriva-. '° all three MSS. пашаш. 
1 Ва abhirüpadassaniyñ păsādikā рагашёуа ғарпёуз samanuāgatā. 15 Сї» saka- 
bhā-. :* Bd вапйһагегаш. 


2. Ошшайай1}4їайа. (527.) 911 


sakkonti, вогарёоашадепа' viya kilesamadena тайа hutva 
satith paccnpatthāpeturh samatthā оёһевоф. Ath’ аваа pita 
Tiritavaccho’ га}йпап upasahnkamitvā ¡deva mama gehe 
itthiratanarn орраппаф гаййо уа anucchavikarn, lakkhana- 
pšthake?' pesetvā tarh vimarsápetvā yathárucim karohíti“ āha. 
Raja „sādhū“ ’ti vatvā brābmaņe peseti, te setthigebharn 
gantvå katasakkārasammānā рёйуйавагп paribhnüjirnsn. Tasmim 
Еһапе Ummadanti sabbaálarnkárapatimanditá tesa santikarh 
agamãsi. Те tam disvā satih paceupatthápeturh asakkontå 
kilesamadamattā hutvā аќапо vippakatabhojanabhávam na 


zt’ 


јёпірвц, ekacce йЇоратп gahetvā Ъһойјашӣ' ti ваййёуа sīse 
thapesurh, ekacce upakaccbantare° khipihsu, ekacce БШ 
paharińhsu, sabbe ammattakā ahesum. Sā te disevā „ime kira 
шата lakkhanarb vimarmeantiti', рїуёув пе gahetvë niharathá““ 
*ti о1ћагёреві. Te mamkubhātâ rājanivesanath gantvë Umma- 
dantiyá ruttha' „deva sā itthi Е&]аКапп1, na {ишһаКаш anoc- 
chavikā“ ti vadiman. Rājā ,kálakanni kirā“ `1 tah па йпй- 
pesi’ Sā tah pavattih sutvá „abarh kira kálakanniti габа 
na gahitā, kālakaņņiyo nāma evarüpë'° hontiti“ vatvā „hotu, 
васе pi tarb rājānarh passissāmi jánissëmiti' tasmim āghātam 
bandhi. Аа nar pitā Аһірагакавва adāsi, sā tassa piya 
аһовї manāpā, — Kassa pana kammassa phalena ™ еувф abhi- 
rüpë ahositi rattavatthadānassa™: sā kira айе Вагйпавїуаш 
daliddakale nibbattitvā ussavadivase puññasampannā itthiyo 
knsumbharattavattharn nivāsetvā ајафиві&а Kilantiyo disvā 
табіваф vattharh nivšsetvë kilitakámë hutvë mátápitunnam 
ārocetvā tehi „amma шауаш dalļiddā, kato no evarüpam 
Vatthan“ ti vntte „tena hi mam ekasmih addhakule bhatirm 
kātu anojānātha, te mama gunam ñatvā dassantiti“ vatvā 


"Сіз omit surà. * Rd titti- 2 Bd adds brabmaņe, * C*-jamā, Bd 
bhuñjaha, Ве Ьһийјатёцё, * Bd adds bhattatb. © СЕ -1, Rd bbittiyadisu. 
Hd -віввәпи, Rè -slssantikim, ° Bds kuddbā. ° Ва àņā- !° Bde add па N 
Ва adds в, !? Bd: add nissandena. 

14% 


10 


16 


20 


219 ХҮШ. Papnišssnipšta 


tehi a&nuññátë ekarb kulah upasamkamitvá .,kusumbharatta- 
vatthena bhatim karomiti“ аһа, Atha паш te ,tini sám- 
увсоћагёпі kamme kate tava gunágunarh' ñatvë dassãmā“ ‘ti 
vadihsu. Sā ,sš&dhü“ `ti patisnnitvë kammarh patipajji. Те 
tassă ропаф üñatvë араприппеви yeva tisu sarhvaccharesu 
(авва ghanakusumbharattavatthena'saddhirh аббат pi vattharn 
datvá „tava sahāyikāhi saddhim gantvā nahëyitvá nivāsehîti“ 
tarh pesayimsu. Sā sahāyikā ādāya gantvā rattavattharh tīre 
thapetvë nahāyi. Tasmim khaņe eko Kassapadasabalassa 
sāvako acchinnacfvaro sškhábhañgarh nivāsetvā ca pārupitvā 
са (аш padesan pāpuni. Sā tam disvā „ayan bhadanto 
acchinnacīvaro bhavati’, pubbe рі adinnabhávepa mama nivá- 
sanam dullahbarh jātan `{1* vattham dvidhā phäletvā ekar 
kotthásarn аууавва dassamiti%“ cintetvā uttaritvā attano пїуй- 
sana nivásetvë ,titthatha bhante“ ti vatvā thera vanditvă 
vattharm phāletvā tase’ ekakotthásam` adāsi. So ekamante 
paticchannattháne thatvá sákhabhañgam chaddetvā tass’ ekam 
kannam nivāsetvā еКаш párupitvá nikkhami, ath’ авва vattho- 
bhásena sakalasarirah tarunasuriyo viya ekobhāsahm аһові. 
5а tamb disvá ,ayam  ayyo pathamam na sobhi’ idāni taruna- 
suriyo viya virocati, idam pi tass’ еуа* dassāmîti“ dutliyam рі 
kotthásam datvā ,,bhante aham bhave caranti uttamarūpa- 
dharā bhaveyyarn, таф disvā Косі puriso sakabhāvena santhá- 
turh’ mā asakkhi'°, mayá abbirāpatarā пата абба mā hotü“ 
‘ti patthanarn thapesi. Thero anumodanam katvā pakkāmi. 
Sā devaloke sañcaranti' tasmim kāle Aritthapure nibbattitvā 
{а{һйгйра ahosi. — Atha tasmim nagare kattikachanam gho- 
sayimsu, kattikapuņnamāya nagararh sajjayihsu. Ahipārako 
attano ñrakkhatthánam gacchanto {ат ämantetvā „bhadde 


1 Ваг omit guna. ° Bd ghatanaku-. 2? Rda bhaviasati, * Bdz adds tarn. * 
Bd sš tah koțbāssm. * Bds mayhah. ? Bd -аі. ° Bd etassova. * Rdr 
sandhbāretuih. !9 Сї iti. 1! Bds sarhsaranti. 


2. Ummadantijātaka. (527.) 213 


Ummadanti, ajja kattikacchano', ršjë nagaram padakkhinam 
karonto pathamarmn imah реһайуйгатп āgamissati, må kho tassa 
attënarm dassesi, so hi {аш disvá вар upatthápetum na 
sakkhissatiti* аһа. Sā gacchantamh’ „aham jaánissámiti“. 
Tasmirn gate dásirn*° ёрёреві: „raño imam gehadvărarh ágata- 
kāle mayhan åroceyyāsîti"“. Atha- suriye attharhgate uggate 
риппасапде* devanagare` viya alamkate падаге sabbadisāsu 
dipesu jálantesu° rájá sabbášlarnkarapatimandito ājaññaratha- 
varagato amaccagaņaparivuto mahantena уавепа парагат 
padakkhinam karonto pathamam eva Ahipárakassa gehadvárarnh 
agamāsi, tarh рапа реһап› manosilavannapaákaraparikkhittam 
alamkatam dvárattšlakam sobhaggappattam pásádikam. Tas- 
ті? khane dási Ummadantiyë ārocesi, sā pupphasamuggarh 
gāhāpetvā kinnariüllháya' уйїарйпапш nissāya thitë rañño 
pupphšni khipi. So tam wulloketvá° kilesamadamatto satim 
paccupatthápeturn asakkonto ,,Ahipárakass' etai реһап ti 
sañjānitum pi násakkhi. Atba sārathih âmantetvā pucchanto 
dve gāthā abhasi: 
1. Nivesanam kassa по 'dam Sunanda 

рӣкагепа paņdnmayena guttam, 

kā dissati aggisikhā va dūre 

уеһ&вауаш pabbatagge va acci. 57. 

э. Dhitë о’ ayam kassa Sunanda hoti, 

sunieá n’ ayam kassa atho pi Ыһагїуй, 

akkháhi me khippam id’ eva’ puttho: 

avávatá, yadivā atthi bhattā ti. 58. 


Tattha kassa nudan ti kasse по! Ideb, pandumayenāå `ú rattítthi- 
kīmayena'?, dissatitj vätapāne thitā paññāyati, aggiti'3 snalajalakkhandho!5, 


1 Cs kattikarattikacchano, Bd -rattl gāro chano. ? Rds дасеһа tvaru ваші, ? 
Си -arn. * Che -о, * Bde -гаш. * Bd jalitesu. ?Bd Шауа. ° В4 diavā olo-. 
* Ck idhəva, Bd ішета. !° Cis omit nu. ?! Bde rattithakapškšramayepa, !7 
Ck aggatl, Bd асса. '? Ce пајај&-. 


20 


10 


15 


20 


214 ХҮШ. Pannăsanlpāta. 


dhitë nayan t аы! pu ayab, avåvată ti apetābharaņā’ apariggabiti’, 
bhattā ti уай!уй anā вёшіко асі, idah ekkhahitl. 


Atb’ assa so ñcikkhanto dve gāthā* abhāsi: 
з. Ahar hi jānāmi janinda etar 
matyā са реїуй са atho pi assã', 
tath’ eva‘ во puriso hhüúmipála 
rattindivarh appamatto tav’ attbe. 59. 
«. Iddho са рҺїїо' ca subālhiko’ ca 
amacco te aññataro janinda, 
tass’ евё bhariyā Ahipārakassa 
Ummadanti’ пйёшайһеууепа гаја ti. 60. 
Tattha maty са petyš cà “і matito ca pltito са tam Jänsmîti vadati, 
atho pi авей ti atha вёшікат рі 'веё Jänimiti табай, Іа4ћо tl samiddho, 
phito? ti vatthálarnkárebl phullito!2, subäthiko'! ti sutthu addho, паша- 


dheyyenëá "11 пёшепе, ayah hi!) уо nam passsti tah ummidetl satim assa 
paccnpaettbšpeturn па detl tasmë Ummadantitl vuecati. 


Tarh вчфуй ráj& обтат авзӣ thomento anantararh g. й.: 
s. Ambho ambho'™ námam 1йаш imiss& 
matyā са petyā са katan susšdhu, 
tathá ‘* bi mayharn apalokayantī 
ummattakarn Ummadantt akësiti. 61. 
Tattha makya ca petyë cë 'ti mātarā са рібага са, mayhan t! upa- 


yogatthe затрадёпаћ, apalokayantiti mayä apalokttä ваумй mah spaloka- 
yanti шап ummettakarb аказіі sttho, 


Së tassa kampitabhāvarn Gatva vātapānarn thaketvá siri- 
gabbham eva agamāsi. Rañño рі `‘ввё '° ditthakšlato patthāya 
nagarapadakkhinakarane'* cittam eva пёһої. So sárathim 
āmantetvā „samma Sunanda ratha nivattehîti“ vatvå „ayar 


* Ва adds kë. * Bde -varanā. 2 Bd -ggahā. + Ва -ауо. ° Ck? tassā. * 
Bds tavava. T! Ck рі-, C? thi-, Bd phi-. * Bd suvaqhito, Ва euvaddhito. ° 
Bd nmaddantiti, read: ишшайїпї? efr. Zecharlae snpra, 0 Bd puppito. `t 
Bd suvaqhito. !? Bd ayañhi, Cke аһапМ. '? во all three MSS. for aho? '* 
Ва гада. !5 Bd (авва. '* Ckz -narnka-, Bd -пакё-. 


2. Ummadanújataka. {$21.) 216 


chano amhăkarh nânucchaviko, Ahipárakasenápatiss' evánuccha- 
viko, r. рі tass’ evánucchavikan“ ti га{һаш nivattăpetvā равах 
darn abhiruyha вігізауапе nipajjitvë уірра1араоќо ёћа: 
e. Sš' punnamáse migamandalocaná 
орёуівї pundarikattacañgi, 
dve punnamáyo tadahü amaññath ° 
disvāna párápatarattavásinim. 62. 
т. Alárapamhehi subhehi vagguhi 
palobhayanti* шат yadā ndikkhati 
vijambbamånā harat' eva me mano 
jātā vane kimpnrisiva pabbate. 63. 
+. Tadá hi brahatf° вёт&* aámattaimanikundala 
ekaccavasanā nārī тїрї bhantā’ у’ ndikkhati. 64. 
+. Kadássu тат tambanakhëá snlomá 
báhëmudü candanasãralittā 
vattañguli sannatavirakuttiyá ° 
пётї upaññissati sisato subhá. 65. 
10. Kadássu mam kañcanamáëñluracchadá° 
dhit& Tiritissa viläkamajjhā 
‚ modahi báhahi palissajissati'° 
brahāvane játadumarmh va māluvā. 66. 
з. Kadássn lákhárasarattasucchavi 
bindutthani pundarikattacaüngi 
mukham mukhena upanámayissati 
sondo va sondassa suráya'' thálam ' 67. 
ıs. Yathâddasarh narh '* titthantim sabbagattarn шапогатаф 
tato sakassa cittassa návabodhámi kiñcanam. 68. 
зз. Ummadanti !' maya 018 āmnuttamapik andalā '° 
па ворёші divărattin sahsssarh уа parājito. 69. 


1 Ck во, Bd yå 2 Bd tadabumaññahari, Рә akhaññātarb. Ck sa-, Сә si- 5 
Ва brahmáhi. * С samāsemigamandā, ? Bd phsnda. Bd -дЫга-. * Ba 
-ЈЫага-. 10 Ck: -dissati 11 Ck phu-, Сә ро-. !! Ck pbā-, '> Bd yadadda- 
mantar. 14 Сю» „сіт, Ва -ti. 15 Ве -Јаг. 


10 


35 


30 


85 


916 ХУШ. Pannisanipáta. 


14- Sakko са! ше vararh dajjá, во са labbhetha me varo: 
ekarattirh' dirattim* vā bhaveyyam Ahipárako 
Ummadantyë& гатіќуёов, Sivirājā tato siyā ti. 70. 


Tattha ропдашёве 11 punnacandâya rattiyā, migamandalocanë ti 
kandasantāsena palšayltvë vanantare (batvá luddarh olokentlyā migiyā viya man- 
апі locanäni assš ti migamandalocanä, орёт! еї padumavanpena karsta- 
lena pupphānl khipitva mar olokentī vātapāne nisidi, puņndarīkattacañgiti 


rattapadumapattavapna 
divase {айй рїгёра!арё 


dve punpamiyo ti аһа tadš tasmih сһара- 
атаппага rattavatthaulvattharn disvā (алё mu- 
kham * olokento ekassa pšcinalokadhštuto eksssa Аһірёгакевепёрабпо nive- 
вале ti dvinnarh pünnacandánar uggatattå dve риппашауо amañāih, alà 
pamhehiti visšjapakhumehi 5, subhehitl parisuddhebi, vaggubtti madhura- 
karehi, udikkhatiti evarüpebl nettebi yasmin khane clokoti, pabbate ti 
уга Himavantapabbate suphullltavanet Inam šdaya tantissarena attano saram 
sarhasndenti7 kimparisā kimpurisessa menara harati’ evarb harateva те 
mano ti vippalspati 
тавапа ti ekacolkavas 


brahatiti*t шага, sšmë ti suvannasámá, екасса- 
а. ekapattanivatihš ti attho, bbautā vudikkhatiti 
sanhakesš!° puthun Byatabbamü viísšlakkhi tuñganāsā rattotthi!! setadantë 
tikhinadšthë suvatțagivā tanubābu susanthitapayodbarë karamitarpajjhi visãia- 
aoni!’ euvanpakadalisamānarūps 12 sā'* ottamjtthi tasmirn khane шап udik- 
khanti bhayana vana pavisitrā ропа nivattitvå Juddah udikkhanti bhanta- 
шівїче 1% шат udikkhatitl тайа, bahšmudü uú mudubåhā, sannatavira- 
kuttiyš'* ti suphaasitachakakaraņā !! прайй1вва11 "man H вй subhë паї 
kadā nu шат teh! tambhenakbehi sisato ра!{һауа sannatena +їгепа!* Кегапепа 
paritosessatiti patthento аре, kañcanamiluracchada)!' (1 Шайсапашәуа- 
uracchadālamkārā, vilâkamajjhâ t| vileggasariră вй, brahâvane tÍ mahâ- 
таце, rattssucchavitl hatthapadatalaagganakhaolthamarbsesu likhšrssaratta- 
samšnavanni, bindutthaniti udakabubhulaparimagdalatthani, tato t| yadă 
tam titthantirh addasarm (асо ресћауа, sakassa cita "П attano citlassa 
anissaro jšto "ФЬ айһррёуо, Кійсапап?0 (1 kiñcl, вуат?! asukå оёшё 
"Я na Јёпёші, ummattako Јао 'mbfti vadati, dltthbàá ti disvana2), supāmiti 
n’ eva rattirhdivarn?3i niddsh lsbhšëmi, во са labbhetha `1 yam me Sakko 
татаф dadeyya во са me varo labheyya?*, labheyyeñ c' aharh vatan tl attho, 


Atha te ашассё” Ahipārakassâpi ёгосауатћво: „sāmi råjā 
павагай padakkhinarn karonto tumbákarñ gharadvárarh рап1уй'* 


1 Ва се. 3 Bd-arm. # Bd dvirattarn, * Bd mukhansa sukhar. 5 Che -ра- 
mukhehi. * Bd supuppita-. ! Ва -dati. # Ско baranti. ° Bd brabāti. 1° Ва 
kanha. 11 Ck fatto, Bd гайай 13 СЕ -soni, Се -успі, Bd -уопі, !9 С 
-noruya. 14 Ck» omit её. '® Bd bhanda-. !$ Bde -dhira-; '? Ске supa-, B£ 
enphuylta-. 1 Bd dhirena. `° Bd .jJalura- *° Bd Кайсі-. 2! Ва айбат. °? 
ao Cka; ditthšti dísvëna wanting in Bd. 30 ṣọ Ска; Ва rattidiva. 1* во all 
three MSS. 1 Сі omit atha-. ?* Bd раза. 


2. Ummadantijštaka. (527.) 217 


pivattitvā рйвййаш abbirülho%“ ti'. So attano geharh дашуй 
Ummadantirh ámantetva ,,Ьћадде Кассї* rañño attšnarh dasse- 
siti“ pucchi. ,,Sámi, еко mahodaro mahādāthiko rathe thatvá 
āgato pariso atthi, aban tarh гаја? vā гајако* vā ti па janámi, 
sko іѕваго ti pana" vutto*, уйїарапе thatvā pupphápi khipim', 
во tāvad eva nivattitvā gato“ ti. So tah sutvā ,,násito ‘mhi 
tayāä“ ti punadivase páto уа гајапіевапаф āruyha siri- 
gabbhadváre thatvā гаййо Ummadantih nissáya vippalāpar 
sutvā „ayah Ummadantiyā patibaddhacitto jāto, tarn alabhanto 
marissati, raño са mamañ ca aguņpah mocetvë imassa mayā 
jivitarn dāturh vattatîti““ attano nivesanari gantvá ekarh dalha- 
mantah” upatthëkarh pakkosápetvá ,„tăāta asukattháne вовіга- 
cetiyarukkho atthi, tvah kañci' ajānāpetvā atthañgate suriye 
tattha gantvā anto rukkhe pisida, аһат tattha balikammaro 
karonto tarn (ћёпат patvá devatë namassaoto yácámi: 'deva- 
гаја, amhákarn rājā параге chaņe vattamāne mkilitvë va siri- 
gabbharn pavisitvá vippalapanto nipanno, тауаф tattha kāra- 
nam na jānāma, гӣјё '° devatānar bahüpakáro anusamvacchararn 
ваһавзаш vissajjetvā balikamrmarm karoti'!, ідаћ '* пата nis- 
säya гаја vippalapatiti йсїшКһа!', габбо по jtvitadánarh dethā’ 
"1 yácissámi, tvah tasmim Кһапе sarar parivattetvš'* ‘вепа- 
pati, tnmhákarm гаййо vyádhi пата v’ atthi, во рапа tava 
bhariyaya Ummadantiyā patibaddhacitto, sace {аш !* labhissati 
jivissati noce marissati, sace tassa jivitarn icchasi Ummadantirh 
assa dehîti' katbeyyasiti'%“ evam tah uggaphāpetvă uyyojesi. 
So gantvā tasmim rukkhe піѕїдііуа punadivase вепёрайпё tarn 
thànam gantvā āyācite” tatbā abhāsi, senapati „sādbūā" 'ti 
vatvā devatam vanditvā amacce jānāpetvā парагатп pavisitvā 
rëšjanivesanam abihruyha sirigabbhadváram,ákotesi. Rājā satih 


1 Ва -рйуһайи. ? Bd kiñci. 3 Bd adds ti, * Bà’ rājapurisoti, C% rajako. 
5 Cls omit рапа. * Сіз -e, ? Bd -i. 6 Bd -mittan, R° йп{{һапиламаш. ? 
Bd kis. 19 Chs omit rājā. 11 Bàs kāreti. At Сә Bd imar. 15 Rd -stba, !* 
Bd pațivattitrātâta. 13 Bd nar. '* Bd vadeyyësiti. 17 Bd -to. 


10 


зо 


85 


30 


918 AVII. Реправалірага. 


upatthapetvā' „ko eso“ ti pucchi. „Ahar deva Ahipárako“ 
ti. Аф" assa rājadvārah’ vivari. So pavisitvë rajánarh 
vanditvā g. ā.: 
is. Bhâtåni те bhütapati namassato 
āgamma yakkho idam еуат' abravi: 
rañño mano Ummadantyâ nicvittho, 
dadāmi te їаш, рагїуйгвуазвй* ‘ti. 71. 

Tattha namasaato ti tumhaákari vllàpakaranarh Jšnanattharn ballkammarh 
katvš namassantassa, tan ti аһай бат Ummadantin tumbakarb рагісёгікаа 
ketvā dadimitl. 

Atha nam rājā „вашта Ahipáraka mama Ummadapntiya 
patibaddhacittatāya vilapitabhávarn yakkhápi jánantiti““ pucchi. 
„Аша devš* ti, So „sabbalokena kira me lāmakabhāvo ñáto“** 
ti lajji, dhamme patittháya anaptararh g. â.: 

ia. Puüña' са dhamhse ашаго па c' ambi, 
jano са not рёрат idan ti jañña, 
bhuao ca 1у-йвва manaso vighāto 
datvá piyam Ummadaptirm adițtthā’ ti. 72. 

Таа dharise сі samma АМрйгака aharb tya saddhirù kliesavasona 
paricarayanto puññato са dharnseyyath, tšya saddhim paricāritamattena amaro 
са na homi, mabšjsno са ше idah? lämakabhàvarn }апеуув, tato ayuttarn таййа 


katan ti garaheyya, tañ са mama datvà paccha piyabbariyah айк һа? tava 
manaso vighāto c' asså 'ti stíbo. 


5евё ubhinnam pi vacanapativacanagatha: 
ат. Janinda nâññatra tayå тауё vā 
sabb’ ёрі kammassa katassa jaññā 
узо te mayá Ummadanti padinnā, 
bhusehi гаја vanatharn sajahi'" 73. 
18. Yo раракат Катта" karam manusso 
во maññati: má-y-idha maññimsu аййе'', 


* Cha -ahetvà 3 so ali three MSS. for гајё атага? 3 Bd idametad. * Bda 
-еёта- 5 Ске puññañ. * Rd me. 1 Ck adbitthā. ° Bd Imah., ° Ck айы, 
Cs aúltthe, Bd ааһа, 19 Bd adds гаја šhs. '' Bd каштай. 1? во all three 
M3S. for jän! аббо? 


t. 


2. Ummadanújštaka. (527.) 


passanti bhütáni karontam etam 
yottă ca ye honti nará pathavyā. 74. 


. Айпо nu te ko 'dha' паго ра!һаууй 


saddheyya lokaemi: па së? ріуё ti, 
bhuso ca ty-āsaa manaso vighäāto 
datvā piyan Ummadantim adițtthā’. 75. 


. Адаһ& piyå mayha janinda esā. 


na så mamam аррїу& bhūmipåla, 

gacch' eva tvah Ummadantim bhadante 
во va selassa guhar upeti‘. 76. 

Na pilitë attadukkhena dhîrā 
sukhapphalah kamma pariccajanti, 
sammohitā сёрі sukhena matt 

па pápakarn kamma samācaranti. 77. 
Tuva hi mātā са pita са шауһаш 
bhattá pat! ровако devatā ca. 

dāso ahar tuyha sapottadáro, 
yathásukharm Sibba” karohi Катай. 78. 


. Yo igsaro `mhiti karoti рёрат 


katvā са? so n` uttapate рагеват 
na tena so јїтасі dīgham айуи', 
devápi рёрепа samekkhare па*, 79, 
Aññätakam’ ѕатікећі райїппат 
dhamme thitë уе pațicchanti dánam 
райссһака дауакё сарі '° tattha 


sukhapphalam ñeva karonti каттайт "". 80. 


Аппо nu ќе Ко `‘dha™ paro ра(ћаууё 
saddbeyya lokasmi: па зё ріуа ti 


1 Ва aiie 


sivi. ‘ Ва пе, ? Ва um. ° В4 adds athassa ebhipšrakassa аһа. 
10 Bd väpi, Ck# сарі. '! Ва adds гаја āba. !2 Bd boci. 


añhākater, 


219 


te косі. ? Bd name вз. 7 Ck adhi-. * Ckalupahi, 5 Bd siva, Вг 


9 си 


10 


30 


15 


15 


920 ХҮШ. Pamnšsanipáta. 


bbnso ca ty-ñssa mapaso vigháto 
datvá ріуат Ummadantim adittha'. 81. 


‚ Addhā ріуё mayha janinda esã, 


na så mamam аррїуа bhūmipāla 
yan te mayá Ummadanti padinnā, 
bbusehi гаја vanatham sajāhbi’. 82. 


и. Yo attadnkkhena parassa dukkharh 


sukhena vá attasukharn dahāti 

увіћ ет’ idab? тауһа tathā рагеваш 

sot evarh jānāti ва vedi dhamma. 83. 

Айбо°* nu te ko dha“ naro pathavyā 

saddbeyya etc. 84. 

Janinda jānāsi piyā mam’ евй, 

оа вй mamarh appiyā bhümipála, 

piyena te dammi piyan janinda, 

piyadayino deva piyan labhanti. 85. 

So nün’ aham’ vadhissëmi attānah kāmahetukar, 
па bi dhammarm adhammena abar vadhituh’ ussabe. 
Sace {пуат mayha satin janinda 

па kāmayāsi naraviriyasettha 

cajami nam sabbajanassa Sibba’, 

mayā pamuttam * tato паш avhayesi. 67. 


‚ Adüsiyañ се Аһірагака {уаш 


cajāsi katte ahitāya ty-āssa 

mahā са te орауёдо pi assa 

na сёрі ty-āssa nagaramhi pakkho. 88. 
Aham sahissam upavādam еїат 

niodah pasamsam дагаһаш pi'' sabbar, 
mam etam ágacchatu bhümipála, 
yathšsukham Sibba’ karohi kamam. 89. 


86. 


1 Ск adhi-, adding abhipārako аһа. 3 Cis -iti. 5 Ско ida, Bd Idham. * Ва 
э Che -ā, è Bd рос. ' Ва во nunšharb, * Cis vyädhi. * Bd aslbya, 
Be sibyā, ?° C? pavuttariı. '! Bd -hañ ca. !? Bd sivi. 


yo. 


B4 


- 
3 


a 
fei 


2. Ummadantījätako. (5273 221 


Yo п’ eva nindam na роов-рраѕафваш 
ādiyatī garahar no рі püjam 

siri ca lakkhi ca apeti tamha 

ёро suvutth! та! yathá thalamhá. 90, 
Yam kiñci dukkham са sukhañ ca etto' 
dhammátisáram уа * mapovighatarn 

пгавйё аһа рассорайізвёті* sahbarn 
pathavī ува thāvarånarh ќавёпаф. 91. . 
Dhbammáatisáram va’ тапоуідЬёіаф 
dukkhañ са п’ icchāmi ahar рагеваф, 
еко p' imam hárayissámi° Ыһагаш 
dhamme thito kañci na tāpayanto’. 92. 


. Saggüpagarm puññakammam jauiuda, 


mă me (пуаш апёвгауаћ akási, 
dadāmi te Ummadantirn pasanno 
гаја уа уайпе dhanarh Ъгаёһтапйпап. 93. 


‚ Addhā tovarn katte hitesi mayharn, 


вакћа mamam Ummadanti tuvañ ca, 
nindeyyum devë рісаго са sabbe, 
рёрай са passa' abhisamparáyam. 94. 


. Na h' е adhammam ° Ѕіуігаја vajjumn* 


sanegamā jánapadá са sabbe 
yan te mayá Ummadanti padinná, 
bhosehi гаја vanatharh вајаһі, 95, 


. Addhā tuvam katte hitesi mayharn 


sakhā maman Ummadanti tuvañ ca, 
satañ ca дһаттйпї sukittităni 
samuddavelá va duraccayáni. 96. 


. Ahüniyo ° me si hitanukampi 


dbātā. vidhātā c' asi kāmapālo, 


15 


1 Ch -tthi va, Rd -thivi. 3 Ва ettho. 3 Ва -rañ са. * во Сіз for upa-? Bd 
eccuttarissāmi. * Cks kira-. * Bdz kiñci ahāpayento, 7 Ске mšsss. * Ck па 
henadh-, Bd? na hetarhdh-. ° Hd: vajje. !9 Ck šbu-, Сә abū-, Bd áhuneyyo, 


922 ХҮШ, Pannāsanipāta 


46. 


1. 


50. 


(ауї hntā deva mahapphalá hi те, 
Кашепа me Ummadantim paticcha. 97. 
Addhā hi sabbam' Аһірёгака' tuvarh 
dhammarh acári mama kattaputta, 

аййо по te Ко idba sotthikattā 

dipado oaro aruņe* jivaloke. 98, 

Tuvan nu settho, tvam' anottaro si, 

tvah dhammagü dhammavidü samedho, 

so dbammagntto ciram eva jiva, 

dhammañ са me desaya dhammapala. 99. 


. Tad imgha Ahipāraka sunohi vacapam mama, 


dhammarm te desavissámi satai āsevitam аһаш. 100. 


‚ Sadhu dhamimaruci гаја, sādhv paññāņavā’ паго, 


вёдћо mittánam айаЫЫһо![, рёраѕв'' аКагапаш вокћагћ. 102, 
Akkodhanassa vijite thitadhammassa гајіпо 

sukbah manussā ёве(ћа sitaccháyáya sarhghare. 102. 
Na vàham etan abhirocayámi 

kammari asamekkha katam asādhuri*, 

уе vápi' ñatvā na вауаш karonti, 

арата іта mayham tovarn sunohi: 103. 

Сауап ce taraimënëánarh jimham gacchati puñgavo (Ш 311) 
sabbā tā jimharh gacchaati nette jimhagate ” sati. 104. 


. Evam evan manussesu yo hoti setthasammato 


so се adhammar carati pag eva itarā paja, 

sabbar гараш dukkharn seti гаја ce hoti” adhammiko. 105. 
Gavañ ce taramānånarh ujurh gacchati puügavo 

sabbá tā ujui‘ gacchanti nette ujugate'' sati. 106. 

Evam eva manussesu yo hoti setthasammato 

во се pi dhammarh carati pag eva itarā раја, 

sabbarh rattbarn sukhar seti гаја ce hoti dhammiko. 107. 


1 Ска васса. 2 all three MSS. - ка. 5 Оке -о, < Сіз tav. > Bd -пауё. * 
Ва а-. ? all three МЭЗ. -зѕа. “° read: katarù азёйшгп asamekkha Кертай? 
* СЕ уоуатёрі, Сә уо тарі. 19 Bd -мііщасе. !! read hot’, 38 pd ojam-. 


2. Ummadsntjātata. (527.) 223 


эз. Na câp' ahars adhammena amarattam pi patthaye 

imarh vā pathavirh sabbar vijeturn' Ahipáraka. 108. 
ы. Yam hi kiñci manussesu ratanam idha vijjati 

güvo dāso hiraññañ са vatthiyarn'haricandanam 109. 
sı [Assitthiyo ratanarh manikañca 

уай cāp' ime caudimasuriyā abhipálayanti] 

па tassa hetu vizamarb careyya, 

majjhe Sivinam usabho 'mbi jāto. 110. 
s. Netë рий ugvato ratthapálo 

dhamma Sivinam арасёуатёло 

so dhammam evánuvicintayanto 

tasmā sake cittavase па vatto. 111. 
в. Addhā tuvarn mahārāja nicearn avyasanarn? віха 

Кагіззаві сїгаїтї rajjarn, paññā hi tava tādisī. 112. 
ы. Etah te‘ anumodáma yarh dhammar na-ppamajjasi, 

dhammarm pamajja khattiyo ratthë cavati івваго. 113, 
s. Dbammañ сага mahárája mātāpitusu khattiya (supra р. 12s) 

idha dhammarn caritvána rája' saggarh gamissasi% 114. 
в. Dbammañ сага maháraja puttadāresu khattiya, ete. 115, 
во. Dhammañ сага таћёгаја mittámaccesu khattiya, etc. 116. 
s. Dhammañ cara mahārāja vābanesu balesu ca, etc. 117. 
e. Dhammaü сага maháraja gāĀmesu nigamesu са, ete. 118, 
ea. Рћаттай cara mabārāja ratthe janapadesu са, etc. 119. 
в. Юһаштай сага таһагаја samane brahmanesu са, ete. 120, 
вв. Dhaminañ сага таћагаја migapakkhisu khattiya, ес. 121. 
в. Dhammañ сага maháraja, dhammo cinno зикћауаћо, 

idha dhammarh caritvána rája sagga gamissasi. 122. 
e. Idha dbammar caritvána saindadevā sabrahmakā” 

ѕисірпепа divam рана, та dhammarh гаја pamādo ti. 123. 


1 Сіз да 2 Bd vattiya. 5 Ске avyasanirh, Bå abyasannam. * Cke me. 3 Bd 
гаја, * Схе ti, 7 Bd dhammañ cara mahārāja indo deva ваһгаһтаКа. 


20 


25 


10 


15 


20 


35 


33 


224 XVIII. Pangasanipáta. 


Tattha sabbåpiti janinda sham р’ etah ekako va pațicchādetvā šuessaml 
tasmă thapetvš tañ са шашай са süño sabbo pl jano! imssss kammasss katassa 
akaramattam рі na jaññš na jāniseanti®, bhusehiti taya saddbim abhlramanto 
attano tenhāvanatharn bhusath karoh! vaddhebi, шапога!һетп pürehitl, ба]5Һ1Ч 
manorathaù pana pūrətvā sace te na ruccati 'atha nam sajâbi, maybam eve 
рҳ(іссћарећі °, keamma* karan ti samma Ahipiraka уо manusso раёрайаштага 
karonto so раесћа mi idha süñe idan päpakammah шаййїшзп më jânantü 'ti 
maññe ti cintetl, duccintiteam’ etab (вава, kirokäreņā: karontam eva hi naro 
passanti bhūtānl yo ca Buddbá Paccekabuddhš Виййһарипа iddhiyogena yattă 
te ca пага passanti yeva, па ше piyš ti samma Abipāraka añño nu te Косі! 
idha imasmimù sakaliya p! pathaviyë па me Ummadanti piyš ® ti evam” sadda- 
beyya!°, вїһо та ве! овва guhan ti mabārāja васе tarn tvah idha па ёпеві 
atha yathā siho kilesaparilihe nppanne sibapotikšya vasanatíhipar manigubsrh 
hånarh gaccha, &апїтё tattba attano patthanarh!! 


ире етага tassă vasan 
pürehitl. sukhapphalan ti samma Abiparaka, papditā attano dukkbena 
раоё t? вашёпа ns sukhavipäkadāyakakammai pariccajanti, sammohitë ёрі 
butvà mobena mülba sukħena mattā pápakammañ пёша!? na samācarauti, 
ув ёвок аю Sibbe!* karobi Кёшап ti såmi Sivirāja, attauo дёвіф parl- 
värontsssa 1° garahš паша n’ atthi, tvan уа воћа yathàjjbäsayah kšámarb 
karobi, attano iccharn pūrebîti, na tena so jivatiti samme Abiparaka, уо 
їөзаго 'mbîti рараф karoti Каста са Кіг 16 mam devamanussă vakkhantiti)? па 
uttsaati na ottapati па во tena kammena digham кааш jivati ШЫрраш eva 
marati, devatâpi ca ner kih imassa pšparañño rajjena varam авва vüjukághatarh 
gale bandhitvā marana t! lâmakena саккћопаё olokenti, aññātakan t| mahârāja 
aññesarn santakarn tebi samikehi padinnadšánam уе attano dhamme {16 patic- 
chanti te їаНһа!* paticchakā са dăyakă ca sebbe pi snkhepphalan) ета kanimarh 
karonti, petiggšhake bi pațiganbante tai дёпай dāyakassa mahantarh хіраКагі !* 
dettt) sñüo nu to -pe- sddhš piyā -pe-, yo ассадоккћеца 'Ч samma Abl- 
pâraks уо attano dukkhena pilito tab dukkbah parasse dahati attano aarirato 
регавагїге khipati рагазза vä’? sukbena ettano sukha dabat! tari parasea 
sukhar gahetvá абапі pakkhipati attano диккћаф barissâmiti parah dukkhitaro 
karoti attānarn sukhessamiti paresukharh nāseti na so 4һашштай jipštl, yo 
pana evar jināti yath'ev' Idan шауһап› sukbadukkbarm tatbā paresan ti aa vedi 


dhamma so dhamma jènāti паша, ayam etlesš gåthāya sttho, ріуепа te 
daemmiti ріуепа karanabhütena ріуаш рћеіаф patthento dammid attho, piyam 
labhantiti samsâre sarnsaranti piyam eva labhanti, kamahetüukan tÍ samma 


! Bd айба sabbāpi Janš, C% aññe sabho рі jano. 2 во all three MSS. for 
-1ввай? 2 Ске .cchšádehi, Bd patidebi. * all three MSS. -am, > Bds duci-. 
Ске duccaritarn. * Ске va. = Ске konu. * Ck ya, Cr viya. *# Сї etah. 10 
Сёз -hessati. !1 Bd manam, !? so ail three MSS. ' Bd adds manasă. '* 
Bd sivi. 18 Çs Bd -ca-. ` Bd’ kam. 7 Bd ra-, В да-. !2 Bd пацћа. '* 
Bd: vipphšram. 20 Ck: omit và. 


2. Ummadantijštaka. (527.) 225 


Аһірагака kamahetukarh aynttakarn ketvà! запа? vadhissamiti? ше peri- 
vitakko оррајјіввай14, maylam satin ti mama santaka, mama santi’ pi 
pštho, mama santikayšt tl evah maðñsmāåno, sace {тїгї tarh na kāmesiti sttbo, 
sabbajauassā 'ti ssbbe? seniya’ sannipātetvā tassa sabbajanassā "1" ayarh 
maybarn abitā t рагіссајізвёюі, tato avbayasiti tato nar :pariggabattă !0 
āuàpeyyāsi!', sdūsiyan tl anaparādbarń, katte ti tam eva арагепа nāmena 
älepati, so bi гаййо bitah karoti tasmë kattā'? tt vuccath, na capi tyšssš 
"Ч evara akiccakariti nagare tava koci pakkbo pl na bhaveyya, nindan ti na 
Иета!вїй upavāädam eva aace рі mai koci sammukhā nindisssti разагпв!взвї1 vā 
dosamh vā pana āropento garabiseati tan р' ahan ninda pasarse garahañ 
ca sabha sabissámi, sabbam etan mamêgacchatū “1 vadati, tamhbā ti уо ete 
nindšdayo па ganhšti tamhš purisä (sssriyanarhkbšta siri ca paññšsarnkhátá 
lakkbī са thalattbanato suvuttbísarbkhata аро viya apet! na patitthšátl, etto ti 
ito mama tassă ратісса(ќакагапасо, dbammātisāram vā ti dbammarh atikka- 
mitvā ратацага 2 акиајатћ vā yar ‘kici hoti, paccupadisaāmîti sam- 
patlcchlesšmí14, tha varšá nar tasãnen ti yatbā mahāpațhavī kbīināsavānaŭ са 
puthujjanānañ ca na kici па paticchetl sabbar adhivšseti tath' evâham pi 
mabbani etan paticchisssmi adhivšsessšmiti dipetl, eko pi man ti аһапп eko !5 
va imami а(бапо dukkhabhaárain hāraylaşāmi’’ vahissámi!?, @һатте {1110 ti 
vinicchayadbamme pavenidhamme?® rivildhasncaritadhamme thito hutvá, saggü- 
psgan ti devapuññakammarb nām’ etarh saggüpagain hotl, уайбе!? dbanan 
ti уабпайћапаћ, syam evs và pštbo, Um madantiti Ummadanti рі mama 
ваһђёуіка tvam рі sabáyako, рісаго ti Ътартапо 0, eabbe tl na kevalarh 
devabrahmuno?! sabbe ratthavásino mar passatha bho sshšyakawsa bhariyā 
sahëylkñ iminā gehe katá t! nindeyyum, na hetadhamman??’ ti na bí etarh 
аЧһашш!Кат, yai te тауз ti yasmā mayá ва?* tuyharh dinnā’* (лешё etarb 
adhammo ti па vadiesanti2°, satan ti амапап Boddušdinarn khantimettš- 
bhaávanaeilacáarasarhkháatáni dhammani euvannitšni, tāni?° samuddavelā va durac- 
сһуёпі, tasmā yathë samuddo velarh nñtlkkamati evan aham рі ailavelarh *” 
nátikkamamiti2Š vadati, ābuneyyo те 810 mahārāja tvan mama аһопа- 
pibunasskkārassa?’ anocchaviko, dhătā vidhātā casi? kāmapālo ti (тап! 
deva mama dhàranato dhàtà Issariyamukhassápi?'! dabanato vidhātā iccbita- 


! Cka akatvā, Bd ayuttam katvă. 3 Be adda na. *Bd pavisaämlti. * Ba uppa- 
jati. 6 ao Ck» for santim? Bd mayharn pasinti, Be maybarb вей. е зо Ске; Bd 
ssutakāsãyā. 7 Bds -āå, * СЕ Bd -уо, Сә seņlyo ® Bds -павва, omitting ti. 
10 Bd „Мана. '' Rd änoyyāsi, Ck апйрөууйзї, DB? aneyyàsi. t? Ске Касей. 13 
Che 8, '4 Се aaropatissacchisami, Rd paccuttariasâmit! sampaticchissami dbāra- 
yissâni, Bš paccuparlssāmiti sampațicchà dhāressāmi. '® Bd ekako. !* Cko kár-, 
Ве tār-? 1 Cha ehias-, Bd vah ог gah-, Вг pah-. 1° Bde -niyadh-. '% Cis -5, 
30 СЕ brahmano, С brābmauo. ?’ во Ске Гог -mâno; Bå brahmano, omitting 
дела. 23 all tbree MSS. hetaindh, ?? Cks omit ва. ?* Ске ari. 3 Rd ne- 
vadiesati. 3 Bd omits tani. #7 Cè? sîlari-. 25 Bks _missšmiti. 29% Bd omits 
pšhuna. 20 Rd? vasi. >! Ваз -sukhassāpi. 


таа. V. 15 


10 


15 


20 


25 


30 


15 


25 


35 


226 ХУШ. Pannasan(pita. 


patthitānarn kamanar palansto kāmapālo, tayi! butā ti tuybah dinnā’, 
kâmena me t| mama раћапёуа? Ummadantim paticchā* "1; evan Аћірёгако 
reñño deti, гаја na mayharn айһо ti pațikkbfpati, güthapatitari ê sākuņikai * 
paccbih рЦМрадепа pabaritvā ataviyarh kbipantā viya ubho рі nai JahantU 
eva, 1ййп1 răjă punaakathanatthāăya tarh santajjento addhă hit g. à, tattha 
kattaputtā? di рИ&® pi ?вга katta та? tens tah evar šlapati, i. v.b.: аййЫв 
атп ito pubbe maybam sabbah dhammarh acari hitam eva!? skāsl, ajja! pana 
patipakkho hutvă Баһот 19 kathesi, mă evah vippalapi, añño nu te dipado 
паго ko idha jivaloke arune yeva sotthiri kettã!?, sace hi аһага viya aüño 
гаја lava Ыһапуауа patibaddhacitto abbavissa anto arule yəva tava вївагп chiodi- 
petvā tab attano għare kereyya, ahan pana akusalabhayen' eva па karomi, 
tunbi bohl, na me tāya'* attbo ti santajjesi; во tab 6utvë puna pl kici 
vatturh asakkonto rañño thutivasena {таш nü!š 'ti g. а., tass’ attho шаћёгаје 
(уаш бета sskala-Jambudīpa sabbesan narindânerb settho tvarh anuttaro tvari 
vinirchayadbammapaveņnidhammasncaritadhammänarh !'* gopāya (епа dbhammagū 
(ева 17 vidabitattā dhammavidū tvarn sumedho'® {таш yah dhamma gopesi 
ten' eva gutto, ciran jiva dhammaü са ше deseb! dhammapila dhammagopaka 
гаја рағагё !» ‘ti; atha rájá dh. desento tadimhghä ' &dim å., tattha irnghá 
'ti codanatthe nipāto, yasma шей (таф codest tasmā ti attho, satan ti Bud- 
аһа sappurisehi šsevitar, вайһй ti sundero!2 pasattho viniccbayapaveni- 
sucaritadhammo госевї‹! dhammaruci, tadlso bí Jivitah jJshanto рї akiccah ne 
karoti (авта sādbu, рабдёрата tl pñapasampsuno, mittânamn adubbho ti 
mittasas adubbhanabhávo 1, thitadhammaasă 'tí petitthitatividhadhemmassa, 
agethá 'Ч šseyyum nisideyyurn, desanasisam өз’ etah 22, cattāro Iriyāpathe su- 
Rherb kappeyyun ti ayarn рап’ ettha attho, sitacchayšyaá 'Ч puttadārañiti- 
mittanarb вїассћёуёуа, samghare ti sarhghare attano gebo adhammabalidapdâ- 
dihi anupaddutasukbain passeyyun!5 tl daeseti, na vābametan ti samma Abi- 
рёгака yarn etah?t anamokkhitvā katah asādhukammarı etarn aban na roca- 
уаші, ye vàpi йаї+апе tl уе vā papa гёјёпо ñatvë tulayltvá tīretväosayanı 
karonti tes' šbarn kammam rocemitl sdhippáyo, [më ираша ti imasmirb pau’ 
atths tvah mayharh 1тё dve upamă aqnohi, jim han tt varnkarn, nette И уо 
tā gàviyo пекі 25 tasmim jetjhakausabhe, pagevā `1} ізеті афһашшай 
carante ИНатё раја pag eva сагай айтіуа kerotiti attbo, dbammiko ti 
саат! agatigamanāni рађёуа dbammena r. kareti3% amarattan tt dovattari, 
Tatanan tì ваті akaratanarh 2", vatthiyan ti kasikavattham eva, as- 
sitthiyo ti våtasamagatiasse рі uttamarūpadbarā itthiyo pl, гаївиаа 
manikañc5 ‘tl sattavidharatanañ са müànikkamayabhandaü ca?! abhbipåla- 


1 Chstayá. ? Ске -a. Š Bs kāmena. * Сіз -а. * Ві bhūmiyai ра-. * Сїз 

-ks, Bd -ntnarn. ' all three MSS. kattha-. *во all three MSS. ° СЕ каба va, 

Bd аца са. '° Ad adds vadhimeva. 1! Ва idānl, !3 Ске -u. 13 Сі Кама. 14 

Rd ettaya. 13 Ске nûnā. !®'В@ -paveniya-. 1? Cke -guttosa. !® Bd adde so. 

19 Ck carš, Cs расага, Bd! javarā. ?O Ско add tí. 3! Ско -bhāge. ?% Bd eva cotar. 

33 Ска vase-. 34 Bd yathā tan. 2% Cke neneti. 25 Bd -ento. 37? Вія savlññina- 
їпйа tanam. 2° CE máni-, Вёз mahagghabbandakañca. 


3. Mabābodbijātaka. (528.) 227 


yantitl alarhkarontš ' rakkhanti, па їазвй ‘ti tassa cakkavattirajjassápi botu 
па тіѕашаі careyys’, usabbo ‘вг yasmă аһагп Sivinarn шајјће jetthakaršjá 
hutvā Jšto бева cakkavattirajjakaranam ? pl visamarm na caršmiu attho, netā 
ti шађагајёлат t Ковајева patilthapetvë devsnagararb netā bitakăranena tassa 
pita Sieirājā kira dbammarājā* ti sakala-Jambudipe Āâtattā uggato samena 
rattbarb pålanato” ratțhapālo, арасауатапо t| Sivinam porāņakarājūnar 
ратепібћешштађћ apacãyamãno, so t! so аһап tam eva dhammam cintemi® 
manastkaromi, na vatte ti? tena karanena attano ciltassa vase pa valtāmi; 
avah M-asss dbammeakathsh sutvë Ahiparako thutin karonto sddhš Һ1Її! 
айію а., na pamajjasiti attanā!° kathitadhammarn!1l na-ppamajjasi tatth° 
eva vattesi, ЧВашшаш рашајја ^i? 4һашшаш pammussitvā!? ада'1завеца 
вапсуё 14; evar so tattha!* thotih katrā dbammacariyāya nlyojento!* uttariro 
dasagāthā 17 abbšsl, tš 2 һе({һа Tesakunajátake vappitš va. 


Evam Ahiparakasenápatiná гаййо dhamme desite rājā 
Оттайвойіуё patibaddhacittam vinodesi. 

5. і. d. â. s. j. в. (Ѕассврагіуовёпе so bhikkhu sotāpattiphale 
patittbahi): „Tadê Sunandasārathi Anando ahosi, Abipárako Sāriputto, 
Ummadanti Uppalavanņā, зезврагізё Buddhaparisā, Sivirājā aham evāå“ 
і. Ummadantijštakam,. 


3. Mahabodhijátaka. 

Kinnu dandam kimajinan ti, Jdem S. Ј, v. paūññāpāra- 
mim â. k. Vattbun Maháummagge âvibbavisesti. “ada pana 5. 
„ua bhikkhave ідёп’ eva pubbo pi Т. раййвта parappavādamaddano 
yevā" 'ti vatvā a. й.: 

A. В. Br. r. k. Bo. Kāsiratthe asitikotivibhavassa ndicca- 
brāhmaņamahāsālassa" kule nibbatti™“, Bodhikumāro ti 
"вѕа пашат Кагірѕи. So vayappatto Takkasilaya'" uggahita- 
sippo paccāgantvā agāramajjhe vasanto apaąrabhāge Каше 
pahāya Himavantapadesarh pavisitvā paribbājakapabbajjarn 


1 Ваг äjokarhkarontā. š Cka mareyyurn. ? Bd -kār-. * Dde шаһајацагіш. ° 


Bds bita. * Bd: dhammacâri. ' Bd rathapšálayanataya. ® Bd snucintayanto, 
Ваг уаашё in the place of mauasi - - ti. '9 Bde-no. !! Bd -е, 13 Cis 
регішајјавти. ?" Ва samussitvā. 14 Bdsag-. 1° Bde (авва. 16 Be dhammañ= 
cară tt uyyojento, В» -yojento. 1: Bs utari tassa osànagāthā. !* Ско те. 3: 
Ске aja, #0 Chs ita. °! Bd -yam. 

15* 


е 


10 


95 


228 ХУШ. Раппёвапірёса. 


pabbajitvā tattha vanamūlaphalāhāro cirar vasitvā vassáratta- 
samaye Himavantā oruyha cārika caranto anupubbena 
Bārāņasińn' patvā rājuyyāne vasitvā рипайїуаве paribbāja- 
kasāruppena nagare bhikkbāya caranto rājadvāram pāpuni. 
Tam enai sihapañjare thito гаја disvā tassa upasame pasi- 
ditvā саф attano Бетараф pavesetvā rajapallarhke nisidá- 
petvā katapațisanthāro thokarh dhammakatharh sutvā nānagga- 
rasabbojanarh dāpesi. M. bhattarù gahetvā cintesi: „idam 
rājakularn пата babudosam bahupacceámittam hoti*, Ко nu kho 
mama nppannam bhayarm nittharissatiti™: во атійбге thitarh 
rājavallabharn ekarh piñgalasnnakham  disvá mahantarh ° bhatta- 
pindarh gahetvā tassa dátukámatákaáram ° dassesi. Баја ñatvā 
suoakhassa bhājanah ähbārāpetvä bhattarn рёһаресуй dápesi, 
M. рі tassa datvā bhattakiccarm пійһареві. Rājâpi tassa’ 
patiññarn gahetvá аоќопараге* rājuyyāne раппаѕёјат Кагебуа 
pabbajitaparikkhāre datvā {аш tattba vāsesi’, devasikañ с' 
assa dve tayo уйге upatthánarh agamāsi, bhojanakále pana M. 
niccarh rüjapallarhke yeva nisidati, rajabhojanam eva bhuñjati, 
evam dvādasa samvaccharāni atitani. Tassa pana rañño pañca 
amaccá atthañ ca dhammañ са anusāsanti, tesu еко ahetn- 
vädi™ еко issarakāraņavādi'' еко pubbekatavādi еко uccheda- 
vādi еко khattavijjavādi™”. Tesu ahetukavādi „ше sattá 
sarnsarasuddhikš“ ti mahajanam пррапһарезї, issarakāraņa- 
vādi ,ayam loka issaranimmito*“ ti орраоћёреві, pubbekatavādi 
„imesah sattānah sukhah vā dukkham vā uppajamanam " 
pubbekaten' eva uppajjatiti“ ganhapesi, ucchedavādi „ito 
paralokagatšá'' ойша п’ айћі, ayam loko ucchijjatiti“ ganha- 
pesi, khattavijjavadi'" ,,matapitaro рі māretvā attano va attho 
kámetabbo ”“ ti gaņhāpesi. Те rañño vinicchaye niyuttá 


1 Сне iyah. 3 Сёз -mitt honti. > Ck піца-. * Bd siñgāla-. 5 Bd mahásatto. 
6 Ске -makākārah. ' Bd ssa, “ СЮ attano nagare. ° Pd (ваті vâsāpeni. 
10 СЕ he-, Bd ahatukarvšdi, !' Che -namittavāådi. !3 Bd Khetta-, 13 Bd ninam. 
13 (е Q-kargsti, Bd -kmigato. 1% Bd kataobo. 


3. Mahabodhijataka. (528.) 229 


Јайсакһадака hutvā assāmikarn sámikarh' karonti. Ath' eka- 
divasarh eko puriso kütțațtaparājito М-аї bhikkhāya rājageharh 
pavisantah disvā уапййуй ,„bhante, tumhe rājagehe bhnüja- 
тапа vinicchayāmacce Јабйсаф gahetvā lokan vinásente kasmā 
ajjhūpekkhatha, idāni 'mbi райсаһі amaccehi kütattakárassa 
hatthato Тайсаш gahetvá sāmiko va samāno аввйшїКо kato“ 
ti paridevi. So tasmim káruññavasena vinicchayam gantvā 
dhammena viuicchinitva sámikarm ñeva sãmikam akāsi, mahā- 
jano ekappahāren’ eva mahāsaddena sádhukárarh adāsi. Каја 
tari saddarh sntvá ,,kimsaddo nāmâyaa“ ti pucchitvá tam 
attharn sutvā katabhattakiccaro М-аї upanisiditvá pucchi: 
„bhante ajja kira уо? atto vinicchito“ ti, „Аша mahārājā“ 
`. „Bhante tumhesu vinicchinantesu mahājanassa vaddhi° 
bhavissatîti* ito patthāya tumhe va vinicchinathā“ 'ti. ,„Маһа- 
råja, mayarh pabbajitā паша, n' etah amhaáakam kamman“ ti. 
„Bhante mahājane Кагпййепа kātum vattati, tumhe sakala- 
Чїуазай mā vinicchinatha, пууйпаїо pana idhâgacchantā* 
vinicchayațțhānarh gantvā pāto va cattāro atte vinicchinatha, 
bhutvá uyyānaro gacchantā cattāro, evan mahajanassa vaddhi’ 
bhavissatiti“. So tena punappuna уёсіуашёпо ,„sādhū“ "і 
sampaticchitvë tato ра{{һауа tathā akāsi. Kütattakáraka 
okāsam‘ па' łabhińnsu, te рі amaccā lañcar alabhantā dug- 
gatā hutvā cintayirhsu: ,,Bodhiparibbajakassa vinicchinana- 
Ка]аїо* рамћауа тауаф Кійсі оа labhāma, handa паг rāja- 
уегіко ti vatvë rañño antare paribhinditvë mëárüpemëš'“ 'ti te 
rëjánarn upasamkamitva ,,maháraja Bodhiparibbājako tumhakarh 
anatthakámo'* ti asaddhahantena raññā™ .„silavā ева ñána- 
sampanno, ра eva karissatiti“ vutte „шаћагаја, їепа'' sa- 
kalanagaravāsino attano hatthe katā'', Кеуа]ай amhe yeva 


' Ва adds simikari) assämikan ° Bas te. % Вахш, è Bd -asati. > Ha -o 
S Ска Jañcar), Т Ска alabh- in the place of па lsbh-. 5 Ck -echinakâ-, F8 
-сеһапака-, *# Hds -pessāmā. !0 Сіз —tenam rañño. !! Ddadds hi. 113 Сө 
Каа. Ва касез. 


“ 


90 


10 


95 


30 


230 XVII. Pannāsanulpāta. 


. 


райса jane Каїшїї па sakkoti', васе ашһаКаш па saddahatha 
tassa idhágatakale parisa о]оКе!һа'' "і &һафво. Rājā 
„ө&дһа “tí віһарайјаге thito tah арассһапівт olokento 
parivārarh disvā аќќапо aññánena attakārakamanusee tassa 
parivāro ti таййашйпо bhijjitvā te amacce pakkosāpetvā 
„kin ti karomāâ“ "і росс. ,,Ganhápetha пап devăā“ ‘ti. 
„Olārikam aparšdham apassantā nam’ katha рапһйареввата°“ 
‘ti „Tena hi maharaja pakatiparibāram assa hāpetha, tarh 
parihāyantaih disvà pandito paribbājako kassaci anārocetvā 
вауаш eva paláyissatiti“ Баја „sādhbū" "і vatvā аппрпЬЬепа 
tassa parihararn hāpesi. Patharnadivasarm tāva (аш tuccha- 
pallarhke yeva nisidāpesurh, so pallarnkam disvā va rañño pari- 
bhinnabhávam ñatvā uyyānah gantvā tam divasam eva 
pakkamitukāmo hnotvá „ekantena* ñatvá pakkamissāmîti*! па 
pakkāmi, ath’ assa punadivase tucchapallamke nisinnassa 
rañño pakkabhattañ са aññañ са gahetvë missakabhattarn 
adamsu, tatiyadivase mahátalarh pavisitum 'adatvā ворапавіве 
yeva thapetvá missakabhattarh adarnsu, во tam адауа uyyá- 
narn дапбуй bhattakiccarn akāsi, catutthadiyase hețțhāpāsāde 
thapetvā kanājakabhattarh adarhsu', tam рі gahetvá uyyānarh 
gantvā bhattakiccarh акёзі. Баја amacce pucchi: „mahā- 
Bodhiparibbājako ваккаге parihaápite”' рі па pakkamati, kin 
ti karomā“‘ ti. ,,Deva, na во bhattatthāya-carati chattatthšya 
pana carati, васе bhattatthāva careyya pathamadivase° yeva 
palāyeyyā“ ‘1. „Idāni kim Каготё ’ti, „Әуе ghatapetha 
nam mabārājā" 'ti So „sādhū“ ‘ti tesar yeva hatthe khagge 
thapetvā ,,sve antaradvāre thatva pavisantass’ eva вїзагі 
chinditvá khaņdākhandikah katvā kañci” ajânāpetvā vacca- 
kutiyah pakkhipitvā nahātvā āgacsheyyāthā* "і аһа, Те 


„sādhū“ "і sampaticchitva „sve āgantvā evan karissāmā“ “ti 


1 Bd aakkā. 2 Bd omits nam. 5 В4-һашА * so Ске for ekañısena? Rd pi- 
kautena. 5 Ck» -missatit. * Bd adds so. ' Ck» -со. Š Bd: add пар. "Rd 
=sarn. 10 Ва ki-. 


3. Mahābodhijātaka. (528) 231 


aññamaññam vicáretvá attano attano nivesapáni agamirnhsu'. 
Rajápi sáyarh bhuttabhojano вігівауапе nipajjitvë M-assa gune 
аоовѕагі, ath' assa tāvad eva soko uppajji, sarirato seda 
тиссїїївп?, sayane аввёдат alabhanto aparšparam parivatti. 
Atha nam aggamahesi upanipajji, во (ауа saddhim sallā- 
pamattam рі na kari, atha nam sā ,maháršja, kin nu 
kho sallapamattam pi na karotha, api nu' me koci aparādho 
atthiti“ pucchi, ,,N'atthi deviti, арі ca kho Bodhiparibbā- 
јако kira атһакащ paccatthiko játo ti, tassa sve ghāta- 
natthāya рапса ашассе йпйревий, te (аш banitvā’ khandā- 
khandikarh katvā vaccakūpe khipissanti, во pana amhākarh 
dvádasa samvaccharáni bahurn dh. d., ekāparādho pi 'вва maya 
paccakkhato na ditthapubbo, parapattiyena pana hutvā tassa 
тауё vadho ёпасќо, tena káranena восёщїіі“. Atha пат) së" „sace 
te deva so paccatthiko jäto tarh ghátento kim socasi, paccat- 
(іка nama puttam pi ghātetvā attano уа sotthibhāvo 
kátabbo, mā cintayittha*“ "і asaāsesi. So tassā vacanena 
pațiladdhassãso пїййап okkami, Tasmim khane koleyyako 
piñgalasunakho' (аш kathan sutvā „sve mayá attano balena 
tasaa jīvitadānņarn dātum vattatiti“ cintetvā punadivase pāto 
va pāsādā oruyha mahādvārah āgantvā ummāre вїваш katvā 
M-assa agamanamaggarh° olokento пірајјі. Те khaggahatthâpi 
amaccā pato va āgantvā anantaradváre' attharnsu. Во. pi 
velan sallakkhetvā uyyānā nikkhamma rajadváram арасећі ', 
atha пап sunakho disvā mnkharm vivaritvā catasso dátha 
dassetvă „kirn bhante Jambudipatale aññattha bhikkharn па 
labhasi, amhškam гаја tava māraņatthāya pañcāmacce khagga- 
hatthe antaradvāre™ thapesi, mā tvah nalāțtena шасси 
gahetvā āgami™”, sigham'' раккашё“ Чі mahāsaddena viravi. 
So sabbarudaññotāya tam айаш ñatvā tato nivattitvë uyyānarh 


3 Ва -amsg. # Bd muüc-. > Bds add kho. * Bd: te pana пап măritvā. ° 
Bd adds аһа. ° Bd socittā. 7 Bd siñgāla-. * Ck -шайып. *so C% for antara- 
dvāre? Вёғ ёпарбаге. 19 Cs ёрабсһ!, Bds адашёві. ?! Bd dvārantare. 19 Ads 
sgamăsi. 15 Bd siügar. 


10 


10 


15 


30 


933 XVIIL Panņāsanipāta, 


gantvā pakkamapattháya parikkhāre ádiyi. Rājâpi sīhapañjare 
thito tarh āgacchantañ c' adisvā ‚васе ayam mama paccat- 
thiko' uyyánari gantvā bala sannipátetva kammasajjo bba- 
vissati no ce attano parikkháre gahetvā gamanasajjo bhavissati, 
јапіѕѕаші ау’ assa Кігіуап“ ti пууйпаї gantvá M-ar attano 
parikkháre ādāya ,gamissāmîti“ pannasálato nikkhamantarb 
сајкашапакоіуат disvā vanditvā екаштапѓат thito patha- 
marh g. 2. : 
1. Kin nu dandar kim ajinarn Кій chattam Кїї upëhanam 
kih arhkusañ са pattañ са samghaátiñ cápi brābmaņa 
taramānarūpv ganhási kin nu patthayase disan 0. 124. 


Tass attho: bhante, pubbe tvah ашћ&кай gharah agacchanto dandādini 
ganbšsi, ajja pana kena kāraņena dandañ са ajinañ са chattupābanañ ca 
mattikapasibbakolambauarh’? аткиввӣ са mattikapattañ са sarhghátiñ сё ‘ti sabba 
p` ішо рагіккћаге taramāno gaņhāsi, kataran nu disan patthesi, kattha gantu- 
като afti pucchi. 


Tam шуй М. „ayarh абара katakamınarh pa janatiti 
maññe ti, jaánápessami nan“ ti dve раїћа abhāsi : 
s. Dvādas' etāni vassāni vusitāni tav’ antike, 
nàbhijānāmi sonena piñgalena’ abhinikūjitah*. 125. 
з. Sv-áyarn ditto va nadati sukkadaátharb vidarbsayam°* 
tava sutvā sabhariyassa vītasaddhassa” mam райні. 126. 


Tattba abhiniküjJitan? ti etena? tava sunakbena evaiii mahăviravena 
viravltah na jänâmi, ditto” vā 'ú dappito 2 viya, ваъ ёгіуавѕ й 'ti tava 
sabbariyassa mama maranatrbáya рабсаппат '! ашасеапагп ánattabhšverh kathan- 
tassa sutvā tvan іт {2 aññattha bhikkhah na labhasi rañño!3 te vadho āpatto 
idha mågacchti!t ditto’ va nadatÎti, vltasaddbussa!5 mampatiti mam’ 
antare vigatasaddhassa 26 tava vacanamn зиста evam nadatiti ё, 


Tato rājā attano dosah sampaticchitvá' khamāpento 
саїш аш g. à.: 


1 lids add bhaveyya. ? Bd -па, Вз -ka, 9 Bd війда-. * Ска abhinikujjitarh 
for »ikūjitaņm? Bd -nëbbinikujitarn. © Bd ditho. Š Bd vidh-. l Ok -eabbassa, 
Се hhitasandassa? Dd vigatisaddassa. 3 Chs -kujjiz. ° Ве етап. 1° Bd dippa-, 
Ba dammi-. 11 Cka.anam. 13 Bde kirn таш. !% Bas -ā, 14 Ce -gañchitl. 
15 Ck víyasaddhasaddhassa. Оё vinasaddhasas, Bd vigatasaddassa. ! Dd -вай- 
давав. © Dds add tam, 


3. Mabābodhijātaka. (525.) 233 


+. Аһа esa kato doso yathá bhāsasi bršhmana, 
ева bhiyyo pasfdāmi, vasa brāhmaņa mā gamāå ‘ti. 127, 
Tattha bhiyyo ti sabbarh etan mayá! Enattarn syarh me dosa esa рапй- 
һай idáni adhikatararb tava? pasidāmi idh’ eva vasa mā аййаНһа даша” u. 
Tam sutvå М, „таһагаўа panditā пашта tādisena para- 
pattiyena apaccakkhakārinā saddhih ра vasantiti“ vatvá tassa 
anácararh pakásento å.: 
s. Sabbaseto риге азі, tato pi‘ sabalo ahu, 
sabbalohitako dáni, kālo pakkamiturn mama. 128. 
e. Abbhantaram pure āsi tato majjhe tato bahi, 
рога niddhamanā hoti sayam eva са]йш' abhain. 129. 
z. Vitasaddharn па seveyya udapánarh v’ anodakarm, 
sace рі паш anukhane vári kaddamagandhikarm, 130. 
s. Pasannam eva seveyya appasannarh vivajjaye, 
pasannam payirupáseyya rahadarh ` уа udakatthiko. 131. 
v. Bhaje bhajantarn purisam abhajantam na bhájaye, 
asappurisadhammo so уо bhajantarh па bhájati, 132. 
1w. Yo Ъһа}ап(аш па bhajati sevamanam па sevati 
sa ve manussapápittho* migo sākhbassito yathā, 133, 
11. Accabhikkhanasamsaggë asamosaranepa са 
etena mittā jiranti akāle yācanāya са. 134. 
1. Tasmā nàbhikkhanarm gacche na са gacche cirácirarn 
kālena уйсаш yáceyya eva mittā na jirare' 135. 
1з. Aticirarhnivásena ріуо bhavati арріуо, (IV 22) 
amanta kho ta рассһата рога te homa арріуё ti. 136. 
Tatha ssbbaseto ti mabārāja pathamarh eva tava nivəmane mama 


odano” sabbaseto аћові, yar; tvan bhuñjasi tam eva шап dāpesiti attho, tato 
ti tato pacchā paribhedakBnaru vacanah gahetvā tava mayi virattukšle° miesako- 


dano játo, idāniti idāni sebbalolLitako jāto, kālo ti eĀĀâņassa kbo’? tava 
santikā idâni mema pakkamiturh kalo, abbhantaran [1 ра|һашап шаша 


V Ва вассаш mayá evar. 2 Chs va. > В4 ai. + Cha у]. $ Ва dahada. * 
Che -səšs. 1 Віз jiyyare. ° Cks -пе, ° Bd adds pi sabalo, !° Bdr agunañ- 
йивва for aññ-. 


10 


20 


95 


30 


10 


15 


95 


30 


234 XVIII. Рапоёвапіріга. 


abbhantararb asi! alaernkatamahštslarn  ussitasetacchatte rājapallahke yeva 
man nisidáapesurh, ша}}һе ti sopānamattbake, purā niddhamanëá hotiíti 
yāva gīvāya gabetvā nikkaddbanā? na boti, anukhane ti васе рі anüdaskarn 
udapšnarp patto puriso udaka вразвзпіо kalslaiı viyūhitvä apukhaneyya tathâpi 
{ап тап kaddamagandhiysrn bhaveyya ашапобйаќйуа na pivəyya, ба‘ eva 
vitasaddharh payiropāsantena* Іайёһарассауќрі$ parittā с’ eva lūkbā са ama- 
nupñá aparibhogārabā tí attho, pasannan ti раи Ыаваддћаф, rabadan* 
ti gambhirarn mabšrabadam, bbajantan ti attanam bhajantam eva bbajeyya’, 
abhajantan ti paccatthikarn, па bbājaye ti ла bbajeyya, na bħhājattul 
yo puriso attānarn bhajantarh bitacittah pugzalarh na bhajati во asappurisa- 
dhammo паша 'ti, manussapāpittbo ti manussalāmako patiklittho ° sabba- 
pacchimako, sãkhassito ti makkato, accàbikkhanasamasaggš ti ativiya 
abhinbesarnaaggena, akāle (1 ayuttaappattakále parasea piyahbandarh уасапёув 
mittă Jiranti пёша, {зат рі aticlraniv&sena mayi mettib bhindi, tasmüë ti 
yasmš accābhikkbaņasarhsaggena азашовагапепа са mittā jiranti tasmā, сіга- 
ciran ti cirakâlam vitipšmetvš cirah? па gaccheyya па upasarhkameyya 1°, 
уёсап ti yācitabbabhandakarh yuttakālena yaceyya, na Jirare!l (1 everh mitt 
па jJiranti, purå te homā ti уйға tava appiyā na boms tāva'? ámasntetvë 
evan gacchamá `ti. 


Rājā аһа: 
1. Evañ ce" yacamánëánarmh añjalim návabujjhasi 
рагіуйгакёпат sattánam vacanarh ра karosi no 
evan tarn abhiyacáma рипа Кауігёві pariyayan ti. 137. 
Tattha navahujjhbasiti agce bhante ішагі !* yšcantena mayá bata- 
añjallh na јапаві, па patigaņnbāsîti attho, рагїуйуап ti ропа idbāgamanāya 
ekaro тага kāreyyāsîti yñcati 
Bodhisatto аһа: 
19. Evañ ce по viharatam antaráyo na heasati 
«пуһат câpi'™ mahārāja mayhañ ca'* ratthavaddhana '' 
арр-еуа паша раввета '° ahorattānam accaye ti. 188. 
Tattha evañce по 11 sace шаћёгаја етап пвпА hutva vibarantšrarb am- 


Ьёкаф апбагёуо ! па hesasti, tuybañca #0 ° васе (пуһа vā mayharn vā’! 
Јїе Кат pavsttiasatit) dipeti, раззешіё `ti арі піша passeyyama. 


1 СЕ así, Ва &8запай. 3 Ск -tbalah, Ddz -talamhi. > Bd nikadhbamano, * Ck 
-păsa, C’ -pšssnto. > Ck laddbāyapipaceayā. “ Bd dahadan. 7 Сік айд na, * 
Rd -kutho. ° Сёз сіга. ° Cha -me. !! Віз јіууаге. '? Ске tava. 12 Віг 
ета te. !* Bd? evan. !5 Bdz vapi. !*# Віз шауһап v5. 1 Bd -дһапа. 16 
Сив -ama. !® Cks -yam. 20 Bd: -mvā. ?! Сіз omit va, Bd omite шауһагп va. 


3. Mahabodhijátaks. (528.) 235 


Evam vatvā M. гаййо dh. desetvā ,.appamatto hohi ma- 
hārājā“ '1 vatvā uyyānā nikkhamitvá ekasmim sabhāgațthāne 
bhikkhāya caritvā Rārāņasito nikkhamma anupubbena Hima- 
vantokâsam eva gantvë kiñci kášlam vasitvā puna otaritvā 
ekarù paccantagámam nissāya araüñe vihási!. Tassa pana 
gatakālato ра{{һйуа te amaccā puna vinicchaye nisīditvā vilo- 
рай Кагопїй cintayimsu: „sece Mahabodhiparibbájako punâ- 
gamissati jīvitah по п' attbi, kin nu khv-assa' anāgamana- 
káranarb kareyyāmā“ `1. Atha nesarb etad ahosi: „ime sattá 
patibaddhatthánam паша jahituh na sakkonti, kin ‘опо khv- 
assa” idha patibaddhatthánan“ ti, tato „rañño aggamahesiti“ 
йабуй ,„{ћараф kho pan’ etah vijjati yam so imarh nissāya 
āgaccheyya, patigacc' eva narh mārāpessāmā“ 'ti te гёјапат 
etad avocum: „deva ime divase nagare ека* kathā soyystiti". 
.„Kirkathā паша“ ’ti. ,,Mahabodhiparibbájako ca devi ca 
aññamaññarn sāsanapațisāsanarnh  pegsessantiti%“. „Кіп ti 
katvā“ ti, „Tena kira deviyā pesitain: “sakkhasi° nu kho 
attano balena rājānah mārāpėtvā тата setacchattarn datun' 
ti, taya рі ‘вва pesitarn: “rañño māraņan паша таша bhbāro, 
khippam ёрассһа' ti“. Баја tesah punappuna kathentšuam 
saddahitvā ,idáni Кіш kātabban“ ti pncchitvā ,devim шйге- 
turn vattatiti% vutte anupaparikkhitvā’ va „tena hi tarb tumhe 
māretvā khandákhandiyarn' chinditvā vaccaküpe khipathā“ 
'ti а. Те tathë karirnsn, ѓазва māritabhāvo sakalanagare pā- 
kato ahosi. Ath’ asså cattāro puttā „iminā no niraparādhā 
mātā māritā“ ti rañño paccatthikā аһевпш. Каја mahā- 
bhayappatto ahosi. М. paramparāya tamh pavattin sutvā 
cintesi: „thāpetvā mam айпо Кишйге вапйаребуй pitararh 
khamëapetum ваша! һо náma п’ atthi, rañño са jivitarh das- 
sāmi kumāre са pápato mocessamîti“ во punadivase paccanta- 
gümarm pavisitvā manussehi dinnam makkatamarhsarh khāditvā 


| Bd vagi. Š Bd khassa. 5 Bdz-kacceva. * Ске -ah, 5 Bd adds kira. * Bde 
pesentitl. 1 Bd какка. 6 Ске „15. 9 Bd „Кат. 


15 


20 


95 


236 ХУШ. Pannaásanipšta. 


tassa cammarh yācitvā! assamapāde sukkhāpetvāà піррапдћаф 
katvā nivásesi pi pārupîti* рі ase thapesi, kihkāranā’: ,ba- 
hūpakāro‘ me“ ti vacanatthāya. So tan сатта ādāya apu- 
pubbena Вагапазіњ gantvā kumare npasamkamitvë „pitu 
gbātakammam пйта dāruņah, tam vo na kātabban ti, 
ajarāmaro satto пата п’ ай, аһаӱ tumhe aññamaññarh 
samagge karissāmîti c’ eva agato, tumhe mayá" pabita- 
ѕазапепа ёрассһеууёћа `1 komāre ovaditvā antonagare 
uyyánarh pavisitva makkatacammarh attharitvā silápatte nisidi. 
Atha пай оууёпвраіо disvā vegena gaptvá гаййо агосеві. 
Каја sutvá va sañjátasomanasao' te атассе йййуа tattha 
gantvā M-ar vanditvā nisiditvá patisanthararm kātu ārabhi. 
M. tena saddhirñ asammoditvá makkatacammam eva parimajji. 
Atha пап evam аһа: ,,bhante, tumhe шай apatthapetvš' 
makkatacammam eva parimajjatha, Кий vo idam тауй* bahü- 
pakārataran“ ti. „Аша mahārāja, babūpakāro me еза vānaro, 
aham imassa pitthe nisiditvá vicari, ayam me pániyaghatarh 
аһагі vasanatthánam sauymajji abhisamācārikavattapațivattarn 
me akāsi, aha рапа attano dubbalacittatāya assa marmsarh 
khāditvā сашшаш sukkhāpetvā attharitvá пїзїййшї с" eva 
nipajjāmi ca, evar) bahūpakāro esa mayhan“ ti. Iti so (ева 
vādabhindanatthāâya vānņaracamme уйпагауоһйгай âropetvā 
tam pariyáyam sandhāya imam kathah katbesi. So hi tattha' 
nivatthapubbattá'° „pitthe nisīditvā хісагіп '' ti а., tah arhse 
katvā рапїуарһа{агт!? āhațapubbattā ,,pšnlyaghatam āhbaratîti“ ā., 
tena cammena bhūmiyā sammațtthapubbattā’* „уввапацћараћ 
sammajjatiti“ ā, nipannakāle tena cammena pițțhiyā akkanta- 
kāle раййпаш putthapubbattë ,„vattapațivattakam™ me akāsîti“: 
а., chātakāle рапа tassa marhsarh labhitvā khāditattā ,,aharh 


1 Bd adds gahetvá. ? Hd -pesiti. 2? Віг add сашшаћ. * Ba —iarh. * Ск 
mayah, * Bd adds hutvë. 7 Ваг akathətvá. 6 C#s mahā. 9 Cs Bd tasca. 19 Ck 
nivatta-, Ва nivutha-. 1: Bd -гап. 32 Bd aswa. '° Bd sampajja-. !* СЕ 
vatlāvattapati-. 


3. Mahābodbijātaka. (598.) 237 


рапа аќапо dubbalacittatáy' assa ташваш Кһайїп' ti а. 
Тап sutvá te ашасса ,pãnņnātipāto tena kato“ ti ваййауа 
„passatha bho pabbajitassa kammarh: шаККа{аш kira māretvā 
maisar kháditvë cammar gahetva vicaratiti“ panim paharitvà 
parihāsam’ акафзо. М. te tathā karonte disvā „їше attano 
všdabhedanatthaya mama cammarh раһеіуа' āgatabhāvarh па 
jānanti, па јёоёреввёші te“ ti ahetukavëadim tava йпап- 
tetvā pucchi: „āvuso (уап kasmā paribhāsasîti*".  ,Mitta- 
dūbhikammasss с’ eva pāņātipătassa са katattā“ ti. Tato 
М. „yo pana tava c` eva ditthiyáë ca te saddahitvā evam 
kareyya tena’ kirn dukkatan“ ti tassa vādaro bhiodanto ā.: 
va. Udiraņnā се* samgatyā’ bháváya-m-anuvattati 
akāmā akaraniyam уй karaniyam vápi kubbati 
акатакагапіуаѕтіћ Киу-ійһа* pāpena lippati. 139. 
т. So се attho са dhammo са КаЇуёпо* ра рарако 
bhoto ce" уасапаф вассайф вићаќо уёпаго mayá. 140, 
1a. Attano се hi vādassa aparšdharn vijāniya 
па шаш {уап garaheyyāsi, bhoto уйдо hi tādiso ti. 141. 
Tattha ndiranë ti Кафа, samgatyā ‘ti earhgatiya, cbannain abhlja- 
tīuah tarb tarn abbijštiih upagamanena, bhåväyamanuvattatîti bbšvena anu- 
vattatiti karanatthe sampadinarn, аката ti акашепа anicchāya, akaraniyari 
vā Кагай1увї! va tl akattabbah рареш vā kattabbain kusalam vå, kubbatitl 
karoti, kuvidhā® "1 ko idba, І, v.h.: tvah abetukavādi п’ ав betu ш аи 
paccayo sattënarb sarbkilesaya 'ti 401 dittbiko: ауа) loko sarmrgatiyë с' eva 
mabhbàvena са anūvattati parinamati tattba sukhar dukhbar patlsarhvedeti 
akámako pāpakarn vā риййаїп vā karotiti vadasl, ауага tava udīraņă васе!» 
tatbā evam sante askamakeraniyaamirm attano va dhammatšya pavattamāne '2 
päpe ko'? 14һа satto pāpena lippati, васе bi attanš !* akatena рі lItppati'? na 
косі па lippeyyš 'ti, во се ti so ahetukavadasarnkhato tava bháasltattho!* ca 


attbajotako dbammo са kalyãno се!" na pāpako аһеїпїррассауа!* satt sam- 
kilissanttti'® vodayantiti?? sukbadukkbarn patissrnvediyantiu idan bboto vacs- 


1 Bd „Пап. ? во ali three MSS. for paribhā-? > Bd ädāya. * Ck pariba-, Bd 
-hâsstiti. 5 Bd adds вада. * Bate. 7 Che „расса. 5 Bd kvacidha? ° 
Ch: -a for -ova? !0 Сіз vo, !! СЕ вае, Cs васе. 19 Bd -no. !3 Cks papako. 
16 Bd -no. '2 Bas akate раре na limpatl. 16 Ck bā-. 1" Bdeca. "8% Ва 
abetuka-. !# Bd -ti. 2° so Bs; Ске codayantiti, Dd omits vo-. 


10 


20 


35 


10 


15 


20 


238 XVIII. Pennasanipata. 


Dari 9úccarh се suhato vānaro шауё, ko ettha mama doso ti attho, vlJaniyà 
'ti saca Ш tvah attano vādassa aparšdharn јёпеууёаі па таш garaheyyüšsi, Wim- 
karana: hhoto vāđo М tādiso, tasmā! ayah шата vādaih Hharotiti mam pa- 
sarhseyyāsl, atteno pana уйбат ajānsnto шат garabastiti 3. 

Evarn M. tarh nigganhitvá appatibhánarn?' акаві. So pi 
гаја parisati* marnkubhüto pattakkhandho рівїйі. М, рі tassa 
vàdarh bhinditvá іввагак ёгарау&йій āmartetvā’ ‚зап 
āvuso mam Кавша paribhāsasi yadi issaranimmānavādar ° 
sārato paccesiti“ vatvā å.: 

з». Івваго sabbalokassa васе kappeti jivitarh 
iddhivyasanabhāvañ са kamman kalyaáanapapakarh 
niddesakári puriso issaro tena lippati. 142. 

є. So се attho са dhammo са kalyāņo’ па ca рарако 
bhoto ce vacanam saccarh suhato vānaro mayá. 143. 

a. Attano ce hi vādassa aparádham vijániya 
па шат tvam garaheyyási, bhoto vädo hi tādiso (і. 144. 
Tattha kappet? jivltan ti засе Шгећша vā аййо và косі івваго {уаш ka- 

siyà jiva tvarh gorahkheuš 'ti avario sabbsiokassa jivitarnŠ sarhvidabati' уісагец!о 
Iddhivyasanabhavañca ЧЇ issarlyādibhədā iddbiyo ce ñâtivināsādikeri 
vyasauabhšávañ са sesañ са kalyšánapaparn l! Шашшаш yadi!5 jssaro va™ 
kappeti!* karod, niddesaküariti yadi tassa niddesarn апаш eva!’ уо косі 


ригіво karoti evarh sante уо boci рёрлКаш karoti (азза issarena katatt& isssro 
va tena рёрепа lippati, sesami purimanayen' eva veditabbaih, yathâ са idha 


eva) sabhattha. 


Iti во ambato уа'* muggaram gahetvā ambar pátento 
уіуа іввагакагапеп’ eva іввагакагарпауадаф" hhinditvá pubbe- 
katavadirm āmantetvâ „(уаш avuso шаш kim paribhhāsasi 
yadi pubbekatavádarh вассаф maññasiti“ vatvā å.: 

эз. Sace pubbekatahetu'"° sukhadnkkharmh nigacchati 
рогаракаф katan pāpa tam eso muccate inam, 

рогапакат inamokkho, kuvidha'* рарепа lippati. 145. 


t Chs кавша. !Ck -sitl. ? Bd -пап. ‘Bd paribhâsati. > Сіз omit ámantetça. 
6 Ска -nimmitavadarh. 7 Ске „е, 8 Cks omit уаш. ° Сіз -һац. 19 Bd vitar-. 
11 бїз -пат. 12 БФ add sabbaru, !? Ске са. 1$ Che oati, 15 Ва абда возо. 
t4 Bd оз, U CH -пащ-. 18 (ka —talnbetu. !° Bd kvarnhciva, Bš hocidba. 


2. Mahābndbijātaka. (528.) 939 


s. Зо се attho са dhammo са kalyáno" pa са рёрако 
bhoto се vacanarh saccam suhato уёпаго mayá. 146. 
14. Attano се hi уёдавва арагаЧһаш vijaniya 
па marh {уаш garaheyyási, bhoto уйдо hi tādiso u. 147. 


Tattha pubbekatahetü ‘ti pubbakatahetu pnurimabhave katakammarh ? 
Кагапец’ eva, tameso muccate inan ti yo vadhabandhanādibi dukkha pâ- 
punšti уза! во yam tene рогёпакаф katah páparb tarh Idšani {пат muccati 
evach sante шашёрі ева poranakalnamokkho ?, anena hi makkatena pubbs paribbā- 
jakena bhutvā aban makkato вашёпо burtrvá* khădito bbhbavissšmi, av-ãya idha 
шакбаайа patto ma 
ko idha рёрепа lippatîti. 


3 paribbājakattarh patteria māretvā kbādito bhavissati, 


Iti во tassåpi vädarh bhinditvā ucchedavádim abhi- 
токһаф Кабуд" „tvar āvuso n’ atthi dionan ti ёдїрі vatvā 
idh’ eva satt& ucchijjanti paralokarn gaccbantā’ пёта n'atthiti 
maññamāno kasmá шаф paribhásasiti°“ santajjetvā а.: 

зв. Сабаппаш yev’ apådāya’ гїрат! sambhoti рёпїпаш 

yato са rüpam sambhoti tatth' eva anupagacchati, 148. 

зе. Idh' eva jívati jivo ресса pecca'° vinassati, 

ucchijjati ayah `“ loko уе bālā уе са panditā, 

ucchijjamāne lokasmińh kuvidba ™ pāpena lippati. 149. 

a. So се attho ca dhammo са kalyāņo™ па са pāpako 

bhoto се!* увсапат вассаш suhato vānaro mayá. 150. 

a. Attano ce hi vādassa aparádbam vijāniya 

na mam (уаш garaheyyësi, bhoto vādo hi tādiso ti. 151, 

Tattha catunnan tl pathaviádinam bhütanarn, rüpan ti rüpakkhandho, 
tatthevš "tÍ yato tah гйраш sambhoti nirujjbanakále tatth' eva gacchati!5, 
iminássa!'? catumahaábhütlko hl ауа ригїво уада аја karoti’? pathavi!% 
pațbavikāyarn anupeti!t anupagacchati apo tejo уёуо?0 viyokāyam auupeti 


anupagacchati ākāsah indriyāni sarbkamanti asandipañcamë рогівё matat 


idāya gacchanti yšva šlšhanà рёдапі paññayanti kāpotakāni attbinl bhavanti 


1 Ска -в, ? Hd „е, * Bd esa рогіпакайћ ета sabbattha inato mokkho. + Hds 
add māretvā, 5 Cts mayai. * Bd (мча. 7 Ва katā for gatā? ° Rd -hšsiíti. 
9 Ск ye up-. ~ Сда ar. !! Ске stäyarh. '2 Bd kvacidba, Bz Косійһћа. 19 
Сё „е, 14 Ck te. 13 Bd anupag-. 16 Bd# -nátassa. !' Ва adds (аа. 19 Па 
omits ра-. 19 Ска -өһі. 20 На omite vā. 


10 


15 


20 


35 


зо 


15 


240 ХУШ. Pannāsanipāta 


bhasmantāhötlyo' дайпраййаЧап* уайїйаш “diáuarh їеватп tucchë musavilapo 3 
yo keci atthikavådatiı vadanti Ьа) * ca рапфИїз* са káyassa bbedă ucchijjanti 
Yinassantl na honti° param maranë ti Imam dithih patitihapeti, idheva ’ti 
imasmii уета loke Jivo jivati, pecca pecca  vinassstiti paraloke nibbatta- 
вайо раітавепв idba anāgantvā tattb еса paraloke vinassati ucchijjati, evam 
ucchijjamâne lokasmlr) ko idha рёрепа lippati. 

Iti во tassa рі уййап bhinditvā khattavijjavādirm 
āmantetvā „tvan йупво ‘mātāpitaro māretvā attano attho kā- 
tabbo’ ti imar laddhim ukkhipitvá caranto' kasmā таш pari- 
bhëásasiti“ увіуё а.; 

se. Ahu khattavidhā loke bālā paņditamānino : 

mëtararmrh pitararh haññe а(һо* jettham рі bhátararh 

haneyya putte ca dāre са attho се" tādiso sìyā ti. 152, 

Tattha khattavidhā ti khbattaviljá’?, ayam eva vā pātho, khattavijji- 
сапуёпаф '? etab пашап!?, bālä panditamanino ti bālā ваоёпёрі panditā 
mayar attano panditabhāvaro pakšásemā 'Ч maññamānā pandítamënino hutvš 
evam &һо, attho сө ti васе айапо tatharüpo!! koci attho alyā ла псі pari- 
vajJeyya sabbath haneyya và 14 'ti vadanti, tvam pi (ева aüñataro ti. 

Evam tassa pi laddhim patițtthāpetvā attano laddhim 
pakāsento й.: 

so. Yassa rukkhassa chāyāya nisideyya sayeyya vā 
na tassa sákharn bhañjeyya“, mittadūbhf hi pāpako. 153. 
s.. Atha atthe samuppanne samülam api abbahe, 

attho те sambalenā 'ti'° suhato vānaro mayā. 154. 

e. So се attho са dhammo ca kalyëno' па ca рёрако 

bhoto ce!" vacanarh вассаф suhato vānaro шауй. 155. 

ss. Attano ce hi vádassa арагайһаш vijāniya 

па marù tvah garaheyyási, bhoto vādo bi tādiso ti. 156. 

Tattha, ambho khattavidba '*, ambākah pana ācariyā eva vannayanti: 


attanā paribhuttachšysssa rukkhassa р] sākbarh vā раппап vă па Ыһап]еууз“*°, 


1 во Ске; Bd assantëbhū-. ? Bd rattu-. 3 Ck tuccha-, Bd bhilāpā, Ckz vilšpo. 
4 Chee. 5 Bd adds uccbajjati. © Сіз -aji. ? Bd vice. 8 Ске ао. ° Ске 
me. )9 Bd -viJà, Се -vidbā. ©" Ck khattle. 12 Ck BA -а. 1? Ско -е, H 
CEs baneyyatbā. 5 Bd bbindeyya. 6 Bs -si, Bd -рі, 17 Ck -в. !® CÈ me, 
Ca ve. 1% Ве -pidba? Ch -vādi. 39° Bd bhijJeyya. 


3. Mahabogdhijštako. (528.) 241 


kirnkarana: mittadūbho hi pšpeko, tvan pana етай vadesi; atha attbe sam- 
орраппе samülam api sbbaha ti, mama са! ра(һеуувпа attho abosi, (аеш sace 
p' еза mayá hato tathāpi attho me sambaleuš "11 ‘tt suhato všnaro maya ti. 


Evar во tassápi vádarh bhinditvá pañcasu pi teso nippa- 
bhesu' nippatibhanesu' rájánam āmantetvā ,„таћагӣја, tvar 
ime pañca ratthavilopake mahācore gahetvá vicarasi, aho si‘ 
bālo*, evarūpānarh рі* sarusaggena puriso dittbadhammikam pi 
samparayikam pi mahadakkham рарппеууа“* “і vatvā rañño 
dh. degento й.: 

e4. Ahetuvādo рогіво yo са issarakuttiko 

pubbekatī' са ucchedií yo са khattavidho паго, 157. 

вв. Ete asappurisã loke bālā panditamáëpino, 

kareyya tādiso pāparh а{һо аббат pi kāraye, 

asappurisasarhsaggo dukkhanto' katukudrayo ti, 158. 

Tattha саво ti mabārāja yēdisā ete pañca ditthigatika tādiso ригіво 
вауат pi papar kareyya уо c' авза? vacanarh sunëti tar айбай pi káraye, 
jukkhanto t| evarüpebí asappurissh! saddhirn sathsaggo idbaloke pi!° para- 
loke рі dukkhanto® katukudrayo va boti, imessa pan atthassa pakasanattbarn 
'yāni Капісі bhikkbave Ъһауйп! црра)јкпе! »abbān! tānl balato ti auttsb bari- 
tabbarb, GodhaJataka-Sañjivajataks-Akittijatakádiht!! pl câyam attho dipetabbo. 

Idåni opammadassanavasena dhammadesanarh vaddhento й.: 

вв. Urabbharūpena vak’ āsu pubbe 

asamkito ajayütham npeti, 

hantvë огапій '* ajiyarn ajañ са 

citrāsayitvā '' yenakámam paleti. 159. 

sr. Tathavidh' еке samaņabrāhmaņāse '* 

chadanarm katvá'' vañcayanti'° таповве 

anāsakā tbandilaseyyakë са, 

rajojallah ukkutikappadhánam 


1 Ckca. 2 Bd omits са. 3! Bd omita пі-. * Bd: півіппева, * Bd omits si. 
3 Ске -в. 6 Che hi. 7 Ck -1, Bd katavi, B? katt. 5 Ваг dukkhandho, * Ва 
yväyarh, omitting cassa, 1° Ске -Јока, omitting pl. !! Ске -karh-karb-, Bd 
-ākatti-. 18 Ва urani, Вг uraui. 13 во all three MBS. !* Che -ув, 15 all 
hree MSS. -1. 

Janka V. 16 


20 


95 


10 


15 


35 


30 


242 XVIII. Pannësanipata, 


вә. 


49, 


44. 


л. 


4. 


pariyáyabhattañ са apānakattarh 

pāpācarā' arahanto vadānā. 160. 

Ete asappurisá loke bālā paņoditamānino, 

kareyya tādiso papar atho апйат' pi káraye, 
asappurisasarhsaggo dukkhanto’ katukudrayo. 161. 
Y’ āhu* n° atthi viriyan ti hetuñ са apavadanti* 
[ye] рагакйгатп* attakārañ [ca] 

уе tuccham samavannayum, 162. 


. Ete asappurisā loke bālā paņditamānino, 


kareyyya tādiso pāparù atho аббат? рі kāraye, 
asappurisasarnsaggo dukkhanto* katukudrayo. 163. 


. Sace hi viriyah nássa' kammarm Кајуёпарёракат 


па bhare vaddhakirh гаја па рі yantáni káraye. 164. 


. Yasmā са уігіуаф atthi kammarn Кајуйпарёракат 


tasmá уапійпі kárenti гаја bharati vaddhakin. 165. 
Yadi vassasatarh devo па vasse na himarh pate 
ucchijjeyya ayam loko vinasseyya ayar раја. 166. 
Yasmë са vassatī devo himan cánuphusiyati' 

tasmá sassüni paccanti ratthañ ca pallate cirah *. 167. 


. Gavañ ce taramānānarh Jimharn gacchati puñgavo (зорга 298 


al 
sabbá tā jimham gacchanti nette jimhagate sati. 168. 
Evam eva manussesu yo hoti setthasammato 
so се adhammar carati pag eva itarā paja, 
sabbarh rattharn dukkharn seti гаја ce hoti adhammako. 169. 
Сауап ce (агашйпйпаш ujui gacehati puñgavo 
sabbā tā ujurh gacchanti nette ujugate sati. 170. 


. Evam evar manussesu yo hoti setthasammato 


so ce pi" йһатташ carati pag eva itarā paja, 

sabbarn га аш sukhar seti rājā ce hoti dbammiko, 171. 
Mahārukkhassa phalino ётат chindati yo phala 

rasai c’ assa pa jánëti Ьа с’ assa vinassati. 172, 


1 Bå -cšrá. 3 Сі -e ? Dd dukkhandho. * Bds yamšhu. 5 во Che; Bd 
ahetuñca svindiye. “ Ck pakā-. 1 Bæ massa, ° Bj jabbati. ° Ck -веууаві. 
Cs -slyyasi, Bd cānuphustyati. 1° Bd раје сїгай. ™ Ck omit pi. 


3. Mahābodhijātaka. (525.) 943 


зо. МаһагаКЕһйрашаш rattharn adhammena уо равёваќі 
газай с” азза па јёпӣсі ratthañ с’ авва vinassati, 173. 
si. Маһагоккһаѕѕа рһайпо pakkam chindati уо phalam 
гавай c’ assa vijānāti Ыјаф c’ assa па nassati. 174, 
s. Маһагиккһдратаф rattham dhammena уо pasāsati 
газай с' assa vijānāti ratthañ с' assa па nassati. 175. 
вв. Yo ca гёја јапарабаф adhaminena pasāsati 
sabbosadhíihi во rājā viraddho hoti khattiyo. 176. 
se Tath’ eva negame himsam' уе yuttā kayavikkaye 
ојабапађајїкаге? sa kosena virujjhati. 177. 
sse Pahëáravarakhettaññü варрёте Каїапївзате? 
ussite hirnsayarmn* гаја sa balena virujjhati. 178. 
ве. Tath’ eva isayo һїїїваї* вайпа{е° brahmacërayo ' 
adhammacārī khattiyo so saggena virujjhati. 179. 
т. Yo ca гӣја adhammattho bhariyarh hanti adüsikarh 
loddam pasavate" thánam puttehi ca virujjbati. 180. 
ss. Dharomar саге janapade negamesu balesu ca 
isayo са па himseyya puttadare ватай саге. 181. 
вә. Sa tádiso bhümipati ratthapálo akodhano 
sámante sampakampeti Indo va asurádhipo ti. 189. 


Tattha ғакёзо? pubbe ti vsko аво 10 pubbe, šsu!9 'ti nlpštamattarh, 
is. ћ.: mabārāja, pubbe eko urabhharüpo vsko ahosl, (авва nañguttbamattam 
eve дїдЪаф, (аш pana 80 antarasatthimbi'! pakkhipitvë ursbbharüpena asar- 
kito а]ауй!аш порей, tattha qránikañ'? ca ajikañ са ајай са hantvë yena- 
kimsi paletl, tathāvidheke tl’? tathāvidbā eke вашапађгёћтапё pabbajjā- 
Ийдепа chadanarn Шаїза attãnariy chădeivă madhuravacanā!* hitakámá vlya 
butvā lokan vañcentt 18, anāsakâ t| 501 tesan chadanarb dassanattharh vuttarh, 
ekecco bi mayah апівака па kliñci'* šharemë ’ti manusss vañcentl!’, apare 
mayar thandilaseyyakā tt, аббевыһ rajojallarn сһїйапап, añūeseh Qkkuti- 
kappadhišnarh, te gacchentêpi uppatitvà ukkutikā gaccbanti, aññeserp вацёћа- 


1 Ck bbisarn, Cs bhiihearo, ° Oks -ue-. 2 Bde -niyame. “all three MSS. 
һМаауай. 5 Cs Bd hisah. * Bd saryyame. 7 Bd -rlyo. " СЕ pavane, C’ 
pavasate. ° Bå -àssu !©° Ва assu. !! Ck -sakkhimbi. '* Bd ura-. !* Си 
omit ta-. '™ Bd -nādībi. ?* Hd -antl. 16 СЕ, кайа. 

16° 


15 


20 


95 


зо 


244 XVIII Раппавапірё'в. 


dasšhšdivarabhojanaserhkbatsari 1 pariyaysbhattari сһайапаш, apare apšnakatta 
попі), maysh pāniyab па pivāmā "і тайап, arahanto vadānā tl рара- 
сага? hutvëpi mayah arshanto ti vadantà vicaranti, ete? ti mahārāja ime уй 
рабса Jana hontu айбе vā yāvanto‘ ditibigatikă nama sabbe рі eta asappurisa, 
yšhü* t!i уе аһи ye vadantl, васе hi virlyem nässā* ‘ti mah 
ñăņasampannsrh” käyikacetasikarh viriya па bhaveyys, nabhare ti ovañı 
sante vaddhakirh và аййе vë karaka гаја na posayya, па рі yantānîti na рі 
tohi sattabhûmikap: ādīn! yantini kareyya*, kirhkširana: viriyaesa с' eva 
kammassa са abbávā, ucchiJjeyyš '1 maharšja yadi ottakarn kalam u' eva" 
бето çvasseyya na himar pateyya atha kapputtbânakālo vlya ауа loko ucchij- 
Jeyya. ucchedavādinā katbitaaiyāmena рапа uccbedo паше п atthi, pallate? 
d pšlayati'', gavaüce ti catasso gātbå rañño dbammadesanattbam eva vutti, 
сања шаћвгиккћавэё 't| šdikš, tattba mabārukkbassā '{1 madhursambaruk- 
kbassa, adhammenä '(1 sgatigamanensa, rasañ са na Jánštiti adhammiko 
таја ralthassa rasarn ojah па jšušti āyasampattih na lshhati. vinassatit] 
айбай Богі, manuasā gāmanigame cbeddetvá paccantah pabbatavisamar 
bbaJjanti, ssbbani šsyamukbišni pacchljjanti, sabbosadhihiti éabbebi mülata- 
capangepupphaphalšdibi!2 с" evs sappinavanīitādīh! са osadbebi virujjhatt, 
пёвва!2 tāni sampajjanti, adhammikarañüo hi pathari niroj hoti, tassá 
nlrojatšya озайһапай viriyarn'* na hoti, tāni roga vūpassmeturn па sakkonti. 
itl ao беш! viruddbo nšma hoti, пвдаша ti'’ nigamavāsikutimhblke, hirisan '* 
ti hihsanto’” pilanto 18, ye yuttā ti ye kayavikkaye уйна ёрапашикћаћаја- 
patbavāņljā'” te hiiwsanto, ojadăãnabalikare’? ti tato tato?! Ыһапдаһагапа- 
surhkadšnavasena ojadānam с' eva’? chabbbāgadasabbágäādibhedarn balin са 
karonte, sa kosonă '!1 во ete birssnto adhawmikarájā dhanadhañňā parihā- 
yanto kosena virujjbati nima, pahāravarakbertaĀĀG ti imasmih imasmirn23 
tháne vijjhituh vattatiti eraro pahäravarānarn khettan Jānante’* dhanuggaho. 


samgāme katanissame?’ ti yuddhesu katakamme шаһауойһе, ussite ti 
uggate pañĀāte?’ mahümatte, himńesan?? ti evarūpe #ayatb và hirnsento parehi 
vå hbimaäpento’’, balenă ‘ti balakáyena3', tethävidbai bi raJjšnari ауага 
babūpakāre attano rajjadāyake рі hirpsati kimañga pana amho tl svasesápi 
yodhā jahantl yeva, itl во balena viruddbo паше hoti, tatheva івауо him- 
san ti yathă ca negamădayo tath’ eva евієадопе "0 pabbajite akkosanapsharană- 


1 Ck aattšhəarn- -tā, Hd aattåbadayāhaphānitabbo-. ? Bdz рарасага. ° Che 
yepine. * Сёз yšc-. * Bds yamšbu. * Bd nessä. ? Bd sampayuttarh ° Bde 
kā-. 9 Che па. 19 Cks pallato, Bd pàállte, Вг pălayato, 1! Ске palāyati, 1? 
Ска mülenaca., Bd mülskacapatta-. !? Вёз naasa. !* Bds оја. !5 Сіз omit ti, 
Bd reads negameliti 1* Ck Bd bisan '7 Се Bd his-. 16 Bas pilento. !* 
Ваг ауйпаш mukhánarbtbalajala-. 1° Bds „ате 31 Cha only опе tato. ™ Ві, 
ојапатета. 223 Bd omite опе im-. 3⁄4 Ска о. 235 Bds -niyame. 365 СК 
omita (е. 37 Ck bisan, Bd bisayan. 1% Ck Ьітпзерапіо, Сә himsanio. 3° Віз 
add (ап. 20 Ck [sita-. 


3. Mebābodbijātaka. (528.) 245 


dibi birpsanto 1 adbammacāriko гаја kaysssa Ыһейа apāyam eva upeti, sagge 
Dibbattitun na sakkotìti saggena viruddho паша hoti, bhariyam hanti 
адӣвікао ti attsno þibuchāyāya vaddhitarn puttadhītāhi са? sarhvaddharh ? 
silavatībharlyarn mittapatirüpakáanarh coršnsrh vacanarh galetvā māreti, ludd arb 
pasavate thšnan tÍ so attano nirayūüpapattih pasavati nipphâdeti, putteb! 
сё '1 imasmirn yeva attabhāre attano puttebi saddhi virujjbatiti; evam 
assa во temat pañcannam janānam kathah gabetvā deviyā шагітаһћатай puttā- 
пай viruddhabhâvah* sandhimukhe5 coran cüláya gaņphanto уа khathesi, 
M-assa hi teseh amaccánam nigganbanañ ca dhampadesanañ са deviyā {еШ 
màritabhavassa ca” âvikaranatthañ ca tattha? anupubbena katharo âharitvā 
oksa katvă otan attharh kathesi; rājā tassa vacanarh sntvā attano aps- 
rădbarh jáni, atha пат M. ito ра{{ЬВуа mahārāja evarüpánarh päāpakânarh 
kathan gahetvā më puna етагӣра а 
tata dhammañcare ti mah: 


fii таста ovadanto dhammañcare ti а. 
%)е råjā nāma janapada adhammikena balluā 
apilento jauapade db, careyya, sämike азаёшіке akaronto педашези db. careyya, 
ațthāne akilamento balesu dh. careyya, vadhabandhanaskkosaparibhšse*° pari- 
baranto 29 paceaye са tesaro dento 1! івауо па vihirhaeyya. dhitaro yuttatthāne’?’ 
patitthapento putte slppšni sikkhāpetvâ sammā parlbaranto bhariyah issariya- 
voasaggaslarnkáradànasammānanàdibi  auugganhsnto!! puttadāre вашай!* 
сагеуућ ‘u. ва tädiso ti so tädiso гаја pavenim ewbhinditvë dhammena 
samena г. káreuto тајёпёуа ršjatejena sámante!5 sampakanipeti tásetl caleti !*, 
Indo vā “Чї jidai opamwusttbah vuttar, yathš asure jetvā abhigapbitvā '? 
thítakšlato ра ћвув asurâdhipo ti sarikharn gato Indo te'5 attano sapatta- 
hbüteé!° asure kampesl"0 tathë kampattiti 


Evam М. rañño dh. девеіуё cattaro рі kumáre pakko- 
sāpetvā ovaditvā raññá Каїакатташ pakāsetvā ,,raájanam 
khamâpetbā“ ‘ti khamāpetvā ,,maharaja, ito pattháya atuletvā 
paribbedakānah kathah gahetvā mā evarūpam sābasika- 
kammar akāsi, tumhe рі kumārā mā rañño dubbhitthā“ `ti 
sabbesam оуйЧйат! adāsiì. Atha nam rājā а.; „aham bhante 
tumhesu'' са деуіуё ca aparajjhanto ime’ nissãya еїезватп** 
kathan gahetvá etah pápakaminarm karin’™', ime pañcápi 


1 Ске Bd himanto 3 Cks va, Bd omits ca. * Bd sarnvadbarh, Ске savaddbarn. 
% Ска virujjha-. 5 Ck -o. * Ck teme, Czte. * Bd omits са. © Се сава, 
С азаю ° Che qá. '° Bd pati-. 1! Ва dadanto. !? Oke putta-. 'Ф 
Chs апова- !* Bd dhemmam. !? Ck зашапазашаше. !* Bde ја-. 1 Ва 
abhibhavi-. 19 Bd va, !# СЕ sampatibhūto, С ssmmaujbhüto, Вг sampatta- 
bbüte зішегоќо 20 Си-ц. 1 Cks „рө, 92 Cha „заш. ?5 Ві omits е-. 
34 all three MSS. kari, В4 adds ito. 


10 


15 


10 


35 


246 XVII. Раппёзан!рац. 


màaremiti“. ,,Na labbbā mabārāja evarh kátun“ ti. „Tena bi 
&евай ' hatthapäde сһеййретїн“. „Idam pi käturn na labbhá“ 
ti. Raja ,.вадһа bbante“ ti sampaticchitvā te sabbaharaņe’ 
katvá pañcacülákaranagaddüúlabandhanagomayasiñcanehi” ava- 
mānetvā ratthë pabbājesi. Во, рі tattha katipáham vasitvā 
„аррашаёќо hohiti“ râjānarh ovaditvā Himavantam eva gantvā 
jbānābhiññar * nibbattetvā vávajtvarn Brabmavibáre bhāvetvā 
Brahmaloküpago ahosi. 


S.i.d.ã. „na bhikkhave idan' eva pubbe pi T. paññavā yeva 
paravādappamaddano уета“ '{1 vatvā j.s.: „Tadā pañca ditthigatikā 
РигёпаКазвара?- Makkhaligosāla- Ракойћекассапа*- Ajitakeaakambali- 
Niganthanāthaputtā аһезиш, piñgalasunakho' Anando, Mabābodhi- 
paribbājako aham етё“ “і. Mahābodhijātakemn. Раппйзапї- 
pštavannanë nitthită, 


1 Che па, 3 во Ck; Cs Ba sabbassaharane. ® во Oks; Bd -gomayssitañcanehi, 
4 Bd -5. 5 во all tbree MSS. for pürana-, see Е. Müller, Pali Proper Names 
in J. P. T. 8. 1858, cfr. Sp. Hardy, Manual р. 290. © Ck kakudha-, cfr. Sp. 
Hardy, Manua! p. 291 and Alwls, Boddbism p.11. ? Bd siñgāla-. 


XIX. CHATTHINIPATA. 


1. Sonakajātaka. 


Kassa' зціта satam dammiti. Idam S.J. v. nekkhamma- 
рёгаший* a. k. Тваё hi Bh. dhammesabhüyam nekkhammaparamim * 
таппеіёпаш ° bhikkhünam majjhe nisiditvë ла bhikkhave idn’ eva 
pubbe рі T. mahabhinikkhamanam nikkhanto уетйа“ °і vatvā а.й.: 


А. Rājagahe Magadharājā r. karesi. Bo. tassa aggama- 
hesiyá kucchismim nibbatti, nāmagahaņadivase c' assa Arin- 
damakumaro ti námam Кагїйзи. Tassa jātadivase yeva 
purohitassa pi putto јӣуі*, Ѕопакотӣго ti "вва nāmam karieu. 
Te ubho pi ekato vaddhitvā vayappattë uttamarūpadharā, 
rüpena nibbisesá hutvá Takkasilah gantvā uggahitasippš, tato 
nikkhamitvá „sabbasamayasippañ са desacárittaü ca jānissãmā“ 
‘ti anopubbena сёгікаф carantā Báršnasim patvā rājuyyāne 
vasitvā punadivase парагай pavisihsu, Tam divasañ ca 
ekacce manussā „brāhmaņavācanakamh karissāmā“ “і pāyāsarb 
pațiyādetvā asanëni раййареїта* рассһапїй* te kumāre disvā 
ghara pavesetvá paññattásane nisidápesum. Tattha B-assa 
paññattasane suddhavattharn atthatam ahosi Ѕопакавва ratta- 


kambala. So tam nimittarn dievā ,,ајја' piyasahāyo Arinda- , 


1 Cfr. IV p.37. Ш p.238. ' Bdta-. ° Bd nikkhama-. 2 Bd vangayan-. 
* Ba vij.. ° Ва paōñäpetvā. 6 Ва -е.. ? Bdr add ше, 


с 
е 


20 


35 


30 


248 XIX. Charthiíioipšáta. 


makumaro Báranasiyam ` гаја bhavissati, mayhan рапа senā- 
patitthánarn dassatiti sññási. Те ubho pi katabhattakiccã 
пууёпаш eva аратафво. Тай& HBHaranasirañño kálakatassa 


`sattamo divaso hoti, aputtakarm rüajakularn, amaccādayo вавї- 


ваш” паһёќа sannipatitvá ,.ršjarahassa santikam gamissasîti*“ 
рһиввага!һаш vissajjesurm, so парага вікЕћашііуё anupubbena 
чууйпаш gantvā пууйпайуйге nivattitvā arohanasajjo hutvā 
atthăsi. Во. mañgalasilapatte вазїзаш párupitvë рірајјі, Sona- 
kaknmāro tassa éantike nisidi. so turiyasaddarmn sntvá ,,Arinda- 
massa рһоѕвага(ћаф * āgacchati, ajja ауа? гаја hutvā mama 
senāpatitthānah dassati, na kho pana mayharh issariyen"attho, 
etaemim gate nikkhamitvá pabbajjssāmiti‘ cintetvā ekamante 
paticchanne atthasi. Purohito uyyánam pavisitvā M-am ni- 
раппаКаш disvá turiyãni раррапһарезї*, М. pabujjhitvë pari- 
vattitvā thokarmn nipajjitvā nttháva вїїйра{їе pallarnkena nisidi, 
atha narh purohito añjalim paggaphitvā &,: ,,rajjan te deva 
pápunátiti“. „Кій aputtakam rājakulan“ ti. „Eva devā“ 
ti. „Tena hi sādbū" ‘ti. Atha паш te’ tatth’ eva abhisiñ- 
citvā ratham āropetvā” mahantena parivárena парага pave- 
вевшї, во nagara padakkhinam katvá päsādar abhiruyba’ 
yasamahantatăya pana Sonakakumaram na sari. So pi tasmim 
парагатп pavitthe'° šgantvá silāpatte nisidi, ath' assa purato 
bandhana'' pamuttasálarukkhato pandupalásarn pati, so tam 
disvā va „yath’ ev' etarh tathā ата рі вагїгат jaran раїуй 
patissatiti“ aniccādivasena vipassanam patthapetvá pacceka- 
bodhi pāpuņi, (аф Кһапаш ñev’ assa gihiliñgarn antaradhayi, 
pabbajitaliñgam pātur ahosi, во „п' atthi dàni punabbhavo““ 
ti udánam ndānento Nandamülakapabbháram agamāsi. М. рі 
cattálisamattšnarn загуассһагапа№ accayena saritvā „kahan 
nu kho me sabāyo Sonako“ ti'” punappuna saranto pi ,.,mayá 


"Ва -т. 2 Ва casīi-. —* Bd -tīt. * Bd -tho. > Bd ајјева. * Ck turiyarh 
nigg-. 7 Ва omits ќе © Bd abbirūbl-, ° Bd -rūyiso. ?° Bd sdds pacrha, 
11 Ва vandā for vantš. !? Bds add sonakarh. 


1. Sonakajataka. (529.) 249 


suto và dittho уй“ ti vattārah alabhitvā aIlarhkatamahatale 
гёјараПањке nisinno gandhabbanatanaccakádiparivuto' sam- 
pattim anubhonto? „уо me kassaci santike sntvā “asukatthšáne 
пата бопаКо vasatiti' ácikkhissati tassa satah dammi', уо 
sâmamh disvā arocessati tassa sahassan“ ti ека идёпат 
abhisarnkharitvā gitavasena udánento ра{һаташ р. â.: 
Каѕва* sutvā satam dammi ваһаввагп datthu° Sonakam, 
ko me Sonakam akkháti* sahâyarh pamsukilitan ti”. 

Ath' assa mukhato Іойсаой viya gahetvā ека nátakitthi tarb 
gāyi, atha aññâ аа абба ti „smhākari rañño piyagītan“ ti 
sabbā orodhā рйуїїїзвп, аоикКашера nagaravõsino pi janapada- 
vüsino° pi tam eva gīħtah рйуїгїзи, гајёрі рипаррооа tam eva 
gitan’ gāyati. Pawuoásamattánam вашуассһагапагї accayena 
авза '° Баћа" puttadhitaro ahesurh, jetthaputto Dīghāruku- 
māro™ пата ahosi, “Tadá' Sonakapaccekabuddho ,,Arinda- 
márajá marb datthukámo, gacchámi 'ssa kāmesv-ādīnavar '' 
nekkhamme cánisamsam kathetvá pabbajjanakárarn karomtíti“* 
cintetvā idjdhiyágantvá'° uyyāne nisīdi. Tadá'* еко va satta- 
vassiko pañcacūļakumāro mātarā pahito gantvā пууйпи- 
pavane"” дёгӣпі uddharanto рипарропа ° gitan рёуі. Atha 
пай во pakkositvă „kumära tvah” айбат agāyitvā ekam 
eva рїїай gāyasi, kim аппа jānāsiti“ pucchi. „апап 
bhante ti, атһакаш pana гайбо idam eva ріуаф, tena’ 
punappuna gāyāmîiti“, ,Etassa рапа te gitassa patigltam gê- 
yanto koci ditthapubbo“ ti™. „Na dihttapubbo bhante“ ti. 
„Aham tam sikkhápessámi, sakkhissasi rañño santikarh gantvā 
patigitam gāyitun“ ti. „Аша Ыһаше“ ti. Ath’ assa so pati- 
gltarh ācikkhanto ,,mayharh sutvš“ ti ādim а., ugganhápetvá са 


1 Bd -pštakansccagitadihi ра-, 2 Bd -bhavanto. 3 Bd dassàmi. * Bd ta-. 
> Ва ацы. * Ва -kkbāsì 7 какаа sutvā - ~- ti wanting in Che. 6 Bd аа. ° 
Bd omita gi-. '° Bd panasse, 11 Cha Qu. 19 Ck -yu-. 332 Bd tato. !* Bd 
kimesu &0, 15 Ваг -уа àkāsenāgantvā. '$ Ck adds raja, (Сә гаја ' Bd 
-пар-. ?° Bd adda tarn. !# Bd adds kathan, 39 Bd omits ti. *' Bd add 
паш. 2% Сіз omit ti. 


950 ХІХ. Chattblnipāta. 


pana {аш nyyojesi: .дассһа kumára, imar patigitam гаййй 
saddhirn gáhi', rájë te mahantarh issariyarñ dassati, kin te 
darühi, vegena yáhiti'. So „„вйёйһй'* °'ti tar: patigitarn uggan- 
hitvë vanditvá „bhante yáváham гёјёпаф ánemi táva idh' eva 
bothā“ 'ti vatvā vegena mātu santikam gantvā „атша khip- 
раф mar nahápetvá alarhkarohi', ajja tar daliddabhāvato mo- 
cessãmîti’ vatvá nahátamandito rājadvāram gantvá ,,аууайо- 
уйгіка, еко dārako tumhehi saddhiù раш! gāyissāmîti 
ügantvá rājadvāre thito' ti габпо ārocehîti“ а. So уерепа 
gantvá árocesi, rājā „āgacchatū““ "1 pakkosāpetvā ,„tāta (заш 
mayā saddhim gītah’” gāyissasîiti“ á. „Аша devā“ ti. , Tena 
hi gāyassū“ `1. „Deva па imasmim thëne gáyámi, nagare' 
pana bheriñ carāpetvā шаћһёјапаф ваппїрйёїйре!һа, mahájana- 
majjhe gāyissāmîti“. Rājā tathā kāretvā alamkatamandape 
pallarnkamajjhe nisīditvā tassa апигйраш sanam dāpetvā 
„idāni tava Фат рауавапй““ і š. , Deva, tumhe tāva gā- 
yatha, athâharn patigltarn gāyissāmîti“. Tato гаја pathamat 
güyauto 
1. Kassa’ sutvä satah dammi sahassam datthu° Sonakam, 
ko me Sonakam akkhāti ваһауаш parhsukilitan ti g. ё. 1. 
Таса sutvš ti asukattbëne nšma te piyasabāyo Sonako vəsatitl wusa 


vasanațtbānań sutvë šrocentasea kassa?’ заїап dammi’, dațpthū “ti” asu- 
Ба!(һйпе паша mayá dittho t| disvå агосепїавза kasea” sahasaah dammtlti. 


Evam гайпа pathamam udanagathaya gīitāya pañcacūlakajārakena 
patigitabhávam pakāsento S. abhisambuddho hutvā dve pade abhàsi: 
s. Atha bravi māņavako двћаго рабсас ако '°: 
шауһап sutvë satai debi sahassarn дафи“ Sonakam, 
aham '' Sonakam akkhissam sabāyam pamsukiltan ti. 2. 


Тепа vuttagšthšáya pans ayam attho; mahărăja, tva’? sutvā ñšrocentasss 
satarh dammiti vadasi'?, tam pi maybsm eva debi, yah Jisvá ёгосепсазва 


1 Bde даугі, > Ске -kara, Bd -rotu. ? Bd gitapailgītah. * Bå -ramajhe. 
5 Ва ta-. * Bas ditiba. 7 Bd: ta.. © Bd -iti. ° Bd ditbanti. !9 Ck» add ti. 
11 Bg abante. !? Cts nar. 13 Dá -tk 


1. Sonakajātaka. (529). 951 


ваһћеввафш dammîti vadasi! tam pi шаућат ета debi, аһа te (ай piyasshšëyarh 
Idën' eva рассаккћа(о та ayain во ti ëšcikkhhissan ti, іорагаф suviññeyyarh, 
sambandhagāthā раііпауеп' ета vedlitabbā. 


e. Katarasmim [во*] janapade ratthesu nigamesu са 
kattha te? Sonako dittho tam me akkhāhi pucchito. 3. 
< Тат'* ета deva vijite бат’ ev' uyyanabhumiya 
ujuvarmsa' шаһёва!й nilobhāsā тапогатё 4. 
s. Titthanti meghasamonä гатта аббобпепіязієё, 
tesan mülasmim Sonako јЬёуаќі anupádano ° 
upšdánesu lokesu' dayhamānesu nibbuto. 5. 
в. Tato св гаја рёуёзі senāya caturangiya, 
kārāpetvā заташ maggam agama yena Ѕорако, 6, 
т. Оууёпаъћатій gantvåna уісагапіо brahāvane 
ёвїпаф Ѕопакат dakkhi dayhamānesu nibbutan ti. 7. 


Tatha ujuvarnsa ti ujukhandbā, mahāsālā ti mahárukkha, megha- 
samšná t| nilameghasadisãi, гашта 1! ramanņniyā, aññoñňñanleaită ti 
sâkhāhi såkbam mülebi ca müla sarpsibbltvá! thitå, tesan ti evarüpanam tava 
uyyänavane sšlënaro hetthāä?’, jhäyatiti Jakkbanūpanijjhänašrammanūpanljjbäna- 
aarkhätehi }һапеһ1 jbàyati, апирёдёпо ti kāmūpādānsrahito!?, фауһаша- 
Desü ‘ti ekšdasahi aggihi dayhamānssu sattesu,. nibbuto ti te аррї nibbā- 
potvå sitaləna hadayena jhâyamino tava uyyåne mañgalarakkhamüle silšpatio 
пізіпоо ева te sshšyo kañcanapatimš viya sobhamàno patimānetiti, tato са 
"и bhikkhave tato so Arindamo гаја tassa часапат sutvā Sonakapacceka- 
huddharn pasissâmîti caturaüginiya вепёуа pay 
ujukam eva ågantrā {азір mahante vanasande vicaranto tsesa Bantikam 
gantvā (ат asipar addakkhi, sa tarn avanditvi!! ekamantarn nisiditvš айапо!% 
kllesšbhirstatt&!5 (атп kapano t! maññamāno iwatn g. à.: 


nlkkhami, vícaranto ti 


в. Kapano vatñáyam bhikkhu mundo samghātipāruto 
amātiko spitiko rukkhamülBsmim jháyatiti. 8. 


Tattha jhäyatiti nlmmatápitiko karuññappatto jhāyatîti "t. 


9. [mamn тёкуат nisāmetvā Sonako etad sbravi: 
па гаја !'° kapano hoti dhammam'* kayena рћеѕѕауаф '". 9. 


3 Bd eti. 3 Ch уо, > Cka tanha so. * Ске tam, ° Cksujumvasā. © во all 
three MSS. ! upādânesu lokesu is wanting іп Che; and haa been added in В4. 
$ Ск simbitva, Се sibbltvá, Bd sarhsibbetvá, ° Dd adds sandhaya. ° Bds nādi- 
тіга-. Yt Ad ув-, 19 В-ы 2 Ck -rattā, Сә -ratta. < Ске -siti 15 
Bd је. !# Ck -a "t Ске ра-, Bd pu-, Вг phu- 


10 


15 


80 


15 


95 


252 XIX. Chattbinipāta. 


10. Yo ca дһаттат niramkatva adhammam anuvattati 
за таја kapano hoti рёро рарарагёуапо ti. 10. 


Tattba iman ti tasea kilesšábhiratasss pabbajjarh arocentssss' imam 
pabbajjāgarahanavacanarh? вшїтї, ctadabravitl pabbajjaya аппа pakšsento 
etarh sbravi. phassayan 6 1! pbassayanto <, yena ariyamaggadhammo nâma kāyena 
phassito? so kapano паса ba botiti dassento evam Â.. пігаф каста {1 attabhavato 
niharitvš, рёро pāpaparāyano tÍ sayeh pāpānaro karanena раро® вйбеваш 
рі akarontšnari t patitthibbšvena pāpaparāyano. 

Evam so B-arh garahi, во attano garahitabhávarh ajánanto 
viya hutvá пйшаройат kathetvā tena saddhirm patisanthárarh 
karonto 

n. Агїпбашо ti me nāwam, Kásirája ti таш vidū. 

kacci' bhoto sukhā веууй idha pattassa Ѕопакё ‘ti р.й. 11. 

Tatiha kacciti” amhākarn tāva na К!бсі aphšsukarn, bhoto рапа kacci’ 
idba pattassa imasmirh uyyšne vasato sukhavlhšro tí pucchi. 

Atha паш во paccekabuddho ,,mahárája na kevalai 
dha аййаїгйрї хаѕапінзва mama aphásukar) пйша р’ atthiti“ 
vatvā tassa samanabhadragáthá nama árabhi: 

is. Sadâpi* bhadram adhanassa anāgārassa bhikkhuno: 

na tesain kotthe upenti' па kumbhe па kalopiyá ", 

paranitthitam евйапй tena yāpenti subbatā. 12. 

w. Dutiyam рі bhadram adhanassa апйрйгавва bhikkhuno; 

anavajjo'' pindo bhottabbo па са koc’ üparodhati. 13. 

14. ТаЧуаш pi bhadram adhanasaa anāgärassa bhikkhuno: 

uibbuto pindo bhottabbo ? na са Кос" üparodhati. 14. 

15. Catuttham'' bhadram adhanassa anāgārassa bhikkbuno: 

muttassa ratthe carato sañgo yassa па vijjati. 15. 

19. Райсатат !* bhadraim adhanassa anāgārassa bhikkhuno: 

nazaramhi dayhamánamhi nåssa kiñci adayhatha. 16. 


1 Che аг-, Bd аг- corr. to at=. 2 Bd -jjarngarahava-, * Che pa-, Bd pbu-. 
* Bde phussayanto. Ске passsuto. ° Bdsz add рїра parāyano t * Bd kan ' 
Ваг kiñcl. ° СЕ bhadra рі, read bhadram арі adhanassa throughont? * Bd Cs 
ор-. 1° Ck natumhenekšlo-, Сг пасипћепека]о-, Hds -kumbhi-. !! Bd -а, 1% 
Сї bhutt-. !2 Сә Bd -ampi. '* Bd adds pi. 


1. Sonakajātaka, (529) 253 


и. Chattharn' bhadram adhanassa anāgārassa bhikkhuno: 
ratthe vilumpamánamhi nássa kiñci ahfratha’. 17. 

ia. Sattamam' bhadram adhanassa anāgārassa bhikkhuno: 
corehi rakkhitarn maggam уе с” aññe рёгірапіћік&" 
pattacIvaram ādāya sotthirn gacchanti subbatá, 18, 

з. Atthamar' bhadram adhanassa apagárassa bhikkhuno: 
узі уаф disam pakkamati anapekho va gacchatiti. 19. 
Tattha апёдёгавеё 'ti mahārāja gharšvšssrh раһёуа anāgārlysbhâāvarn 

pattaesa adhansssa акібсапавѕа bbikkhuno ssbbakšlsrp Ыһайгаш evs, па tenen 
tl mahärāja tesarn adhbananarn bhikkhünarb na kotthāgāre ЧһапайһайпПап! upenti' 


ne kumbhiyarn na рессђћіуага, te рапа subbstá parinittbitah paresarb gbare 
pakkarn ábäraro saroghätipärutä kapšlam ādäya ¿gharapatipštiyë esantă’ pari- 


yesantë* tena tato laddhena' tah ahárarn mnavannerh pátikolyanarh vasene 
paccavekkhitvă paribhuñjitvá jīvitavuttiyã" yāpenti, anavajjo” рію фо! bhot- 
tabbo’! {1 vejjakamnmàdikšya aneranâya vā kubanllapanšnemittikatanippesi- 
katšlábhens lšbharn nijiglbsanat& 1° ti evarüpena micchājivena vā’? uppâditå- 
р1!* сайато раесауё dhammena samena uppaditápi apaccavekkhitvà parlbbutta!% 
з&1* ватајјаріпдо паша, anasanar реһаув micchajivarh vajjetvë dhammena 
namena иррйдїї& patisarnkhá yoniso civararn patisevamiti vutte nayena pacca- 
vekkhitvā?’? anavajjo'® pindo паша, yena еғэгӣро апағајјаріпјо bhuttabbo 
parihbuüjitabbo уай са evarūpeh anavajjarn’® pindaùi bhuñjeamipar paccaye 
півеёуа koci appamattako рі kilaso па uparodhati па pijeti tassa dutiyam pl 
bhadram адһапавва anāgârassa bbikkhuno, nibbuto t| putbuJjansbbikkbuno 
dbammena uppannapindo рі paccavekkhitvă paribhuñjamāno nibbutapiņndo 
пёшв, ekantato pana khinasavassa ріпдо mibbutapindo паша, kirhkáaraQá: ao hi 
tbeyyaparibhogo inaparibhogo däyajjaparibhogo simliparibhogo ti lmesu ca- 
tüsu Pparibhogesu sämiperibhogavasena'® bhuñjati tanhšdasavyatarn !? ао 
ami butvà paribhuñjati па tab tappaccayà koci аррашаизко рі 
КПево uparodbatitl, muttassa rattbe carato t upapthăkakulādisu alagga- 
ш3паввв?! chinnavalšhak. viya Rihumukhà muttavlmalacandamandalassa 
su carantassa rāgaseñgādisu eko рі sañgo п’ atthi, 
@kaceo bi kulehi?? аагіва һо viharati sshasoki sahanandi ?® ekacco måtàpitasu 


уа са уазва дзшапіваш 


elassa, Bd езапё, * Bd -вапа. 7 Вй+ айі ріофепа. $ Ске -іш. ° Вёз -а. 10 
СЕ ра, Сг рі. 't Bd bhettabbo, Ok» bhuttabbe. !? во Cè; СЕ -nakatá, Bd 
jigisanatā. 12 Сіз omit vā, 14 Cks -tābl, Bd -tāya рі. '5 Віе-цо 1 Ba 
omita vā. `? Bds add paribbutto va. ?* Bd -а. 19 Bd adds tatn. #9 Bd tanhá- 
yadãsabyah. *'! Rd» -nasassa. #7? Bd -esu. 26 Ck -ki nandi, Се -soki sam- 
ganandi, Bd sahasoki sabanandi, Вг -sokin honandi. “t Bd nagaragšmavani. 


10 


15 


25 


30 


10 


15 


20 


25 


30 


254 XIN. Chstthinipäie 


bhadram ova, nāssa kiñcitl уо! hi bahuparikkháro boti so mā ше? bs- 
rirnsü ЧЇ айгекабагёпі е civaršdiní antonsgare apatthákakole njkkhipati, atha 
usgaramhi dayhamåno asukakule nama saggi ойо ti sutvā socati kilamati, 
ovarūpessa bhadraiw паша п’ stthi, yo рапа fmahārēje sakunavattarb pūretl 
kayapatibaddhaparikkhšro va hoti tassa mādisassa па kici adayhatha, ten’ 
asta райсашма hit bhadram eva, vilumpamānamhîÎu viluppamanambi ayam 
eva vå pštho, аһїга1һ&? 'ti yathë pabbatagahanädibi nikkbamitvë ratiharh 
vilampamanesu coresu bahuparikkhārsssa antogāme thapitarn vilumpati* 
birati?” баа yassa айһапалза kišyapatibaddhaparikkhšárassa na kiñei abiratha 
Савка? chattham pi bbadram eva, ye саййе páripsnthikš?' ti ye р! айбе 
(ево tesu thšënesu surnhkagahanatthšya thapitā рагірап Шка? tebi са rakkhitaro 
pattacivaran t| coršanarn anupakārab sumkikanarmn asumkaraharh mattfkapattarn 
с" eva katadalbikammaparibhandsrü!° parbsukülaciverañ ca арраррһїп! kāye- 
bandhanaparissávanasücivasisatthakšni сё `(1 забе рі attba parikkhāro' káya- 
patibaddhe katvå maggarh ра{1раппо kenaci avlbethiyamáno!2 sottblm gacchatl, 
subbato 11!# lobbaniyan] bi civaršdiol disvā coråpi harantl eurbkiká;i kin 
пи kho etassa batthe ti pattattbesikādīni sodbenti, suhbato pana sullahukavutti 


tesar passantánarh yeva sotthirb gacchati, ten’ asse sattamam pi bhadran ora, 
anapekuho va gacchatiti kàyapatibaddhato’* atirekasea vihăre patisšniduasta 
kassaci parikkhārassa abhāvā vasanattbānah nivattitvêpi ra oloketi, уаш diser 
gentukámo hoti tarn gacchanto anapekkho та gacchari'", Апогіаһарогё nikkha- 
тіста thüpärňme pabbajitānam dvinnarn kulaputtánarn vaddhetaro !* viya, (—?) 


Iti Sonakapaccekabuddho attha samanabhadrakapi'' ka- 
thesi, tato uttarih pana satam рї sahassam рі aparimāņāni 
вашапаһһайгаййпї'* esa katheturn samattho yeva, rājā pana 
kāâmābhiratattā tam" 


manabhadrakehi attho p` actthiti“ attapo kamadhivimuttita)h *' 


kathan paticchinditva ° ,maybam sa- 


pakāsento āha: 
зо. Dahü pi bhadrakā ete yo? tvarh bhikkhu pasarhsasi, 
ahañ са giddho kāmesu katharh kāhāmi™ Ѕопака. 20. 
з. Piya ше mānusā Ката atho divyápi me piyā, 
atha kena nu vannena ubho loke labháiüaee ti. 21. 


1 Сю мо. ? Bd adds coro. 2 Bd adbikānl. * Bde pi. ° Bd ahinda-. * Bd 
viluppa-. ? Ck virati, Bdz harati, ° Che hirathassa, Ваг abir-. * Bd parlgañ= 
міка '° Bs -дајһа-, СЕ -dalhicerabhandarh. Bd dalhlkammaparidandarn. !! 
O% -тв, Се -rå. ?9 Bd -bedha- š Ck pubbako, Cks omit ti. !*во Ска; Bd 
-bandbato. '5 Ва-ай. '* Ckabu-. 1° Bde -bhadragathayo. 15 Bd -bbadra- 
gåtbani. '* Bd tassa. ° Cs Ва pacchi. 2! Bds -muttataro. 2° Bde babōnl 
вашапабћадтіпі yo. ?? Bd gāhā. 


1. 


Tanba vannenaë ‘ti karanens. 


Sonakajštaka. 1529.) 255 


Ath пап рассекађоддћо áha: 

зз. Кйте[вп] giddh& kāmaratā kāmesu adhimucchitā ' 
пага pāpāni katvāna upapajjanti дирраѓіф. 22. 

s. Ye са káme раһаїуйапа'! nikkhantā akutobhayā 
ekodibhāvādhigatā na te gacchanti doggatim. 23. 

2, Upaman te karissámi, tah sunohi Arindama, 
прашйуа р' idh’ екассе° attharh jananti paņditā: 24. 

1s. Сайрёуа Копараф disvā vuyhamánarm mahannave 


vāyaso samacintesi appapañño асеїазо: 25. 


зв. Үёпай са vat' idarn laddharm bhakkho cáyam anappako, 
tattha rattim ќабБа divă tatth' eva nirato mano. 86. 


зт. Кһадат пйразва marhsáni pipah Bhāgīirasodakarh * 
sampassarh vanacetyáni° па palittha' vihañgamo, 27. 
в. Tam уа otarani' Сапрй pamattarn kunape гаїаш 
samuddarh ајјһағаһауі° agati' yattha pakkhinam. 28. 
з. So са bhakkhaparikkhino udāpatvā " vihañgamo 


па pacchato па purato n` nttarar no'! рі dakkhinam '” 29. 


so Dipam so па ajjhagacchi'* agati” yattha pakkhinam, 
во са tatth' eva pāpattha yathā dubbalako tathá. 30. 
s. Тап ca sāmuddikā macchā КитЫМ!а!* makará susū 
pasayhakārā khádimsu phandamünarm vipakkhinam ". 31. 


з. Evam eva tuvam rüja' уе c' aññe kámabhogino 


giddhā ” се 


na vamissanti'" kakapaññáya te vidū. 32. 


ss. Бзд te прата гаја atthasandassani katå., 


tvañ са райййуазе tena yadi Каһаві vā па vā ti. 33. 


t Cke .ceclta. 


э Ck pabi-, Bd -ħantvāna. > Cks pi idbe-, Hd midhe- * Ck 


pipesahšágirayodakarh, Bd pivañgikarasodakarh, Bs pivarh gañgira-, read: -tho- 
* Ва palettha corr. to paletvā? ? Bde (айса-, Сї 
obāriųī. ° Bd sjjagšbusl, Сёз ajjbagāhāsi. ° Сї ~ti. 20 во Ck; Се udapatva, 


Чайага? 


Rds udam рабт; read udapattha? 


5 Cha зенан). 


касс, Bs najjhagëgacchi. 


Ck Ва -Ja. 


1? Bd gicchâ. 


У Chs а. 
8 Ско və. 


її Chs -ranto. 12 С/е ра, 18 pd najjhága- 


15 Ске „ат, Bd пай, Ве -івата. M 
19 Сы ра.. 


10 


16 


90 


10 


15 


95 


ШП 


256 XIX. Chatthinipáta 


Таа раранїїї mahāršja (те kāmagiddho nari са! kime nissáya 
kāysduecaritădīni pšpšni katva yattha supinake рі dibbā са тёппзайй ca каша 
na Jabhanti* tar doggatim upapsjjantiti attho, pabatvāná `ti khelapindarn 
viya pahaya, akutobbayā t| гёрадтва kutocí enāgetabhayā, ekodibhavadhi- 
gatā її ekodíbhavarn ekavibarikarn adhigatē, па ta ti te evarūpā pabbajitā 
daggatirn ла gaccbanti, apamante ti mahārāja dibbamanusske каше pattben- 
«авва hatthikunape patibaddhskakasadisassa tava ekarn оратагі kerisaāmi, tari 
sunohid attho, kunapan t hatthikalebarah?’, mahannave tì gamhhira- 
puthule* идеке еко kira mabšvšrapDo Gañgšure caranto Gañgšya patitvë utta- 
ritur asakkonto tatth' eva mato Gañgšya уцуМ. їзїп sandhžy' еїмї тайап, 
vàyaeo ti ākšsena дессћалќо еко Како, yanañca vatidan ti во evan cintetva 
tattha uiliyitvā idam тауа hatthiyanarii 1еддһа ettha nibno asnukharn carissimi 
ayam ета са те anappako bhakkho bhavisssti idšni mayá aññattha gantun, na 
vatlatitl вапп{һаёпат екаёв!, tattba rattin ti tassa’ rattiñ са 016 са аи" 
ета mano abhirato аһові, па ра! ієгћа“ ‘ti na uddetva раккаті, о{агап}1% 
#amuddabhimoukbi обагашёпё, оћагапій рі ра(ћо, së samuddšabhimukhi ava- 
haramänā’ 11 attbo, agat] yatthš 'ti samuddamejjhe вапаһду&һа, bhak- 
khaparikkhino ti parikkhinabhakkho, одарасеё !0 tl khina camme са шаве 
са atthlsarmghšáte йшїзедөпа bhinno udake nimujji, stha so kako udako patițthā- 
turn asakkonto uppati, evarn uppatitvā t| attho, agati yattha pakkhinan 
Ч yasmin samuddamajjhe pakkhinarn agati tattha во evarh uppatito, pacchimarh 
disah gantvs tattha Ppatittharn alabhitvā tato puratthimarn tato uttaran tato 
dakkhinan tí catasso pi disā gantvā attano patitthānah na ajjhagaechiti 
adhigañcbîtl!? attho, atha vāyaso етай uppatitv5 paccbimadisu!' ekekarh 
dissh agañchi, diparn pana na ajjbagâmā ti evarh p' ettba attbo dattbabho. 
bápatthá ‘и patito, yathā dubbalako tl ystbā dubbalako pateyya tath' оха 
patito, sueü t| susunimakš!t candamacchâ, pasaybakarëšá tl enicchamšnakarn 
yeva balakkārena, vipakkbinan!5 ti viddharnsítapakkhakamn!*, z(ddhš се 
vamissantin'? yadi gljJhA butvA Кёше па vamissanti)” па cheddessənti 
kákapaññaya te samänapañňā’® tl”, itl te Huddhšdayo panditā vidū vadanti 
jänantîti attho??, attbesandassanitl atthapakāsikā“’, tvañca paññayaee 'ti 
peDñāylesas!, i v.b.: mehārāja mays hitaskāmena tava ovādo dinno, (ат рапа 
tvar) yadi kahasi davaloke nibbattissasi, yadi na kāhasi kâmaparhke nimaggo 
jivitapariyosâne niraye nibbattissasiti, evath {таш eva tena Кагапепв và akōra- 


1 Ско add те, ? во all three MSS. for labbbanti? 3 Bd -vararn, * Ck re- 
puthulodske. © CÀ» tama ^ Ck раіс, С* palitvá, D4 paletva, Нг pbaletthā. 
7 Ва uppatetvá, Вг uppadbotvā. ° Ck ohārânl, Cs оћагапіі. # Bd avabarani. 
10 so Ске; Bd udakam patvă corr. to udai-? !1 Ck ajjbabhāgacchatīti, C 
ajjhabhágañchíti, Bd sjjbasagsccbitl altered to -gànāgacchiti. 9 Dd пайЬдас- 
chati. !® Bd mädisâsu. 1* СЕ susukānāmeka, С° -kā. 1° Che pakkhen, Bd vi- 
pakkhakau. !* Bd viddharpsarapakkbatarn. 18 pde -te ti kâkassa- 
шапа-. !# Rd omits 0. #09 Ckslomit а-. 


1. Ѕопакајёќака. (529.) 957 


Dena vā sagge' та пігауе! vā paññaylssasl, sharn рапа Ъћатећ!? matto арра[1- 
sandbiko ti; imarh* рапа oršdarn dentena paccekabuddhena пайї daseltā, tāya 
yuybamanarh hatthikunaparh daasitarn, kuqapakhadako kako dasslto, tasas kuna- 
parh khšditva pšuiyam pivanskšlo ° dassito, ramapiyavanasandadasssnakšlo das- 
sito, kunapassa nadlyā vuyhamanassa samuddappaveso dassito, samuddamajjbe 
kàkassa hatthikunape patifiharn alahhitváë vinäsarh pattakšlo dassito, tattha пайт 
yiya anamataggo sarnašro datibabbo, пайіу& vuyhamiuarh hatthikunaparh viya 
зашайге paücakámagunadh, kško viya bālaputbujjano, Какавѕа Шапараш khaáditva 
рёпїуеф plvsnakšálo viya putbujjanassa кашавцрафе рагЬЬийјієуё somanassiks- 
kilo”, kškassa kunape Іардава’ ета ramaniyavanasandadassanarn® viya puthuj- 
Janassa kâmagune lsggass' eva ваталатазепе atlbstirbsasrammanadussanarb, ku- 
Паре samudda pavitihe*' kikasss раі! (Һа !9 jahbhiturn asakkontassa vinësarh 
pattakālo viya balaputhujjsuasss kšmagunagiddbassa рёрарагауапавва kusala- 
dbammo patittharn alabhitvā mahāniraye mahāvinäsam pattan 0\2, 


Evam assa во imāya ирашйуа ovādarh datvá idāni tam 
eva ovādam thira keatvā patitthapeturh g. ã.: 
s< Ekavācam`pi dvevácam bhaneyya apukampako 
taduttarirn'” па bhāseyya dáso ayirassa'" santike ti. 34. 
Tattha na bhšseyyë 'tí vacanarh aganbantassa bj (а{0!* uttarim bhi- 


ватапо hí вёшіКкавва santike dšso viya boti, даво hi sšmlke kathah gauhante 
pi aganbante p) katheti yeva, tena vuttatb taduttarirh)! na Ъһавеуув 'Н. 


ss. Idab vatvāna pakkámi Sonako amitabuddbimā 
vehāse antalikkhasmim anusasitvápa khattiyan ti 35, 
@bhisambuddhagathà уаш. 


Tattha Idah vatvšna 'tl bhikkbave во paccekebuddho smitšya lokuttara- 
buddhiya amitahuddhimi idam vatva iddbiya uppatitvā васе pabbajissas) tav' 
ova посе pabbajlssasi tav’ ета dinno te шауг ovàdo appamatto hohitl ovaro 
Anusšsitvëria khattiyarn pakkimi, è 


Во. pi tam ākāsena gacchaptam yāva dassanapathā'* 
olokento thatvá tasmih cakkhupathe atite'* samvegam pati- 
Jabhitv& сівќеві: ,,ayarn bráhmano hinajacco '” ватёпо asam- 
bhinnakbattiyavamse '* јаќаѕѕа mama matthake attano pëšda- 


1 Cha —ena. 2 Rds sahbabh-. 3 Cks idam. Ck tathamsa. ° СЕ picana-, Cz рі 
раџа-, 6 Bd ne. * Chs -jtakālo. © Ck і, Cs-nī, * Che .o, 10 Chs 
patítibita. 1: so Ско for patiakālo? Bds patiitidațibabba. !! Bd tat-. 1 Ва 
ayyassa. !* Rd adda ce. !5 Bd dissana-. !# Bde atikkamante. !? Cks bràh- 
шедејассо. !$ Ck -nno - во, C* -nne - - ae. 

waka. У. 17 


5 


10 


15 


20 


25 


30 


90 


25 


258 XJX. Sathtnipits. 


rajar okiranto &Ейвагї uppatitvë gato, mayápi aj) eva nik- 
khamitvā pabbajiturh vattatíti“ во г. niyyādetvā pabbajitukámo 
gāthadvayam й.: 
se. Ко nu "ше rājakattāro sñtá veyyattim āgatā', 

Tajjar niyyádayissámi, náharh rajjena-m-atthiko. 36. 
зт. Ај)’ eva pabbajissāmi, Ко jaññë maranam suve, 

máharmn * Како va dammedho kámanarn vasam annagë' ti. 37. 


Тайһа ko nu me ti kuhin nu Ime, rajakattáro ti уе rajjārahern * abhi- 
siñcitvë rhjánarb karonti, sütš veyyattimāīgatā* t| вй ce уе са аййа* 
veyyattabhëvarb? адаа mukbamañgalikā, rajjenamattbiko ti гајјера attbiko, 
ko }аПпа maranarb suve 1] шагапаш ajja’ save và ti Idah ko? jJániturh 
samattho. 


Evam r. niyyádentassa sutvë ашассё áharnhsu: 
зв. Atthi te daharo putto Dighávu ratthavaddhano ”, 
tam rajje abhisiñcassu, so по гаја bhavissatiti. 38. 
Tatoparah raññš vuttagātham ādiù katvá uttānasam- 
bandhagāthā'’ palinayen' eva veditabbā. 
з Khippar kumărar ānetha Dighávur ratthavaddhanar, 
(аф rajje abhisiücassu, so vo? гаја bhavissati, 39. 
+, Tato kumáram šnegurh Dighávum ratthavaddhanam, 
tam disvā ёарі гаја екарийаф manoramarh: 40, 
a. Satthi'* рётаваћаввёџі paripuññăni sabbaso — 
te putta patipajjassu, rajjarh niyyādayāmi™ te. 41, 
+. Ajj' eva pabbajissámi, ko јайћа тагапаш suve, 
шёһаф käko та dummedho Кашапаш vasam аппарй. 42. 
+. Satthi nágasahassáni sabbálamkarabhüsitá 
suvannakacchë mëtañgš hemakappanavësasë 43. 
“. Атаа gaámaniyehi іошагафкавараріћі — 
te putta patipajjassu, rajjam піууйёбауаші te. 44. 


* Ске sudš-, Bd sutšveyatta-. ? Ck mahan, Bds па. * Bd аптада, * Ві 
%)4-. 5 Oke sudā-, Rd sutšveyatta- corr. to suddhāre-. * Вә suda-, Che 
eutā va aññe са. 7 Bds byatta-, * Bde add va. ’ Bd adds па, ° Bd -таўћапо. 
11 Bd uttánatthasam-. 19 (k св. !3 Ch aatthirn throughout. 1* Ско -tayámi. 


1. Sonskajātaka. (529.) 259 


а. Ajj’ eva etc, 45. 
<. Satthi авваваһаваёпі sabbálarnkárabhüsitá 
ajënoIyë va jātiyā sindhavë sīghavāhino! 46. 
ал. Атаја gámantiyehi illiyäcāpadhārihi’ — 
te putta patipajjasssu, гајјат niyyádayámi te. 47. 
ав. Ај) eva etc, 48. 
о. Satthi rathasahassñni sannaddhā nasitaddhajá 
dipá'atho pi veyyagghā sabbālamkārabhūsită 49. 
во. Ага}ћа gümantyehi căpahatthehi vammihi — 
te potta patipajjassu, rajjarn niyyādayāmi te. 50. 
в. Ajj' eva etc. 51. 
ss. Satthi dhenusahassāni rohaññá* puñgavūsabhā — 
tā putta patipajjassu, rajjarh оіууёйаубші te. 59, 
s., Ajj eva ete, 53. | 
se Solasitthisahassáni sabbšlarnkarabhüsitá 
vicitrahatthabharana' ámuttamanikundalá — 
tā putta райрајјааво, гајјаф niyyádayami te. 54. 
в. А}}' eva etc, 55. 
ъв. Daharass’ ета me tāta mātā matā' ti ше sutam, 
tayā viná аһатп баха jīivitum hi па ussahe. 56, 

s. Yathā йгаййакатз ойра poto anveti pacchato 
jessantarh giriduggesa samesu visamesu са 5⁄7. 
se. Evar tah anugacchámi pattam' ādāya pacchato, 

subharo te bhavissāmi, na te һезайтї dubbharo. 58. 
s. Yathā вёшойікай návam vëánijanam dhanesinam 
уоћёго tattha ganheyya vāņijā vyasanl' siyā' 59. 
во. Evam eváyam pauttakali'° antarāyakaro mamam ", 
imam kumëáram pápetha разёбат rativaddhanam. 60, 


1 Ck dighavayano, C? eighavāhito, Bd slñgavābaņā, Вә sighavšhani. ? Bæ in- 
driyácapa-, C% jliyocspa-. * Bd -е. * Çh -hañña. 5 Bd vicittavatth8-. * 


Ck Bd mātā. ? Bda pu-. * Bd hyasanam. * во ail tbree MSS. for siyum, 


10 Сю -liù, 11 Bd шаша. 
17+ 


10 


20 


10 


15 


260 ХІХ. Satthinipats 


e. Tattha kambnssahattháyo' yathá Sakka va accharā 
të nam tattha ramessanti’, tšbi-m-eso" ramissati. 61. 
в. Tato kumëram рёревиш pásádam rativaddhanam, 
{аш disvá атаспш* kaññaá Dighávum rattbaddhanarm: 62, 
es. Devatë nu si gandhabbo ёдо Sakko purindado, 
ko vā tvarh kassa vë putto, кафай jánemu tam тауаф °. 63. 
sa № amhi devo na gandhabbo ра рі Sakko purindado, 
Käsirañño ahai putto Dighávu ratthavaddhano. 64. 
as, Маша* bharatha, bhaddam vo, aharm bhattā bhavámi vo. 
Таш tattha avacum Кайпа Dighavum ratthavaddhanañ: 
kuhirh гаја anuppatto, ito гаја kuhim gato. 65, 
вв. Pamkarn гаја atikkanto thale гаја patitthito 
акапќакат agahanarh patipanno mahāpathah. 66. 
Аһай са patipanno 'smi шарратп duggatigáminarm 
вакарќакаф sagahanam yena gacchámi duggatih. 67, 
Tassa’ te sāgatam“ гаја sihassóva giribbajarn, 
anusšsa mabārāja, (уво no’ sabbásam івваго ti. 


е? 


Tattba khippan ti tena Ы taro sigbam ёпеа, šlapitl ва((Ьі gšmasa- 
hassšniti adinl vadanto älapi, sabbšlarnkarabbüsltš ti te nàgë ssbbebi 
sīsupagâdihi aslarbkárehi bhüslta, hemakappanavàsasñ ti suvanpnakhacitena 
каррапепа paticchannasarira, gamaniyehiti hatthācartyebiì, ајёцїуа уа 'ti 
кёгарёкёгапа'!о jänanakā va'l, Jštiyš віпдћатё И aíndhavaratthena'  Sindhu- 
naditire Jšta, ёёшапіуећі «і assacariyehl, illiyacapadharihitll3 illiävudhañ 
са!* сёрётифһай са dhārentebi, дїра atho pi veyyaggbā (1 dipicapima- 
vyagghacammaparivārā 15, gámaniyehiti rathikebi, vammihíitl!* sannaddhs- 
vammehil1?, тоһаййа ti тайатапп‚ puñgavūsabhā ti изаһһазап- 
khëtena Jjetthakapuñgavena samannágati, dabarasseva me ti atha nam ku- 
māro tata mama?’ daharasseva’’ sato mātā matā?’ iti mayā sutan so ‘ham 
{вуй vinā Jīvitarù na sakkbissamiji ã., poto ti tarunapotako, Jessantan ti 
vlcarantarn, sāmuddikan ti samudde vicarantarh, dhaneslnan t| dhanarh 
pariyessntšánar, тоћёго (1 tagmirh oharento31 hettha kaddhanako všlamaccho 


1 Ва kammusa-, Ве kammussa-. ? В4* -issanti. > Cs Rd ceso. * Сї ёар, 
5 Ва adds kumarošha. * Bd шат шап, Вг шатаў. 7 Bd tattba, ° Bd svá-. 
+ Ске во. 1° Bd -nai. !5 Bd т!}апапана ca, Ck -ко va. 1 Bd jātlyå sin- 
dhuratthe.  1# Bds indriya-. 14 Bd: indriyāvu-. 25 СЮ -рагё. 1% Bd свгіуећі 
vamıoibhiti, Ck? cammibiti. 7*7 Ckz -сашлећ. 15 Bd adds tata шаша, !° Bd 
adds me. ?° Bd mātā, °?! Bå vicitravohëro Іп the place of tasmim - =. 


2. Ssükiccsjštaka. (530.) 261 


vā udakarakkbaso vā āvațto vā, tatthā 'П tasmin samudde, vāņijā vya- 
sanī siyā ti atha ta vāņijā vya»anssampattā bbaveyyurh, siyan? # vā pāțho, 
puüuttakalíti puttalämako puttakšlakanni, kumāro puna kiñei vatlurh па visahi?, 
atha гёја smacce āņāpento Iman il ādim E., tattha kambussshattbāyo ti 
kambussah vuccati suvannarh, suvenpābharapabhūsitahatthāäyo t! attho, yathā 
tl yathā icchanti tath&3, етап: vatvā М. tatth' eva tar abbisiñcapetvš парага 
pāhesi, sayan pana ekako va uyyānā nikkhamitvā Himavantah pavisitvá rama- 
niye bbümibhāäge pannasšlarn māpetvä lsipabbajjarn pabbajitvā vanamülaphalaá- 
hāro yāpe»i, m: 
pah katvë p. 


по рі kumaársr Baranssirh pavesesl, во nagararn padakkhi- 
ат abhirühi*, tam atthah pakšsento S. tato (1 šdim â., tarh 
disvā avacurn Кайба ti tern mahantena sirisobhaggena ёраѓат dlavà asukç 
nam’ eso ti ajānantiyo va iā nāțakitthiyo avocurn, тата? bharathā "tÍ mam 
icchatha, pakan ti ragadikllesaparhkarh, thale ti pabbsjjaya, akapțakan ti 
ršpakantakiadirahltar, teh ova gahanehi араһапат, mahāpathan ti sagga- 
mokkhagāminarn mahámaggarh patipanno, yenā "і yena micchbāmaggena dagga- 
tir gacchenti tam ahah pajipanno ti vadati, tato tā cintesurn: 7ājā (ёта amhe 
раһауа pabbajito, ayam рі kēmesa vibarantarūpo“, васе marh nábhirsmessima 
nikkhamitvā pabbajeyya, abhiramanâkāram assa karissāmā 'ti, atha Dar abhi- 
nandantiyo osānagātham ёћафви, tattha gíribbajan ti aibapotikānami" vasa- 
natthánarh kañcanaguharb, kesarasibasaa âgatah viya (авва tava gatah suš- 
gatain б, tvanno ti (хаш sabbāsam рі amhākam issaro sëmitl. 


Evañ ca pana vatvë sabbe turiyāni рардапһїїївп, nánap- 
pakārāni naccagītāni vattayirmsu', yaso mahā ahosi, во yasa- 
matto '° pitararh na sari, dhammena рапа' r. kāretvā yathá- 
kammar gato, Во. pi jhánabhiññarh'?' nibbattetvá'' Brahmalo- 
kūpago ahosi. 

5.1, d. š, „пв bhikkhave ідёп' етв pubbe pi T. mababhinikkha- 


manash nikkhanto yer“ ‘ti vatvë j. s.: „Tadā paccekabuddho pari- 


vibbāyi, putto Вёһиакошёго ahosi, Ariodamarājā вһвш еуй" "ti, 


Sonakajšatakam. 


2. Samkiccajátaka. 


Disrā nisinnam гёјёпар ti. Idem S. Jiyakambavane +, 
Ajatasattussa pitughatakammam а. к. So bi Devadattam піззёуа 


1 Ва sighan. 3 Bd -hati. > Віз add karonti. * Bds -ruyhi. * Bde mamat. 
* ao Са; Ads virattacittarūpo. ? Cke -1шаш. ° Сіз omit su-. ° Bds pavattidsu, 
10 Bd yanaqampatto, !! Bdz omit papa. '* Bd» a=, 1% ajl three MSS. -eutvâ. 


10 


15 


262 ХІХ. Sathinlpáta. 


tassa твсарепв ріќагаш ghātāpetvā Devadattassa samghabhedāvasãne 
bhinnaparisassa roge uppanne „T-a КһашйёреззйтЇн''' mañcasivikāya 
Sårattbim’ gacchantassa Јеіатапайтате pațhavih parvitthabhšvam 
sutvā „Devadatto Sammāsambuddhbasse patipakkho hutvë Ppathavim 
pavisitvā aviciparayano jato, шауйрї tam nissāya риа dhammiko 
dhammaerājā ghātito, aham pi nu kho pathavim pavisissamiti" bhito 
rajjasiriyā cittassšdam alebhi', ,thokam niddāyissāmîti“ niddam upa- 
gatamatto navayojanabahalāya’ ayapathaviyarn” pātetvā ayasūlehi 
kottiyamāno“ viya sunakhehi luñcitvë khajjamāno viya bheravaravena 
Yiravanto' utthšsi, ath’ ekadivasam komudiyā cātumâsiniyā amacca- 
ganaparivuto attano yasam oloketvā „тата pitu yaso ito" mabanta- 
taro, tathārūpam’ nāmâhah dhammarëjam '° Devadattah nissüya 
ghëtesin" ti cintesi, tass' етып cintentass’ eva kāye dāho uppajji, 
ваКа!авагїгатп sedatintam ahosi, tato „ko nu kho тате imam bhayam 
vinodetîti" cintetvā „thapetvā Dasabalan añño n` atthiti cintetvë ™ 
„ahar T-assa mahüparádhiko, ko nu kho mam `” netvë dassessatiti'' 
cintento „na аййо Косі añūatra Jivaká' ti sallakkhetvā tassa gahetvā 
gamanüpáyam karonto .,ramaniyá vate bho dosinā rattiti® udānat 
udānetvā „Кїп nu khv-ajja єатарат vā brāhmaņam vā рауїгирй- 
зеууйёша' ‘ti vatvā ригапаваувЕй@їһ! puránádinam ропе kathite ќезаф 
Yacanam anädiyitvå Jiyakam pațipucchitvā tena T-assa guņam kathetvë 
„tam devo" Bhagavantam'' payirupāsatū" “і vutte hatthiyānāni Каррй- 
реѓтё'° Jivakambavanai gantrā T-am upasamkarritvë vanditvë Т-епа 
katapatisanthëro sanditthikam samanaaphalam pucchitvā T-assa ma- 
dhurasamaññaphaladhammadesanam '* 
kattan pativedetvā T-am Кһатареіта раккёті, So tato patthüya 
Чёпай dento sila rakkhanto T-ena saddhinm samsaggam katrā 
madhuradhamrmakatham sunanto kalyánamittasarhsaggena pahinabhayo 


sutvë suttapariyosâne upăsa- 


vigatalomaharnso hutvā cittassādah pațilahhi", sukhena'? cattāro 
iriyāpatbe kappesi. Ath’ ekadivasain dh. k. s.: „āvuso, Ajatasattu 
pitughatakammam katva bhayappatto ahosi, rajjasirim пізвёув cittassã- 
dam alabhanto sabbiriyāpathesu dukkham anubhosi, во даш T-am 
āgamma kalyanamittasamsaggena vigatabhayo issariyasukham anu- 
bhotiti*, 5. šgantvë „kāya nu ‘ttha bhikkhave е. k.s.“ ti pucehitvë 


1 Ва -matl. 3 Ck -iyarp. *# во Chs; Dd ns labhi. ¢ Bd -yam. ° Be 
ayamahäpaihariyarh, Ck’ pajhavih. * Bd koti-. 7 Bd vihar-. * Chs add ca. 
° Chs pá. 10 Па .}апаш. !! Rd бабта, 12 Ck: me in the place of kho шап. 
10 Ске чо. 1% Сз bhavantaro. 7° Ck вашрё-, C? kampā-, !* Ві msdhurarb=. 
1f Rds „ута, 15 Ck sumukhens. 


2. SamkiccaJataka. (530.) 263 


„їшйёув оёшё 'ti vutte „ne bhikkhave ійёп’ eva pubbe р’ ева pitu- 
ghšëtakammarm kstvā шаш nissšya sukbam sayiti" увітё а. ā.: 

А. В. Brahmadatto! Brahmadattakumëšram оёша putta 
patilabhi. Теда Во. рогоһіќавва gebe pațisandhih дарһі, 
јаіавва с” авва Samkiccakumšro ti nñinarm Капшвп, Те 
nbho рі гајапіуевапе ekato va vaddhimsu, aññamaðñasahāyakā’ 
hutvá vayappattā Takkasilan gantvā sabbasippáni uggaņhitvā 
paccágamirmsu. Atha rājā puttassa nparajjarh adási, Bo. рі 
орагајавв’ eva santike аћові. Ath' ekadivasam vparājā pitu 
пууйпаКПаш gacchantassa mahantarh уаваф disvá tasmim 
lobham оррёйеѓуё „швуһай pitë шата bhátisadiso?' васе 
etassa maranam olokessāmi mama maballakakāle r.labhissami, 
їад& laddhena рі rajjena koattho*, pitararn máretvë r. Кагева&- 
míti°“ cintetvā В-авва tam attbah агосеві. Во. „вашта, 
pitugháitakamman оёша Ъһагїуап nirayamaggo, na вакка 
etárh Еййшї, mā kariti“ pațibāhi. So punappuna рі kathetvă 
yäāvatatiyarnh tena pațibāhito pádamülikehi saddhin mantesi, te 
sampațicchitvā rañño* maraņnūpāyam уйпашаїйвп. Во. tam 
рауайїш йаќуа ,,пёһет etehi saddhim ekato” bhavissámiti“ 
máëtápitaro anápucchitvá aggadvārena nikkhamitvá Himavantam 
pavisitvā isipabbajjah pabbajitvā }һапаЬһїпйаш* nibbattetvā 
vanamūlaphalāhāro vihāsi. Rajakumáro рі tasmim gate рїагаш 
märetvă mahaotah yasan anubhavi. .,Samkiccakumáëro kira 
isipabbajjam pabbajito“ ti sutvā bahñ kolapottā nikkbamitvā 
tassa sautike pabbajihsu, so mahată isiganena parivuto tattha 
vasi sabbehi samapattilabhibi" yeva. Баја pitaram māretvā 
appamattakarh yeva kalam rajjasukhah anubhavitvā' tato 
pattháya bhito cittassádamr alabhanto niraye kammakaranappatto 
viya ahosi. So B-am_ aqussaritvë „ваһйуо me ‘pitughâta- 
картай bhāriyan’ ti patisedhetva шаш attano kathan gāha- 
petu asakkonto attšnarh пїййозатп katvā palāyi, sace so idha 


1 Ваг add г. kāreuto. ! Bd -ййатва-. ° Ва» bhātikasa-. * Ck add ti. $ Bd 
aanhissāmlei, * С omlig таййо, ? Rd -ko. 5 Ва -āä. °? СЕ ДЫ, Bdz -ino. 
36 Cke anaribh-, 


95 


264 XIX. Satihinipáta. 


abhavissa па me pitughátakammarm Каир adassa, idam рї me 
Ьһауаш hareyya, kahan пп kho' etarahi viharati, вас” авва” va- 
sanatțhānarh jäneyyarh ракковареууаш, ko nu kho me tassa vasa- 
nattháparh &госеууй“* ‘ti cintesi. So tato pattháya antopure са 
rájasabhāyañ ca B-ass' eva уаппагп bhāsati. Етар аййһапе gate 
В. „гаја шаш saratiti, mayá tattha рап{уй* dh. desetvā {аш* 
nibbhayarn katvá ágantum vattatiti“ раппйза vassāni Himavante 
vasitvā pañcasatatápasaparivuto Āākāsena рапіт& Dāyapasse 
näm’ uyyäne otaritvā isiganaparivuto silápatte пһїзїйї. Uyyána- 
раіо (аш disvā ,bhante gaņasatthā ko паша“ °ti pacchi, 
„Samhkiccapandito пата“ `ti са* sutvā sayam рі sañjánitvá 
„bhante yáváharm гйёўйпаш ānemi tāva idh’ eva hotba, аюһёкаф 
гаја tumhe datthukāmo“ ti vatvā vanditvā vegena rüjakularh 
gantvá tassa āgatabhāvarh rañño ārocesi. Каја tasea santika 
gantvā' kattabbayuttakarm орасёгаф katvå pañham россћі. 


Tam attham pakāsento S. â.: 
1. Disvā nisinnam гаўапаш Brahmadattam rethesabham 
ath’ asse pativedesi yassàsi anukampako: 69. 
s. Samkice' âyam anuppetto ізіпаф sadhusammato, 
teramānarūpo niyyāhi’, khippam passa теһеѕіпаф, 70. 
s. Tato [ca] гёја taramāno yuttam йгиуһа sandanam 
mittămaccaparibbūļho agamāsi rathesabho, 71. 
4. Nikkhippa рапса kakudhāni Kasinam ratthavaddhano 
vāļavījanin unbisarn khaggam  chattam upābanan’ 72. 
s. Oruyha raja yānambā tbapayitvā paticchadam 
азїцыш Юйуаразгазшй Samkiccam иразвшКаш, 73, 
в. Upasamkamitvë [so] гаја sammodi isinë saha, 
tam katbam vitisaretvë ekamantam upāvisi. 74. 
т. Екашапќаф nisinno va yathë'° kalam wmaññatha 
tato pāpāni kammāni pucchitum рассарајјвіћа, 75. 
в. Isih pucchëmi Samkiceam isinam sâdbusammatam 
азїпаш Dāyapassasmim isisamghapurakkhatam: 76, 


1 Ваг add во. > Ва sacetaesa. °? Hd adds tassa. * Bd omits taù. ° Rd 
omits са. © Ck āg-, Cf ag-. т Bd пјууіи. ê Bd -а. ° Bdz сһапайсир-. !° 
Ва atha, 


2. SarmbkiccaJštaka. (530.) 965 


о. Каш gatih' рессв gacchanti пага dhammaticarino, 
віїсіппо mayá dbammo, tam ше вкКћаћі pucchito. 77. 


Та. disvš ti bbikkbavə so uyyänapālo та}ёпагп rajasabbays3 nisionarh 
Qisvš, асһавеё `(1 evarh nisinnarn djava atba tassa pativedesi yaasāsiti vadanto, 
ñrocesiti ацћо, уазвёв1!1 mabärāja yassa tvah anukampako muducitto 281% 
yassa ahhinbarn vannarn pavirudáhšsi во ayarh Sarhkicco 1в1пагп antare sâdhu 
latthako < ti sammato anuppatto tava пууапе silāpatie isigaņaparlvuto kañcana- 
patimiš viya півіппо, taramānarūpo tí mabārāja pabbajitá nama kule vā gara уй 
alaggā tumbškarh anāgacchantānam ота? pakkameyyurht tasmâ taramánarüpo kbip- 


рай niyyšbi mahantānah silšdigunšnar esitattā?’ gavesitattü  mahesinarh, tato 
ti bbikkbave во гаја tasaa vacanarn sutvë tato tasaa vacanato anantaram eva, 
nikkbippë ' nikkbipitvš, tassa kira uyyanadvárarh patvā va ətad abosi: pabba- 
jit паша garutthánlya Sarhkiccai 


sassa santikarh uddhatavesena gantur ayuttan 


ti во manlcitiasnvannadandarn válavljanirh kañcanamayarh uņhisspattah supari- 
kbitterb mañgalakbaeggarn sotacchatten вотарпарадикё ti Ішёпі рейса гёјека- 
kudbabbandáni арапеві tena чабат nikkblppá 'ti, paticchadantl tad? eva 
тајаквкидћебћар даф thapayltvë bbandigarikassa batthe datva, О ёуараввазшіп 
ti evarbnàmske оууёле, atba Ка! аф amañüathiš `!}! аца ao idâni me pañ- 
һай росси kālo ti jāni 1°, Pāliyan репа yatbā'? kālan t! ёра(атһ, tasoa 
kálanurUpena pañbapucchanarn 12 amaññatbā 'Ч attbo, paccapajjatbā 'u 
patțipajji, pecoš '1 patigantva, paralokassa vā пашаш etarh 1°, taamā paraloke ! 4 
ti attho, mayá ti bhante mayà sucaritadhammo!5 atikkanto pitughštakammah 
katath, tamme!t akkháhiti tasmā ше!? akkhābi'®: kern gatirh!° pitugħâtakā 
gacchanti katarasmih niraye рассапіїй pucchati, eo tarn sutvā tena bl mahārāja 
sunohiti vatvā ovádarh tava ađdāsl. 


S. tam attham švikaronto аһа: 
10. lsi avaca Samkicco Kasinam ratthavaddhanam 
ёѕіпат Dayapassasmim, шећагаја sunohi те: 78. 
11. Uppathena vajantassa уо maggam enusäsati 
tassa те тасапеш Кауіга nàssa?' maggeyya kantako. 79. 
12. Адһатташ putipannassa уо dhammam anusãsati 
tassa ve төсапаф kayirā па so gaccheyya duggatin і". 80. 


Ta, upipathena "И corebl pariyutthlitamaggena, maggamanusëšsatiti 
kbemarm maggaih skkbêti, оёвеа maggeyya kantako t| tassa ovšdakëarassa 


1 all three М9. -i. 7 Bde уа. ? Bd abosi. * Bd laddhako, 5 Ddz anagacchantá- 
naüñeva, Ck? gac-. 6 Ckz -eyya. ? Сіг mabamtarn - - випа esltattah. 6 Chs 
passa in the place of gavesitattā. ° Bd tam '° Bdr јапай. !! Crs tathā. !? 
Сіз райћат-. !3 Cs nimatametaih, Bd nāmetarh. !* Ске -ko, !6 Oks add tl. 
10 Cks kammar, Вг yamme. ' Ck ce. 1š Віз omit tasmā me а-. 19 all three 
MSS, -i. 20 Bd па-. 21 Ch tih, omitting ti. 


10 


15 


95 


30 


10 


20 


266 XIX. Satthinipšta. 


purisussa mukham corakantako па passeyya, уо dhamman ti yo sucarita- 
dhammai acikkhatl, па so tí во рогіво nlreyidibledarn duggstirn na gaccheyya, 
uppathasadiso hí шаһїгї]з adhammo maggasadiso sucaritadbammo, {тай рапа 
pubbe pitsrarh gbātetvā гаја homid mayharh kathetvā шауё patibšhlto, mama 
Yacanarh skatvš pitarahb miretvë!' |фап1 госазі, panditšënarb avādah akarontā 
паша coramaggarh ? райрепоё viya шаһїтуазапаїй papunantitl. 


18» 


Evam assa оуйдаш datvā upari dhammarh desento å.: 
Dhammo patho’ mahărāja adhammo рапа uppatho, 
adhammo пїгауаї neti 

dhammo рёре‹і suggatin. 81. (IV 9°), 
Adhammacārino гёја пага visamajivino 

yam gatim pecca gacchanti niraye їе sunohi me: 82. 


. Sañjivo Kalasutto ca Sarhghato dve ca Roruvā 


athâparo Mahāvīci Тарапо са Patāpano. 83. 


‚ Icc-ete attha pirayá akkhātā doratikkamā 


ākiņņā luddakammehi paccekā ѕо]ав’ ussadā 84. 


‚ Кайагіуёќарапё · рћогё accimantā mahabbhayá 


lomahamsanarüpá ca Ыһезт&* pațibhayā dukhā 85. 


. Catukkannëá catndvárá vibhattā bhāgaso mită 


ayopākārapariyantā ayasá pațikujjitā. 86. 


. Tesan ayomayā bhümi jalitā tejasā yuta, 


samant yojanasatarn phuțā titthanti sabbadā. 87, 
Ete patanti niraye uddhapadë avarsirā 
isinam ativattāro* saññatānarh tapassinam. 88. 


. Te Ыһйпаһипо“* paccanti” macchābhflā’ katā yathá 


sarhvacchare asarhkheyye narā kibbisakárino. 89. 
Dayhamänena gattera niccam santarabšhiram 

пігауй nâdhigacchanti dváram_ nikkhamanesioo, 90. 
Pnratthimena” dhávanti tato dhávanti pacchato, 

uttarena pi dhāvanti tato dhbávanti dakkhinam, 

yam yarn dvārarh gacchanti tar tar devá pithiyare™, 91. 


1 Bd għâțetvå. ? Bd -a. 2 Ce HBd pantbo. * Bds bhasmš. * Ске -cattāro. 
* СЕ gunáhuno. 7 Bd paccenti, * Bd macchābbila, Çks «bila. * Січ add pi. 
10 Ва pidhlyyare. 


2. Sarrklccajataka. (530.) 967 


s< Bahūni vassasahassáni' janë пїгауауйвїпо? 

báhá paggayha kandanti patvā dukkham anappakarh. 92 
ss. Asivisarh va kupitarn tejasih’ dnratikkamam 

na sädhurūpe* &в1де* па saññatánarh ќаразвіпаћ. 93. 
ss. Atikáyo mahissáso Ajjuuo Kekakādhipo 

sahassabáhu ncchinno їзїш ёвајја Соїатап. 94. 
sr. Arajarn° rajas& Vacchara Kisam avakiriya Dandaki 

tālo va mülato! chinno, ва гё}й vibhavarh gato. 95. 
з. Ораһасса* manat’ Mejjho'° 

Mātañgasmińh yasassine'! (IV 5°) 

варёгівајјо ncchinno, Mejjháraññam ' (айё ahn, 96. 


зә. Капћайїрауао’ ӣвајја isiù Аодһекауепһиуо '" 


aññaññarh " musale hantvá sampattā Yamasādanam™. 97. 

Atháyarm isinä satto'°antalikkhacaro'* роге (Ш +°) 

pávekkhi pathavirh Cecco hinatto patta pariyáyarn", 98, 

si. Tasmā hi chandagamanam па-рраватазап{ї pandita, 
adutthacitto bhāseyya girarh saccupasamhitam, 99. (ITI 55°) 

ss. Manasā ce padotthena уо naro реккћаѓе !" monit 
vijjacaranasampapnarh gantā™ во nirayarh adho, 100. 

а. Ye vaddhe™ paribhásenti'' pharusüpakkamá janë 
anapaccá adáyáda tālāvatthu™ bhavanti te. 101, 

м. Yo са pabbajitarm hanti katakiccam mahesinam 


ra Kālasutte пігауе сїгагаййуа paccati. 102. 
зв. Yo са гё}& adham:inattho ratthaviddharhsano mago 
{арауіїуй janapadam Тарапе?* pecca paccati. 103. 
вв. $0?* ca тавваваһавзӣпі satarm divyāni paccati”” 
accisarnghapareto во dukkharn vedeti vedanarn. 104, 


1 Све sstasshbassáni. ! Bds -gamino, ° Bd -si. * Ске -ро, ° Ске šside, Bd 
nāside. * Сіз -Ја. ? Bd samülo. è Ck -gaccha, С° -gacca, * Bd шё-. '° 
Bd ша-. !1 Ck Rd -no, !2 Bd“ -vindayo, C# -venšhuyo, Ck -venhuso, ?!? СЕ 
ariñañña, Bds aññamañüa, l all tbree MSS. -вайһапап. 35 Cke santo. !% 
Che -khbe-. 1? во all tbree MSS. for patva paiyayari. 29 Cke.to. 19 Сї 
һал, Bd gantvā. 7° Bd vndhe, В buddhe. ! Bd -santi. 23 Bd tala-. 33 
Ва a=. ?* Cka уо. 25 Bd pucati. 


10 


16 


10 


15 


35 


268 ХІХ, Sathinipšts. 


вт. Tassa aggisikhá Кауй піссһагапіі раЪћаѕвага 
tejobhakkhassa gattáni lomaggehi' nakhehi са. 105. 
e, Dayhamëánena gattena uiccam santarabšhiramn 
dukkhábhitunno nadati nāgo tuttaddito’ yathā, 106 
s. Yo lobhá pitara hanti dosă vā purisádhanio 
ва Kāļasutte пігауе cirarattāni?’ paccati. 107. 
в. Sa tādiso paccati lohakumbhiyá*, 
pakkañ ca sattīhi hananti nittacarn 
andha karitvá muttakarisabhakkham, 
kháre nimujjanti° tathávidharn пагаш. 108. 


a, Tattam pakatthitain'ayogulañ са 


š 


dīghe ca phaále' cirarattatāpite 
vikkhambham ādāya vibhajja гајјџһі° 
хабе? mukhe sarnsavayanti rakkhasá, 109, 
а. Sám& са sonë са balā ca gijjh&'° 
kákolasarmghá са dijā ayomukhá 
samgamma khadanti vipphandamëánarm 
jivharh vibhajja үірһаза ** salohitam . 110. 
в. Tam daddhakolar "° paribhinnagattarh 
nippothayantā '* [anu]vicaranti гаккћавӣ, 
rati hi nesam™, dukhino pao’ аге, 
е(айїзавтїїї niraye vasanti 
ye keci'* loke idha pettighātino ” 111. 
аа. Putto ca mátararm hantvā'* ito gantvë ҮашаККһауаш 
bhusam ápajjate'° dukkhath attakammaphalūpago. 112, 
є. Amanussë atibala hantëram janayantiyā 
ayomayehi phalehi" pīļayanti punappunam, 113. 


+ Ва lomebi са. 2 Bd tundattito. * Ві -āya. * Bd -yam. $ СЕ ра - -, Bd 
nisi- corr, to nisu-, * Bas pakkattbitam, C% jakahkātbim. ' СЕ phalo, Bd 
раје, * Bd rajjati. * во Сїг; Bd vivate, Be ујғаге, !9 Bd cabalā corr. to sa- 
balš? Ске giddhā. '! Сёз vigha-. 12 Сёз viiobbl-. '? яо Сг; Bd vadhakalarh, 
Ck 4дапдайо!аш. !* Cke nippoța-. !*# Bd te-. 16 Cts уо koci. Ч Rà рішщ-. 
10 Bd hatvš, !* Cka äsajjate. 20 Cks pä-, Ва çà-. 


46. 


4. 


и. 


64. 


67. 


7. Samklecajātaka. (530.) 269 


Таш раввшаф вака gattā' ruhirarh attasambhavarn 
tambalohavilfnarh va tattam páyenti' mattigham. 114. 
Jighaññarn'kunapam püti* daggandham güthakaddamarí 
pubhalohitasamkšsarm rahadam ogayha titthati. 115. 
Tam enam kimayo’ tattha atikáyá ayomukhā* 

chavim chetvána' khādanti pagiddhá ° marsalohite. 116. 


‚ бо са tam nirayam patto nimuggo Sataporisam 


р00їпаф” Кипараф váti'° samantá ѕаќауојапаћ, 117. 
Cakkhumápi hi'' cakkhūhi” tena gandhena jíyati, 
etādisah Brahmadatta mattigho' labhate dukham, 118. 
Khuradháram арок капца tikkbarn durabhisamblhavarm 
patanti gabbhapâtiniyo'* дирдат Vetaraninadim., 119. 
Ayomayáñ simbaliyo solasarngulakantaká 
dubhato-in-abhilambanti '* доррат Vetaranirn nadi. 120. 
Те accimanto titthanti aggikkhandhá va áraka, 

Āādittā jatavedena uddham yojanam uggatā. 121. 

Ete'* sajanti niraye tatte tikhinakantake 

оёгіуо ca aticāriniyo™“ пагй са paradāragū. 122. 

Te patanti adhakkhandbā vivattā vihatā™ ршһй, 

sayanti vinividdhañgá, digharh jagzanti sarnvarih ”. 123. 
Tato ratyá vivasane mahatih pabbatūpamarh 
lohakumbhim pavajjanti?'° tattahn aggisamüdakarm. 124. 
Evarh divá са ratto са dussîilā mohapárutá 


anubhonti " 


sakarn kammarh pubbe dukkatam а(ќапо. 125. 
Үй са bhariyā dhanakkītā sámikam atimaññati 
sassum уй sasurarh vápi jettham*" vápi nanandararh’? 


tassā varkena jivhaggain nibbahanti sabandhanam, 126. 


1 Bd tarn pamsavarñ ракка раа, ? Bd payanti. 3 Bd jighaccham. * во Сї, 
Bd pati. 5 Bd -iyo. 6 Ске adho-. ? Bd tetvāna. è Hd sarngiddhš, В» sati- 
"баһа. * Rd putikan. '° Ckz pāti. 1! so Сі; Cs Bd pi Ы. '2 Ск Qütl. 
їз Bd mátugho. '* Ва gabbhapätayo, Ске gabbhápatiniyo. 15 Оё duhatom- 
hllembanti, Bd ubhato abhilampanti. 15 Bd etam te. !1 Bd -сёгіуо. $° Oks 
эй ыз. ' Bds əsbbadš. 2° во all three MSS. for pabbajanti? 2: Che -oti. 
23 Ско settharb. 21 Rd jandanarn. 


10 


15 


20 


10 


90 


96 


270 XIN. Satthlnipata. 


s» ба! vyámamattam kiminam jivham passati attani, 
viññapetum па sakkoti, Tapane pecca paccati. 127. 
во. Orabbhikā sükarika macchikā migabandhikā 
corå goghăātakā lndd& avanne vaņņakārakā’ 128. 
e. Sattihi lohakütehi nettirosehi usühí са 
haññamānā khāranadińh? papatanti avarsirā. 129. 
es. Sāyarh рёќо kütakárI ayokütehi haññati, 
tato vanta durattánarh рагеваш bhuñjate sadá, 130. 
ea. Dharhká* bheraņndakā gijjhā kákolá ca" ayomakhā 
уїррһапдашапат * khādanti naran kibbisakárinarh' 131. 
мє. Ye migena migar hanti pakkhih vā pana pakkhin& 
asanto rajasă' channá' gantë'° te nirayarh adho'! ti. 139, 


Ta. patho’? t| dasakusalakammapatho š dhammo, khemo tit арра(і- 
bhayo sugatimaggo, vlsamajivino ti айһашшепа Карр!ќајїтікё!°, niraye 
te tí te etesah nibbattaniraye katbemi, sunobi me ti M. гайба pitugbâtakâ- 
паш nibbattananirayarn !* pucebito pl patbamarn ќаб adassetvă ЇЇ aliha mahani- 
rayo sojasa са useadaniraya!® dasseturh evam a. kimkâraņā: pațbemambi tas- 
mii dassiyamāne гёјё phalitena badayena tatthb’ eva mareyya imesu pana nira- 
yesu paccanasatte disvá ditthānugatiko hutv abah viya айбе pi babupèps- 
kammino attb! аһапу etesarn antere pacciasšmiti sañJatupattbambbo rogo’ 
bhavissstitl, ta pana niraye dassento М. pathamarh lddhibalena pațbaviin dvidhä 
katvā paccha dassesi, tesarh vacanattho: nirayapālebi?’? pajjalitāni папаупаһап! 
Rahetvá khandakhandikam chinnă?? nerayikasattā puvappuna sañjivapti ettbā 'ti 
SañJivo, nirayapālä pana nadantā vaggantā Jalitani nānāyudhâni gabetvā jali- 
tiya lobapatbaviyarb пөгауіке?? aparaparsi anubandhitvë paharitvā jalltapatha- 
"(уаш patite jalltah kâlasuttan pátetva jalitapbarasurh gahetvā sayarin unna- 
дарёб mahantena attassarena’” viravante attharnse solasarnse Катоп!&?* ettha 
tacchbanttt! Kālasutto, mahanta }а11199 ayapabbatà samghātenti?® etthā 
"И Sarnghbato, tattha kira satte?! патауојепёуа jalltasyapațbaviyā уёта 


1 во all three MSS. 2 СЕ арапетапекёгаҝё, C? apanevana-. * Ck wbārā-, * 
Cka tarbka. 3 Ске omit ca. * Сё -па, Се -па. ! Bd -kārakarb, 6 Bds rajjuyā. 
* Bå’ cbandā. 10 Bd раќа, '! Ске ayo, Bds nirayussadan. !! Bd рапћо, Ce 
pattho. 12 Bd -tha. !4 Cka omit ti. !5 Сёз kappika-- W Ске -ye, Bd nip- 
patta п!гауаш, !? Сќа apassetva. ! Bd шаһапі-. !° Cs Bd а-. 30 Ске -lohl. 
з. Bda chindichindar. ??В4 adds satte. 25 Ck atțha-. 94 Ck» -to, Bd -to corr. 
to -tā.~ 35 Bd -a. 2* Ске ghštentl, Bd sarbghatenti. 2?! Che sante. 


2. SarnkiccaJataks. (520.) 271 


katito pavesetva піссаје! Кагопії, atha puratthimato?' ayapabbato зашо {ауа 
авап! viya viravanto? āgantvā te satta saphakaraniyarh* tilah’ ріфвапіо туа 
gantvä рассЬішадівёуа titthetl, pacchimadisato samutthite рі tath’ eva gantvā 
puratth!madisays titthati, dve рапа eksto samāgantvā ucchuyante® ucchukhan- 
dani' vlya pilentl, evarh ta. bahūnl vassseatasabassān! dukkharb anubhonti, dve 
са Roruvā ti Јајагогато Dbūmaroruvo са* 'ti dve, ta. Jālaroravo kappena 
aanțbitäbi rattalobitajšlšshi?° рорпо Dhümaroruvo khšáradbümena!2, nesu’! Jäla- 
roruve Ú paccantšnarh!) navab! vanamukhebi jšlš pavisitvā sarirar dahanti!*, 
Dhümaroruve 1? патаһ!!% vanamukhebi kháradhümo pavisitvë рЇ{һагй viya вагї- 
тый sedeti, ubbayathápi!* рассаш& sattë mabaviravarh viravantiti dve рі!" 
Вогце& tì vuttā, jālānah vā! рапа ssttánarp vaš!)  tesarh dukkbassa vš!° vīcl- 
antararb n' atthi etthā ‘ti Avici, mahento Avicitl Mabišavicl, са,!# Ы pu- 
тайышат! bbittihi Ја utthebltvë pacchimadisu pațihañĀati tā са bbittlyo 
vinivijjbitvā”? parato”! yojanasatarh ganhati, һе!{һа utthitë&pi3? uparipatihaüñati 
npari uțțbită hetthā patihaññati, eva tšv'ettha jålānarh vicl nāma n’ atthl, 
(авва pana anto yojanasstarn thanarb khiravallipitibasaa pūritanāl] viya sattahi 
nirantararh рйгїгатй, cstühj iriyāpatbehi paccantānah patpánarh n’ ай, na ca 
aññamaññarn3? Ъадһеп{1%* sakasakațthāne?* yeva paccanti!*, evam ettha aattà- 
narh vici náma п’ atthl, ува pana jivhagge cba madbnbindüul sattamassa tam- 
balobabinduno anuġabanabalavatāya 17 abbohārikāol hontt tatbā ta. аппфаһапа- 
balavatāya”? sesš cha akusajaripákupekbá abboharikë2° bonel, dukkham eva 
nirantararh райбёуви, evam ettha dukkhassa vici пёша n’ atthi, sv-āyah saha 
vibhattīhi?® vikkhambhato?? ațthārasādhikayojanasato’! ävațțtato catupaņnā- 
sādhikayojanasato?® saha ussadell dasayojanasabasso ti?? evam assa mabantatà 
veditahbā, niccalasstte tapatfti Tapano®‘, ativiya (&рейй Patāpano’’, ta. 
Tapanasmirh 66 tiva satte? tālakkhandhappamāņe*®? Jalitaayasūle risidapenti, 
tato ће ё pathavi јаја! sūlam*?’ јајай, етап so nirayot2 niccale*1 satte tapati, 
itarasmirh pana eabhasstte*? jslanteh! āvudhebi paharitvā jalltarb ayapabbatarh 
âropenti, təsa pahhatamatthaka tbitakšle kammapaccayo véto paharati, te ta. 
sapjhåturh asakkontā uddhapādā adbosirā papatanti, atha hațțbā pațbaviyâ (‘° 
jalltani nyasūlāni nțthabanti, te (апі nitthaken eva äsădetvä tesu vinividdha- 


1 Ck „Јо, Bd -la. 3 Bd adds jalito ? Bd vivaranto. * Cks -ya, Bd santhš-? 
š Ck по, Cs tile. * Ою -to, Bd ucchayante. ! Bd uccha-. * СЮ огоі сё. # Ске 
-rohlrajšjahi. ?° Ck -дһйрепа, Се -дарепа, !! Bd tesu. !# Cks-o. 12 Cha 
-пабса. 1% Cks dayh-. 1% Bd paccantānarh navahi !* СХ (арі, Ва -ttāpi. 
17 Сі add са, 35 Che ра. !? Bd tatra. 20 Bd vavajbl-, Вг pavljjhi-. ?! Ваг 
рогаќо. 39 Bd omita рі. 32 Cks -пбеМ. 34 Bd byapadhenti. 23 Bd опу опе 
вака. 26 Ска -enti. 37 Bd -da-. 26 Ске „Калі. 3° pd -bbittihl. 20 Bde 
-bhanato, 5! Bd -katiyo-. В*% Bs kanavayo-, Bd -karnevayo-. *P Bdz -hassani. 
3t all three МЭЗ. ї&-. 25 Bd mahata-. 36 Bd ta-. 21 Bd tāpente satte, B 
only tāpente for tāva satte. 39 Ck -по. 89 Bd sulāui. © Ске -в, 6 Gr 0, 
+e Bdz nibbattasatta. 48 Bd ayapathavito раррасат. 


10 


15 


%5 


30 


10 


15 


25 


272 ХІХ. Satthlpšta. 


зага jalantā paccanti, evam ева! ativiya tipetiti, B. pana ete ulraye dassento 
patbamarn Sañjivań dassetvā ta. paccante nerayikasatte disvà mahājanassa 
mahābhaye uppanne ters autaradhāpetvā puna pajbavih dvidbā katvë Kāla- 
suttarn dassesi, ta. pl paccamāne satte disvë mabšjanassa mahābhaye орраппе 
tam pi autaradhâpesiti, evan patipštiya dassesi, tato rājānam âmantetvà mahi- 
rāja taya imesu attbasu mabånirayesu paccamāne satte disvā арратайдап kâāturù 
та(айи vatră puna tesah yeva шаһапїгауйпатп kiccah katheturb iccete ti 
5000 #, ta. akkhatš ti mayš? tuyharb Кафа poršnakebi ca katbltš yeva, 
ākiņnnā ti paripunDš?), рассека sojasussadà (1 оќеват nirayānaw ekekassa 
catūeu dvārəsu ehekaqmirn cattšro cattšro katvåâ solesa solasa ussadanirayi ti 
ваЬЬе pi satah‘ а}!һатїва!1* usaadanirayā а!!һа ca mahânirayā ti chattihsa- 
nirayasatarh, kadariyštapana t ti sabbe р’ ete kadariyanam tapani”, balava- 
dukkhatāya ghorš, kappanibbattšnarn  sccinar atthitaya accimanto, bba- 
yassa шаһатіа(ёуа? mahabbhbayš, ditthamastta vā?” sutamattë уі!! lomāni 
hathsentiti’® 1ошаһапвапагйра val3, bhirnsanatšya bhoamáa!$, bhayajanana- 
tāya patibhayá, sukhābhāvena доки ё, catukkanpi ti sabbe pi caturassš!5 
mañjúüsasadisš, vlbhattšá ti catudvšëravasena vibhattáa, bhāgaso mitšá ú dvüra- 
vithinarn уавеца kottháse'® thapotva mitá, ayasā pațikujjitā!? ti варбе!* 
рі navayojanikena ayakapšlens paticchannāă hutvā'’, titthantiti sabbe pi 
ettakah (hënarh anupharitvä tittbanti, әве ti32 tesu nirayesu samparivattitvë 
punappuna patamëáne sandhayáha, ativattāro ti pharusavācăbi atikkamitrā 
vatiāro”', mahënirayesu kire yebbuyyens dbemmikasamapabrăähmapesu kati- 
ратёдЬа?*! paccanti, tasmā evam äba, te bhünabuno ti té laínam ativattâro 
attano vaddblyà һаїап& Ыһйраһипо kottbāäsakatattā?’? macchā viyat paccanti, 
asamkheyye?5 tt ganeturh asakkuneyye, kibbisakärino t! dšrunakamma- 
kárlno, nibkhamanesino Ч пігауё nlkkhamanarh esautåpi gavesantêpi nikkha- 
inauadvëram nádbigarchenuU, puratthlmenā '(1 уада teb dvarerm apëárutarh 
hoti atha tadabhimukhaë dhāvanti?*, tesar ta. cheviādinî Jháyanti, dvarasamipam3! 
pattāvam рі 2° stesa?’ tern pithlyaci?0, pacchimarñ apārutan viya khāyati, 
ева nayo sabbattha, па sšdhurüpe ti vottappakāra варраш viya sādbu- 
тйре ізвуо náside®? na pharusavacauehi°' kāyakammeua vā ghattento upa- 
gaccheyye, klrnkāraņpā: saññatanarh tapsssinarn šsšditalt&33 ațjhesu mabānirsyesu 
mahšdukkhassa anubbavitabbattā**, idåni уе rājāno tatbārūpe šsàdetvš tarb dukkha 
рана te даввегип› atikāyo tl àdim š. ta. atlikāyo ti balasampannamahākāyo, 


1 Сиз ап. ? Bd adds ca. ? Bd рагікіопё. * Cke yarntari. > Bd adds ca. * 
Bd as. ? Вё aá. ° Ва kammani-, * Cks mabantāya. !@ Cks omit vā. U 
Сю рё. !% Ва harnsanti. '? Bd ca. 14 Bd bhaamā. !* Rd -гар. !* Bd adds 
gahetvă. 17 Ck omit ра-. !® Ске -5, 19 Bd putà, Ве рші. ?° Bd: nddham- 
рада avarsirā ti evarh for ete ti. 3! Ско catt-. 22 Ске „гвуя, Hds -parâdhāva. 
33 Bas skatā. 24 Bd adds са. 35 Січ Hd „ууд, 35 Сіә уа-, 37 Ві -po, 2% 
Bd -nañca. 2" Bds te-. 39 Che _yauti. 31 Cha naside, Bd paside. +? Bë -uena. 
23 all three MSS. авё-, 34 Cke -vitattā. 


2. Seikiccijätaks. (530.) 973 


mabissāso ti mahädbanuggsho, sahasrabšhü "1 рейсе dhanuggabasetebi 
bähusahaasona’ ātopetabbam dhanu āropauasamatthabāhbhu, Kekādbipo’ ti 
Kekaratihadhipatl3, vibhavarh gato tl vināsappatto, vatthüni Sarabhañgajštake 
vitthāritänl, upahacca manan? t! айапо cittarh padūeetvā, Mataügasmin ti 
пфИе, vattburp Måtañgajåtake уарпаш, Kanhadipāyanāsajjāä 'u 
апай ёвајја, Yamasādhanan ti nirayah‘, vatthurh GhațajStake $ 
vitthăritah, lalnë t! Kapilatšpasena. pāvekkbít! pavittho, Cocco (1 Сейуа- 
vājā, hinatto tli parihinat'abhšvo antarahitalddhi, pattapariyāyaon ti pari- 
yšyar, marapakālero расча, vatthum Cetiyajitake kathitarb, tasmă t| увешё 
eittavasiko Һаста lsisu aparajjbitvë atthasu шаһапігауево расса! taamā, chan- 
dāgamanan ti chandšdicatubbidham pi agatigamansi, psdutthenëš ’t! kud- 
dhona, бапта ao nirayarn adho Ч so teua adhogamaniyena kammena adho 
nirayam eva Racchati. Pšllyarn pana nirayassudan ti likhitari, tarn tassa ussa- 
danirayah gacchatiu а, vaddhe? ti rayovaddhe са gupavaddhe са, апарасса 
ti bbavantare рі арасса va dayšdarh vå na labhantÎti a., tšlavatthü" иаа 
dhamme pi chinuamūlatālo viya mahšvinšsarb patvå niraye nibbattanti, hantiti 
māreti, cirarattâyā 'ti ciran, етаго M. jelvihețthakanatn paccananiraye даввестё 
орагі adhanimiksršjünam раесапап!гауе dasaento уо сё “і šdim а., ta. rațțha- 
зідаһатвапо ti chandadivasena gantvā га|[һаабва viddbarnsano, acolsamgha- 
pareto ti acchsamübaparikkhitro, tejobhakkhaasā 'ti aygim eva kuâdan- 
tassa, gattšnit tigärate'“ sarire sabbañgspaccañgāni Іошећі ca nakhebi сё '1 
etehi вадам sabbāni akajálán' eva honti, tuttaddito?? ti ёпайјакатараф 11 
kårlyamāno tuttebi!3 viddho nāgo yatbā nadati, 1дёп! pltughàtikādīnai рассапа- 
Dltayo dsssetuin yol’ lobha ti ааіш &., ta. 1оЬһй ti yasadhanalobhena, dosa 
t! dutthaciitatäya, nittacan ti lohakumbhiyar; bahüni vaasasa! 
nibaritvá tigāvutam aspa sarira uittacarh katvë Jalltäya 1оһара(һау}уа!* pátetva 
tlkhinebl!5 ayaaülehi koçtetvå'! cunnavicunnar karont, апдћаф karitvá ti 
шаһагёја terb pitughátakarp niraya lohapejhaviyahn uttšnarp pštetvš jalitehi 
&yasülehi akkhíni bhinditva!? andhah karitrā mukho unharo штайайагаай 
pakkhipitvā palšlapitharn тіуа!* saivajtetvā kappena santhite khiralohaudake 
nimujjapsanti, tatta pakkatthitam'' ayogulañ сё 'u puua pskkalihita- 
güchakelalañ 20 c' eva Jalitaayogulañ са khádapenti, so pana tan àhariyamanarh 
дїву mukha pidheti®™, ath’ assa dighe clratapite? Јајашёпе phšle3% ädāya 
mukhah vikkhambhetvš 2? vivaritvā rajjabaddharn ayaballsarh khipitvë jivbarn 


1 Ва -ohi. > Ва ketak-. * Ck npšhacca manau, Bd upabacca mánan. * Bd 
Dirayapšlakaršjšuarn. +} Cha ghata-. * all three MSS. gantvā. ' Bd vudhe. 
Bd tšlavatthun. # Ck gāvasarire, Се gāvute-, Bd tlgšvutte. '0 Bd 
tupdattito, Ве tundaddito? 1 Bd апайсапакё-. !? Bd tunq-. !3 Ско ye, !* 
Bd -yarm. !% Ва ddkkhehl. !$ Bd -entā. !7 Ckz „дапа, 19 Bd add nam. 19 
ВА pakkudhitam, Ck» chakarnhkathim. 7° Сї pakkattblgüthakalalà, Bd pakkadhitarh 
gudhakaslalañ, Ве pekkut(hltarigüthakslalarh. 31 Ck pideti, #2 СЮ cirarsttšpite. 
3E Bd hale, Ске thâle. !* Rd „нта. 
майл. V. 18 


10 


15 


974 XIX. Satthinipštas 


niharitvš tasmim vatte! vivstte mukhe ќат ayogulan sarnsavayanti pakkhipantií, 
rakkhasš Я nirayapšla, sāmå сё 'ї} mahšršja tassa pitughštakassa tarh’? ba- 
Изепа nikkaddhitvā ayassrhkühi! pathavjyarb vitatarh * Jivharn sáamasopë sabala- 
тарпа sunakhā cs іоћасорда t giljhš са Yškasarhghš са айбе са nānappakirā 
sakupa samâgantvā avudbehí chindantë víya vibhajja kškapadakirena kotthšse 
katvā тіррЬердатёпаф vissandamanarh * salohitam ! vighāsah’ khadantlt vígha- 
santâ’? bhakkhayantie! attho, tah daddhakolsn !! ú tah pitughâtakarn jhá- 
yamanarm (21а !?° viya Jalltasarirarmn, parlbhínnagattan ti ta. ta. bhinna- 
дайма 12, пїрро{һауап1а ti jaliteb! ayamuggarehi paharantā, rati b! nesan 
ti tesan nirayspälānar së rati ка hoti, dukhino panītare ti itare pana 
norayikesattă dukkhitā honti, pettighbātino ti pitughidkâ’, iti. imah pitu- 
ghatikánarh perceuanirayar дівта rājà bhītatasito abosi, atha nam М. samassã- 
веста måtughātikānai paccananirayarh dassesi, Yamakkhayan (1 Yamanive- 
sana, nirayan ti a, attakammaphalūpago Ч attano kammaphalena upa- 
gato, ашаповаа ti оїгауарё13, hantšram janayantiyā ti miátughatikam, 
vālebiti!® ayamakacivšlshl!* vețhetv5 ayayaptena репой, taa Ч tab māta- 
għâtikan рёуепеїй 1' tassa pillyamānassa rubirarh galitvă ayakapallan pūretl, 
atha narh yautato niharant), tāvad ev assa sariramn pākatikai hoti, аб patha- 
viyarn attànaro nipajjâpetvā vilinańh tambaloharh viya pakkajthitarh'® lohitarh 
pšyenti!?, ogayha titthattti babüni vassasabassāni ayayantena'0 piletvā je- 
gucchaduggandhapatikküle mahante gūthakaddamıā khipanti, so tar rabadarh 
оваућа ogayhitvá tittbati, atikayá ti екадопікапётарр павагіга?'!, a yomukha 
ti ayssüclmukha, chavih chetrānā?’ tl сһатий айий ketv yñvatthim pi 
bhetvā’? atțhimlñjań kbädantl, paglddhâ^t (1 gadhita2 mucchitš, пе kovala 
ca khšdant'eva adhomaggšdihl2?% pana pavisitvā mukhâêdībi nikkhamanti, уйра- 
passšdíihi pavlsitvë dakkhinapassšdihi nikkhamanti, sakalasarirarn®” chiddä- 
Yacchiddarb karonti, so ta. atidukkhapareto viravanto рассаЧ socati, so mätu- 
ghatako (атп Sataporisarn п|гауатї patto sasisako nimuggo va hoti, tañ ca kona- 
ре 2* samantā yojanasatarnh pūti?’ Ьо(та váyati, mattigho t! mātighātiko, 
Khbursdhšreamanukkammi 'ti Khuradhàranirayath arikkamitvš (а. 20 niraya- 
pālà mahantamabanta khure прагіёЬаге katvá!! santharanti22, cato yà Ы gab- 


1 Ва omits vatte. è Bd jivharn. 5 СЕ ayah samhkubi, C ayarb sarbüahi. * СЕ 
vi, Bd vivata. 5 СЕ -tandi, Се -tunda, Bd -kunda. ° Bd omita vise. Си 
omit ва, 5 Сёз vigħharhearn. ° Вӣ• -tă. 10 Bde viyasatte. :! Bd -tālan. '1 
во С; Bd hilan, !> Bde paribhí-. !* Ck adde viya. !% во Ваз; Chs vāja- 
bbith 16 so Ck Rd; C? аташа-? 1! Bd paya-. !5 СА pakkanțhantarn, B 
pakkudbitah. !* Bd -anti. 3° Bas -ehi. 3! Cks -pika nšá-. % Bde bhe- 
tvāna. 95 Ck уата vațțhimbi hetvā, Сә уёуа Ы оаћеста, Bd yiva ațhi vibhetva, 
Ве убта atthi pl bhəetvā. 7* Bd ватрі. 25 Се даа, Ck gamitā. 9% pa 
-mukhadihi. °" Cka -га. 28 Ck kūparr, Ве vaccaküpam in the place of tañca - =. 
29 Ва putlksm. 2% Rds add kira. >! СЕ urasārekatvā, Bd upadháritva, Bs орагі- 
dharetva? 02 Ва aantha-, Ck tattharatti. 


2. Samkiccajštaka. (530). 275 


bhapaátapani! khārabbəsajjānl’ pivítçë gabbbapātit5® gabbhapaátiniyo itthiyo 
Jaliteb! avudhehi pothentš anubandhauti të tikhiņakhuradbärā sukhandikhandíka 
hutva ропарропа пП{{һауа tar durabhisambhavam Khuradhāranirayaib айа. 
шалйуо atikkamitvā nirayapālehi anubaddhā* duggen duggamam  visamarh 
Vetaraņih patanti, ta, kammakaranari Nimijātake ävibhaviasati, етаф gabbha- 
pštininar nirayarh daasetvā yattba paradi š са atlraripiyo ca paccanti tari 
Kotisimbalinirayarh 6 dassonto ayomayā ti šdir 3. ќа. dubhato-m-abbi- 
lambhanttiti” Vetaraniya ubhosu tresu tšsar simbalinarñ sšákhšë olambanti, 
` te accimanto ti te pajjalitasarīrā sattā ассітепіо butvā titthanti, уојапап 
п tigavutarn tesarh! sarirato ațțhitajālāya рапа saddbib (е? yojanaubbedhš 
honil, eto saJantitl te paradārikā sattā nānāvidhehl Evudhehl kotthlyamana!° 
eto Simhaeliniraye abhirühanti, ќе patantiti te bahüni vassasahasqáni rukkha- 
vitapesu laggā Jhšyitvë puna nirayapāleh! šávudhehi'! vihatš vivattë butvā pari- 
vattitvá адһовівака patanti, putbü ti һаһй, vinividbaōgā ti tessrh tato 
pstanakaále het(hë ayapatbavito saülšni utthahitvë tesan matthakarh paticchantl, 
(201 їөзаш adhomaggena!t nikkhamanti, (ө evarh sülesu viddhā viravantš!5 
ваўапЧ, dig han И snpine рі niddarh alabbantă digharattah jaggantîti, tato ?' 
табуа vivasane ti rattinarn ассауепа, cirabšlatikkamenë "Í a., ратајјапеїсі 
Bațthiyojanikan jalltarn lobakumbhirñ kappena вап{Ыаш jalitatambaloharasa- 
pupnnam lohakumbhirn nirayapšlehi khittš 1 pavisanti!*, dussilš ti paradārikā 
орага! sšmiksvattasasnuvattëádIni!? apürentinarn!” paccanatthinarh pakā- 
santo уй cš?° "l айіш á. ta. atlmañ üatit Bhisajâtaho katbitan’! sámiksa- 
табаш akaronti atikkamitvā maññati, Jettban ti sāmikassa jotthabbātararh, 
nanandaran?' (1 вьаш!Ккавва bhaginiris, etesam р! аббабагазва hatthapada- 
pitthiparikammanahšpanabhojanáadibhedarh vattarn apūrentì teen hlirottappari 
зпораі{{ћарепеї te atilmaüñati паша, såp! niraye nibbattati, таю кела 'u 
tassā simikavattáadipam aparipūrikāya sāmikādayo: skkositvë paribhšsitvá 
nraye nibbattāya Iohapathaviyarn nlpajjāpetvā ayasamkonā mukha vi- 
varitvå balisena Jivhaggan nibbabauti rejjubandhaneona sarnbandhanarh °? 
ākaddhanti, kiminan ti kimibharitah, 1. v. b. шаһага}а so nerayikasatto 
evan nikkaddhitarh attano ууйшера vyämamattah’t jJivbsrh атифһеһ) kot- 
thitakojthitațthāno"’  sañJatehl mabādoņippamāņehl®* Кїї?! bharitarh 
passati viüñapeturn па sakkotîti nirayapšle yâclitukāmo [рі Шбс vatturh 
na sakhkotl. Tapane'® {1 етеш să ta, bahūui vassasahasaân! paceitvë puna 
Тарапатаћёпігауе 22 рассай, 10801 sükarikadinar paccananiraye dassento 


1 Bds -nāhbi, 2 Bd kha-, ? Ck -ра-, Bd adds kā. * СЕ -bandhâ, Bd -Бапіһапы. 
5 Ва dukkhaman. * C> kota-, Bd kaņhakaıhsippall-. 7 Ck -tombhlla-, Сз toma- 
bila-. *# Сіз add вагїгай. # Bd omits te 0 Bds koțl-. !t Bd -dhe gahetva. 
13 Cka -в. 12 Bd clrarattă. '* Bda attho. '* Cès khittan. !* Bd paccanti. 
11 Bd tatopa-. !8 Ck -vantassuravantš-, Сг -vettassuravattā-, !" Сх attei. ° 
Che va. 31 Bd vaita. °? pds -dan. 23 ао Che; Bd sab-. ?* Ck -тецё, Cs 
-mattå. 3° Bd koți-, ?Ó Ва -піка-. 3? Bd omita ki-. 35 Bd tā-. 
18* 


10 


15 


10 


15 


276 XIX. Satihinlpáts, 


orabbhikš tí ädip š., ta evanne vapnakārikā’ ti регоббакагакё, khara- 
nadin ti ote orabbhikádayo etebl sattlšdihí haññamšnëá Vetaranir patanúti s., 
sesāni orabbbikadinarb paccanațthānān! Nimijātake savibhavissanti, kütakiaritl 
kütavinicchayssssa с? ета tulšëkütëdinañ са kērake’ sandhõy' eteh vuttam, ta. 
kütavinicchayakütatlakarakaküla agghšpsnikšánarh paccananirayáni NimiJjátake āvi- 
bbavissanri, vantan ti vamitaksrn, durattānan ti duggatattabhavanarh, [. v. h. : 
таһатё}а, te durattabhāvà sattë ayakütehi matthake bbijjamâne vamanti*, tato 
təh vantan jalltakapālehi tesu ekaccānern mukhe pakkhipanti, iti te parosarh 
vanta bboñjanti лаша, ЫһегапфаКа 11 sigālā, vippbandamānan ti, ayo- 
—mnukbam * nipajjäpitarn nikkaqdhitajivharh ito c’ ito ca рһапдашапай'!, mi- 
gen '1 okacsramigena’, pekkhinā 'ti tatbârūpen’ eva, gant?’ te ti gan- 
ёго 10 te, n[rayussadan ti ussadanirayatn, Ра!!уап pana пігауаф adho 
1l likhitarn, ayah pana nirayo Nimijätake Svibhariesati. 


Iti M. ettake niraye dassetvā idáni Іокатіуатапат " katvā 
raüño devaloke dassento а.: 
в. Santo ca'' uddharn gacchanti sucionen' idba Катшапа ", 
висїппаввв рһаіаф passa: saindadevā '* sabrahmaká, 133. 
вв. Таш tam brümi mabārāja: dhammarh ratthapati cara, 
tathā tathā rāja carāhi dhammam 
yathā (аш восіопат '° опёошарреуув рессӣ'* 'єі. 134. 


Та. santo ti kàyâdihi upasantá, uddban tl деуціоќкаго, saindà!' ti ta. 
ta. indebi saddhim, М.'® М "вва cātummahârājike deve са dassonto шаһагё]а 
cšátumnmaharšájšádike hi deve pasee caltaro mahārāje passa tāvatihse разва 
Sakkarn раза 'ti evarh sabbe pi indake'? deva dassetvā idam pl аисірравва 
phalan ti dassesi, tath tarn brümiti tasmā tah bhanimi, dbamman ti ito 
pattbāya pänņātipātādīiul райса verān! раћёуа dānádīiui риййап1 karobi 2°, yathā 
саф sucinnam nànutappeyyà '(1 yathā tam dauadipuñüakammam sucinnsrh 
pitugbātakammapaccayar 9! vippatisšrarb patlcchideturb samatthataya tatn nánu- 
tappeyya tathā (ал sucinnarn cara, balur puüñarb karohiti a. 


1 Ck avanne vana-, C# avanevana-. >? Cks omit kā-. 2 Cha -re. * Ck vama- 
tanti, Сг vamanauti, Bd vapanti, ® so Cher for -khå? Bdzeadhomukharp, * 
Ck Bd -hā, 7 Bd vippa-. Š Bd otacāra-, СХ okatara-. ° Bd қа. © ВФ 
gantvā, 11 Ваг devaloka-. !2 va, 1% Rds —una. 14 Bd gabindā-. 15 Cus 
omit su, 16 Ch рассһа, Rd рессһа, read: уаћа па tah anutappeyya pecca? 
17 Ваг sabindā. 19 Ck: „е. 19 Rds sahindake sabrahmake ca, 39 Bd karothā ti. 
31 Сїз -kammarnpa-. 


2. Sarhkiccajštaka. (530.) 277 


So M-ssa dhammakatham sutvá tato pațthāya assšsam 
patilabhi. В, рі kiñci kálarn ta. vasitvā attano vasanattb&narm 
yeva gato. 


S.i.d. ñ, „пе bhikkhave 1дёп' eva pubbe p’ esa ювуё assñsito 
yevā“ "ti vatvå j.s.: „Tadā гаја Ajatasattu ahosi, isigano Buddhe- 
рагізё, Samkiccapandito abam evā" `1. Samkiccajütakam. 
Satthinipštavannanë nitthitëá. 


XX. SATTATINIPATA. 


1. Kusajātaka. 


ldante rattban ti, dam S. J. v. ukkanthitabikkhurmn 
а.к. So kira Sāvatthivāsi-kulaputto sĀsane uram datvā pabbajito, 
ekadivasam Sāvatthiyah piņdāya caranto ekam alamkataitthih su- 
bhanimittaggāhavasena oloketvā kilesabhibhuto anabhirato vihāsi 
dighakesanakbo kisasariro Eilitthacivaro uppanduppandukajšto dhama- 
nisanthatagatto, yathā hi devaloke cavanadhammanam devaputtanam 
pañca pubbanimittāni райпаёуалы mālā milayanti vatthāni kilissanti 
вапге dubbanniyam okkamati ubhohi kacchehi вей& muccanti! дето 
детёввпе nàbhiramati evam evam sãsanā cavanadhammënarm ukkanthi- 
tabhikkhūünan pañca pubbanimittāni? paññáyanti saddhāpupphāni 
milayanti ellavatthëni kilissavti mamkubhāvatāya с' eva ayasavasepa 
ca dubbanniyam okkamati kilesasedā muccanti' araññarukkhamqla- 
suññāgāresu nâbhiramanti, tassa рі tāni? paūūāyibsu. Atha nam 
Satthu santikam netvā „ayam bhante ukkanthito%“ ti dassesum. S. 
sacca „kirā" 'ti pucchitvā „sacca Ыһаше'" ti vutte „mā bhikkhu 
kilesavasiko ahosi, mātugāmo nām’ esa” pāpo, tasmim patibaddha- 
cittatarn vinehi’, sāsane abhirama, шёїирёше patibaddhacittataya hi 


' tejavanto pi porăņakspanditā nittejā hutvā anayavyasanam papunimsü** 


"ti vatvā а, Āā.: 


А. Mallaratthe Kusávatirájadhápiyarn' Okkāko nāma rājā 
dhammena г. káresi. Tassa soļasannario itthisabassánarh jet- 


\ Bd muñe-. * Rd omite pubba, 3 Bd tassapitănimitiăni, “ Che -esà. * Bd 
vinodebi. © Bd -уё. 


1. Kusajitaka. (631.) 279 


thikā Silavati пёта аррашаһевї ahosi, sā п’ eva puttam па 
dhitaram labhati, nāgarā с' eva ratthavësino ca rājanive- 
sanadváre' sannipatitvë ,rattharn”' nassissati vinassissatiti*“ 
upakkosirsu. Rájá sihapañjaram ugghëátetvë „mayi г. kārente 
adhammakáro náma n ` atthi, kasmá upakkosathā“‘ 'ti pucchi, 
„Sacca deva adhammakáro? п' atthi*, ғафвёоигаккћаКко pana ° 
vo putto па vijjati, айпо r. gahetvá rattharm násessati, tasma 
dhammena r. kāretuih вашайћаф puttam patthethā“‘ 'ti. ,,Put- 
tarh patthento kim karomiti“, ,Pathamam táva ekam’ satt&- 
ham caullanátakam dhammanātakah katvā vissajjetha, васе 
tarn° puttam labhissati’ eādha, посе atha majjhimanāțakam 
vissajjetha, tato jetthanāțtakaih vissajjetha, ауавваш ettikāsu 
itthisu ека ройбауа(ї puttarh labhissatiti“, Rājā tesar va- 
canena’” tathā katva sattame sattame divase yathásukham 
abhiramitvā āgatāgatā’ pucchi: ,,„Кассі' vo putto laddho“ ti. 
Sabb „па labhāma деуй“ 'ti ābarnsu. Баја „па ше patto 
uppajjissatiti“ апайашало ahosi. Nāgară puna tath’ eva 
upakkosihsu. RAjá „kim upakkosatha, mayá ишҺаКаш va- 
сапепа nátakáni vissatthšni, екёрі putta оа labhi, idáni kith 
karomiti“ á. „Deva etā dussīlā bhavissanti nippuññëá, n’ atthi 
etāsam '' puttalābhāya puúñarn'*, tumhe etăsu puttar alabhan- 
tisu má appossukkatam ăpajjatha, aggamahesi vo' Shlavati 
devi вПаватрапойё, tam vissajjetha, tassă putto uppajjissatiti““, 
So „sādhū“ Чі sampațiechitvā „ito kira sattame divase гаја 
5Пауайш детїй dhammanátakarh katvā vissajjessati, purisă 
sannipatantü*“ 'ti bheriñ carăpetvă sattame divase devi alarh- 
kārāpetvā răjanivesanā otāretvā уіввајјеві. Tassā stlatejena 
Ѕаккађћатапаф ипһаййагаш даввеві, Sakko „kin nu kho“ ti 
āvajjanto'* deviyá puttapatthanabhăvam '° ñatvá „etissā шауй 


1 Cks omit таја. * Bdt add te. ° Bd adds nāma. * Bd adds арі са * Ck 
etah. ° Ck {а засе паш, Ог засе ths, Bd sace tā. ? all three MSS, -oti. ° 
Bd vacanarh ашу. *# Bd -tānai. '° Bd blūcl. '' Bd -su. 19 Сә. (8 
Bd te. 14 Cks sento, 15 Сы puttam-. 


280 XX. Sasttatinipi#ta. 


pattam dáturb vattatiti', аб) nu kho devaloke etissánuccha- 
viko’ putto“ ti npadhëárento B-arù addasa, so kira tadā Tā- 
vatihsabhavane yom khepetvá uparidevaloke pibbattitukámo' 
abosi. Sakko tassa vimānadvārah gautvë tarn pakkosápetvá 
»›шёгіва‘ tayā manussalokarñ gantvë Okkākarañño* aggama- 
hesiy& kucchismim ° pațisandhih ganhiturn vattatiti“ sam- 
paticchápetvá aparam рі devapnttam „(уаш рі ї(авв& yeva’ 
putto bhavissasiti*'“ vatvā „mā kho pan’ ава&* Косі silam 
bhinditi'°“% mahallakabrāhmaņavesena rañño nivesanadvárarh 
адатойві. Mahájano pi nahaátálarmkato ,aharh деті рапһ1&5й- 
miti“ ršjadváre sannipati Sakkañ ca pana dievā „tva kasmā 
āgato eîti““ parihasam akësi. Sakko pi „Кїй mam '' garahatha, 
васе рї me sariram jiņnpar rāgo pana ра jirati, sace Silavatirh 
labhissámi ádáya narm gamissámiti ägato 'mhiti“ vatvā attano ' 
ënubhávena sabbesam purato atthási, añño tassa tejena purato 
һһауйшй násakkhi, so tam sabbášlarhkárapatimanditarh'"” nive- 
вапё nikkhamantirm yeva hatthe gahetvá pakkámi. Atha nar 
(а. ta. thitë garahimsu: „равва{һа bho, mahallakabráhmano 
етв nttamarŭpadbararh devim ádáya gacchati, attano yuttarh па 
jānātiti“. Devi pi ,,mahallako mam gabetvā gacchatiti“ attt- 
yati! haršyati jigucchati'*. Riajápi уйќарёпе țhatvā „Ко nu 
kho devi gahetvá gacchatiti'' olokento tarh disvā anattainano 
аһові. Sakko tam adáya парагайуйгепа nikkhamitvë dvāra- 
samipe екаф gharar тёреві ° vivattadvāram paññattakatthat- 
tharikarh '*. Atha namh să „idah vo'! nivesanan“ ti pucchi. 
So „āma bhadde, pobbe pana abam eko, idāni 'mhë dve janá, 
aham bhikkbāya caritvā tanduládíni āhbariesãāmi, tva imissā 
katthattharikáya пїра}]&!''* ‘ti vatvā™ пап mudună batthena 


! Bd зацай. ? Bd eties anu-. ° Cka nibbattidhammo. * Ске -sā 5 Bd uk-. 
€ Bd -Imbi. 7 Ва etimså eva 5 all three MSS. -titl ° Сіз -а. 10 Bd ~da- 
tuhi, '! Ва» adds tambe. '? Сёз -kārahe. 1? B4 na ațtiyati па. '* Ва 
omite jie. 13 Ck mēnesi, Сә manesi. !* Bå adds kstva. !! Ва бе. 1 Bd 
-ābl. 1! Pd adds во. 


1. Kusajitaka. (531.) 281 


рагётаві!, dibbasamphassarn рћһагареѓуй? ta. nipajjāpesi, sā 
dibbasamphassapharanena saññam vissajjesi. Atha nam айапо 
ānubhāvena Tāvatihsabhavanarh netvá alarhkatavimáne dibba- 
sayane nipajjāpesi. Sā sattame divase pabujjbitvā tah sam- 
pattih dievā „па so brăhmaņo* manusso, Sakko bhavissatiti“ 
aññási. Sakko рі (автїйз samaye páricchattakamüle dibbaná- 
takaparivuto nisinno hoti. Sā sayan uttháya tassa santika 
gantvā vanditvā ekamantam atthaási. Atha паш Sakko „varar 
te devi demi‘, ganhábíti“ а. ,,Тепа hi me deva ринат de- 
Мн“. „Devi, titthatu eko, аһат te dve putte dassāmi, tesn 
pana eko paññavā bhavissati na‘ rūpavā еко тйра\й na 
paññavā, tesu” ра{һататп Ка(агатп icchasiti“ ,,Paññavantarm 
deyā“‘ ‘ti. So ,s&dhü%“ "і vatvā tassā kusatiņnarn dibbañ ca 
Yattharn dibbacandanarh рёгїссһаНаКараррһаш Kokanadañ са 
пёша viņai datvā tarh ādāya raño вауапарһагаш pavisitvā 
raññā saddhih ekasayanqe nipajjāpetvă añgutthaken'" assā 
пёбћіф parámasi, tasmińh Кһаре B. tassā kucchimhi patisan- 
dhih ganhi. Sakko рі sakatthānam eva gato. Рапдіє& devi 
gabbhassa patitthitabhšvarn jāni. Atha nam pabuddho гаја 
disvá „kena nitásiti“ pucchi. ,,Sakkena devā“ “і. „Ahar 
paccakkhato ekarn mahallakabráhmanam tar ёдёуа gacchan- 
tarh addasarh, kasmā marh уайсевібі'“, ,Saddaha deva, Sakko 
mam gahetvă devalokah nesîti“, „Ма saddahámi deviti'%“, 
Ath’ assa вй Sakka-dattiyam Кпвайїпаш dassetvā „saddahā“ 
'ti а. Баја „kasatiņah náma yato kutoci labbhatiti“ na sad- 
dahi. Асһ” assa sā dibbavattháni дазвевї''. Rājā tāni disv& 
saddahitvā ,„bhadde, Sakko (ата tah unetu, pntto рапа te 
laddho“ ti pucchi. ,„Laddho mahāraja, gabbho ше patitthito!“ 
ti. So tuttho (азаа gabbhaparihārah adāsi. Sā dasamëá- 
saccayena puttarh vijāyi, tassa aññam пашат akatvā kusa- 


1 Ва -santo. ? Ck phā-. ? tapdulâdini - - - brābmaņo wanting in Cs. * Bd 
dadami, $ Bd adds putto. * Bd vl, 1 Ba tesa, * Bd pšdañg-. " Bd adds 
па saddahl. !? Bd omits na suddabâmi--. '! Bd «tt, 


- 


° 


10 


15 


80 


282 XX. Sattatlnipšta. 


tiņaoãmam eva akamsu. Kusakumárassa padaságamanakiále 
itaro devaputto tass& kuccbimbi patisandhim ganbi, tassa 
Jayampatiti nëmarh karirnsu. Te mahantena yasena vaddhirnsu. 
B. paññavë šcariyassa santike kiñci' anuggahetvá attano pañ- 
ñáya sabbasippesu nipphattih рёрорі. Ath'assa solasavassa- 
каје гаја г. dātakāmo devirm_ āmantetvā ,bhaddə puttassa te 
г. datvă пёќакапі npatthapessáma', jīvantă yeva nam гајје 
patitthitam passissāma, sakala-Jambudíipe kho рапа yassa 
rañño аага icchasi tam assa° ănetvā арратећевій karissñma, 
cittam assa jānāhi kataram rájadhitararmn госейіі“, Sá ,,вадһа“ 
‘ti sampaticchitvë „kamărassa са imarh pavattirh ārocetvā cit- 
саф jānāhîti“ ekarh paricárikarh ревеві. Sā gantvă tassa (аш 
pavattih ёгосеві, Tarn sutvā M. cintesi: „abah na rūpavā, 
rüpasampanná rājadhītā nītâpi mam disvá “kim me iminå 
virūpenā’ 'ti palāyissati, iti no lajjitabbakarh bhavissati, Кїї 
те рһагауйвепа, dharamëne* matápitaro upațțthbabitvā tesarh 
accayena nikkhamitvá pabbajissămîti““ во ,mayharm п’ eva 
rajjen’ attho па nátakehi, ahan mātāpitunnarh ассауепа pabba- 
jissāmîti“ á. Sā gantvá tassa kathah deviyá ёгосеві. Баја 
anattamano hntvă puna katipāhaccayena вёвапащ pesesi, so рі 
patibáhi yeva. Evah yavatatiyarh рабыта catntthaváre 
cintesi: ,,mëtšpitühi saddhirn ekantena patipakkhabhávo' na 
yutto, ekan upáyarh karissămiti“ во kammārajețthakarn pak- 
kosäpetvă bahnrh suvannam datvā ,,екаф itthirāūpakah‘ karo- 
Ы uyyojetvă tasmih pakkante аййаш suvannam gahetvá 
sayar itthirūpakarn* akāsi. B-ttënarh adhippāyā' náma ijjhantii’. 
Таш rüpam jivhāya avaņpņanīyasobharh abosi. Atha тап M. 
khomarmh nivāsāpetvă sirigabbhe thapăpesi'™ бо kammāra- 
jetthakena аһһасагӣраф disvá' tarn garahitvá „gaccha am- 
hākari sirigabbhe'! țthapitarūpakarh āharā“ 'ti ë. So gabbhamn 


' Ва has added sippa. * Bd bas added mayah. * Bd tassetan. “ Bd -no. 
5 Ва adds nāma. *СЁЕ-гйрап. ? Bd -yo. ° Bd samijbasi. 9 Се ta-, СЕ pāpeei. 
10 Çs äbhate rüpake, Ck abate rūpake, both omitting diavå. 0: Bd adds gathtvā. 


1. Kusajštakš. (531.) 283 


pavittho {аф disvá ,kumarepa saddhim abhiramitum ека de- 
vaccharā āgatā bhavissatiti“ hattharn равагеіші avisahanto nikkha- 
mitvá „deva sirigabbhe ayyá ekikā devadhitá thitë!, upagantum 
na sakkomîti“ а. „„Таїа gaccha suvanparüpam etan āharā“ 
*ti puna pesito &ћагі. Kumaro kammārena katah rüpakarn' 
suvannagabbhe khipápetvá! attanā‘ katar jalarnkārāpetvā rathe 
thapápetvá ,,evarüpam labhanto 'дапһашїН* matu santika 
раһіпі. Sā amacce pakkosāpetvā ,tëta mayham putto шаһа- 
рїййо sakkadattiyo, anucchavikah  kumárikam ° labhiasati, 
tumhe* imar rüpakarh' paticchannayáne thapápetvë' sakala- 
Jambudiparn carantë уаава rañño evarüparn аМќагаф pasaatha 
taes’ etarù datvá ‘Okkākarājā tumhehi saddhim aváham ka- 
rissatiti' йїуаваш vavatthapetvá" agacchathá“ tia. Те „вайһї“ 
"1 tam адауа mahantena рагіуёгепа nikkhamitvā vicarantā 
yam yarh' rājadbānih раропапіі ќа. вауапһазатауе mahā- 
janassa samosaranattháne tar гйраКата vatthapupphálarnkarehi'° 
alamkaritva suvannasivikam Aropetvā titthamagge thapetvëš'' 
sayam pațikkamitvā &раїйдаїйпатй kathásavanattharn ekamante 
titthanti. Mahájapo tarh oloketvá ,suvannarüpan“ ti вайпаш!" 
akatvá „ayam manussitthisamānā devaccharapatibbägā ativiya 
sobhati, kin nu kbo ettha thitā kuto уй ágatá, amhákam na- 
gare evarūpā n’ atthîti“ vannentá'' раккашапіі'*. Tam sutvă 
amaccā „sace idba evarüpá dārikā bhaveyya ʻaeukā™ гајада 
viya авпК&'* amaccadhitá'° viyā' ti уайеууот '*, addhā idha 
evarüpá п' atthiti* tah ādāya айбаш оздагаф gaccbanti. 
Te™ eva vicarantā Maddaratthe Sägalanagararh '° sampāpu- 
pithsu, ta. Maddarañño satta dhitaro nuttamarüpadhará de- 
vaccharapatibhëgá, tësamn sabbajețthikā Pabbāvatī nāma, tassā 


Y Bd eklkš двтадыш, сә ekfkš va (иа, 3 Сё гара. 5 ва ШШ!» corr. 
to піккЬт-. * Bd -по. ° Bd omits ku-. * Bd adde evarüparp labhantā gan- 
bilasstba.  ? Bd thape-=. e Ске tha-. 9 Ва only one yam. 1° Ck vanta-, 
Сг vatta-, Bd vatthšlañk-. 11 04 adds āmaccā. !? Cke samñaya. !3 Bd -to. 
19 Ва sti, 16 Се, 16 Ck Ва -kā-. 17 Ско „ууа. 18 Ване ™ Ck 
зёдаіагі. 


æ 


15 


95 


284 XX. Sattatinipšta 


sarirato bālasuriyassa viya pabhā va niccharanti, kālandbakāre 
pi catuhatthagabbhe' padipakiccarh оёта п° atthi, sabbo gab- 
bho ekobháso va hoti. Dhātī pan’ asså khujjā, вё Pabhávatirh 
bhojetvā (аввё sisar nahāpanatthar atthahi vannadásibi attba- 
ghate gšábápetvë sāyaņhasamaye udakattháya gacchanti tittba- 
magge {һай “tam rūpakah disvá ,,Pabbávatiti“ saññáya 
„ayar dubbiníitá ‘sisah naháyissámiti' amhe udakattháya pe- 
setvë pathamatararm gantvë titthamagge (іса ti kujihitvá 
„аге kulalajjāpanike’, purimatararh ágantvë idhā thitási, васе 
гаја јапівва(і nāsessati по“ ti уаїуй* hattbena рарјаразве* 
pahari, hatthatalam Ыһї}}апаррашапатї? játarh, tato „впуаппв- 
тйраКап“* ti ñatvā һаватапа“* vannadësinarh santikarh gacchantI 
„passatba’ me Каттаф, ‘тата dhitá' ti' saññáya° раһёгаф 
adásirh, ауаз тата dhitu santike kim agghati, kevalam mama 
hattho dukkhëpito“ ti á. Atha narn răjadātā gahetvā „tva 
“mama dhitā ito abhirüpatara' ti vadantīi Кат '° nāma kathe- 
вїп. „Maddarañño dhitaram Pahhüvatim'!, idab гӧраћ'" 
(авва solasam pi kalan nâgghatiti™, Те {п{{һатйпавй rája- 
Чуйёташ gantvā ,,Оккакагайпо dūtā dvāre țbitā“ ti rañño 
patiháresurh. Каја āsanā vnttháya thitako va „pakkosathā “< 
iā, Te pavisitvā гајапаф vanditvā „mahārāja ambakam гаја 
tumhākarù йгоруап pucchatiti“ vatvá katasakkārasammānā 
»„»kimattharn āgatā '% ti vatte ,amhákam rañño putto sIhas- 
saro Kusakumāro nāma, rājā tassa г. dátukëámo tumhákam 
santika pahiņi, tumhákam kira dhīitarah Pabbāvatih tassa 
detha, imañ са “ gsuvannarüpakam '" Чеууайһашшаш gan- 
hathá“ "і tah гйракат tassa adarmsu. So pi ‚„еуагйрепа 
mahárájepa ваддһіф vivābamañūgalarn bhavissatiti%“ tutthacitto 


t Ва adds anto gabbhe. * Bd adds ambehl. 5 Bd garntva. < Ck gaddha-, 
Bd ganda- corr. to kanpe., > Bd -паф corr. to «пат viya. * Bd adde (ават. 
1 Ва -theta. 5 Bd ya. ° Bd ssññati. 1° Ck kim. '! Ва -úu. !3 pd 
-pakan. '# Bdna ag- !* Bd -sapetba. 25 Bd Q-tettha. !6 Chsidañcs. 
17 Ске -rüparh, 


1. Kusajataka. 1531.) 285 


sampaticchi. Atha паш dūtā ёһагіви: „mahārāja amhehi na 
вакка papañceturn', Котёгікёуа laddhabhávar gantvā гаййо 
агосевзйта, atha’ so šgantvë ádáya gamissatiti“. So „sādhū“ 
°ti vatvā tesarh sakkārah katvā vissajjesi. Те рапсу rañño 
ca deviyá ca агосеѕші. Вајё mahanteoa parivárena Kusā- 
vatito nikkhamitvā annpubbena Sāgalanagararh sampāpuņi’. 
Maddarājā paccuggantvá падаташ pavesetvā mahanta sakká- 
гаш акёві. Silavati devī paņditattā' „ko jānāti kim bhavissa- 
titi“ ekāhadvīhaccayen’ eva Maddaršjáanam #.: ,„mahārāja 
випїзаш datthukám) ашһа?“* “і. So ,sādhū“ ‘ti sampaticchitvā 
pakkosāpesi, Pabhávati sabbālarhkārapatimaņditā dhātigaņa- 
parivutā ágantvá зазвшї° vandi. Sā tam disvá va cintesi: 
„ayar kumārikā abhbirūpā, mayhań putto virūpo, васе еза 
tam passissati ekāham pi avasitvā palāyissati, upāyarh karissa- 
miti“ sā Maddarājānah amantetvá ,mahārāja, sanisă те 
puttassa anucchavikā, api ca kho pan'amhákarn kule рахепіуё' 
āgatacăãrittarh atthi, sace ayam тазтір cáritte vattissati nes- 
вёша пап“ ti š. „Kim рапа vo cårittao" ti. „Ашһӣкаф 
уаіве yāva ekassa gabbhassa patittháná divá ват!Каш pas- 
віёші па labhanti’, васе ева tathá Кагізваві nessāma пап“ ti. 
Наја „Кїп атта sakkhissasi еуаф vattitun“ ti dhītararh puc- 
chi. ба „ёта tātā“ ‘ti а. Табо Okkākarājā Майдагайбо 
baghur уїрһауаш'! datvā ќат '° ādāya раккаті. Maddarājâpi 
шаћапќепа рагіуйгепа dhītararn џууојеві, Okkako Кизёувііћ 
ganivā nagara ајафкагёреќу& sabbabandhanāni mocāpetvā 
puttassa abhisekarh datvá'' Pabhávatirh aggamahesirn káretvñ '* 
»Kusarājassa апа" ti bheriñ carāpesi. Jambudīpatale rājāno 
уеват dhitaro atthi te Kusarañño dhitaro pahinimsu yesam 


1 Cs ppañceturu, Bd papañcarn káturb, Ck vañceturn. ! Rd adds пап. * Bd 
pšpuni. * Ck -dietā, Bd pandipattā. ° Bd -hi. * Bd sassurarb. 7 Ck pame-, 
Сг раташе-, Bd kulapave-. ° Bd petithānah hot ёта divë tah samikharm p. 
па labbbati. * Bd dhanah. !9 С” omits datvă tari, Се omita tab. *! Ba 
-karo abbisañc! rajja datvā. !3 Bd adds nagare. 


286 XX. Sattatinipata. 


puttā' atthi te ten' eva saddhiù mittabhāvan akarmkhantá 
putte upațthāke katvā раһїпїйзп. B-assa nátakapariváro 
mahā ahosi, mahantena yasena г. кёгеві. Pabhāvatih” pana divā 
passiturh па labhati, sápi tarh divā passitum na labhati, ubhin- 
пат рі rattih dassanam eva hoti. Tattha Pabhāvatiyā sarirap- 
pabhá abbohārikā ahosi. B. рі airigabbhato rattin yeva 
nikkhamati, So katipāhaccayena Pabhāvatih divā datthukámo 
mtu агосеві. Sā „тё (е? госсі, уйу’ eka puttah labhi* 
tāva āgamehîti™"‘ pațikkhipi. So punappuna уёсі yeva. Atha 
nai‘ ã.: „tena hi hatthisãlarnh gantvā hatthimeņdavesena tittha, 
ahar (ат ta. ānessãmi, atha nam akkhīni pūretvā olokeyyāsi, 
mā са attšnam jánápesiti', So ,„sādhū‘“ `1 sampaticchitvá 
hatthisālah agamāsi. Rājamātā hatthimañgalan kāretvā 
Pabhāvatih „ehi sámikassa te hatthino passissãmā®™ ti tattha 
netvë „ayah hatthi asuko nāma ayam asnko nāmā“ 'ti das- 
sesi. Ta. nam rājā matu pacchato gacchantimi hatthiccha- 
kanapindena pitthiyarn pahari, sā kuddhâ „гаййй'° te hattharh 
chindăpessāmîti“ уа{уй өті шјјһарезі, ва паш saññapetvá 
pitthim рагітајјі. Puna рі гаја datthukámo hutvá assasālāya 
вввароракауевепа disvá tath’ eva азвассћакапаріпдепа pahari, 
tadápi nam kuddham sassū вайдареві. Роп’ ekadivasarh 
Pabhāvati M-ar passitukāmā hutvá sassuyā ārocetvå „alarh 
te mā" rucciti“ patikkhittápi'° punappuna уйсі, atha nam 
sā &.: „tena hi sve mama putto nagararh padakkhinarm ka- 
rissati'', tvan sīhbapañjararh vivaritvā раввеууйвїїї“, evañ са 
pana vatvā рппайїуаве nagararh alarkārāpetvā Jayampati- 
kumärarn гаўауезатп gābāpetvā hatthipasse nisīdāpetvā nagara 
padakkhinarh kārāpesi. РаЬһйауабиш'* ádáya slhapañjare {һа{уй 


„passa '* tava sámikassa sirisobbaggan'*' ti а. Sā „аписсһа- 


1 Bd -о, 3 Ва so pa-. 3 Ва adds tāta, “ C% -аі. * Bd -māblti * Ba 
adds sā. ! Bd -hit). ° Bd passāmā. ° Bd adds disv8. 19 Bd rañño kathetvä. 
11 Bd mā te. 1° Bd patikkhipetrāpi. ?? Ck Bd -ssātł. 14 Bd вё ра. ° Ва 
passatha '* Bd -ggappatten. 


1. Kausajštaka. (531) 287 


viko me sámiko laddho“ ti attamaná ahosi. Тайф divasarn 
pana М. hatthimendavesen' eva Jayampatissa pacchimësane 
nisiditvá yatbādhippāyena Pabhávatirh oloketvá! hatthavikárádi- 
vasena cittarnciyarn Каш! dassesi. Hatthimbi atikkante rāja- 
mātā Pabhávatim pncchi: ,dittho te amma вёшіко“ ti. „Аша 
вууе, pacchimāsane’ pan’ assa nisinno hatthimendo ativiya 
dubbinīto mayhan batthavikārādīni dassesi, kasmā еуагйрат 
alakkhikarn rañño рассһїтйвапе* пївїййревип*'* ti. „Amma 
rañño pacchásane rakkhá паша icchitabbā“ ti. Sā cintesi: 
„ayah hatthimendo ativiya nibbhayo rājānai: rājā ti pi na 
mañüati, kacci nu kho eso va’ Kosarājă, addhā hi so уїгйро 
bhavissati, ten’ eva mar па dassentiti“ вй khnjjah Карра- 
müle á.: „amma gaccha táva, já&náhi Кіф porimásane nisinnako 
гаја udāhu pacchimāsane“ ti. „Kathah panáharm jánissámiti'“. 
„басе hi во rājā bhavissati pațhamatararn hatthipitthito ota- 
rissati, imāya sañüáya jānāhîti“. Sā gantvá ekamante thitaá 
pathamari M-arih otarantam addasa pacchá Jayampatikumáram, 
M. pi ito c'ito са olokento khujjah бівуа ,iminá' káranena 
ева йраїй Ыһауїзваї111'*© йаїуа* pakkosăpetvā „imah antara’ 
må kathehšti“ dalhar уаїуй!° uyyojesi. Sā дапбуй ,,рогігоё- 
sane nisinno pathamarh otariti“ š. Pabhávati tassā увсапаф" 
saddahi. Puna rajá'" datthukámo batvā mătararn уйсі. Sā 
patikkhipituh asakkonti „tena hi añüñštakavesena uyyšánam 
gacchëáhiti“ á. So uyyšnam gautvāå pokkharaniyam galappa- 
măgari adakah pavisitvá padominipannena'' sisam сһїйеїүй 
pupphitapadumena mukhah avattharitvā'* анһаві.  Matápi 
‘вва Pabhāvatih пууйпай netv& sāyaņhasamaye „ime rukkhe 
passa, sakune passa, mige раввё“ ‘ti palobhayamānā роККһагапї- 
tirah pesesi' Sā paüñcavidbapadumasañchannarm pokkha- 


' Bd -ento. 3 Bd кей. # Bd рассһёвапе. * Bd -pesurh 1Ьагёреһіпаф. > 
СЕ pacca, Bd іш. * Ске ca. 7 Bd adds nama. ° Bd adds ќат. *# Rd adds 
pablävatiyā. :° Bd katvā, 1! Bd adds sutvā. 12 Bd saddahl М. рі лет pana, 
18 Dd -ppattena, !* Bd avārltvā, '$ Bd pāyāsi. 


5 


16 


288 XX. Santatinipâta. 


ranim disvā nahăyitukämā paricárikáhi saddhir pokkharanir 
otaritvá kfļautīi tam padamarm disvå gahetukāmā' hattham pa- 
såāreti", atha пат! гаја paduminipaņparh apanetvā „ahar Kusa- 
гаја ti hatthe ganhi. Sā tassa mukha disvá „yakkho mam 
Бапһайн'“* viravitvā tatth' eva visaññitah pattā, ath’ asså 
rājā batthain шойсі. Sā sañüam patilabhitvá ,Kusarājā kira 
mam hatthe ganhi, imioáñ с’ ahar’ hatthisăläyah hatthiccha- 
kanena азвавай!йуап са assacchakanakena pahat, ayañ с' eva 
таш? hatthissa рассһёваре nisiditvë uppandesi, kim me evam- 
уігарепа* dummukhena patiná, ahar jīvantīi айбат райт la- 
bhiseāmîti“ cintetvā attanā saddhir ágate amacce раккова- 
petvā „mama уйпауйһапатп sajjan karotha, ај)’ eva ратіввё- 
шїн“ а. Те гаййо йгосезий. Rājā cintesi: „sace gantuh па 
labhissati hadayam а65&' phalissati, gacchatu, puna tam attano 
balena ānessāmîti™', Ath’ авва ратапаф аоојёпі. Sā pitu 
nagaram eva agamāsi, М. pi uyyānato nagara pavisitvā 
alarnkatapāsădarb abhirūhi. В-ар hi вё pubbepatthanávasena 
па icchi, so pubbakammavasen’ eva’ virüpo ahosi, — A. kira 
Вагёпазідудгадёпе uparimavīthiyā ca hetthimavithiyá ca dve 
kulāni vasirnsu, ekassa kulassa dve puttă ekass’ ekā va dhitë 
ahosi, дуїви puttesu В. kanittho, narn kumārikarh jetthassa 
ёпевшћ '°, kanittho ādārāharaņe' bhātu santike yeva vasi. 
Ath’ ekadivasah tasmim_ ghare atirasakapüve pacimsu, В. 
araññarn gato hoti, tassa рйуаш thapetvá avasesá'' bhājetvā 
khådithsu. Tasmim khane paccekabuddho bhikkháya ghara- 
буйгат agami! B-assa bhátujáyë '* ‚‚сШараїїпо айбай рйуаш 
pacissãmiti“ tah gahetvá рассекабиддһавва адёзі, so рі {аш 
khanar ñeva araññato йрассһї'',‚ atha nam вй й.: „sāmi 
сїйаш pasádehi, tava kotthëso paccekabuddhassa dinno" ti, 


1 Ва vicjnitu-, 9 Сг Bd -resl > Bd ganhlu. * Bd çšharn, ° Bd ауашеха ca 
шаўһап. © Bd evarūpena. ? Ске asee ° Bd adda cintetvà, *# Che pubbe-. 
10 Ва jethakaasa айайаиц. !! so Ck; Ва darakabhšvena. !2 Bd -зе, 12 Ва 
agamšsi. Žž! Ck Jayatu. '* Ck ар. 


1. Eusajitaka. (531.) 289 


So „tava kotthāsah khāditvå шаша koțtbāsar -` desi, аййаш 
kim karissasiti'"“ kuddho gantvë pattato pūvarh рапії. Sā 
mātu gharam gantvā navavilinah campakapupphavannam sap- 
pim āharitvā pattan püresi' tah оһһаваш muñci° Sā ќай 
disvā patthanarh thapesi; „bbante*, nibbattanibbattattháne me 
sarira obhásajátarn' hotu, uttamarūpadhară Ыһауеууаг*, 
iminā са me asappurisena saddhim ekattháne уйво ша abosîti“. 
Iti sā imissá pubbapatthanáya vasena' tarh na icchi. B. pi 
taù püvar tasmih patte онїййре{тй раићапаӱ” {һврезї: 
„bhante imar yojanasatarh'° vasantim pi šnetvë mama păda- 
paricárikarn kátuiñ samattho bhaveyyan“ ti. Та, yarh’ so 
koddho hatvá'' pūva gaņhi tassa pubbakammassa vasena 
уїгїро abosi'", — So Pabhāvatiyā gatāya вокаррайо аћові, 
папаКагеһї paricaramānâpi пай зевійЫіуо '* oloketom*™ pi па 
sakkhirmau, Pabhávatirahitam авва sakalam pi пїуезапаш tuc- 
cham viya kbáyi. So ,idāni Sāgalanagararh раа bhavissa- 
titi“ paccūsamaye mātua santikah gantvā „amma, ahah Pa- 
bhávatirn ānessãmi, tumhe г. anusasatbš%“ `{1!° pathamarh g. й.: 
1, Idan te rattharn sadhanam вауорда 

sakáyuram sabbakámüñpapannam 

idan te rajjarh''anusšása amma, 

gacchām’ аһаш yattha piy&ë Pabhävatîti. 1. 

Та. sayoggau ti battbiyoggadisahitarp, вакгуцгар t! варайсагајакаки- 
dhabhandan, anusšsa ammi `d se kira purlssssa r. datvë puna ganhanamh 
nima me syuttan (1 pitu vā bhātu vë anlyyådetvā mātua niyyšdento evam i. 

Sä tassa kathah sutvā „tena hi táta appamatto bha- 
veyyãsi, mātugāmo паша asuddhāsayo™“ ti vatvā nánaggara- 
sabhojanassa'’ suvapnakarotiñ pūretvå „idah antarāmagge 


1 Bd „ввашій. 3 Bd -гіцха patte paccekabuddbassa pūresi. 3 Bd muce, * 


Bd adds iminā dánapalena. 5 Ck Bd -sarnjštarn. * Bd -yyurh, Ck -ууа. ? Bd 
adds па. Š Bd sappipa-. ° Ck -пабса. !° Ck -1е. !1 Ва adda hšranar. !% 
Bd пайт. !# Bd adds së са бай па їсс. 1 B4 -сёгіуашёпа nisinnase- 
ашМуо. 15 Ва -kāpetum. !* Bd adds vadanto, !!' Bd ratbarn. Í Bd apari- 
suddhahadayo. ?* Bd -rasaggassa bbo-. 

ишла. v. 19 


25 


290 ХХ. 5$айайо!раш. 


bhuñjeyyšsiti“ vatvā uyyojesi. So (аф йййуа müátaram van- 
ditvā tikkbattarh padakkhinam katvá ,jivanto puna passissá- 
шї ' sirigabbham pavisitvā pañcãvudharh sannaybithā bhatta- 
karotiy& saddhih kahápanasahassarm pasibbake katvë' Kokana- 
даш? vinam йййуа nagarā pikkhamitvë maggarmh patipajjitvë 
mahābalo mahšáthámo уйға majjhantikā paņņāsayojanāni gantvá 
bhattam bhuñjitvá вевепа divasabhāgena puna papnnësayojanëáni 
gantvā ek&hen eva yojanasatikam magga khepetvā вйуапһа- 
samaye паһаїтй* Sägalanagarah pāvisì. Tasmih pavițttha- 
matte yeva tassa tejena Pabbāvat! sayanapitthe sapthātui 
asakkonti otaritvë bhümiyarh nipajji. B-am pi kilantindriyamn 
vitbiyarh gacchantam aññatară ittht° disvā pakkosëpetvë nisi- 
dāpetvā райе dhovăpetvā ввуапаш daápesi', tasmiñ viddū- 
pagate bhattah sampādetvā pabođhetvă bhattarn Uhojesi, во 
tuttho tassă saddhim karoțiyā kahāpaņpasahassarn adäāsi. So 
pañcšávudham tatth'eva thapetvā ,gantabbatthanam' no atthiti“ 
vatvā vinam ādāya hatthisñlam gantvā „ajja me idha vasiturh 
detha, gandhabbarn vo’ karissámiti' vatvā hatthigopakebi 
anuññato ekamante nipajjitvā’ patippassaddhadaratho utthšya 
уїіпаф muñcitvá ,„sakalanagaravāsino imarh saddam sunantü““ 
‘ti viņa vàdento рау. Pabhăvati bhümiyam nipaunā tarh 
saddarh sutvā™ ,ayam na aññassa уїрёуа'! saddo, nissar- 
sayah Кивагаја шаш’ attbāya āgato“ ti aññasi. Maddarājâpi 
tarn saddam sutvâ ,ativiya madhara vádeti, sve etar pakko- 
sāpetvā mama gandhabbarh kāressāmîti““ cintesi. B. „па sakkë 
idha vasamănena Pabhävatirn datthurn, atthanam etan“ ti pāto 
va nikkhamitvā sšyarh'' bhuttagehe yeva рйїагйзаш bhuðjitvă 
viņarn thapetvá rajakumbhakarassa gwautikam gantvā tassa 
antevásikabhávañ: upagantvá ekadivasen'evarn ghararh mattikāya 


1 Ck passe-. > hadayamassaphalissati - - - - = katvà wantiug in Сә. ' Bd 
пийайса. * Bd patvā., 6 CF itti, Cs Bd itthińn. * Bd adds so kilantatāya nip- 
ра}}Ит& riddarm okkami atbassā, ° Bd gandħappa-. * Bå te шап, ° Bd 
adds вокат niddāyltvā. 19 Bd adds va сіпсеві. !! Ва viņā. 12 Rd sayar. 


1. Kusajštaka. (531). 291 


pūretvā ,.bbajanani karomi йёсапуй ‘і vatvā „āma karohiti“ 
vutte ekam mattikapindam сакке thapetvä cakkarh avijjhi', 
sakim йуїййһаш* eva yāva majjhantiká tikkam agami" yeva. 
So оёрауарпёпі khuddakamahantāni bhājanāni katvā Pabhā- 
vatiyā attbāya bhājana karonto nánárüpáni samntthapesi, 
B-ttënarh hi adhippáyá ijjhanti“. „„Тапї рапа rūpāni Pabhā- 
vati yeva passatü“ 'ti° adhițtbāsi. So sabbabhājanāui sukkha- 
petvá pacitvā geham pūresi. Kumbhakāro nānābhājanāni ga- 
hetvá råājaknlah agamāsi. Баја disvā „„Кеп' imapi katániti%“ 
pucchi. , Mayá devā“ ti. „Abam “(ауа akatāni jānâmi, ka- 
thehi kena katănîti“. ,Antevāsioā me dəvā“ ‘і. „Na te 
antevāsl, ācariyo te во, taasa santike sippar sikkha, ito pat- 
(һауа ca шаша dhīitānai bhájapáni karotu, imam с' авва 
eahassarh debîti“ sahassam dăpetvā ,imëni khuddakabbājanāni 
mama dhitáparm dehiti“ & So tāni tësarn santikarh haritvā®’ 
„imāni kilanatthaya khuddakabhajanániti а. Tā saąbbā āga- 
misu. Kumbhakáro M-ena Pabhăvatiyā attháya katabhájanam 
eva tassñ айда Sā bhájanarh gabetvá tattha attano са 
ca Кһојјдуа са гйрап passitvå „imam па aññena katam, 
Knsarājen’ eva katan“ ti ñatvā kujjhitvá „їшїпй mayharh 
attho п’ atthi, icchantānah dehiti“ ё, Ath’ assa bhaginiyo 
kuddhabhávam ° ñatvă „Kusaraññā katan ti maññasei, па idarh 
tena katar, kumbhakárena katah, ganhšhi nan“ ti avaha- 
війво. Să tena katabhăvar tassa са āgatabhāvar tāsań па 
kathesi, Kumbbakaro sabassarm B-assa datvā ,„tāta rājā te 
tuttho, ito kira patthāya răājadhitānah bhājaņāni Кагеууйві, 
їйїйһатп (ават harissāmîiti“ á. So ,jdhápi vasantena па sakká 
Pabhāvatirn datthun“ ti tam sahassar tass' eva datvā raju- 
pațthākassa nalakëárassa santikam gantvā tass’ апіеуйвіко 


hutvá Pabhávatiyá" tālavantahı katvā tatth' eva setacchattain : 


1 Ckeav-. 3 Bd ётіЈЫ yeva. ® so Сіз; Ва ábhami. “Bá -yo пёша ñanijjhati. 
5 Bd за. $ Bd netvā. 7 Ске kujjha- for kujjhana-? 9 Dd adds atthåya. 
19* 


5 


310 


10 


9 


30 


292 ХХ. Байайшраш. 


āpānabhūmiñ са ува! gahetvā thitam Pabhbávatirm са 'ti 
nënërüpáni dasseti', Мајакаго tañ са айбай ca tena kata- 
bhandarn šdáya rājakulah agamāsi. Raja disvá ,,Кеп’ imëni 
katšniti“ pncchitvë purimanayen’ eva sahassarh datvá „imāni’, 
nalakārabhandāni mama @һїїйргай dehîti“ а, So pi В-ера 
Pabhāvatiyā atthaya katatālavanțarh taesá yeva‘ adāsi, tatrâpi 
rüpáni аййо jano ра passati, Pabhāvatī pana disvë raññë 
katabhāvarn ñatvå „gaphitukāmā ganhantü“ ‘ti kuddhā bhümi- 
yarn kbipi. Atha паф sesá hasirnsa. Naļakāro sahassarh 
ābaritvă B-assa adāsi. So „idam pi тауһаш ауавапа{{йпап““ 
ti sahassarh tass’ eva datvā rājamālakārassa santikarn gantvā 
antevësikabhávarh upagantvā nánávidharh málávikatiih bandhitvā 
Pabhávatiya attháya nánárüpacitrarn ekam cumbatakamr акёві, 
Mālākāro {ага sabbam ādāya raëjakularn agamāsi. Каја disvā 
„кеп? imëni ganthitšniti'“ pucchi. ,,Mayë деуй“ ‘ti. „Ahar 
tayáganthitani јёпёті, kathehi kena ganthitániti“. ,Antevā- 
sinā ше devš“ ‘ti. ,,№а во antevšsl, йсапуо te во, tassa 
santike sipparh sikkha, ito ра{{ ауа mama dhitënarh роррЬёоі 
ganthatu, imañ с' assa sahassarhn dehiti“ sabassarh datvá 
simüni pupphāni таша dbitánam dehiti“ á, B-ena Pabháva- 
Чуй attbāya katah mālācumbațakarh tassš yeva айй. Sā 
tatth` eva attano ca гайбо ca rūpehi saddbim nānārāūpāni 
disvā tena katabhavam ñatvā kujjhitvā bhümiyarh khipi. 
Sesä bhaginiyo (аф tath’ eva avahasirmsu' Mālākāro рі sa- 
hassarñn haritva*° B-assa дауа tah pavattin агосеві. So 
„idam рі шауһагп ауавапабёпап“ ti sahassarh tass' eva 
datvā таййо sūdassa santikam gantv& antevšsibhávam ! upa- 
gacchi. Ath’ еКайїуазаш айдо гайпо bhojanavikatirñ haranto 
attano attháya pacituh B-assa attbimarnsam adāsi. So tam 
tatkā ватрёдеві yathássa° gandho ваКа!апарагагп avatthari. 


1 Bd vatthuh. 3: Ва -ві. 2 Chs ішіп. * Cha eva. ° Ске ара-, Dd avasa- 
hirnsu. * Ва åha-. 7 Bd -аіка-. 8 Bd athasau. 


1. Kuesjitaka. 1531.) 293 


Каја nam ghāyitvā „Кїї no' шаһйпазе айдат рі marhsarmh 
p8casiti' pucchi. ,,N' atthi deva, арі? kho pana me ап{еуйзї- 
kassa ntthimamsarm pacanatthāya dinnar, tase’ eso gandho 
bhavissatiti“. Баја tam ° āharāpetvā tato ока jivhagge 
{һарелї, távad eva ваёѓагаваћагапіваћаввёпі kbobhetvā' phari. 
Rüajá rasatanháya bajjhitvá'sahassarh datvă „ito pattháya tava 
впёеуйвіпа татай ca’ dhitānañ ca me bhattarn pacãpetvā tvarh 
mayham āhara, so mama dhitánam һагаїй'“ ‘ti а. Südo 
gantvë tassårocesi. So tarh satvā „idāni me manoratho mat- 
thaharh patto, idán' aham Pabhāvatih даһи Jabhissámlti'“ 
tnttho аф sahassarh tass' eva datvá punadivase bhattam ватп- 
pšdetvá rañño bhattabhájanñni pesetvā rājadhītānañ ca bhatta- 
kácarn'" sayah gahetvá Pahbávatiyá vasanapšsádarh abhirūhi. 
Să tam Касаф ādāya pāsādah abhirübantam disvā cintesi: 
„aya attano ananucchavikarn dāsakammakarehi kattabbarh 
karoti", васе panâbarn™ tunhi bhavissámi ʻidāni тап еза 
rocetiti' ваййї hutvá katthaci арапуй!* mam olokento idh’ 
eva vasissati, idán' eva паті akkositv& paribhásitvá muhuttam 
рі idha vasitum adatvá palāpessāmîti“ sā dváram addhavi- 
vatam katvā ekam batthah Кахае laggetvā екера apgalam 
uppiletvá dutiyam g. а.: 
s. Anujjubhütena hararn mahanta 

divá са ratto са nisithakále 

patigaccha tvais Еһїрраїї!* Kusáçatirh Кова!" 

па icchāmi™ duobbannam aham vasantan ti. 2. 

Т. a.: шаћагаја tvarh bhattakaro butvā ujukena cittena yo pi te sisar 


ЬМпдеууа tassa p' etah kamrarh па karosi, anujjnkena !' pana elttena!? mam’ 
atthâya етй !9 tan mahantarh kācah haranto’? divā ca ratto ca nisithakale 


1 СЕ ко, Rd te, 8 Cha -tfti. 3 Ва adds са. * Bd савветаво. ® Bd omit tarh. 
* Ва kbobhantan 7 Ске bandbitvă. * Bd шаша, ° Bd mšha-. '0 С” 
=hávari, Bd -kăjah. '? Bd dāsaksmmati karoti akattabbah kammawova karoti. 
13 Bd adds Кайрёһат. !2 Ck Bd āg-. 1 read: khipparh tvan? '* Bd kuse, 
Cs -sarh, Ck „ваш. '6 Ck -ma; read п. 1" Ck -ks, Bd anujjabhūtena. !* СЕ 
eitte. !# Са evarhkam, Bd etah. 0 Bd âba-. 


35 


а 


20 


294 ХХ. Sattatinipštas. 


Ipahaptarn dukkharh snublavissesi, Кі tena anujjubhütena', tvarı attano ns- 
Багат Kusavatim eva pațigaccha, aññam attanš вайіеіг З atirasapūvasanthāna- 
шат yakkhinih asggamshaesirh Каста г. аге, па !ссһат1 dubbannam 
аһа vasantan ti abara pana tarb dubbaunarh dusssnthitarb ldha vasantarmp па 
їсеһатш. 

So „Pabhāvatiyā me santiká kathā laddhā“ ti tutthacitto 
tisso ратћа abhasi: 

s. Маһап gamissámi ito Kusávatim, 

Pabhávati* vannapalobhito tava 

ташёті Maddassa niketaramme 

hitvëna rattharn tava daasane rato. 3. 

+ PabbávatI' vannapalobhito tava 

sammülharüpo vicarámi medinitb, 

disarb jánëmi kuto 'mbi šgato, 

tay' amhi matto migamandalocane. 4. 

s, Suvannaciravasane jātarūpasumekhale 

вивводі tava kāmāhi’ náharm rajjena-m-atthiko ti. 5. 

Та. гашаші abhiramšmi na nkkanthámi, əaammülharüpo tt kllesa- 
semmülho hutvá, їауашһ1 matto t! tayi matto 'mhl tayā và matto 'mht, 
вота) цасігатаваре ti suvanpakhacitavatthavasane, rajjonamatthiko : 
гајјепа atthiko. 

Evam vutte sā cintesi: „ahar etam ‘vippatisārī bhavissi- 
tîti' paribhásámi, ayarh pana rañjitvá уа kathesi, sace kho pana 
mam ‘ahar Kusurajá' ti vatvā battbe ganheyya ko паш váreyya 
Косі? no imam kathah snneyyā" `ti dvārarn thaketvā sucit 
datvā’ anto" atthási. So pi bhattakācarh āharitvā rājadhītaro 
bhojesi. Pabhëvati „gaccha Ковагӣјепа pakkabhattarh аһага“ 
'ti khujjarh pesesi. Sā sgharitva ,bhuñja%“ ‘ti а. „Nâhar tena 
раКЕаЬһайаш bhuñjāmi, tvam bhañjitvā attano laddhanivëpam 
gahetvāä bbattarn pacitvā áhara, Киѕагайбо pana ágatabhšávarh 
më kassaci arocesiti“ а. Khujjā tato pattháya tassā КоцЬа- 
sar āharitvā sayarh bhuñjati, attano kotthásarh (авва npaneti'. 


1 Ck anubhutens, C# anububbūtena. ? Ck -sarb. * Oke etib, Bd ti. * Chr-u, 
Ва -G? > Bd kámena. * Che kovi. 7 Сә danto. ° Bd adds gabbbe. 9 Bd -si. 


1. Ковајабака. (531.) 295 


Kusaršjápi tato Ppattháya tam passituh alabhanto сіпќезі: 
s8tthi пп kbo Pabhávatiyáë mayi вїпеһо udāhu п” attbîti, vi- 
marhsissëmi пар“ ti so ršjadhitaro bhojetvā bhattakácam ādāya 
nikkhamanto tassā gabbhadváre pásádatalarh pádehi paharitvë 
Ъћајапапі ghattetvá' nitthanitva visañāī hutvà avakujjo pati. 
Sā (авва nitthanitasaddena' dvárarmrh vivaritvë tarh bhattakácena 
otthatarh disvā cinteai: „ауатп гаја sakala-Jambudipe agga- 
rājå тпай nissãya rattindivah dukkharh anobhoti, sukhumāäla- 
tăya bhattakācena avattbato pati‘, jīvati пп kho“ ti sā gab- 
bhato nikkhamitvā tassa násávatam npadhāreturù рїүатп pas- 
retvā mukharh оЇоҝезі. So mukhapūrarh" Кһејаф gahetvā* 
tassā sarire påātesi. Sā tar paribhësitvë gabbharb pavisitvā 
dváram addhavivațarn katvā thitá: 
в. Abbhn hi tassa bho boti yo anicchantam icchati, 
айашаї гаја kāmehi akanto kantam' icchasîti g. ā. 6. 


Таса abbhü tl abhütl avaddhîtl? attho. 


So patibaddhacittatáya akkosiyamāno pi paribhásiyamáno 
рі vippatisáraín anuppādetvā va апап(агаш g. й.: 
т. Akimam уй sakāmarb vā уо naro labhate piyarh 
lābham ettha pasarpsama alábho tattha pāpako ti. 7. 
Sâpi (азтій evarh kathente рі anosakkitvā thaddhava- 
canai’ vatvā palāpetukāmā itara р. å.: 
в. Pāsāņasārah Кһапав! kanikárassa darunëá 
vátarh jalena badhesi' yo anicchantam icchasiti'. 8. 
Та. kanikarassa дёгипа И kanikárakatthena, бааћевій !% bandhasi. 
Таш sutvā гаја tisso gātbā ађћаві: 
э. Рйвйпо ойра ќе hadaye оһіќо mudulakkhane, 
уо te sātarh па vindámi tiro janapada’ gato. 9. 


1 Bd та(іе-. ° Bd pittbu-- 8% Bd nikkhunitassa ва-. * Bd вей. 5 СЕ Ba 
mukbam-. 6% Bå adds khunant) corr. to nitbunsanti- ? Bd akantarh Matturb. 
* СЕ avaddhati, Ce адди, Bd sbbhutiri avughiti. 9 Ck thaddhatarain па, C# 
thandataram пай, :° Chs bhšdheti, Bd pādbesi. 11 Ске -titj, 1% Сг bhá-, 
Bd рһё-. '* Bd -då. 


15 


90 


25 


90 


95 


296 ХХ. Вайайираа. 


10. Хайа mam bhbükutim katvā rájapatti udikkhasi 

&]агіко tadā homi гайпо Maddassa риге. 10. 

n, Yadā umhayamëná' шаш rëjaputti udikkhasi 

пё]апКо tadá homi rājā homi ада Kuso ti. 11. 

Ts. mudulakkhane ti mudunš itthllakkanena samannigate, yo ti уо 
aharb tiro raítharn? agato tava santike vasanto psilsanthšramattam рі sštam% na 
labbami sot evarb шаййаш!: mayi sinehuppatinivšranšaya' пйпа tava һадаув 
pāsāņo thapito, bhükutli katrā tÍ kodhena valivisamarh t nalátarh Кайа, 
šlšriko ti bhattakarako, tasmirh khane sharh MuddaraDĀo antepure bhattakira- 
дёво vlya homit vadati, nmhbayamānâ’ d pabatthškárarn dassetvā hasatnana, 
гаја homliti tasmim khane shar Kusavstinagare г. karento гај "(ув homi, 
kasmâsi evarh pharnsš, ito patthšya mâ evarüpam kari hhadde ti. 

Sā tassa тасапаф sutvā cintesi: „ayah ativiya alliyitvā 
katheti°, musāvādań katvā gpāyena tam ito paläpesasāmiti“ g. å.: 

11. Sace hi vacanam sacca nemittánam bhavissati 

o' eva me уаш pati авва kámarh chindantu sattadhā ti. 12. 

T. a; шаһёгаја шауё Ковагаја mayharh pati bhavissati na bhavíssatiti* 
bahunimittapāäthakă pucchitš te kâmarn kira mar sattadhâ chindautu n’ ova 
ше tvatb pati bhavissesiti vadirbsü 'Ч. 

Таш sutvá гаја ta pațibāhanto „hhadde mayápi attano 
ratthe nemittikā'? pucchitā te “aññatra sībassara-Kusarājato 
{ауа pati паша n° atthiti' vyākarihsu, aham рі attano ййпа- 
mimittena evam еуатї!! kathemiti“ vatvá anantararh g. й.: 

xs. Sace hi vacanarh вассаш аййезаш yadi уй пашаш” 

па c` eva te'' pati atthi аййо sihassará Kuasa ti. 13. 

T. a.: yadi bl'* añĀeser nemittšustb vacanarh yadi vā шата vacanarh 
вассайф tava аййо рай паша п’ atthîti. 

Sä tassa уасапат sutvá „па закка imarh lajjapeturü, pa- 
lāyatu vā mā và kim me iminë“%“ 'ti dvërar pidháya attānarh 
па dassesi. So рї Касап gahetvā otari. Tato pattháya ќай 
datthurn па labhi'*, bhattakárakakammarh Кагопѓо ativiya kila- 


1 Ck -пањ. 3 Bd ratha. 5 Bd наш. * Сіз уо. è Bd -na. 5 Сіз walicl-. 
7 Cks „пап, 5 Bd -sl, ° Ско -ай. 19 Hd -aka. 11 Bd eva, 12 B£ шаша 'Ф 
Сиг navamete, Bd na сетаіте, !* Ck omits Ы. ! Ва jabhati. 


1. Kusajātaka. (531.) 297 


mati, Ъћоќќарёќагёво jšrüni phëleti bbājanāni dhovati kāceua 
udakarh āharati, sayanto ammanapitthiyarh eayati, påto vottháya 
yăguădīni pacati harati bbojeti, nandirágarmh пїввйув atidukkharh 
anubhoti. So ekadivasah Dbhattagehadvárena gacchantim ' 
kbujjarh disvá pakkosi. Sā Pabbāvatiyā bhayena tassa san- 
tikam gantun na visahanti' їпгїїй* viya gacchatì. Atha паш 
}атепа* upagantvë ,„Кһојје“ ti 4. Sā nivattitvā thitā ,,ko 
eso“ ti vatvë ,tumhákarh saddar na sunámiti“ а, Atha пап 
skhujje tvam pi вётіої° pi te‘ ativiya thaddhá, ettakarh kálarn 
tnmhëkarh santike vasantā агоруаѕёвапатайќат' pi па labháma °, 
deyyadhammarh рапа kim dassatha’, titthatu tāv' etai арі 
me Pabhávatirh mudar katvá dasseturh sakkhissasiti“ а, Sa 
››8Ё8@һй'* 'ti sampaticchi. Atha паш „sace me tam dasseturp 
sakkhissasi khujjabhávarn te ujukarh katvá glveyyakarh дааѕё- 
miti“ palobhanto райса gāthā й.: 

1s- Nekkharh givan te káressarh patvā khujje Kusávatim 

васе mam пйдапазйгп olokeyya Pabhávati. 14. 

18. Nekkharn givan te káressarh -pe- ñlapeyya Pabhávati, 15. 

ie. Nekkharngivan tekáressarh-pe-umhëpeyya'° РаБћёха!ї. 16. 

т. Nekkharhgivan te кагевваф -ре- ратЬйреууа Рађћатвиї, 17. 

ie. Nekkhar glvan ќе káressam раќуё khujje Kusāvatirn 

васе таф nāganāsūro pāņihi'' upasampbase ti. 18. 


Та. пекат givante ti tava givsrb sabbssuvasDnamayam 13 eva kâressā- 
miU ettbo, nekkharh givan te karissāmiti'®? рі pštho, tava givāya vekkhassa 
pilandhanarn bandhessamiti!t a., olokeyyā 'Ш saca tava vacanena marh Pabhš- 
vati olokeyya sace marh tšya!Š olokapeturb sakkbissasit! a., šlapeyyš 'u ādisu 
р! eso va nayo, ettha pana ошћёреууё!* 'tl basitavasena!? paribáseyya'”, 
рашћёреууё ’tl mahahasitavasena paribāseyya '*. 


1 Ck Чаш, ? Bd visabati. * Bd turitaturita. “ Bd vegena. * Bd -лі, Ct 
зр. * Bd adde ubho рі. ? Сїт -узш sš-. ° во all tbres MSS. for -mā 
ti? O ao all three MSS, for -tbš ti vatte? 19 Bd оттё-. !! Bd pâņinā, 
N В4 ааһЬраш-. 12 Che kāressimiti, '* Ва plladdhissamiti. 1! Ba taast, 
18 Bd ummā- corr. to umhā-. ‘7 Bd mandaha-. !* Chs -ђа-.  !*# Сг 
-bhā-. 


298 XX. Satustinipšu. 


Sā tassa vacanar sotvå ,gacchatha tumhe deva, kati- 
pšhena' {аш tambákarm vase karissámi, passatha те parakka- 
man“ ti vatvā tah karapīyarh tiretvë Pabhāvatiyā santi- 
Ка gantvā (авай vasanagabbbarh sodhentí viya раһагапа- 
yogga leddakbandam рі asesetvā antamaso p&dukápi nlharitvá 
sakalai’ gabbham ваштајјісуа gabbhadvāre ummàáram antararmn 
Каїуй иссйвапаш* paññāpetvā Pabhavatiyá ekam nicapitha- 
Кай attharitvá „ebi amma, sise te ākā vicinissámiti“ ќаф 
tattha nisīdāpetvā attano ūruantare tassā sisan phapetvā tho- 
Каш kanduyitvā „aho imissā sise ока babū“ ti sakasīsato орй 
gahetvå tassā thapetváë „passa kittikā te sise ākā“ ti piya- 
katham kathetvë M-assa gunakatham katheuti 

1ә. Na hi nünáyam rájaputti Kose вёќаш pi vindati 

&]агіке bhate’ рове vetanena ° anatthike* ti g. &, 19. 

T. a.: екафвепёуаш' rājaputtīi pubbe Kusšvatnasgare Ковалагіцдавза 
mantike mišlagaudbavilepanavatthšlarnkáravssena° appamattakam pi sàtah na 
viudati na labhati?, tambülamattam pi!° etissë!l dinnapubbam па bhavissati, 
kimkaáranš: itthiyo пёша ekarh divssam рі srhkarn!! svsttharitvë nipsnnasámi- 
kambi!! badayam bhinditurn па sakkonti, ayari рапа šlšrike bhate't pose âlâri- 
khattañ ca bbatakattañ 15 ca upagate etasmirn't purise mūləna anatthike !! ke- 
valah imami yeva nissšya r. pahšya ăgantvă ovan dukkherh annbhavante 
pațisanthäramattam pi пе karoti'®, васе р! (2° amma tasmim sinebo n’ stthi 


askala-Jambudipe aggarājāà mam nissšya kilamatiti’! tases khiñcld eva daàturh 
arahasiil. 


Sā kbujjāya kujjbi”. Atha nam khujjá giváya gahetvš 
anto gabbhe khipitvā™ bahi hutvā dváram pidhāya áviñjana- 
rajjumhi "° olambanti айћаві, Pabbāvati narh gaheturh asakkonti 
dvaram6le {һаїуй akkosanti itaram р, а.: 


з Bd -haccayena. ? Bd -a, 5 Сі accšsayanarb. * Сі gate. * СЕ vsvatanens, 
Hd vetlanona. “ СЕ attbike, Bd anatthiko. ! Ck ekāyo-, Сг ekšse-. 5 Bd -га- 
divasena. ° Сёз omit nal-. !O Bd adds (епа. 11 Bd etassā. !! so Che; Ра 
agire 15 Сы -kambi, Bd -kampi, '4 Che gato. 1: Ва bhsttañ, 16 Сї 
еказш!ш. 17 C? -ko. !* Ва tar. 1° Bd кагов!. 2° Bd omite te. 3' Cha 
саи, 932 СЕ -ltvā, Cs kujjitrā 23 Bd adds sayah. °** Ch avUana-, Bd avic- 
chana-. 


1. Ковајасаке. (531.) 299 


зе. Na bi пйпйуаш ай! khujjā labhati jivbaya chedanam 

sunisitena satthena evam dubbbásitarn bhanan ti. 20. 

Тв, sunisltena 'q sujthu nisltens tikhinena вачћепе, evam dubbhi- 
sitan ti evar asotabbayuttakarn dubbhasitarn bhanan til. 

Atha khajjă &уібјапагајјшъ' gahetvā thitá va „nippuññe'‘ 
dabbinite tava rūparń kassa‘ kir karissati, Кій? тауаф tava 
тйреф kbāditvā yāpessāmā“‘ “і vatvā terasahi gáthšhi B-assa 
gunam pakëásenti khujjāgajjitan năma gajji: 

si. Mā пай rüpena pāmesi* агоћепа Pabhāvati, 

mahăyaso ti katvāna karassu rucire piyar. 21. 
эз. Ма паш гйрепа pëámesi% ārohena Pabbāvati, 
mahaddhano ti katvána —ре— 22, 
ss. Mā- - - mahabbalo ti katvāna —ре— 23. 
1 Ма - - - mahárattho ti katvāna —pe— 24, 
ss. Mā- - - mabārājāå ti Ка{уйпа —ре— 25. 

se. Mā - - - sihassaro ti katvāna —pe— 26. 

эи. Mā- - - vaggussaro ti Ка{уйпа -—pe— 27. 

зв. Ма - - - bindussaro ti Каќуйпа —pe— 28. 

в. Mā- - - mañjussaro ti katvána —pe— 29. 

s. Ма - - - madhussaro ti katvāna —pe— 30. 

s. Mā- - - satasippo ti Ка{уйпа —pe— 31. 

es. Ма - - - khattiyo’ ti pi° katvāna —ре— 32. 

в. Mā nam rüpena рашевї ārohena Pabhávati, 
Ковегёја ti katvāna* karassu rucire piyan ti. 33. 

Ta. mà nam тйрепа рёшез! šrohena Pabhâvatirti аге Pabhšvati 
mā {тай etah Kusanarindari айапо rüpena ёгоһерагіпёћела!°. рашіпі!!, 
måssu’’ етага pamaánar ganhi, mahāyaso ti mahānubhāvo во ti ета, hadaye 


katvš rucire ріуабазвапе karasau tassa'? piyarn, anubbavo yeva bi 'вза!* rūpan 
И vadati, esa nayo sabbattha, арі сг! mabšdhano ti mabābhogo, mahab- 


1 Cha omit вё. ? Bd švicchsna-. 5 Bd піррайбе. * Bd omit Шаза 5 Bd 
omits Ыл. * Bd рарев. ? Ck -уёуо. ° Chs amit pl. ° Ck vatvāna. ° Ck 
-parināba шаһа ёшо mahšrahena, Dd aropena parinābens. 1! Cke pameni. 
13 Ва passe. !2 Ck: -аѕа, !* Bd yepamabjsi. 15 Bd adds mahayaso t| maha- 
parivaro. 


15 


16 


20 


95 


800 XX. Sattatinipšts 


balo ti məhātbāmo!, mahirattho ti vipolerattho, mahārājā t sakaja- 
Jembudipe aggarājī, sihussaro ti sīhaaaddasamānasaddo, vaggussaro ti 
Jijšyuttasaro °, bindussaro tl sampinditaghanassaro, шабјоявато ti sun- 
darassaro, madbnusssro ti madhu vjya? yottassaro*, satesippo U paresan 
mantike asikkhitvë attano balen’ ета nipphanneanekasatasippo, khattlyo ti 
Okkškapavepiyarn 5 Jätassambhinoakhattiyo, Ковагај 5 41 Sakkadatuyakusatina- 
пёто гаја, ехагӣро bi аббо гёјё nâma n' айћі Jšnitvá etassa руаш 
karohîti, ettikâbl gāthāhi tassa gunarh kathesi. 


5а (азва vacanam sutvă ,khujje ativiya gajjasi, hatthena 
рёрипап(ї* sassāmikabhāvarh te' jánápessšámiti'“ khujjam taj- 
jesi. Sápi namh „abar tam rakkhamānā pitono te Kusarájassa 
āgatabhāva nârocemi’, hoto ajja raño ārocessāmîti“ maban- 
tena saddena ta bhāyāpesi. Sā ,kocid eva na snneyyñ“ ‘ti 
КЪојјаф saññápesi. В. pi паш passiturh alabhanto sattamüšse 
dubbhojanena dukkhaseyyáya kilamanto cintesi: „ko me etāya 
attho, sattamáse pi vasanto eta passitum рї оа labhāmi, 
ativiya kakkhaļā зёһавіка ", gantvā mātāpitaro passissñmiti““, 
Tasmih khane Sakko āvajjanto tassa ukkanthitabhávam ñatvă 
„гаја sattamāse Pabhávatim datthum pi ra labhati, labhana- 
káranam assa karissamiti“ Маййагаппо düte katvā sattannarh 
гёўйпаш düte'?* páhento'* ,,Pabhšvati Ковагёјапаф'* chaddetvā 
араї&, āgacchantu Pabhávatirh'" gaņhantū“‘ ‘ti еКеКавва visurh 
visuh вйвапйёпї pahini. Те mabāparivārena рап{уй парага 
pattă aññamaññassa gatakáranam па jāuanti, ќе ,,tvarmh 
kasmá йра{о'* ti pucchitvá tam абай йаїуй kujjhitvā ‚,еКаш'' 
kira dhītararh sattannam dassati, passatb’ assa anācārar, 
uppandeti no, ganhatha nan“ ti „sabbesam™ рі amhākam 
Pabbāvstih vā detu yaddharh уй“* ti вйвапйпї pahiņitvā na- 
рагай parivarayirhsu, Maddarājā sāsanah sotvāâ bhftatasito 
amacce āmantetvă „Кій Кагошӣ“ ‘ti pacchi. Atha nam amaccă 


1 Bd omita mahabbalo - - -. ? Bd -вваго corr. to -saro. 3 Ck mādhuriya. * 
madhu --- wanting in Сә. ê Cks -ше-. © во Cs; Ck enanti, Bd hatthe mā 
ve guņant!. 7 Bd tab. ° Bd janissáëmid. ° Cè narocemi, Bd nārocesi, !0 
Bd omits na. !! Bd adde ti. 12 Bd „атр. 1# СЕ -15, Сг ete. 14 Ck Ja, Gs 
-jā corr. to -jarn. 1% Rd amits pe-. !! Cks tā. '? Cks etah, !* Ck sabbe. 


1. Kueajštaka. (531. 301 


„deva satta р’ іше! Pabhávatirh nissāya āgatā, (‘васе па das- 
sasi ракагаш bhinditvā nagaram pavisitvā jivitakkhayam pā- 
petvā r. gaņnhissāmā’ ‘ti vadanti, pākāre abhinne yeva tesar 
Pabhāvatith реветё '‹ "і vatvā 

se Ete опара upatthaddhá sabbe titthanti vammitā*, 

рога maddanti pákárarh йпепї' etah Pabhāvatin ti 34, 
g. ёһатво. 

Та. apatthaddhā ti atitthaddhä dappita t, anentetan tl šnentu etarb 
Pabhavatin ti sāsanāni раһїпїшзи, tasmā yšáva  ete nāgā pšákëárar па maddanti 
tiva певатй Pabhávatirh pesehi таһага)а "u. 

Баја tah sutvš ,,sac' āharn ekassa Pabhšvatim ревевзёті 
зезё yuddharh karissanti, na sakkā ekassa daturh, sakala- 
Jambudipe aggarājānarnh cbaddetvā* āgamanassa phala la- 
bhatu', vadhitvā nam sattakhandáni katvā sattannarh ревеввй- 
miti“ vadanto anantaram g. й.: 

ss, Satta khande karitvána abam etah Pabhëvatim 

kbattiyánarn padassāmi уе шаш hantam idbâgatā ti. 35. 

Tassa sā kathā sakalanivesañe рёКаќа ahosi, paricãrikā 
gantvā „гаја kira (аф satta kbandáni katvā sattanuarn rājū- 
naro pesessatiti“ Pabhavatiya ārocesuh. Sā maraņabhaya- 
ЪМї& āsanā vuțțthâya bhaginihi parivutā mātu sirigabbham 
agamāsi, 

Tam айһай pakāsento Satthā ёһа: 

зв. Ари аһ! rājaputtì зёша koseyyavāsinī 

assupunnehi nettehi dāsigaņapurakkhatā ti. 36. 

Та. аёша ti suvaunsvanpšá, koseyyavåsiniti suvapnakhacitakoseyya- 
nivāsanā. 

Sā тёп santikah gantvā mātarah vanditvă parideva- 
maná 4.: 


1 Ва satta тајёпо pl. > Bd ревіввашё. 3! ВФ-1%. * Bd Чарри& corr. to gab- 
bitë? 5 Bd adds yāva, * Bd adde āgatā. ? во all three MSS. for labhantu? 
° Bd айде khattiyān * Ва avuthahbl eorr. to av=. 


15 


25 


15 


35 


302 ХХ. 5айайприа. 


зт. Тап nüna kakkūpanisevitan mukharn 
ādāsadantātharupaccavekkhitarh 
subham sunettah virajam апайрапаш 
chuddharh vane thassati khattiyehi. 37. 
sa. Te пйпа me asite vellitagge 
kese mudü caudanasāralitte 
samëkule sfivathikáya majjhe 
pšdehi gijjbá parikaddhayanti. 38. 
зә. Та! nüna ше? tambanakhā snlomā 
баһа mudü candanasāralittā 
chinpa vane ujjhitë khattiyehi 
gayha vako* gacchati yenakámar 39. 
+. Те nūua tālūpanibhe alambe 
uisevite kāsikacaudanena 
thanesu me lambahiti* sigálo 
mātū va putto taruņo tanüjo. 40. 
a, Tan nūnà sonin puthulam snkotthitam ° 
оівеуі(аго kañcanamekhaJáhi * 
сһіооай vane khattiyehi avattharh 
gayhā vako’ gacchati уепакйёшай 41. 
а. Sonë хака sigālā са уе c' aññe santi dathino 
ајага nüna hessanti bhakkhayitváë Pabhávatim. 42. 
а. Sace marhsš° hariyirhsu° khattiyá dūragāmino 
atthtni атша yācitvā anupathe” dahātha паш'!. 43. 
<. Khettāni amma kāretvā kanikár' ettha ropaya'*, 
yada te pupphitā assu'' hemantānarh himaceaye 
sareyyštha mama атта: evamvannë Pabhävatiti. 44. 


Та. kakkupanissvilan ti sšzsapakakkulonakakkumattikakakkutilakakku- 
haliddikakkü mukhacunnako!! ti Imehl райсаһі kakkühi орапівеғіќагр, 


1 Che as. 2 Ске mam. 2? Bd vaüko. * so Che for lambihlG, Ваё lambissati? 
5 Ва -kotitan. ô Bd -lehl. ! Bd dhaiko. * Сә Bd -api. °’ Ck bari-, Bd 
harisu. !9° С%е _patthe. !! во Ck» Гог në = ušni? Bd mar. !? pd -уе, !° 
Hd asum. !* Bd -ke, Сёз omit kekku after lona. 


1. Kusajātaka. (531.) 303 


ādāsadentātbarūupaccavekkbitan ti dantamayatharumhi âdāse pacca- 
vokkhitarnh katvā! oloketvā manditarm, subhan tl subhamukharh, virajan u 
ч!даїага]ай nimmalarh, ana ñganan Ü vañgspllakāčldosarahlterh °, chuddhan s 
Ч emma evarūpah mama mukbarn аддһа idaní kħattiyebt сһадфіаф агайбе 
Vaue thassatiti paridevi, asite tl kšleke, veliltsgge ti natagge, sivathi- 
käyä 'u susšanambi, рагікаффһћауаці й“ evarüpe шаша kese manussemarh- 
aakhädakagijjhā pádehl раһагіітё nüna parikaddhisaanti*, gayhëá vako® gac- 
chati уепакёшап ti amma таша evarüparh báhar обпа vako" gahetvšá luñ- 
cltvā khšádanto уепаййтаап› gaccheil, tālūpanibhe ti suvannathlaphalasadiso, 
kāsikacandanenā 'ú sukbumacandanena sevite? nisevita, thanesu me ti 
amma шаша susine patitšya evarūpe thane disvë mukbena dasitvë tesu me 
thanesu attano tenujo mātu tarupaputto viya попа sigšlo lamblssati, sonin 
tl kallputhulaks 5, sukofthltan? ti gohanukona pabaritvā sukoțțhitarii "°, 
avatthan ti chadditah, bhakhhayltvšá t| amma ote ettakš пйпа mama 
marisah khbāditvā ajarāmarā bhavlesanıîti!', bariylirhsü '112 amma aace 
khattlya mayi patibaddhacittë mama maməsāni һагоуушй atha tumbe atthini 
yåcitvā анорае!ё dahâtha паш!* jarnghamaggamahamagganarn !° antata da- 
heyyštháë 'tl уајай, khettünid amma mama jhapitatthana màlärattbūni 
kâretvă ettha сова khettesu kapikirarukkhe горауе, himaccaye ti hima- 
pštátikkamo phaggumāse!®, sareyyāthā “tl ева роррЬёпаф сайдо- 
takarn!! püretvá urüsu (hapetvá mama dhītā Pabbāvati evarbvannë ti saroy“ 
ум ‘ti. 


Iti вй maranabhayatajjit&ë mātua santike vilapi. Madda- 


rājâpi pharasuñ са ganthikañ'' са gahetvā „coraghāto" idh 
eva agacchatü“ `1 апйревї. Tassa йрашапаш sakalaršjagehe 
pškatam ™ аћові. Ath’ assa” āgatabhāvarh впїуй Pabhāvatiyā 
ша(а?* uttháyásaná sokasamappită таййо santikarn agamási. 


Tam atthah pakāsento Setthā аһа: 
«в. Tassë mātā udatthāsi’™ khattiyă devavannin; 
disvā азїп'* ca sünañ ` са гаппо Maddassa thipure ti 45. 


! Bd tatıths. °? Bd kapdapi-. > Bd su-. * Bd -kadhissantiti. * Ва škaqhi-. 
* Ва dbañko. 7 Ckə-tab, Ва -ta. ® Ck kaqiph. › ра stl- 1° Ba 
suvsjbi-. 11 Rd -issanti. ’? Ck bariyiheuci, C? hariylibhsuclti, Ва harlsuti. 
10 Ска _patthe. 1% Bd mā. 15 Bd jabgbamagge jarhghamagga-. !* Bd 
paggqpa-. 17 Bd ацтаппесапко-. !® Ck -цай, Bd bhandikañ. !# Bd .ghštako. 
20 Chka -to. 31 Bd aš tassa, 7? Oks tu, 33 Cka utthasl. 34 Cha āe. 35 Che 
sutañ, Bd вппїп. 


10 


15 


90 


30 


20 


95 


304 XX. Sattatiplpëta 


Ta. udsttbasl1dl азапа rutthëya гайпо santlkam дапїтё stthšsl, авібса? 
“1 antepuramhi slarnkatamabštale rañño parato nikkhittarn pharasuñ cs gaņ- 
thikaü * са disvë vilapanti. 
ае. Iminëš пйпа asină* susaññam tanomajjhimam 
dhitarah Maddo hantvšána khattiyáënarh padassatiti р. аё. 46. 


Та. asina ti pharasnum вапдЬёуёћа, so bi imasmim thšne asi паша }&о, 


susaüñam tanumasjjblman ti sutthu saüüQštarb tanumaljbimarb. 


Atha nam rājă saññapento аһа: ,,devi, kim kathesi, tava 
дьа sakala-Jambudipe aggaršjánarm virūpo ti chaddetvš gata- 
magge padavalañje avinatthe yeva шассош“ nalátenádáya ägatā, 
idāni attano rüpan рівѕёуа issásaphalam'labhatü*'ti, Sá tassa 
уасапаш sutvá dhitu santikarh gaptvë vilapanti а, : 

«a. Na me акӣзі vacanarh atthakămăya puttaki’, 

sâjja’ lohitasañchannā gañchisi'° Yamasădanah". 47. 
а. Evam āpajjati poso pápiyañ са nigacchati (ШІ 22) 

yo ve" hitánarn vacanarh na karoti atthadassinam. 48, 
«. Sace {уаш ajja váresi kumáram сёгойавзараш 

Kusena játam khattiyam suvannamanimekhalam 

рӣјиа ñatisarhghehi па райсііѕі'* Yamakkhayam. 49. 

so. Yatth'assu bheri nadati kuñjaro са'* pikuñjati'° 

khattiyanam kule bhadde, kin по sukhataram tato., 50. 

и. Asso са sirhsati'* dvăre kumáro с' uparodati 
khattiyáuam Које bhadde, kin пп sukhataram tato. 51. 
ss, Mayärakoñcābhirade kokilābhinikuñjite™ еіс. 59. 
Та. puttakiti!! nab šlapati, i, v.h.: amma kih Idha karíssssl'" sāmi- 


kaasa santikerñ gaccha mā rüpamadens gajjiti22 өташ уйсатї!уёр! ше vacanam 
па?! akâsi аё? ajja lobitassñchannë23 gañchlel?* Yamasidanarn tt maccu- 


1 Ck uttb-, Сг vupth-. 2 Ска omit а-. 5 Ске sut-, C*sun-, Bd вп-. * Ва 
gandi-. * СЕ шауіпё, Се masin. * Ck -u, Се macca. T! Bd аізат-. ° Bd 
puttike * Bd атаја 10 Се gañjisi, Dd gucchasi. '? all three MSS. -ва- 
dhanarn. '? Ва ge. 1! CE gaccbisl, Сг gañjisi, Rd gacchasi. 1* Che va. 14 
Bd nikuj-. 14 во Ck: Ce sihsaG, Bd зіва: road Һіфвац? 17 Rd -kujjite, 16 
Bå -iketl. 1° Ck -взы!, Сә -вѕай. 80 Rd majjiti. *! Ck namn, Се гаш, " 
Ске omit sā. 3% Ске „аш, %* Cs gañjisl, Rd gacchesi. ?° ali three MSS. -dhe-. 


1. Kusajātaka. (531.) 805 


bhavana 1 gamissssiti, рёріуабса 'd ito pāpatarañ ca nigacchatl, васе ca 
ajja všresit) amma sace tvari cittavaserh йдап(уй Kusanarindarh paíticcalsd- 
dharh attano rüpena sadisarh cârudassanarh kumārah aridhaylssa', Yamak- 
klayan ti eram sante Ташап[чезапат па geccheyyësi, tato ti yambl kbatti- 
yakule ayar vibhbūti tamhë nāņābherisaddena с eva mettavârapakuñcanādena са 
blnnäditā Kusāvatírājakulā kiu nu kho sukhatararo 91878 idhêgatâsiti a, 
blihsatiti" hessatl*, kumāro t susflkkhito во gandhabbekumāro*, uparo- 
datitl uānāturlyäni дзћеста 6 npabārarıù karoti, kokilšbhinikuüjite? ti 
Киѕагёјакиіе säyspāteh"” psvattarn gitevāditūpabāram pațlppharanti® vlya ko- 
khilšhi abliíniküjite!'9, 
lu så ettikáhi gáthšhi'! taya saddhirn wallapitvá „sace ajja 
Kusanarindo idha assa іше вайа гајёпо palápetvë mama dhi- 
taran dukkbā mocetvā ādâya gaccheyyā* 'ti cintetvš 
ss. Kahan nu sattudamano” pararatthappamaddano 
Kuso ао]йгараййапо '°, во'* no dukkb8š pamocaye ti g. &. 53. 


Tattha solšrapaññašno 5 ti ulárapañüo, 


Tato PahhávatI „mama mātu Kusassa vannam bhaņantiyā 
mukha na-ppahoti, Ācikkhissāmi tāv' аваа!" tassa idh' eva 
šlárikakammarñ katvá vasanabhāvan“‘ ti cintetvá 

sa Idh' eva no” sattudamano'* pararatthappamaddano 

Kuso solárapaññáno'', so no? sabbe vadhissatiti р.а. 54. 

Atb’ assá таса „ayah marapabhayabhitā vilapatiti*"!“* 
cintetvă 

в. Ummattikā nu bhanasi ādu” bālā уа bhāsasi, 
Kuso се'* āgato assa kirh па jānemu tarn mayan ti р.а. 55. 
Та. bålă t! mūļhā аййап& hutvā, kim па }&пешй '11 kena kāraņena па 


Jiueyyâma, зо bl antarāmagge (hito va amhbākain sāsauain peseyya samvesita- 
dhejassa caturañgiuï senâ райййув!һа?* tvah pana maranabhayena kathesiti. 


? Ck -пё, C? macca-, Bd maccurâjânamh bhavanaiu. 2 Bd staraylasasi, 3 во 
Che; Bd sisatitl corr. to hasisa-. * soall threas MSS. for hesati? 5 Сів -amba-, 
Bd -аррь-. * Che add tš. 7 Ске -lāhi-, all three MSS. -kujite. 5 Ck вауага- 
páuerb, Bd зёуатрёсат. ! Сг -ti; read -tībl? 19 Ck Bd -kujite. !! Cke omit 
gš=. !% Ва sattuwaddano. !3 Dd so ulš-, Се sūlūrae. !* Bd уо. ! Ck sâlūra-, 
1* Ck tăvassa, Сә sEvassa, Ва taseš. !' pd зо, 12 Ва -maddano. 
+С sälä.. 20 Па yo чө. 3: Ck vllapanti, Сг тарап. 32 Bd andba. 28 
Che са. %* Oks -petha. 
huta Y. 20 


10 


15 


10 


15 


ао 


РУ 


306 XX. Sattaunipšáts. 


Sā еуаф vutte „па ше måtā saddahati, tassa idhâgantvă 
sattamáse vasanabhávar па jānāti’, dassessāmi nan“ ti cin- 
tetvā тёќагаш hatthe gahetvā sihapañjararb vivaritvā hattham 
pasšretvá dassenti : 

ss. Eso ñlšriko poso kumaripuramautare 

dalhar Каїуйпа sarnvellih* kuibhi* dhovati onato ti g. 56. 

Ta. kumāripuramantare 11 {аза Чһїїпаїй kumărinañi vasanatiha- 
nantare* olokebi, ватуе111п®* tì kaccharn bandhltvàt kumbbaiii? dhovatiri. 

So kira tadā ,,ajja шаша тагогаїһо matthakah pā- 
pūnissati, addhá maraņabhayatajjitā Pabhāvatī mamâgata- 
Ъћауат* kathessati, bhájanani dhovitva patisáamessámiti%“ uda- 
Кап! āharitvā bhājanāni dhoviturn árabhi, А(һа* nah mātā 
paribhäsanti : 

и. Мепї!° {уаш asi candälìi айй si kulagatthini'', 

kathan Maddakule jatá dásar kayirāsi™ kamnkan ti р.а. 57. 

Ta, veniti 1% taccbikã’f, айй si kulagattbinîti!® udáhu tvah kula- 
дйвіка, kámukan ti kathah пата tvar evarüpe kule Jātå attano sāmikai 
даѕагі '* кагеуудвій. 

Tato Pabhšvati'' „mama mātā imassa mar nissāya еуаш- 
vasanabhávam na jānāti, таййе“ ti cintetva itararh g. й.: 

ъв. № amhi уепї'" па candali, па с’ amhi kulagatthini ”, 
Okkākaputto bhaddan te {уаш по даво ti maññasiti. 58. 


Ta. Okkakaputto ti amma vsa Okkâkaputto tvarn pana dåso ti таййав! 
kasmā паш aharn dáso tÍ kathoasāmiti. 


1Чапї "зѕа yasar ™ 


vaunenti Яћа: 
ье. Yo bráhinanasahassáni sadā bhojeti visatim 


Okkākaputto bhaddan te tvah nu dāso ti іпайбаѕі, 59. 


1 pd jänâmi. 2 Bd -ah. 3 all three MSS. -i. + Bë -ena. ° Bd -ап. 6 Сз 
їассһа:а, omitting bandbitvā. ? Bd ЉЫ. ° Bd mam āg-. ° Ck adds са. !9 
Ck venu, C? veni, Bd venl. !! Bd -vaddbini. 22 Cke -asi 12 Ck» veniel, 
Ва зеп. í Ck -ukā. 15 Bd -viddhlniti. 15 Ck dasikarn, Bd діва katvā. 
17 Ck stiti, Сг pabháti, Bd pabhärati '® Сз veni, Ва veni. !» Bd -viddbini. 
20 Ва sari. 


J. Kusajātaka. (551.) 307 


во. Yassa nëgasahassáni sadá yojenti vigatirh 
Okkākapatto bhaddan te {уаш по dāso ti maññasi. 60, 
«1. Yassa авваѕаһазварі sadëá yojenti visatim еіс. 61, 
өз. Yassa rathasahassáni вада yojenti visatim etc. 62, 
ss. Yassa пвабћаваһаввёрі sadá yojenti-visatim еіс. 63, 
в. Yassa dhenosahbassāni sadá duyhanti’ visati? etc. 64, 
Evai (дуа chahi* gāthāhi М-аева yaso vaņņito. Ath 
assā’ mātā „ayah asambhītā katheti*, addhā evam etan“ ti 
saddahitvā. rañño santika gaotvā tam attharn ārocesi. So 
vegena Pabhāvatiyā santikarn āgantvā’ „sacca kira amma 
Кизагӣја idhâgato" ti, „Аша tšta° ajja? sattamāsā” tava 
dhîtānarh alárikattarn karontassá%“ ‘і, So tassa asaddahanto 
khujjan расеһйу& yathšábhütar sutvā дага garahanto : 
a. Taggha te dukkatam '! Баје yam khattiyah mahabbalarh 
nâgarh'” mandükavannena 
na tarh akkhās' idhágatan ” ti g. &. 65. 


Таса tagghå "d ekariee nipáto val4, 


Eva dhitararn garahitvā vegena tassa santika gantvā 
katapatisanthāro aūjalim paggayha attano accayam dassento : 
вв. Aparādbarh mahárüja {уап no khama rathesabha 
yam ta aññătavesena na ñasimha'' idhâgatan ti р. &. 66. 
Таш sutvā М. ,sac` āhar рһаговат vakkbāmi idh' ev’ 
assa hadayam phalissati, вевӣзеѕвёші пап“ ti cintetvá bhā- 
janantare thito itaran g. й.: 
ar. Мадіѕаваа na tah сһаппаф yo ‘ham aláriko bhave, 
{уап ñeva me pasidassu, n'atthi te deva dakkatan ti g. а. 67. 
Rajá tassa santikā patisantbárarh labbitvë pásádam āru- 
уһа'* Pabhávatim pakkositvā khamāpanatthāya ревеќай: 


1 this verse Із wanting In Ва. 2 Bd Juhanil. > Ск tir. 4 Bd pañcahl. 5 
Ске assa. * Ва «1. 7 Bd запета. * Bd tātāti. 9 Hd ajjassa. !° Bd -во. '! 
Rd -tan '? Ck -a, Ва -о. '® Bd -зіёр-, 1* Bd -seneva. !? Сә -һа. !* 
Bd abhirūyhitvâ. 

90* 


95 


308 ХХ. Sattatinipāte, 


в. Gaccha bále khamāpehi Kusaršjam mahabbalarh, 
khamāpito Kusarájá во te dassati jivitap ti g. а. 68. 
Sā pitu vacanam sutvë bhaginihi c' eva paricárikáhi ca 
parivutā tassa santikam вратӣві. So рї kammakiáravesena ' 
thito va tassš attano santikarn šgamanarm ñatvå „ajja Pabhá- 
Yatiyá mnam bhinditvá pādamūle narh kalale nipajjëpessámiti** 
sabbar айап? ábhataudakarn?' chaddetvë khalamapdalamattam 
thšánarn madditvš ekakalalarn akāsi. Sā tassa santikarh gantvā 
tassa pādesu patitvā kalalapitthe пїраппй tah Кһатайревї. 
Тет ааш āvikaronto* Satthë: 
вә. Pitussa vacanam sutvā devavanni Раһһата 
sirasā aggabi райе Кизагајаф mababbalan ti g. å. 69. 


Ta. sirasš t! sirasš nipatitvā, Kusarâjan tl Kusarñjarn t раде aggalesi, 
Rahetvá ca pana kbemāpenti tisso gāthā ā.: 


то. Yë imá' ratyá atikkantá imá' deva tayā viņā, 

vande te sirasā раде, më те" kujjhi rathesabha, 70, 
z. баесаш te patijanáami, mahárája sunohi me, 

па cápi appiyarn ќиуһаф kareyyámi aharn puna. 71. 
т. Evañ ce уйсашапйуа vacanarm ше па kāhasi 

idāni таф tato hantvā kbattiyánam padassatiti. 72. 


Ta.ratyā ti rattlyo, tā іта 01° tā'° Imá зарЬёрі (ауа vinā vs atikkantā, 
вассаг!! to patjijanamitl mabārāja ettakarb Кар mayá tava applyam eva 
Кабат idaih te ahari вассай!! patjjanami, aparam pi sunohi me!’ ito pattbâ- 
yåhai pana tuyhari appiyaù na kerlssāmi, етабсе!® ti saco evarh yácamanāya 
mama tvar vacanah па karissasîrti !*. 

Tam sotvă răjă „sac' ёһат imar ‘tvah бета janissasiti' 
vakkháami hadayam assā phalissati assásessámi nan“ ti 
cintetvå å.: 

тв. Evam ќе yácamánáya kih na kāhāmi te vaco, 
vikuddho ty-asmi!* kalyáni, mā (хаг bhāyi Pabhávati. 73. 


1 Ва -vasena, Ck катшатевепа, Сз хатшатевеца, # Bd -no. 3 Rd -tah-. * 


Ва ракавепіо. > Bd -jar corr. to -jassa. * Bd mā. 1 Bd кашё, ° Bd mam, 
è Ск ит, Cst? Rd Каша tl in the plece of 65 Imš t. 10 Соц, 1! Сиз 
зарбат. 1° Rd adds ti. !! Сә eran me. `t Ске <s. 15 Ck Bd атп. 


1. Kusasjitaka. (531.) 309 


та. Sacca ѓе ра{ї]йпатї гёјарибі sunohi те: 
па сёрі appiyarn tuyham Кагеууёті aham puna. 74. 
т. Tava kāmāhi' вовводі bahurn dukkharo titikkhissarh ’ 
bahü Maddakule* hantvā nayiturh tah Pabhávatiti. 75, 


Ta, kim na habamiti kimkäraņā tsva vacanarp па karissāmit, vi- 
kuddho tyasmiti* vikuddho nikkopo te asmi, васса te 115 vikuddhabhavañ 
са idåni appiyaakarapañ ca ubbayarp te idam вассат eva patijināmi, tava 
kämā (1 tava kamena tarh icchamšno, titikkhissan ti adblvāsəmi, bahūni® 
Maddarājakulāni’ hantvā balakkārena tam netum samattho р1®. 


So Sakkassa” devarañño paricárikarn'° viya tah attano 
parivārarn disvá khattiyamánam uppādetvā „mayi kira dhara- 
müne yeva mama bhariyarh айбе’ gahetvá gamissantiti“ siho 
viya гајайдапе vijambhamëáno „sakalanagaravāsino me ёваѓа- 
Ьрауаф janautü% 'ti vagganto nadanto appothento' ,,ійёпі te 
јтуараһаф gahessāmi, rathādayo yojentü“ ti anantararh g.à.: 

1. Yojayantu rathe asse nānācitre samáhite, 
atba dakkhatha me vegar vidhameptassa sattavo ti. 74. 


Ta. nānâcitre ti nanšlarnkáracitre, затаћіќе ti asse ssndhāya vuttarh, 
susikkblte nibblsevane ti sttho, atbs dakkhatba me vegan ti atha me 
patakkamath passissatha. 


„Sattūnarh ganhanərn паша шауһаш bhäāro, gaccha {уа 
nahátvā alarmkaritva pāsādah abhirüha%“ ‘ti {аш uyyojesi. 
Maddarājâpi "вва parihárakaranattharh amacce раһїпї. Те tassa 
таһапаѕайуёге yeva ѕаріил parikkhipitvā kappake upattha- 
pesum, So katamassukammo sisan nahāto sabbálarhkarapati- 
mandito amaccādiparivuto ,,pšsádam abhirūhissāmîti‘““ disá 
viloketvā appothesi'' olokitolokitatthánarn!”" pakampittha '°, 
So „idāni me parakkamarh passathëá* "ti å. 

Tam attham ракёзепіо Satthā anantaram g. â.: 

тт. Tan са tattha udikkhimsu гайпо Мвідвзза &һїриге'" 
vijambhamānarh siham ve роһепїаш!' digunam ! bhüjan ti. 77. 


1 Се kāmāma, Ck kâbāmi. 2 Сг titikkhiyarn, Ck udukkhlya. ? Bd -lam. * 
Ck -Inul, Bd intl. 5 Bd adds tł. * Ва babunti. ? Bd -kalam. 2 Вац. ° 
Bd atha во sakka, 10 Ва -vá=. D Ске „о. 13 Bd -tento. !% Bd -tesi. 14 
Сї sabbslokitatthane, 15 Bd kampitvi. 16 Ва maddassantepure. и р 
appote-. !* Bd dvi-. 


15 


30 


80 


10 


15 


95 


810 XX. Sattatinlpata, 


Т. а: tañ са ta. vijembhantai appothentan?’ rañño атериге? vita- 
pšnani vivaritrā itthlyo udikkhirbsü "1. I 


Ath’ авза Maddarājā kataánaüjakaranam alarnkataváranam 
ревезі. So" samussitasetacchattarn hatthikkhandham агоуһа 
„Pabbāvatim ānethā“ `ti tam рі pacchato nisidāpetvā catu- 
rañginiyā senáya parivuto рёсїрайуагепа nikkhamitvā parase- 
nam oloketvā „ahai Коѕагӣјё, jīvitatthikā* udarena nipajjantü*“ 
'ti tikkhatturn вїћапабат vaditvā sattumathanarh' akāsi. 


Tam attham pakšsento Satthă aha: 
тв, Hatthikkhandhañ са áruyha åropetvā Pabhāvatiù _ 
зайрашаш оќагіітёпа sihanëdam пайї Kuso. 78. 
тә. Tassa tam nadato sutvë sihassëév' аге migā 
khattiyàpi palayimsu Kusasaddabhayatthitã". 79. 
во. Hattháruhü'anikatthë гака pattikārikā 
аййашайпазза khundanti” Kusasaddabhayatthitā“. 80. 
e Tasmim запратазїзазт!ї passitvā hatthamanaso” 
Kusassa гардо devindo adā Verocanam manim. 81. 
вз. бо tam vijitva'" ѕапраташ laddhā Уегосапай manim 
hatthikkhandhagato гаја pāvekkhi Nagaram puram. 82. 
es. Jivagāham gahetvāna bandhitvë sattukbattiye '' 
зазигазз' !' upanāmesi: іше te deva sattavo. 83. 
as. Sabbe va te vasam раќа !* amitt& vibatå'* tava, 
kamam karohi ќе tayā, muüca vā te'* hanassu vā ti. &@4. 


Та. palšáylirhsü'* 'ti sati paccupatthāpeturn asakkontā vipasllatthacittë 
bhljjinsu, Kusasaddabhayatthita* ti Kusarañño ваййеш nissšya Jštena 
bhayena upaddutšá mülhacittá, аййашаййазза khundantiti° аййашайбап 
cbindanti, chindirmsü'!? 'u рі pátho, tasmin ti evan B-assa saddasavanen' eva! 
bbinne tasmíir sañgšmasise ta М-авве parakkamari passitvā totthabadayo 
Sakko!? Verocauarn uāma mapikkhandharb tassa adšsi, Nagaram puran ti 
NagarasabkhLātain purah, bandhitva ti tesan yeva uttarlsātakena pacchš- 
bābah bandħitvā, kámarh karobi te {ауа ti tvah attano Кашат íccharn 
ruci karobi, ete bl tayā dāsakatâpi eubatā yevi™? "u. 


1 Bd арроќе-. *# Rd anto-. > Cte omit во. * Ско jivika-. * Bd -шайдапат. 
* Hd -yațtitā, Ck -ysmthitã. 7 Bd -rohā. * Ck bundan-. Bd chindan-. * Ck 
pattba-, Bd tutha-. '° Cë vlditvá, Bd jitvëna. 11 Cks satta, '? Сёз -вва, 13 
Cko vassgatarn, Bd чаваф Каста corr. to vasario gantva? !* Cs vibātä, Bd vigatā. 
15 Cks ne, '* Bd ripps-. !* Rd bbindisu. ?* Ck saddarovan-, Bd -neneva 
marigapie, °* Cka omit saiko. 2° Bd dšsákatë yerā. 


1. Кивајзака. (531.) 811 


Наја аһа: 
вв. Тпућ’ еуа' sattavo ete, па h’ ete’ mayhan sattavo, 
{уай ñeva по таћагаја!, muñca vā te‘ hanassu vā ti, 85. 


Tattha tvañüeva no ti maharaja tvari yeva amhåkarn lsssro. 


Evah vutte M. „kiih imehi máritehi, mā nesarn ágamanarh 
niratthakarh hotu’, Pabhāvatiyā kanitthá satta Maddaraüño 
dhitaro atthi tā nesarn ййреввйт!її** cintetvā: 

вв. Imā* te dhbītaro satta devakaññásamá subhá, 

dadāhi tesa ekekarh, hontu jāmātaro tavan’ ti g.ā. 86. 

Atha паш rājā йһа: 

и. Amhākañ с' eva tāsañ ca tvah no sabbesam issaro, 

(уай üeva no mahārājāå’, dehi nesarh yad icchasîti. 87. 


Ta. tvanno aabbosan t! mabārñja Kusanarinda kirh vadasi tvarb etesañ 
ca sattsnnaih rājūnah mama ca Imšsañ re sabbesan по issaro, yadicchasiti 
yadt Icchasí уавва тё уаг °? Iccha»i сазва tath dobiti. 


So" tā sabbâpi alarnkárápetvá ekekassa гайпо ekekarh adāsi. 


Тат attbah pakasento S. райса gathá abhāsi: 
se. Ekamekasse ekekarn адё sihassaro Kuso 
khattiyanam tadā tesam rañāōo Maddassa dhitaro. 88. 
вә. Pinita'! tena lābhena tuttbā sihmssare Kuse 
sakaratthëni'' payirhsu khattiyà satta távade, 89. 
9. Pabhāvatiñ ca адвуа manih Verocanam tad 
Kusavatin Kuso таја agamāsi mababbalo. 90. 
ә. Ty-assu ekarathe yantā pavisanta Kusavatim 
samānavaņnarūpene n’ aññamaññàtirocisum W, 91. 
з. Matñá puttena samgañnchi' , ubhayo са jayampati 
samaggā te {айй üsurm, phitam dharanim ётвзор ti. 92. 


Ta pīņitā!’ tl santappitá, paylrhsü 'ti Idānl appamattā bhaveyyñthá 
"И Kusanarindena ovaditš!* agamarnsu, ағат ёвї Кайрап vasitvë ambškarp 


1 Ck tuyhevat(ha. 2 Bd hite. ? Cs Bd .Ja. * Ске по, > Bd hotüti. * Сі 
ime. ! Bd tavâ. 6 all three MSS -Ja, ° Сё yasvšyarh, Сә влеватёуәф, Ва 
yasa уай dêtuih tava, 10 Rd evam vutte во. !! Bd рапіса, !3 Ске вакё-. 15 
C: па añ-, Ck Bd оши n, Bd аййашайбйага patirocisu. !* Сг -ñJi, Bd -cch!. 
13 Ck pipita, Сг рїп, Bd рапка. ' Сіз -ікев, 


30 


10 


15 


30 


25 


30 


312 ХХ, Sattatinlpâts. 


rattbaih gamlssämîti sasuran apucchitvë gato, ekarsthe yantă ti dve pi 
ekaratharù abhiruyha,gacchanti, вашёпатаопагӣрепё ‘ti vannena ca rüpena 
са зашіпі botvā па! аббашабба(ігосівоп ti еко ekarh nâtlikkami?, mani- 
Tatanânubbāvena kira M. abbirūpo аһоз1 euvapnaraņnņno eobhaggappatto, səm- 
gañchtti* M-assa агашапагп sutçë baburh pançâkârańh ädāya paceuggamanaro 
katvë вашёдабсЫ *, во рі màtarš saddhirh yeva nagararh padakkhiņain katvā 
alartnkatapšsidstalam abbirübi, jayampatiti te рі ubho” jayampatikë samakRë 
аһевот, tato ра|{һзуа са рапа yivajivarn вашава5 вашшобатёпі phiterb 
dharanirn ajjhšëvasirnsü ‘Н, Е 

S. i.d. ё. в. р. j.s. (Ѕассарагіуозапе ukkanthitabhikkhu sotapatti- 
phale ран аы): „Tadā тёїїрйїаго шеһёгајакуапі аһевит, kanittho 
Anando, khujja Khujjuttarā, Раһһауаїт Rābulamātā, parisā Buddha- 
parisa, Kusarãjā aham eva" "i Kusajātakam. 


2. Sona-Nanda-jātaka. 

Devatâ nu siti. Idah S. j. v. matiposakabhikkhum ё, k. 
Vattbum Samajaátake vatthusadisam. “ada pana S. „mā bhikkhave 
imam bhikkbhum ujbayatba°, porāgakapaņditā sakala-Jambudipe r. 
labhamānåpi agahetvā mātāpitaro posimsü'!" `ti vatvā а, й.: 

А. Вагапазї Brahmavaddhanarh nāna парага! ahosi. Ta. 
Manojo оёша гаја г. Кёгеві. Ta. аббаѓаго asltikotivibhavo 
bráhmanamahësálo apattako аћові, tassa brâhmaņf ten’ eva 
„bhoti puttan patthehîti‘“ vuttā’ patthesi. Atha B. Brahma- 
lokā cavitvā tassā kncchimhi pațisandhih ganhi, játassa c' 
assa Зопакотюёго ti пйётага Кагїїзи. Tassa padaságamana- 
kale аййо pi satto Brahmalokā cavitvā {авай yeva kucchismim'* 
patisandhih ganhi, tassa ]йїавза'° Naodakumāro ti námarh 
karimsu. Tesar uggahitavedānarnh sabbasippe pipphattirh ра11й- 
nam'' rüpasampadarm disvā Ьгёһтаро bráhmanim āmantetvă 
„bhoti pottan Sonakumárarn gharabaudhanena bandhissámáš“ 
чо. Sa s| 8ñdhü' "і ғатрайссЬйуа puttassa tam atthamn 


1 Bd omita па. > Bd -isu. > Са .бјїй, Ck Bd -ccblu. * Ce -ар, Bd -cebt. 
3 Ck ubhayo. 2. N-to : Nandapandito, S-to = Sonspandito. 6 Bd -yittha. " 
Bå adda уву. 5 Bd -е °% Hd Аш. '° Bd omits jā-. 1! Bd adda veya- 
райапат. 


2. Soua-Nanda-Játaka. (532.) 313 


ācikkhi. So „alah amma mayhan gharšávásena, ahar hi 
yñvajivam tumhe patijaggitvā tumhákarh accayena Himavantarm 
pavisitvā pabbajissāmîti“. Sā brāhmaņassa tam' attharn йго- 
cesi. Te рапаррппа khathentâpi tassa cittarh alabhitvā 
Nandakumaáram âmantetvā ,tāta tena hi tvarh kutumbarh pati- 
pajja?“ "і vatv& ,náharn bhātarā chadditakilesarn* sisena 
ukkhipámi, aham pi tumhšákarh ассауепа bhatará va saddhim 
pabbajissámiti%“ vatte „ime еуашй tarnnápi` каше jahanti, ki- 
mañga' pana тауаф sabbe va’ pabbajissámá%“ "і ciotetvā 
„tātā’, kih vo ашһаКаш accayena pabbajjáya', sabbe yeva" 
pabbajissāmā“ ‘і rañño ärocetvā sabbarh dhana dánamukhe 
vissajjetvá dāsajanarh bhujissarn katvā ñátinarn dátabbayuttakam 
datvā cattāĀro pi janā Brahmavaddhananagará nikkhamitvā 
Himavantapadese pañcapadumasañchannam saram пізвёуа ra- 
mantye vanasande assamarh māpetvā pabbajitvá ta, vasiisu. 
Ubho pi Ъћа‹аго mātāpitaro patijaggirmsu, рйїо va tesar danta- 
katthañ са mukhadhovanañ са datvá pannasšlañ са parivenañ 
са sammajjitvā рапїуатї upatthapetvá araññato madhura- 
phalëšni āharitvā mātāpitaro khádapenti unhena v& sitena vā 
магіпё'! nahăpenti, jatë sodhenti, pădaparikammādīni tesarh 
karonti, Evar addháne gate Nandapandito „тау ābhata- 
phaläphalān’ eva matápitaro khádapessšmiti'"“ hiyyo ca para- 
таһо'* са gahitatthānato уйш! vā tāni vā расо va aharitvá 
måtāpitaro khádápeti, te tāni khāditvāâ mukharn vikkhāletvā 
oposathikā bhavanti. Sonapaņdito pana Чйгаш gantvā ma- 
dhurëáni snpakkani áharitvá upanāmeti. Atha паш (е'* „tāta, 
kanitthena te šbhatáui mayah pāto va khāditvā uposathikā 
jâtă, idāni no attho о’ atthîti“ vadanti, iti tassa phaláphaláqi 
paribhogarh па labhanti vinassaqti, punadivasädisu™ pi tath’ 


1 Ва мат, >? Bd kathetvāpi, * Bd -āhi. * Ck -kilern, Ва -khelam. ва 
=vi, Ске oralt рі. * Bd ~am. ° Bd yeva, ° Bd -s. ° Ba adds idâneva. 10 
С®.ваһеуа, Сә гаһеса. 1! Bd рапіуепа. 2° Ck -mi, Bd -miti pūrato gantva. 
2: во Ck; Bd parabito, Се bbiyyo ca psramato? !* Rd omits te. '* Bd esesu. 


814 XX. Sattatipipata. 


evā ‘ti, етап во pañcaabhiññatava' düram gantvâpi* āharati, 
te ропа" па khádanti. Atha M. cintesi: ,mātāpitaro me sv- 
khumālā, Nando ca уаоі уй* tāni va араккайорраккаві* рһа1й- 
phaláni šharitvë khádápeti, eva sante ime na“ cirarh pa- 
vattissanti, vāremi’ пап“ ti, atha nam ámantetvñ , Nanda ito 
patthāya phalāphalan йһагїуй mamágamanarh patimanehi, 
ubho ekato va khadápessámá“%“ "і а, So еуат vutte рі attano 
va puah’ paccāsihsanto na tasea vacanam akāsi. M. 
„Nando mama vacanam akaranto ayuttarn karoti, рапареввйётпї* 
nan“ ti, tato „ekato va mātāpitaro patijaggissámiti'°“ cin- 
tetvā „Nanda, tvah anovädako, panditánarh vacanarh na ka- 
rosi, аһат jettho, mātāpitaro mamam eva '' bhārā™, abam eva 
ne pațijaggissāmi, tvah idha vasituh na lacchasi, aññattha 
yābîti tassa accharah pahari. бо tena paņpāmito” tassa 
santike tháturb asakkonto (аў vanditvā mátiápitaro правап- 
kamitvë tam attharn йгосе{уй attano paņpņasālarn pavisitvā 
kasinam oloketvā tam divasam eva райсёбћібӣ& '* attha sama- 
pattiyo nibbattetvā cintesi: „aham Sinerupādato ratanavālikarh 
ābaritvā mama bhátu Ppannasiálaparivege okiritvā bhátaram 
kbamāpetuńı pahomi, evam pana na sobhissati Anotattodakarh '" 
āharitvā khamāpessāmi, еуаш рї pa sobhissati sace me 
bhātā'* devatšnarh vasena (add па?) khameyya'' cattāro ma- 
bārājāno Sakkañ ca апеіуа'" Кһашареууаш, evam pi me" 
na sobhissati sakala-Jambudipe Manoja aggarājānam dir 
katvā rājāno ānetvā khamāpessāmi, eva sante шаша bhātu 
gono sakala-Jambudiparh °° avattharitvë gamissati, candasuriyo 
viya paññüyissatiti“ во (ётад eva iddhiyā gantvà Brahma- 
vaddhananagare tassa rañüo nivesanadváre otaritvā™ „eko 


1 Rd _atáya. ! Ва gantvá patitā. 2 Cè pana. ` Bd omits vā. > СЕ Bd .dupa-, 
Cs omite aduppakk. * Ck ға, 7 Bd vāressāmi, Š Ске -а, 9 so Ck; Cs рапё-. 
Bd раја-, read рапашевваёті? 1? Che -ssauii, '! Bd ше va !# Bd „0, !° во 
Се; Ck panamite, Bd palâplto. !* Ва -ayo. '* Bd anotattato uda-, !* Bd 
bbātarab. !' Ва kbamapeyyarh. '* Bd ёһагі(уа. '% зо Che for ce? Bd ошиз 
me. 1° pd -pe. % Bd adds tbito. 


2. Sona-Nanda-Jštaka. (532.) 315 


kira vo tāpaso datthukámo“ ti габбо агосёреві. Rājā „kim 
pabbajitassa mayá ditthena, šhëárattháya agato bhavissatitie“ 
bhattarn' pahini, Shattarn na icchi, taņndularh pahini', vatthāni 
pahini', müle* pahini, mülam na icchi, atha tassa santike 
dütam pesesi*, ,kimattharh kirágato siti“ so dütena puttho 
этёјапат upatțhāhiturh agato "тЫ á., гаја’ sutvá „bahā 
mama upatthăkā, attano tápasadhanimarm ° karotü: 'ti páhesi°, 
во tarh sutvā „ahar tumhákarh гаййо аіќапо balena sakala- 
Jambudīpe г. gahetvá dassāmîti* й., {апп sutv& гаја cintesi: 
„pabbajitā nama paņditā, Кайсї'° прайуагп jánissantiti“ tam 
pakkosāpetvā ё&вапат dāpetvā vanditvá ,bhante tumhe kira 
mayharh eakala-Jambudīpe г. gahetvă dassathā“ чі pucchi ", 
„Ата mahārājā“ “і. „Katha gaphissathā“ `1. ,,Maha- 
гаја antamaso khuddamakkhihāya pivanamattam рі lohitarh 
kassaci апиррайе!уй tava dhanacchedanar'’ akatvá attano 
iddhiyá va gahetvå dassámi',, kevala рарабсат akatvā ajj’ 
eva nikkhamiturn vattatiti*. So tassa™ saddahitvá вепайра- 
parivuto nikkhami, васе вепйуа unharb hoti N-to attano iddhiyá 
cháyarn Каїуй sitarn karoti, deve vassante senāya upari vassi- 
tor па deti, unham våta’ nivāreti™*, magge khëánukanta- 
kádayo sabbaparissaye antaradhëápeti, парра  kasinamandalarh 
viya samai" katvā sayar ákáse cammarh '° pattharitvā pallarn- 
kena nisinno вепйуа purato'° gacchati. Evam вепаш ädāya 
pathamarh Kosalaratthan gantvā nagarassa avidüre khandhā- 
vāra nivesetvā™ „yuddhah vā по detu vase và vattatū" 
*ti'' Kosalarañño dütarm раһевї, во Kkujjhitva * „кій ahah na 
гаја ti, yaddbarh dammîti“ вепат purakkhatvá'' nikkhami "', 


1 Bd s0 Ьћа-. ? Bd adds t. na icchi. 2? 114 adds v. na icchi. * Bd tampularh. 
3 Bd pahini ° Cks omit вї, ! Bd adds (ап. ° Bd tāpamassa kamma. ° 
Bd pesesi. 9 Bd Ш-. !! Bd pucchanti. !% Bd -ccbederb. 1! Bd adds ар) 
ca, !* Bd adds тасапап. 1? Ca vë na, Bd sita vā unham và. !% Bd ғатец. 
17 Ско visamasamaih. !* Bd campakhandar. !° Bd parivuto. 29 Bd nivā-, 
91 Bd deturh setacchattarn vā по deturh ki. 3° Bd adds аһа. 3: Bd rüpakkhi- 
їз. 34 Bd J.itva. 


0 


15 


35 


316 XX. Sattstinlpšta. 


dve senå yujjhituarn' árabhimsu, N-to dvionam рі antare attanë* 
nisinpam ajipacammarhn' mahantam katvā pasāretvå dvihi pi 
senáhi khittasare cammen’ eva sampaticchi, ekasenšya рі koci 
kandena viddho пйша vo’ atthi, hatthagatānarh pana kandanam 
khayena dve рі senā пігирӣуа* а!{һашвп. N-to рі° „та bhāyi 
таһ&га}й“ 'ti assñsetv&ë Kosalassa santikarn gantvá ‚„таһагаўа 
та Ъћауі, n° atthi te paripantho, tava г, tav’ eva bhavissati, 
kevalan Manojarañño уавата((ї* hohiti*% ё, So (азва va- 
сапат” saddahitvá ,,вадһа і sampaticchi, atha паш Mano- 
jassa santikarh netvá' „mahārāja, Ковајагёјё te vase vattati, 
imassa г. imass' eva hotü“%“ “ti, so° „eādhū“ "і sampaticchitv& 
tarb attano vase vattetvë dve senā аййуа Añüñgarattham gantvë 
Айдай '° са gabetvā Magadharatthe Magadhan ti eten’ прйуепа 
sakala-Jambudīpe гёјёро attano vase vattetvā tehi parivuto 
Brahmavaddhananagaram eva gato, г. ganhanto рап’ esam '' 
вваопаф вашуассһагаёпаш upari sattadivasādhikehi sattamá- 
sehi дап, во ekekarājadhānito nānappakārarb khajjabhojjam 
āharāpetvā ekasatarn гаўйпо gahetvā tehi saddhirn sattāharh 
таһёрйпаг pivi. N-to „yâva rājā sattāharh issariyasukharh ano- 
bhoti 149° assa attànarn ра dassessñuniti'"%“ Uttarakaramhbi 
pindaya сагйуй Himavati™ Kañcanaguhadvāre ва{{йһаш vasi. 
Manojo pi sattame divase'* attano шаһапїаш sirivibhavarh 
oloketvá „ayah yaso па" mayham mātāpitūhi па '* aūñehi 
dinno, Nandatápasarh'' nissāya uppanno, tah kho рапа me 
apassantassa ajja sattamo divaso, kahan nu kho me yasadā- 
yako sahāyo“ ti N-tar sari. So tassa аппввагапаЫһйуаш 
ñatvá āgantvā purato käse atțthāsi. So cintesi: „aham imassa 
tāpasassa devabhāvah vā manassabhāvah vā na jānāmi, васе 


1 Bd yujhi-, Ске yuddbi-. 3 Bd -no. ® СЕ asina-, Bd ajinna-. *C* nirapānāyå 
corr. to- рауї, Bå nirūpassāhā, Ck пігирёув. *C* adds шапо}ап, Bd manojassa 
Santike gantvi. * Ске -1, Bd vasevatti. | Bd omits va-. ° Bd -ko ātetvā. * 
Ck хө, Сг omite во. !9 Cè ађай, Сг арай, Rd айдага{һаһ, omitting са. !! Bd 
panase. 13 Bd dassāmiti. 12 Bd -vante. 1* Bd -ena, Се -ena corr. to -е. !% 
Ва omits na. !$ Се narh, 1? Bd nanda tassa риййап. 


2. Ѕопа-Мапба-јаќака. (532.) 817 


bi ева manusso sakala-Jambudipe г. etass' eva dassāmi, atha 
devo се hoti’ devatásakkáram assa’ karissāmîti“ so tah vi- 
marmsanto pathamam g. å.: 

1. Devatë nu si gandhabbo adu Sakko purindado 
mannussabhüto iddhimā, katha }ёпета tah mayan ti, 93. 
So tassa vacanarh sutvá sabhávam eva kathento duti- 

yam g. й.: 

s. № ambi devo па gandhabbo па pi Sakko purindado, 
manussabhüto idhimā, evarn jánëhi Bhāratā’ ‘ti. 94. 
Tatıha Bharatš* ti ratybabbåradhâritāya narb evar âlapl. 

Tarn sutvā гаја „manussabhūto kirâyain, тауһаш evam 
bahūpakāro, mahantena yasena tar santappessåmîti“ cin- 
tetvā a. 

s. Katarūpam idah bhotá° veyyávaccam апарраКаш: 
devamhi vassamānamhi апуйуазваш\' bhava akā. 95, 

+ Tato văātătāpe ghore sitaccháyarn Ъһауаш ака, 
tato amittamajjhesu suratánam ° bhava ака. 96. 

s. Tato phftāni’ rattháni vasino te bhavarh aka, 
tato ekasatam khatte anuyutte" bhavam ака, 97. 

в. Patit' assu mayarh bhoto, vara ќай !! bhañ баш '" іссһаві, 
һайһіуйпаф авѕагаһат nāriyo са alarnkatá 
піуеваоёпі гаттапі maya Ыһо(о дайётаѕе. 98. 

т. Аа [vā] Абре vā Magadhe [vā]" mayam bhoto dadāmase, 
atha vā Asesaküvantim '* ѕошарё damma te mayar. 99. 


Upaddham уйрі rajjassa mayam bhoto dadāmase 
васе te attho rajjeua, aousása уай icchasîti. 100, 


Ta. katarüpamidan 11 katajiniyarh {5 katasabhāvarth, vayyāvaccan 


И käyavoyyävațtikakammarh 1%, апуёуззвап!! ti anuavassarn, yatbā дото na 


2 ce boti wanting in Ске. 3 Ско „5, 2 СЕ Bê -thā, Сг -tā corr. to -thš. * all 
three MSS. -thā. 5 В4 -radbāratāyanaňh. * Bd oto. 7 Rê апотаеваф. so Bd; 
Cts -majjhesaratānain, * Ck рі-, Се Ва phi-. ?° Bd -yante. '! Ско cara tă. 
19 Oks harnam, Bd bhuñjam. !? iu Bd corr. to atba aĀge vā magadhe. '* 
Cr -тапії, Bå keesakāventi. !° Bê omits Ка-. !* Се kaáyyšávatika-, Bd kāya- 
Yeyyavatikammarh. !! Bd anovassan. 


10 


10 


15 


318 XX. Sattatinipšta. 


vassati tatbš katan ti a. siracchayan ti sitalacchšayar;, тазі цо te ti te 
ratthavasino ambškarb vasavartinol, khatte? ti khattlya, atthakatháyarñ pana 
ayam eva үй ра{һо, patitassu mayan tl (0015 mayar, vara {атп Ьһаййа- 
micchasiti?' ҺҺа tif ratanass' etam патат, varan te dadiml yah гаалаф 
lechasi (аг тагеһіїсі 5 a, һапМуйпап ti ādibi sarüpato ta ratanarh dasaeti, 
Assakavantln е ti Assakarattharn vë? Avantirattham тае, rajjenā ‘ti sace 
hi sskalana Jambudiparaljena sttho tani pl те datvā abari! phalakáyndhahattho * 
tumbškarn rathasea porato dhašvissamiti dipetl, yadicchasiti etesu тау 
vütteppekäresu yarh icchasl tah епозёва ёпёрећі. 


Tam sutvā N-to attano adhippáyam āvikaronto а,: 

э. Ха те attho hi" rajjena nagarena dhanena vå, 
atho рі janapadena attho mayharh ра vijjatiti. 101. 
„„Засе tava mayi sineho atthi'' ека те vacanar karo- 

hîti“ vatvā: 

зо. Bhoto ca'” ratthe vijite araññe attbi assamo, 
pitā mayhan janetti са ubho sammanti assame. 102. 

1. Тев’ āhar pubbacariyesu puññam па Іабћаті kātave, 
Һһауаш а ajjhácëram '* katvā 
Sonara уйсёши '* sarnvaran ti. 103. 


Ta. ratthe ti rajje, vijito ti āņāpavattitthāne, assawo t| Himavanta- 
raĀñe eko assamo а, sammantiti tasmiii 


ame vasantl, tesšban tt 
tosu айап, kâtave ti, vattapativattaphalšbaranasarkbštam риббаф Касий па 
labhšm!, bhātă me S-to піша mam ekasmiùh aparidbə mā ldba vasîu шаш 
рапёшеві '%, ajjbācāran'? [1!# te mayah bhavantah adhlåcārath parisam i? 
рагіғагаі katvë S-ta sarnvararb yšcemu, yati !* yãcåmā 'tl a., yšcemu sai- 
varan 12 el рі pštho, mayah (ауа saddbim Sonam уёсеууёта Кһатёреуувша, 
loarn varam tava santikå ganhamitl а. 


Atha nam raja aha: 
за, Karomi te tarn уасапат yam mam bhanasi brahmana, 
etañ ca kho по аККҺаһї kivanto bhontu уйсака ti. 104. 


1 Che ди, Сә -Ма. 2 Сіз khkhette, Bd khatya, ° Bd hhuñJjam-. * Ck bhàti- 
tībhā, Cs bhāsitlbhā corr, to bhātīitibhā, Bd omits hhàti. ° На vado. + Ck 
evantitan, Bd -vanti 1 Ck та. ° Ck omits avanti-. ° Che -tthobi. 1° Сғ bhi, 
Ва рі, !! Ск attho. 13 Bd tava. !° Bd ajhāvar-. !* Bd yacomu, ' Ва 
palāpesi. '% Rē adda avivararn. !? Ck рһагіва, Bd за !® Bd -úsamvaram. 
19 Сї syeverari, 


2. Sons-Nanda-jātaka. (532.) 319 


Ta, karomiti sbarn sakala-Jambudipe r. dadamšuo ейлкай kim na 
Кагізвётші, karormiti vadati, kīvanto tl kittakā, 

Nandapandito ёћа: 

1s. Parosatarn japapada mahāsālā са brahmanëá 

ime са khattiyà sabbe abhijātā yasassino 

bhavañ са гаја Manojo alam hessanti уёсака ti. 105. 

Та. jānapadā ti gahapati', шаһёзёіа ca bršhmanë ti sërappattë 
brāhmaņā са parosatā yava, alah hessantiti antāperiyantā’ bhavissanti, 
yācakā ti mam’ attbāya S-tassa khamapaka. 


Atha гаја āha: 

14. Hatthī asse ca yojentu ratham sannayha nam rathi’, 
šbandhanëáni ganhátha padás' ussárayam dhaje, 
авѕвшап tam gamissámi yattha sammati Kosiyo ti. 106. 


Та. yojentü ’ti batthārohā hetthi agsšrohë ca asse kappentu, га!һаш 
заппауһапап гасћї сі“ samma rathika° {таш рі ratharh баппауһа?, 
šbandhapaniti hatthlassarathesu abandhitabbáni bhandakani ganhatha, райа- 
sugsñrayarb dhaje {1 гае (hapitadhaje!' usešrayantu ussšpentu, Ковіуо 
ti увесоіш аввате Koslyagotto vasatitl vadati. 


1». Toto са тајё рйуйьї senāya caturaūgini, 
agamā" азвашаш гашташ yattha sammati Kosiyo ti 107. 
ayami abhisambuddhagatha. 


Ta. tato св 't| bhikkhave өуат vatvā tato во гаја ekasatarb ° kbattiye 
gahetva таһаї!у& зепёуа parivuto N-tah purato katvi nagarā nikkhaml, ca- 
turañginiti caturañginlyá'? agamasill, antarāmagge vattamāuo рі avassa- 
gšmitšya evam эшо, catuvisatiakkhohinissrtpkhena {2 Cbslakšyena ssddbimn 
maggapatipannassa (авва N-to'! iddbaánubhšávens al(busabhavitthatarh maggara 
samar тёреста ākāse camma pattharitvā ta. pallarhkepa nisiditvá вепёуа pari- 


vuto alarhkatahatthikuhandhe nisiditvaë gacchautena !* raüñš saddhirn dbamma- 
yuttakarn kathento situnhšdjparissaye !° һагапго!® agamāel. 


Ath’ asea азкашаїт pápunanadivase S-to „mama kanit- 
thassa atirekasattadivasadhikáni!” sattamasádhikáni' ° satta- 


1 all three MSS. -1. 2 so Cka; Bd pariyattā, omitting апей. ° Ске rathi, Bd 
ratbarn sanharhyasarathi. * Bd гапат sanhaya sārathiti. 5 Ckz rathikā, Bd 
aăratbi. < Bd sanhayittha. 7 Ско (hapitadhajapădesudhaje. 5 СЕ aggamă, Bd 
арапа. ° Dd te, СЕ -ta, 10 Rd -giya ѕепауа. !1 Bd agamad. !5 Bd -sañ- 
kRháteps. © Bd -tassa, 14 Cha te, 15 Bd situp-, !%# Bd vārento, !7 Cha 
-sattamasidhi-. 15 Ске satta ca divasšni. 


19 


15 


20 


25 


320 ХХ. Satutatinipáta, 


vassāni nikkbaptassš“ ‘ti āvajjitvā .kaban пи kho so etara- 
bíti“ dibbena cakkhunë olokento ,,catuvisatiakkhohinipari- 
уйгепа! ekasatain rājāno gabetvā mam yeva khamāpetum 
āgacchatìti“ disvā cintesi: ,„imebi rājūhi с' eva parisāhi’ са 
шаша kanitthassa bahüni pāțihāriyāni ditthāni, шашариЬһауаш 
ajānitvă ayam kütajatilo attano pamāņarh па jānāti, amhšákarh 
ayyena saddhim Ppaypjetiti mam vambhetvā?’ kathento avici- 
рагауаоӣ bbaveyyurh, iddbipátiháriyarn певаїї dassessāmîti‘ 
so caturañgulamattena arsam‘ asamphusantarh ёкаѕе kácarh 
thapetvā Anotattodakarn' āharitun rañño avidüre аКаѕепа 
pšyšsi, N-to paoa tarn ágacchantam disvā attānam dassetum 
avisabanto nisinnattháne yeva antarādhāya* paláyitvá Hima- 
vantan рёуіві. Manojarājā pana nam ramanīyena isivesena’ 
tathá āgacchantarh disvā: 
10. Kassa kadambayo° káco vehásam caturañgularm 
arsa asamphusam eti udahárassa gacchato ti р. а. 108. 
Ta. kšdambako ti kadambarukkbamayo, авашрһиват” etiul am- 
ваф !© asamphusanto sayam eva gacchail, udabārassā 'ti udakarb ahariturn 
gacchantassa esa'! kāco evar etl, ko nāma (уагп kuto vëgacchasi. 
Evaiù vatte Mahāsatto gātbadvayam āha: 
м. Ahan Sono maharaája tāpaso sahitarhvato '', 
bbarāmi mātāpitaro rattindivam atandito. 109. 
зв. Vane'' phalañ са mülañ са aharitvá disampati 
posemi mātāpitaro pubbekatam anussaran ti. 110, 


Ta. sahitahvato?: ti sahitavatot? silàcárasampanno, еко täpaso aban 
ti vadati, bharāmiti posemi, atandito (і 


alaso hutva, pubbekatan ti 
tehi pubbe katan mayhan gunarh anussaranto. 


Таш sutvā гаја tena saddhim хіѕѕёѕањ kattukāmo anan- 
tara g. â.: 
1 Ва adds saddbl. > Сќг -sāâsu. * Ca vamhe-, Bd -bhento. * Ckz autararh 
Bd asah. ° Bd anotatthato ud-. * Bd -уі. 1 Bd issariyena. ° Ва kadampa- 
mayo. *# Cis е ssam-, Bd аваш-, Bd авай asanpusain. ?° Bd asakutai. !! 
Bd kassa ека. !° Bd sahipappato. 13 Ске etar. 


2. Sona-Nanda-jātaka. (532.) 321 


və. Icchëma assamam ganturo yattha sammati Kosiyo, 

maggam no Sona akkhāhi yena gacchemu assaman ti. 111. 

Tattha assaman ti tumhákarn азвашарайар. 

Atha М. attano ünubhávepa assamapadagāmimaggath 
шёареїүа: 

so. Ayam ekapadi гаја уеп’ etah meghasannibharn 

kovilārehi sañchanpam, ettha sammati Ковіуо (їр. a. 112. 

Т. a.: maharBja ayan ekspadiko jarnghamaggo Iminë gaechatha yena dlsi- 
bhšágena taru meghevaņnpah supupphitakovijšërassrpchannam kšnanarh dissati 
ettha mama pita Koslysgotto vasati ева зо assamo ti. 

эз. Idam vatvāna реккаші taramāno шаһёізі 

vehāse antalikkhasmim anusasitvëna khattiye. 113. 

es. Аввашвш parimajjitvá' panpapetvána авала 

раппвзё!аш pavisitvā pitaram patibodbayi: 114. 

эз. Ime âyanti rājāuo abhijata yasassino, 

assamā nikkhamitvăna пївїйв tvah mahāise. 115. 

w Tassa tam vacanam sutvë taramāno mahaisi 

вззата nikkhamitvëna peņņadvāramhi* upāvisîti 116. 
іта abhisambuddhagatha, 

Та pawkimiu Ацоѓацаћ ° здашіві, parimajjitvā* ti bhikkhave во 
dsi vegena Anotattarn gantvā* pšniyamn šdšya tesu гајево * assamaih asampattesu 
yeva ӧдапіу& paniyaghate рёпїуашајаке thapetvë шаһајапо pivissatîti vana- 
knsumehi” všsetvà ° sammujjaniiw’ ädäya assamapadarh semmajjitvā раопе- 
säladváro рїш šsanarn paññapetvš parisitvā рагаў }#парва1 a, о рат! еї 
осоёвапе nleidi, B-esa mātā рапа tassa pacchato nicatare'® ёзлпе nisidi, В, 
пїсёзапе ekamante nisidi, 

N-to pi В-вза Anotattato păniyarh ādāya assamam āgata- 
kāle'' rañño santikarn äāgantvă assamassa avidüre khandhā- 
vāra піуеѕареві'". Atha rájá nahátvá sabbálamkaárapati- 
mandito ekasatarājaparivuto N-tain gahetvá mahantena siri- 
sobhaggena B-ttah khamāpeturh assamar рёхіві. Atha паш 
(аа agacchantarm B-assa pitā dievā B-am pucchi, so pi 
"вва ăcikkhi. 


1 all three MSS. -jjetvă. *# Che padvšrarhhi. ° Bd anotatthato. * Bd -jjetvā. 
3 Bd -uharb âg-. * Bd -āsu. ' Bd паға-. è Ске mëse-. ' Сг ваштайј-, Ва 
взаша])з-. 19 Bd пісе. !! Rd -magata-. 13 -re nivšsesl. 

Jumka. V. 21 


10 


90 


зо 


399 XX. Запанпірёи. 


Тат айћаф pakšseoto S. ё.: 
ss. Тай са Зізтёпа ёуапіањ jalanta-r-iva' tejasë 
khattasarngbaparibbūjhais Кошуо etad abravi: 117. 
se. Kassa Ьһеп mutiūgā са samkbš panavadendimë 
purato patipannëni hšsayantë'rathesabham, 118. 
sr. Kassa kañcanspattena puthunë vijjuvanpină 
уптйё kalapasannaddho, ko eti siriyā jalan, 119. 
эв, Ukkāmukhe* pahattharm та khadirañgārasannibhar 
шикһай cāru r-ivàbhāti*, ko eti siriyë jalan. 120. 
зээ. Kassa paggahitarm chattam sasalëkam manoramam 
adiccaramsavaranam, Ко eti siriyā jalan. 121. 
so, Kassa ашкаш pariggayba vëlarijanim uttamam 
carati varapañūassa batthikkhandhena âyato. 122. 
si. Kassa setāni ohattãni ајёшуа са vammita 
samantë parikiranti*, ko eti siriyā jalan. 123. 
эз. Казва ekasatam khatyë anuyutt&° yasassino 
samant anupariyanti’, ko eti вігіуё jalan. 124. 
ss. Hatihiassaratbapattisenāya’ caturañgini *. 
eamantë апирагіуё(і'°, ko eti siriy jalam. 125. 
в. Kass’ es mahati senā, pitthito anuvattati 
skkhobhani'' epariyantā sāgarassêva ūmiyo. 126. 
s. Rājābhirājā Manojo `’ Indo та jayatam pati 
Мапдвав` ajjhāvaram eti mssamam brahmecaárinarm. 127. 
se. Tass езй mahati senā pitthito anuvattati 
akkhobhani ° apariyantā sāgarassêva ūmiyo ti. 128. 


Та. Jalantarivā 'ti Jalantah víya pațipannānîti etāni turiyān! kassa 
рагаќо Jgacchantiti a, häsayantă "l tosentā, kañcanapațjonă ' tita 
kass’ ево Кайсапашпауепа vijjavanninā unbisapattena nalátante!t parikkhitto ti 
puccbati, yuvå tf taruno kalâäpssannaddho ti sannaddhasaratuphiro, u kkā- 
mukhe pahattharh vā 'ti kemmārānaù uddhene pahatthasuvannar viya, 
khadirañgărasannibhan t! vīitaccikałbadirañgāravaņoarn’", ādiccaramhsā 
varanan t) ñdiccararnsinarh švaranam, ап Каш pariggayhā ' ahkam pa- 
riggahetvă'® parikkhipitvā ti a. všlavijanimuttaman!! e välavījantr "° 


1 Bd -tamriva. 2 Rd -о. ° Bd -ат. * Ce va-, Bd mukhañcarucirš-. ° Cke 
-renti. * Bd -yantā. ? Bå -parikirantu. ° Bd -ratba-, Ck -assšñrathapatti-, ©" 
-аззйта!һара{Һї-. 9 Сх -nirn, Bd -ní. 10 Bd -yayanti. 11 Ска -bbhani, Bd 
-bhani. 19 Слз -гё]ашапо)о, Bd -гајатапојо. 1* Ck -bbhanirh, Сәг -bbhani. !+ 
во Се; Rd nalštante, '* Bd çvjtacchita-. !* Cs adds passa, Bd рапвмй. 
17 all three MSS. -та. !* Bd manivšlavijani. 


2. 3Sona-Nanda-játaha. (532.) 893 


uttamarh', caratiti #айеатаН, ehattšapfiti šjëniyspiithe nisfnnšusrh dhërita- 
chattadhichattáni, рагікігап сі 01° kassa samantă sabbadisābhāgesu parikirl- 
yanti?, ocatarañginīti etebl hatthišdibhl еа айе samannagati 4, 
skkhobhaniti khobheturn па ваккё, sāgarassovā "1 ašgarassa йшіуо viya 
apariyantā, гајаъ ћігаја ti ekasatānarh тї]йпатп püjíto! tesarb vā adhiko 
ršJšbhlrajš *, jayatam расї JayappattAnai tšvatirnsšnsm jettbsko, ajjhi- 
varan tÍ mama khamāpanatthäya Nandassa psrisabhávsih upagantvā eti. 

Satthā ёћа: 

эт. Anulittā eandanena kësikavatthadharino 

sabbe pañjalikā hutvā isinam ajjhupagamun ti. 129, 

Та. 1еїпеф sjjbupāgamun (1 bhikkhave sabbe pi te га]їпо surabhi- 
сапйапера anulittë uttamakāsikavattbadhārino asirasi раўцћаригдја!ї hutvš 
isînarn santikarh npagatâ, 

Tato Manojarëjá vanditvā ekamantam nisinno patiaanthárarh 
karonto: 

ав. Kacci' uu bhoto kusala, kacci' bhoto anámayarh, 
kacci' ойсћепа° yāpetha, kacci' mūlaphalā bahð. 130, 
s. Кассї darhsā ca’ makasá са appam ava sirihsapă "°, 

vane vālamigākiņņe kacci hirhsá pa vijjatiti 131, 
gāthadvayarh â. 

Tatopararh tesan vacanapațivacanavasena katbitagāthā *' 
honti. 

о. Kusala с" eva no гаја atho гаја anámayarn, 
ао uñchena’ уёрета, atho mülaphalá bahü, 132. 
a. Atho дата са" makas са appam eva sirimsapă ", 

vane všálamigákinne himhsā anharmn na vijjati. 138. 

ө. Bahüni c' assa '* pūgāni assame samiatam idha’’, 

nëbhijanámi uppannam abádharm amanoramam. 134. 

a, Svāgatan te mahāraja atho te adurāgatarn, (ІҮ =$) 

issaro si anuppatto, уаш idh’ atthi'™' pavedaya: 155. 


1 Cha „mā, 9 Chs -kirentiti. * Bd -kķirantl. * во all three MSS. 5 Bd pū- 
mto. * Bd rājādbie. ! Bd пс. * Ckzuñj-, Bd uccb-. ° Ва omits са. "° 
Bd aarisapá. '! Bd sarngitigath8. 1° so Ck for casu? Сә Dd vasea. ! Bå 
sampato mama, !* Bd jdUatti, Cù idbenti. 


21° 


10 


15 


16 


394 ХІХ. SatthInipšts. 


a. Tindukëni ріуё&1апі madhuke kāsumāriyo 
phalāni khuddakappáni, bhuñja гаја vararh varam', 136. 
а. Idam рі păniyarh sitam abhatarp girigabbharā, 
tato piva mahárája sace tvan abhikarhkhasi. 137. 
в. Patiggahītan yam dinnañ са" sabbassa agghiyarb katarb, 
Nandassâpi nisämetha vacanam уаш во pavakkhati. 138. 
«т. Ajjhávar' amha Nandassa bhoto santikam gati, 
випйїп bhava vacanam Nandassa parisāya са 'Н. 139. 
1ша* yebhuyyəna рака! * вагобапдһа 5 yeva, уай! pan’ ettha арёнаја 
tad eva vakkhäma, ратейауй "і улп imaamin thāne tava abhirucitam atthi 
tah no kathehiti vedati, khuddakappániti есёпі nānârukkhaphalāni* khudda- 
madhupailbbšágáni' madħurāni. тагат ғагап tl ito ийаши(ашаг!®? gahetvá 
bhuñJa, girigabbharā t! Anotattato, sabbassa sgghiyan ti yene maysh 
āpucchità tan amhehi patiggahitarn паса tumhelil ca dinnam eva nëma ottâvată 
dimessa janasaa sabbassa ав уво tumheh! katean, М№апдаваёріі! smhâkam 
сата sabbar katarh ідёпі N-to kiñc! vattukāmo савоёрі '9 täva'' varanarh випо!һа, 
а})һатагаш ЬЕ 'ti mayarù hí na аййепа kammena ägatā, Nandassa pana parisà 
butvà tumhëákarn khamápanatthaya ägatā ti адай, bhavan tl bhavarh S-to sunátu. 
Evar vutto N-to utțthāyâsanā wátápitaro са bhātarañ са 
vanditvā parisāya' saddhirh sallapanto а.: 
s. Parosatam janapadá mabāsãlá са brāhmaņå 
ime са khattiyá sabbe abhijátá yasassino 


" mne vaco, 140. 


bhavañ са гёја Manojo anumaññantu 
s. Ye hi santi samītāro'* yakkháni" idha assame 

araññe bhūtabhavyãni sunqantu vacanarn mama, 141. 
so. Машо katvāna bhütánarb isiñ vakkhámi subbatarh : 

so ty-ñharb dakkhino'* bāhu" tava Kosiya sammato. 142, 


16 


ы. Pitaram me janettiü'” са bhattukāmassa me sato 


vira puññam idarn thánaih'', má таф Ковіуа уйгаув. 143. 


1 Bd уагёғагат. ? Rd omita ce, 3 Ске omit Imá. < Cke.qa. ° Bd gam- 
pandhš, Сїз-4М. < Che пе ín the place of etâni nānā. 7 ao Che, Bd 
khuddakkhamadhu-. * Bd vararhvaren. "° Rd uttsmarn.u- 10 Bd сазва pl. 
ї! all three MSS. 18. 1# Hd заара. !# Cks amanuñüasantu. !* во СЮ” саа 
mjtšro? Rd yevasantisamittāro. !* Ck уакићагёцї, C% yakkhārāni. 16 ВЕ „дё, 
Ck -ne, Се -no corr. to -пе. ' Cs Баћа, Bd báhurh. ! Ck janenti, Се janenetti, 
Ва јапеси. !% Hd dhiramapnñña pidan thånam, Ck’ сата рийбашійагі thini 


2. Sona-Nanda-jâtake. (532.) 895 


эз. Sabbhi h’ etarù upañüštarh, ташт’ еќаф upanissaja ', 
utthánapáricariyáya dtgharattarh tayá katarh, 
mātăpitasu роббӣрі mama lokadado bhava. 144. 

вз. Tath’ eva santi тапој& dhamme dhammapadarh vidū 
maggo’ eaggassa lokassa yathā јарӣві tvarh ise. 145. 

s+. ШИћапарӣгісагіуйуа mātāpitusukhāvaharh 
tah mam puññ' Abhiväreti* ariyamaggavaro naro ti. 146, 


Ts, аппшаййап&й* "1 anubujjhantu, sādhukarn katvā paccakkhein ka- 
rontü "И a, samitšáro 11 samāgatā, атапйе hhütabbavyárniti ааш! 
Himavantiraññe уап! bhūtān! с' ета þuddhimariyādā* pattšni bhavyān! са taruua- 
devatāní, tānl pi? sabbšul шата vacanarh sunantü ‘ti а, nemo katvānā "i 
idaro во рагівёуа saññarh datvë tasmirn vanssapde nibbattadevatë namakkararb 
katvā va &., t.a.: ajja bahūhi devetāh! mama bhåtikassa dbammakathšsavarattharb 
Agatāhi bhavitabbain, ayah vo namakkāro, tumhe рі mayar sahāyā botbā 'd 
so devatšnarb añjallih pagganbitvë parisan sañjānâpetvā [sim vakkbāmîti äditb 
K, (а. 1в1һ ti Ват sandbiya vadarl, sammato (1 bbštaro nima añgasamā 
honti tesmā so te ahaiù dakkhino  báhúü ti sammwato tena’ khamiturh arahathā 
"Ш dipet, virå 'ti viriyavənte mashšparakkama, puññamidar {һёпап ti 
idah màatáapituupatihënarn паёта puüñarn saəggasarovattanikakäraņariı tarn karon- 
шї шәй më väiayà "1 vadat, sabbbibetan t! etan matapituupatihánarm 
nëma panditehi upaññátarn upagantvš ñšátañ с eva vannitan са, оралівзајё 
`Ú Idan шауһаш півваје vissajebi dehi, о{{һапарагісагіугуё 10 'ti ntthënens 
с' eva рёгісвгіуёуа!! ca katan ti, digharattann (ауа kusslam katarn, рпййап1(! 
idän! аһа màtápitusu puñāån! kattukâmo, lokadado'? hobi !2, aharn hi tosa 
YVattarn upalthšnarii katvā devaloke зрагішапат yasan, Jsbhissšimi, tassa me 

* tvarh дёуако hohitl тайа, tathe vaš ‘t! yathë tvam Јёпаві tath' eva айбе pl 
manujā Imiesš рагівёуа santi ye! пїпарраййге dhamme idarh Jetthšpacayibha- 
Yasarnkhšitarn dhammakotíhasaiñ vidanti!t kin t| maggo saggasnal t lokaseë ‘tl, 
sukhšávahan 4 0{(ћапепа ca paricariyšya!? ca matápitannara sukhšávaham, 
tah man t tari тай етай samwmāpafipaunam pi bhátá 8-to tambš рипбї 
abhivareti пітагеи, ariyamaggavaro! ° ti'? ao evarn všárento ayar паго 

а devalokasea maggšvarano ° паша 


mama piyadarsanatāya ariysssrhkhš 
hotiti. 


Y Bd -вәјји, > ao all thrao MSS.. > Bd puññāniváreti. * Ско amanuññantū. ° 
Bd eapitro. * Bd vuddhipari-. ! Cè -devatâtānipl, Bd -tāni са (апі рі *В4 
adds me. * Bd -ņa, +° Bd -радасагі-. !! Bd pāda-. !* Bd -do ti tasse 
шаша trah asggarn loka dado. !# all three MSS. hoti. !* Bd yeva 1 
Bd та-. 1% Bd aadovekasaa. '? Bd pidaca-, '° Bd -âvaro. !° Ва adde ariya- 
maggassa ivaro 39 Ok .vhrano. Hd -varanarn. 


15 


896 XX. BSattatinipšta. 


Evain N-ena vutte М. ,imassa tëva tumhehi vacanam 

sutarn, idáni mama pi sunáthë“ ‘ti s&vento å. 
se, Sunantu bhonto vacanam bhátor' ајјйтага шаша: 
kulavarhsam шаһагёўа рогёпаф рагіћараувф 

adhammacãri jetthesu' пїгауаш во upapajjati. 147. 

se. Yo са dhammassa Кова1& poranassa disampati 

cërittena са sampannă na te gacchanti duggatir. 148. 

ss. Mëtëpitá са bhātā са bhaginI ñátibandbavá 

sabbe jetthassa te һата, evarh jānāhi Bhárata?' 149. 

ss. Adiyitvë garun Ыһагаш ušviko viya uesahe, 

dhammañ са* na-ppamajjámi, 

jettho с” asmi rathesabhā `u. 150, 

Та. bbāturajjbāvarā’ И mama bbštu parisš Ьастё sgatë bhavanto 
esbbe pl тајёоо mama рі 18* vscanarb sunantg, paribāpayan d paribāpento, 
dbammasaš ' jJetthapacayadhammaparenidbammassa, kusalä t! сһешв, câ- 
rittebpa сё ‘ti šcšrasilena ватраппа, bhärâ ti sabbe eto Jetthena vahitabbá pati- 
Jaggitabbă ti tassa bhātarâ паша, nāviko viyë 'ti yatbā navágarobhararh' 
adiyltvë samuddamajjhe nšvarb sotthina neturh rëviko изваһе tì vāysmatl saba 
пётёуа sabbabhandarn Jano са авв’ ova bbšro boti (аһа таш’ eva aabbe 
баайа bhšro abañ c' ete ussabimi patijagglturn sakkomi, tañ са Jetthapacáya- 


osdbammarh па-ррашајјаш!, па kovalañ са otessĀ бета sahalassa рі lokss@ 
Jettho c' asmi, tasmë aham eva saddhiñi Мапдепа patijaegltum yutto ti. 


Таш sutvë sabbe pi гајапо attamaná һиіуй ,jetthabh&- 
tikassa kira avasesā bhárë° ti ajja amhehi ñaátan“ ti N-tarh 
paháya M-assa nissitë' hutvā tassa thutirh karontë'° dve gāthå 
аһавїгпвї : 

se. Adhigat' ашһа!! tame Папа јајаг va játavedato'* 

evam eva no bhavam dhammarm Ковіуо pavidareayi. 151. 
в. Yathå udadhim ādicco vàsudevo pabharnkaro 

pšninam pavidarmnseti rüpam kalyánapápakarn 

еташ eva по bhavain dhammarh Kosiyo pavidamsayiti. 152. 


L Cka даг 3! Che јео. 2 Ck -ћа. * Bd dbammase, Š СЕ -саг-. * read 
tšva? 1 Ва nāvâys, °? Ва -o. ° Bd -ttan sanulsitài. !° СЕ Bd ~-o. 1! бо 
Ok; Bd adhigamš, !1 Bd Jåtadovato. 


1. Sona-Nanda-jataka, (532. 897 


Та. adhigastamha' "ti maysh ito pubbs Jetibspacšiyanadhammapa- 
есЬёдаке tamo vattamānā’ ajja Jštavedsto? jšlarb va ñapam * adhligati, evam- 
ета по ti yathā mahandhakšáre pabhatamatthsko јао jätavedo зашапёё šlokarh 
Pharanto rüpën) dasseti tatbā по Ьћатаф Kosiyagotto dhammarb pavidanhsayiti 
a, všsndevo Ц тваодето  vasujotano * dhammappakasano t| а. 


Iti M. ettakarh Ка!аш N-tassa pëtiháriyáni disvā (авшіф 
pasannacitte te rājāvo ñäņabalena tasmim pasëádarm bhinditvš 
attano каат gëhápetvá sabbe attano va maukhullokite akāsi. 
Atha паш N-to „bbātā те pandito vyatto dhammakathiko, 
sabbe p' ime гёјёпо bhinditvá attano pakkhe kari’, (ћареѓуё 
imar аййо* maybarh patisarananmh п’ atthi, inam eva уйсїёвй- 
mîti“ cintetvā g. å.: 

ө. Evah me yäcamänassa nñjalirn nâvabujjbasi’, 

tava baddhañcaro'° hessarh vutthito paricárako ti. 158. 

T. a: засе tumhe mama evarh yšcamšnassa khsmapanatthšya paggahitarn 
айјайф ukvabujjbstha па pstiganhaths tumbe va mátāpitaro upatthahatha sharn 


pana їпшһёймй baddhañcaro’? veyyävaccakaro hessarh rattirhdlvarh апајава- 
bhâvena vutthito!! abam tumhe patijaggissimttl. 


M-assa pakatiyâpi N-te'* roso" уй verad vā o` atthi 
atithaddharh '* kathentassa pan’ assa mānahāpanattham '* nig- 
gahavasena'* (аа katvā idāni ‘вва уасапаш satvā tutthacitto 
tasmim pasādah uppădetvā „idāni te khamámi, mātāpitaro са 
patijaggitum labhissasiti'!“ (авва gunah pakásento å.: 

ө. Addh&á Nanda vijánësi saddhammam sabbhi desitam, 

агїуо агїуавашйсйго, bālharn tvah mama ruccasi. 154. 

м. Вһаташаш vadāmi bhotiñ са !* supotha vacanar mama: 

náyam bháro bháramato аћи '" mayhar kudácanarm, 155. 

е. Tam шаш upațțhitah santam máatápitusnakhavabarh 
Nando ајјһатвгаф '° katvā upatthánáya уйсай. 156. 


1 Bd adhigamā. ° Ва -пе. ° Bd jātadevato. * Bd jštarb lab paññipam. * 
Ck vas. * Ck зојісапо. ? Bd karavatha ° Bd rañüo. ° Bd -bujhatha, '0 
Bd ра{һасаго. '!! Bd adds рагісёгіко, !? hhaglni ñëtlhandhanë v. 37 - - - - - 
nandapandite wanting iu Се. !# Bd дово, !* СХ anltabbah? !'5 Bd -раһа- 
natthah. '# Н adds va. 17 Bd „н. 19 C+ va. !*# СЕ аһа. 20 Ске caram. 


-æ 


25 


398 ХХ. Sattatinipäta. 


es. Yo ve icchati Батепа! вапіёпаф brahmacšárinarh 

Nandan" vo" vadatha ° еке kam Nando’ upatitthatü" ti. 157, 

Та. агіуо d sundaro, ariyasamâcāro sundarācāro si jàto, bālhan ü 
18201 (таф mama ativiya ruccasi. еппосћа 't! amma tata tumho mama vacanarh 
запо!һа‚ nâyamh bhišro ti ayah tumbaákam patijagganabhāro na Кайас1 mama 
bhšramsto abn, tamman ti tah bhšro ti amanñitva va шып tumhe upațthi- 
tab samanarm, upatthšnšya `d tumbe nqpatthšturb mar уёсай, уо те lc- 
ehatiti mayharn b! tvah me miataram vå pitarain vā qQpattbshë 'ti vattu па 
yuttah, tumbiškarn pana santànam brahmaršrinarn ° yo? eko icchati tan vadamií 
khjamarh!0 Nandah vo vadatba!! tah!? mama kanitțhan Nanda rocatha!® 
tumbesu Каш еза ора ћай 2* ubho pi hi mayar» tumhëkarn рана уета 'ti. 

Ath’ assa mātā āsanā vutthāya „tāta S-ta ciravippavuttho 
te kanittho, eva cirāgatarh pi tah yäcituh na visahámi, 
mayam hi tan nissitā idāni pana tayá anuññātā, aha etab 
Ъгвһтасагіпаф bāhābi upagūhitvā sīse upagghāyitun™ la- 
bheyyan“ ti imam асћаф pakāsenti: 

ве. Tayā (йќа апайпа(& Scna tam nissitā тауаф, 

upaghâāturù labhe Nandar 

muddhani brahmacárinan ti р. ā 158. 

Atha nam M. „tena hi amma anojānāmi, tvar '° рассһа 
рокаш Nandan āliñgitvā «Іва '‘* ghāyitvā cambitvā tava 
hadaye sokarh pibbāpehîti“ а. 58 tassa santikam gaptvš 
N-tam parisamajjhe yeva áliñgitvë вїваш gháyitvá cumbitvā 
hadaye soka nibbápetvë M-ena saddhim sallapant1 ё. : 

sr. Assatthassêva (агапаш pavālah máluteritamn 

cirassarh Nandarh disvana hadayar me pavedhati. 159. 

вв. Yadā suttápi'' варрапїе Мапдаг passāmi ёраќаф 

udaggā вотайё homi: Nando по āgato ayam. 160. 

е. Хаба ca patibujjhitvë Nandam passãmi nágatam 

bhiyyo āvisatī soko domanassañ cánappakam. 161. 


1 Che káamapam. * Ck -do, Cs -da. * Ca ve. < Cha сатаа, 5 Bd -dà шый. 
6 Ске omit шай. ? Ck upatthitū. 6 Ck -rinam, Rá -гі. ° Cha во, 10 Rd 
-өпа, 11 Cks ratha 12 Cks omit tarh. 18 Bd rodetba. Сә nanda госеіћа. !* 
Bd ораћасою. !° Bd ораѕзапећауікат. :!6 Chetan. !! Bá... 1° Bd 
sottamhi. 


2. ЗЅола-Маоба-Јаіана. (532.) 329 


о. Sáharh ajja cirassam' pi Nandar равзёші āgatarh, 
bhattuc-ca* maybañ ca piyo Nando no påvist gharar. 162. 

п. Pita pi Nando suppiyo, уаш* Nando рёхівї ghararh 
labhatu táta Nando tah: таш Nando npatitthatü ‘tì. 163. 


Та. māluteritan ti ува vatahatarn assatthapallavah kampati evar cl- 
ressaro Мапа disvåna ajja mama hadayah kampatiti, eoppantet ti (іа 
Sona уадёһат suttā’ supinena Nandar šgatarn passami айёр! udaggă һошій, 
bbattuceš2? `1 sëmlkassa са шауһай са plyo, Nando no pāvisi gharan 
ti täta putto no Nando pannasášlarh psvisatu °, yan il yasmā pitu” воо ріуо 
tasmā puna татћа għarå па тірразавеууа° Nando tan ti Nando уат lcchati 
хаю labbatu, шат Nando ti tšta Sona tava pitararn tvan upatthaha Nando 
merh qupatiitbetu. 


M. „evar осӣ“ `{1 matu уасапат sampaticchitvă „Nanda 
tayá jetthakakotthāso laddho, mātā nāma atiguņakārikā, appa- 
matto hutvá pațijaggeyyäsiti“ ovaditvā mătu gunam pakāsento 
dve gāthā abhási: 

те. Anakampakëá patitthā са pubbe rasadadI са no’ 
maggo saggassa lokassa mātā tarn varate ise. 164. 
в. Pubbe гаѕедадї ронї mātā puñüüpasarmnhitá 
паро saggassa lokassa mātā tarh varate" ise ti. 165, 


Та, snukampabkša t| mudubadayā, pubbe rasadaditi pathamam eva 
attano khirasarhkháatassa rasassa Чау!їй, mātā tan И mama mātā шаг ua’! 
iechati (ап тагай 1°, gottfti борауікё, puñňñūpasamhhitā ti puñūaniseltā 
puüñadayiká. 

Evam M. dvībi gāthāhi mātau gunam kathetvá punâgantvā 
tass sane nisinnakåle „Nanda tvah dukkarakárikarh mëta- 
гаф labhi, ubho pi mwaya mātarā dukkbena samvaddhitā, 
tah dni tvah appamatto pațijaggāhi™, amadburšni pbalā- 
phalāni тё khádápesiti'?“ vatvā parisamajjhe yeva mātu duk- 
karakārikattarh pakásento å.: 


1 Chka sgi, 2 Bd -uñca. ? Ck sam * Ва вуса. 6 Ске зо1Ш. * во all throe 
МЭЗ. ' Ске omit yanti увешё pitu. ° Cè Bd vippaseyya. * Bd ја по. ° 
Bd vadate. 1: Hds уап. !% Bd тадан, Ca add icchati. 1: Ck -ggo, Ca -ggl. 


° 


30 


880 XX. Samqatinipšta. 


Ti. 


LLO 


тт. 


те. 


1 ао 


Akarnkhamëánë puttaphalarh devatáya namassati 
nakkhattăni са pucchati utosamvaccharăni са. 166. 


. Tassă utusinátáya hoti gabbhass' avakkamo, 


tena доћајіої hoti, воћайё tena vuccati. 167. 
Sarhvaccharam vå йпаш vå pariharitvá vijāyati, 

tena ай janayanti (add ti), janetti tena уоссаќі. 168. 
Thanakhirepa gitena ' añgapāporaņena са 

rodantarh (add: eva) toseti, tosentī tena vuccati. 169, 
Tato vštštape ghore mamimkatvë (add: va) dárakam 
appajánantam (add: poseti), posent! tena vuccati 170. 


. Үай са mātu dhanam hoti уай ca boti рий һара 


обћауат etassa gopeti, арі puttassa no віуё. 171. 
Evam putta айй putta iti mātå vibaññati, 
pamattarh paradáresu nisithe pattayobbane 
sëyam puttam anëyantam iti mātā vihañnñati, 172. 


. Evam kicchā bhato poso mātu aparicárako 


mëtari micchë caritvána nirayar so upapajjati. 173. 
Evam kicchā bhato poso pitu aparicārako 

pitari micchá caritvána nirayam so opapajjati. 174. 
Dhao’ ёрі? dhanakámanarh passati, iti me sutam, 
шаќагаф aparicaritvána kiccham vă so nigaccbati. 175. 
Dhanain pi dhanakámënam: nassati, iti me sutar, 
pitara aparicaritvána kiccham vā so nigaccbati. 176. 
Änando са pamëdo са ваба hasitakllitarh 

шёаїагатї paricaritvëna labbbam etam vijáuato. 177. 
Anando са pamādo са вайа hasitákilitarm 

pitaram paricaritvāna labbham etam vijānato. 178. 


. рапай са peyyavásañ' ca atthacariyá са уй idha 


samănattā‘ са dhammesu tattha tattha уаїһагаһаш. 179. 
Ete kho sañgahë loke rathassániva yáyato, 
ete va* sangahë nássu na шаїа puttakāraņā, 180. 


both MSS. for gitena? 'so both MSS. ? во both MSS. for -тајјаб? * 


зо both MSS. for -пањ? # ао both MSS. for ca, read ce? 


2. ЗЅопа-Малда-јасака, (522.) 881 


вә. Labhetha шапаш рӣјай са pitë va puttakáranë, 
yasmá са sañgahā ete samavekkhapti рапдий 181. 
зо. Tasmā mahattarn papponti pásarhsá са bhavanti te, 
Brahmë hi nátápitaro pubbācariyā ti vaccare. 182. 
я. Аһапеууй са puttānarh рајёув annkampakā', 
tasmā hi te пашаввгууа sakkareyyátha pandito, 188. 
ss. Annena-m-atho' рёпепа vatthena sayanena са 
ucchādanena nahápanena рёйёпаћ * dhovanena ca, 184. 
a. Tăya nam рагїсагїуйуа mātāpitusu panĝitā‘ 
idha с' eva [nam *] pasathsanti pecca sagge ca modatiti. 185. 


Ta. puttaphalan ti puttasarnkhštarn phalarn, дезаїйуа® нашавва11ї! 
putto mo upapajjatü ‘ti devatšya namakkšrarh karoti ёуёй?, pucchatitl kata- 
reus Dakkhattena jāto patto dighayuko hoti katarena appëyuko (Í eva nak- 
khattšni ca pucchati, utusańmvaccharān! са ' сһалпай utünam kata- 
таап 8 utumbl Jäto díigháyuko hoti katarasmih®’ utambi sppšyuko kativassāya 
vë шаю Játo putto dīigbāyuko hoti kativassāya sppāyako Ч eva utasa- 
vaccharāni ca pucchatîti, utusinatšayš? t) pupphe uppanne utumhl nahātãya, 
avakkamo ti tiņņamh sannipåtā’? gabbbâvakkaman t! hoti kucchiyarb gabbbo 
patitthëtí, ten š ‘ti tena gabbhena sà dohallbi hotl, tenā '11 tadā tasså kucchimhi 
tlbbattapajaya'! suebo appajjati 1° tena Кёгапепа suhadā ti уцссай, tena '! 
tena k#ranena 68 janayantiti janetti са vuccati, añgapšpuranena!! cë 'u 
thanantare!t nipajjápetvš asrirasamphassarn pharšpenti añgasarhkhšten eva 
рё&ригапена!®, tosetitl sañüšpeti һавей, mamirh'5 katvā ti aganduputtassas 
me!’ upari vëto раһагай аїаро!? pharatiti eva mamarhkëranarb!5 katvë si- 
піддпвпа badayena udikkhsti, ubhayametassā 't! ubhayam р! taù dhanarh 
etassa puttassa atthaya aññawsarh adassetvā saragabbhadisu mita доре, sv arb 
putta adu росёё "і endbabăla putta етап гајакоі&дівц appamatto hobi?” 
адий c' aduñ ca?? kammat karobiti slkkhëpenti Hf mātā vibaññati kilamati, 
pattayobbane ti putte pattayodbane tarn puttarbinistthe!! paradăresu pamattarb 
@šyath anágacchantarn Паста assupuçņebi nettebi magga olokenti vihaüñati 
kilamati, kiccha bhato t! kicchena Ьһаїо pațijaggito, шіссћа caritvānā 
ЗИ тагат apatfjagglitvá, dbanāpîiti?? дһапатрі??, ayam eva vā рёћо, і. ç. b.: 


3 {азаа utu (v. 75) - -- anukampakā wanting la B3. è Bd omits m. > Сё -па, 
+ Cks tā, ° so ай three M39. 6 Bd -yarh. 7 Bd āyācati. 5 Cka katamab. * 
Ва _amnbštšyá? '° so Cks; Bd -(аув. '! Chs ¿ttarhpa-. 13 Bd Jäyatl. '* Bd -vu-, 
18 Ва tadanantare. 31 Bd mapa. >"? Ck agaddbiputtasame, Cs agaņndiputtasamo, 
Bd adbituputtassa me. !7 Ва ātà-. 1° Bd dbammaka-. !* Bd Һойц, #0 CE 
duduñcaduñca, Bd айш ca адий са. ®! (Уз nisitha, Bd nislçe. ?% Bd -пёві0, 
з» Bd adds adšsl. 


0 


15 


20 


30 


9° 


25 


332 XX. Sattatinipáta. 


дһапайаш&ёпый uppannadhabam pi miatararh apatijaggantinarn nassatiti me sutan 
ti, Шїееһат vä so tj itl dhanamh vëssa nassati dukkham vā во! nigacchati, 
labbbametan ti tab Idhaloke са devaloke са ānendādisukban matararh parl- 
caritvà vijānato paņditassa labbbš!, sakkā laddhur tadisenš 'ti a, danañoš 
"Я mātāpitunnen dānah databbarh piysvacanar bhanitabbarh uppannakicca- 
sādhanavasena attbo caritabbo jefthāpacãyanadbammesa ta. ta. parisamajjhe vā 
Tahogatánarh vë abhlvadanadivasena samënasttath! kštabbá na raho abbivádanadíni 
katvå рагївайт na katabbšáni* sabbattba вашбпеп’ ета bhavitabbarb, ete ca 
вапваћа паявй '!1 васе ote cattšro ssthgahë па bhaceyynrn, samavekhban- 
titl sammüënayena kāraņena pekkbanti, mahattan ti setthattarh, brahmi й 
puttánarh  brahmasamá uttamā saettha, раЬЬйсагїуа tl pathamacariyš, ibu- 
пеууа ti аЬцпарайдвёћекё yassa Казвас1 заккбгавва anucchavika, annens- 
matho ti аппепа айо рацепа, ресса "И kálakiriyáya pariyosšne ito капта 
saggo ca modati pamodawti. 


Evah М. Sinerum pavattento viya desanam nitthápesi, 
Тап sutvā sabbe рї te rājāno sabbabalakáyá pastdirmsu. Atha 
пе pañcasu sflesu patitthāpetvā ,,барӣйїѕи appamattá hothá“* 
*ti ovaditvá uyyojesi, te sabbe pi dhammena г. kāretvā йуп- 
pariyosáne devanagaram pūrayihsu. S-to N-to рі yávata- 
yukarh mātāpitaro paricáritvā Brahmaloka-parāyanā аһевшй. 


5. i. d. й. s. p. j. s. (Saccapariyosane mātiposakabhikkhu зоїй- 
pattiphale pattthasi): „Tadă matapitaro mahārājakulāni еһезцо, N-to 
Anando, Мапојагаја Sāriputto. ekasatarājā* asiti mahatherš са añña- 
taratherā са, catuvisati akkbohiniyo Buddhaparisá, Sonapandito pana 
aham ета ti. Sona-Nanda-jatakam. Sattatinipāta- 
vaņnnanā nitthitā’. 


1 Bd adda puriso ? Bd jabbham, ? so sil tbree MSS, for samānatā? * Ске 
-tl? 5 Сё па, © Ce-ja, 7 Rd -pátajátakarm nithtitarh-Kusajšátakarh Sona ca 
dve Jštakáni Sattatinipātamhi therehi sañgabakārebl ssñgitā. 


ХХІ ASITINIPATA. 


1. Oullahamsajátaka. 


Sumukhā ti. 1да S. Veļuvane’ v, āyasmato Anandassa > ji- 
vitapariccágam &, k. Devadattens hi Т-азза jivitë voropetum payojitesu 
dhanuggahesu pathamaiù * pesitena ăgantvā „nêba bhante sakkomi s 
Bhagavantam jīvitā voropetuh, mahiddhiko во Bhagavā таһйпи- 
Ъћато“ ti тибе Devadatto° „alarn āvuso, mā {уаш samanam Gotama 
jivitā voropehi*, abam eva s-am G-ańm jīivitā voropessămîti® vatvā 
Т-е? Gijjhakütassa pabbatassa рвссһёсһауёуа* camkamante’ Gijjha- 
kütam'° pabbatar abhirühitvë'! yantavegena mabati '° silan pavijjbi, 
„imāya silāya s-an G-am jīvitā voropessšmiti'?" dve pabbatakūtțāni '* 
samāgantvä tam silam paticchirhsu '°, tato papațikā'* uppatitvā Bba- 
gavato рёйай pahbaritvā rubiram'! uppādesi. Balāvavedanā pavat- 
tihsu. Jivako T-assa püdam satthakena phăletvă duțtțhalohita:ih 
vâmetvā'* pütimamsam apanetvā'” bhesajjah ālimpitvā’’ пїгода›'! 
akāsi. S, purimadivasam’’ eva bhikkhasamghaparivuto' mahatiyā *' 
Buddbalilbāya* vicari’, Athe паш disvë Devadatto cintesi: ‚в-азва 
С-азав rüpaggappattam* запгаш disvë koci menussabhüto иразаш- 
kamitun па sakkoti, rañño kho pans Nălāgiri nāma hatthi?° cando 


1 Cksjotevane. ? Sdr -dattherassa. ? Rd Sdr ssbbapatha-. * Sdr sdds (ап. 
° Bd: айд аһа, Sdr has во d. аһа. * Bd: -esi. ? Che -tasaa, ° Sdr pacchima-. 
* Sdr adds sayarb, ° Sdr -a. !! Sdr -ruyhli-. '* all three MSS. i. 25 
Bds add vatvā, Sdr (аһа. 14 Bd -(4, Sdr -tādbā. !% во Cks, Bd? Sdr sampati-. 
14 Bd pabbailkā. ?7 Sdr rudbi-. 18 Sdr -ta mopetvā. !9 5dr adds chovltvā? 30 
Bd -etvš, Sdr -ppetvā. ?! all four MSS, nl-. °? Cks purimasadisari, B“ ропа 
divasam, 847 рогівадіво 7> Sdr mahšbhi-. 2* Sdr adds ға, 33 Bd 5dr 
eHjäya. 3% Sdr nagararh pāvisi. 3! ВФ# rūpasobhagga-, Sdr ruparnsobhaga-. 
29 Bd Sdr тпаһаһа-. 


10 


35 


80 


384 XXI Asftlnipata. 


pharuso' Buddha-Dhammsa-Samgha-gune па jšnëti' во пай jivi- 
takkhayah pāpessstiti" so gantvë tam msmttham raño ёгосеві. Raja 
„sādbū*" ‘ti sampaticchitvë hattbācariyah pakkosšpetvë „samma sve 
Nalagirin mattan katvë páto va в-епа G-ena patipannavithiyarn 
Yiassaijehiti" &  Devadatto рі nam? „aññesu divasesu batthi kittakam 
uram рітаби“ pucchitvā ,attba gbate* ti vutte „„вте* војазв ghate 
pāyetvā в-епа С-епа patipannavitbim  abhimukham Кагеууйзїїї* á, 
So „sādbū" `6 затраЫссы. Каја negare hberiñ caršpessi': ‚вте 
Nalëgirim mattakam katvā падаге vissajjessanti, пёдагё рёќо va 
веһЬакіссёпі katvā antaravithinm mā patipajjimsúü'" 'ti. Devadatto pi 
rājanivesanā’ огиуһа hattbisalam gantvā hattbigopake Āmantetvā 
„mayai bhane uccatthaniyam ” nicatthane !° kâtuh samattbā'', васе vo 
уввепа attbo sve рёќо ув Nalagirin tikhinasuršya solasa ghate рё- 
уеітё s-assa С-взва ёрвтапатеіаув tuttatomarehi '" vijjbitvā '!' kujjhā- 
petvā hattbisalam . bhindāpetvā s-ena С-епё patipannavithim abhi- 
mukbam !' katvā к-аш (G-am jivitakkhayam pāpethā“ ` å Те 
эвёйһа" "і вашрвМосһїйзи. Sā ратаі sakalanagare vitthārikā '* 
аһові. Budha-Dbamma-Samgba-mâmakā upāsakā tam sutvá S-ra 


upasnthkamitvë ,,.bhante, Devadatto гаййё saddhih ekato hutvā вте 
tumhehi patipannavithiyam ЇЧа!йдїпїш vissąjjāpessati, sve рїпдвуһ 
apavisitvā idh’ eva hotha, meyan +їһїге yeva Buddhapamukhasss 
samghasea'? bhikkhah dasaâmā" 'Ы vadimsu. S. „sve piņdāya" 
pavisissāmîti“ evatvā „aham вте Nälâgirih dametvā patihariyam 
Ка{тв'* titthiye madditvā Rājagahe pindāya ecsritvā™ ve bhikkbu- 
sarmghaparivuto педага nikkbamitvā Veluvanam ета рашівваші'°, Rāja- 
gahavāsino pi hahüni?' bhattabhājanāni gabetvā Veluvanam eva āga- 
missanti, sve vihëre bhattaggam bbavissetiti® imin Кагапепв {ева 
adhivāsesi. Те T-assa adhivāsanam viditvā bhattabbājanāni šharitva'' 
„таге yeva dënam dassamë:'' 'Ч pakkamimsu. S-ñpi ра{һашвуйше 
db. desetvā majjhimayáme” райһе'* vissajjetvā paccbimayāmassa 
раїһвшаКо{!{Ыйзе #* sihaseyyam kappetvā dutiyakoțtbāse phalasamā- 


' Bd Sdr add manussakhátako 7 Bdr ajānanto, omltting во. >’ Cisna. * 
Bd Sdr add bhante. ° Hd adds tvarn, Sdr tah. * Bd Sdr -jyarh. 7 50" -реіта. 
è Sdr -nato. ” Bd Sdr -nato. 10 Sdr adds рі nicatihšánato uccațihâne, 1! Bd 
adds nicatháënsto vā uccathëne kātu samatthā, '3 Rd kutato-, Sdr tutthato-. 
19 Ва vijjhantā vijjhantā, Sdr vijjhanta vijjhantā. !* Bd Jar -Iyaro. !5 Bd Sdr 
-itā. 1% Rd Sdr bbikkhusa-, '? Bd Sdr add па. '"Sdr pāțihāriyaks. '* Sdr 
сагу. % Bd agsrpjssáamiq. *! C-u, Сә -ū. Be -rāpetvā. 9° Sdr adde 
devadatâya. 3! Ва Sdr -arh. 35 Sdr path-. 


1. Caullaharbsajataka. (533) 335 


pattiyë vitinametvë' tatiyakotthëse mahëkarunásamapattim samapajjitvñ 
bodhaneyyabandbave” olokento Nålägiridamane ° caturësitiyá pánasahassë- 
nam dhammëbbisamayarn disvë pabhătāye rattiyā kataserirapatijaggano * 
āyasmantarh Anaenda āmantetvă „Ananda ajja Rājagahaparivattakesu * 
attharasasu vihāresu sabbesarn' bbikkhūnaù mayá saddhin Ваја- 
gahan ратів šrocehfti* а. Thero ‘аһа akāsi. Sabbe bhikkhū 
Veluvane sannipatihsu, S. mahëhhikkhusamghapariraro° Rājagaharh 
рётіві, hatthimendá'° yathānusițtțhahm Patipajjinsu'', mabanto samā- 
gamo abosi. ЅайдЬёразаппё!" manussê „ajja kira Buddbanāgassa "* 
tiraechñnanagena 't вапрёшо bbavesati, anopamäya'* Buddhaliļlhāya 
Nülagiridamanam passissāmā“ ‘ti pāsādahammiyagehacchadanāni abhi- 
ruyha atthamsu, Aseaddhā рала micchâdițthikā '* ,Nalagiri cando 
pharuso'', Buddhšdinam gunam_ па jānâāti'", во ajja s-assa G-assa 
suvannavannarh гӯраш "° viddhamsetvë' jivitakkhayam papessati, вјја'! 
paccamittassa pittbih раавіввёшё“ ‘і pāsãādādisu ° ațthamau. На! 
рі Bhagavantam aágacchantam йівтё manusse tãsento gehëni viddbam- 
sento вакаѓапі sarmcunnento sondah ussāpetvā pahatthakannavalo 
pabbato viya ajjhottbaranto yens Bh. tenâbbidhāvi, tarn дізтё bhikkhū 
Вһ-аф etad avocum: „ayah bkante Nălâgiri cando pharuso тапиввв- 
ghütako'" imam гассһаш patipanno, na kho рапёуаш Buddhadinam 
күпе jănăti, petikkamatu bhante Bb., patikkamatu Sugato" 'ti, 
„Ма bhikkhave bhāyatha 3)“, patibalo™ ahah Nalagirin dametun* ti. 
Athàyasmë Sāriputto S-ra yāci: ,„bhante pitu uppannakiccarm `?" 
пёша jetthaputtassa bhāro, ahah etam!' damemiti". Atha namh S. 
„Sāripulta, Buddbabalah nāma айбаш, sāvakabalan айпаш, tittha 
tvan" ti pațibābi. Evam™ yebhuyyena asitimahātherā yācihsu, 5. 
sabbe pi pațibāhi. Athôyasmā Апапйдо S-ri balavasinehena addhi- 
vāsetuh влаккопіо „ayar һай рафата) wam таге(и'"' ‘ti T-tass' 
attbāya jivitam регіссајіітё“ Satthu purato ațțbēsi. Atha паш S. 
„apehi Ananda, më те purato айћазіі“ а, ,.Bhante, ayar batthi 


3 Ck yo vitl-, Bdr -yo samāpejjitvā. * Bde -dhujane. Ва Sdr -nena, Ве damena. * 
Ва Sdr adds hutvá. 3 Ске -ke. 6 Bd Sdr mahävl-. ! Bd Sdr add pi. ° Bd Sdr 
-parivutto. °’ Sdr adds plndšys. '? Ске „јо, Bar stha bas. !! Cis раја. 
15 Sdr -матраппё '? Gdr buddhamahaná-. '* Sar айда saddhih, ‘3 Ва 
апу-. !* Sdr adds ayah. !? Bd Sar adds manussaghšátako. !# Сї. !' 
Bd Sdr sarirarh. "° Cha -itvā, "! Sdr ajjeva. °? Sdr rukkhapá-. 8 Bd Sdr 
etako. 24 Bda Sdr -ittha. 5 Ck Sdr -le. 3° so Ва; Che рциппаф kiccā, 
Sdr uppanuskiccai omitting ркц. ?' Bds sham eva tah, 507 aban meva. *#ё 
Che 3# Rd Sdr add gantvë > 


20 


80 


336 XXI. Asitinipšts. 


cando pharuso manussaghātako' kappuțthānaggisadiso, pathamarm mar 
māretvā рассЬё tumhākam santikam āgacchatū“ ‘ti thero avaca, 
yârvatatiyan vuccamāno рї сь tath’ ета athási' пе patikkamati?. 
Atha паш Hh.* iddhibalena patikkamāpetvā bhikkhünar antare tha- 
pesi’ “asmim Кһаре ека itthi Nalagirin disvā maranabhayabhitá 
palāyamānā‘  amkena gahitadārakan hatthino са T-tassa ca antare 
chaddetvë palāyi, hatthi tam anubandhitvā’ дагаказѕа santikam agami*, 
dāmko тшаһагаташ ravi, 5. Ма]йрїгп odissakamettāya’ pharitvā 
sumadhuram brahmassaram niechāretvā ,ambho №]арігі, tam solasa- 
surāghațe” pāyetvā mattah Кагоріё " па апйаш gaphissatiti ka- 
гишзи, mem ganhissatiti '* kariùsu, má akáranena jamghâyo kilamento!° 
vicari, ito ehiti* pakkosi. So Satthu үасапаш sutrā akkhipi ummi- 
letvā Bh-to rūpasirih oloketvë patiladdhasamvego Buddhatejena 
рассћіповвигётедо '* sondarn olambetvā™ kappe cãlento'™ рапітё 
T-tasea pādesu pati. Atha паш S. ,.№а|&дігі, tvam tiracchânahatthi, 
аһаш Buddhavāraņo, ito patthāya mā cando шё '* pharuso mā ma- 
pussaghátako'' bhava, теіасіќаш pațilabhâ" “tí vatvā dakkhina- 
hattharh pasaretvë kumbharn'° parāmasitvåā `° 

Mā kuñjara nāgam asado, 

dukkho hi kuñjara nāgamāsado. 

па * hi nāgahatassa'' kuñjara 

sugati hoti itoparāyano ?'. 

Mā ca mado тё са pamādo”, 

па hi pamattā sugatin vajanti, 

tena tvan бета tathā Катїззёзї 

yena {таш sugatim gamissasiti™ dh. d, 

Tassa sakalasariram pitiyā nirantararam рһч{аш`? ahosi, sace'* 
tiracchānagato na! hhavissa sotāpannaphalam adhigamissa’®. Manussa 
tam pātihāriyam disvā повів арро{евшш??, sañjātasomanassā 
nanabharanáni khipimsu, tani hatthissa sariram paticchadayimsu, tato 


1 Ва Sdr -tako. °" Dds akšsi, Sdr (Но. 3 Bd Sdr -mi. < Sdr matthá. ® 


Ва Sdr tha-. * Okt -паф. 7 Ва Sdr add nivattitvā. ° Bd Sdr араш. ° 
Rd udissatan me-, Sd= uddassa me-. 10 Ck teu. 1! Bd-te, 13 Che 
=ssati, Па Sdr add рапа. ©? Bd Sdr -manto. !* Сів ра(ісећаппа-. 15 Sêr 
olabanto. !% Ck omit mā. !7 Bd Sdr -tako. !# Bd -е, Sdr -bhambhe. !" 
Bdr adds Imar gšthamaha. 20 Ck ti, Sdr пі. 31 зо Се Bd; СЕ -hattassa. 23 
Сї рагапумо. !3 read pimado. 7‘ Sdr adds eva. 235 Sdr рышат. ?* 
Ваз add kira, 37 Ва nā. *% Bd Sdr -ssatl. 2? СЕ appotherhsu, Bd sppotesu, 
Sdr apphotayinsu. 


1. Cullesambajitaka. (533.) 337 


patthaya Nālågiri Оћапарајеко паша јаќо. “Tasmim kho рапа Dbana- 
pälakasamāgame csturāsitipäņasahassāni amatam pivimsu'. S. Оћарв- 
pālakah pañcasu silesu patitthapesi. Sondaya Bh-to pādapamsūni 
gahetvā upari muddhani ёКігібта patikuțito? patikkamitvā dassanūpacāre 
thito Dasabala vanditvë nivattitvā hatthisālam pāvisi, tato pațthāya 
ca danto’ sudanto hutvā па kiñci vihetheti'. 5, nipannamanoratho 
„уећі уаш dbanarh kbittam tesan уета° tam һо“ ‘ti adhitthāya „ajja 
mayá mahəntam patihëriyam katesh‘, imasmim nəgare piudáya ca- 
гапат аррайгїрап" ti titthiye madditva hbikkhusamgbaparivuto ja- 
yappatto Ehattiyo viya nagarā nikkhamitvā Veluvanam ета gato. 
Nagaravasino bahuennapšënakhadaniyam ёдёув viharam gantvà mahā- 
Чёпатп pavattayimsu. Таш 'divasaem зёуаоЬёзатауе dhammasabham 
püretvä nisinnë bhikkbü katharmsamutthëpesum: „ативо ayasmeatë 
Anandena” Т-(авв" atthāya абапо jivitam рагіссајапіепа dukkaram 
katam, №аіёрігий disvā 5-га tikkhatturh patibāhiyamāno pi оёрадвќо", 
aho dukkarakârako āvuso їһего'°'‹ 'Ч, $. ,„Апапдавва gupakathā pa- 
vattati, gantabbam mayā etthā“ ‘ti Gandhakutito nikkhamitvā āgantvā 
„k. n. bh. e. k, s. ti p. і, п, ti v. пе bh. i. р. р’ Anando tiracchüna- 
уошуаш nibbatto pi шеш’ atthāya jivitam pariccajiti" vatvã'’ a. å.: 

A.'' Mabhirnsakaratthe ™ Sakulanagare™ $аКшо'* nâma 
гаја dhammena г. kāresi. Tadā nagarato avidūre еКавшїш 
певаёйарёшаКе aññataro nesādo рёвећі sakune bandkitvā nagare 


vikkipanto'' j[vikarh'' kappesi. Nagarato са avidāre āvațțato 
dvādasayojano '* 


vannapadumasañchanno, ta. пёпарраКаго sakunasamgho osari '', 


Мапавїуо пата padumasaro аһовї райса- 


во negñdo ta. апїуйшепа páse oddeti™™. “Tasmim kāle dha- 
taratthahamsarajá channavutiharnsasahassaparivuto?' Citta- 
kütapabbate Suvannaguhëyarh vasati™, Sumukho? оёш’ азва 
genapati ahosi. Ath’ ekadivasam™ tato hamsayüthá kati- 


) Cks рёуіфео. ? во Che; Вг Sdr -iho, Bd patikuto. * Bs Sdr danta. * ВФ Bdr 
-dhesl. 5 Bds пеха, Ck va. * Che -tā. ? Bd sannislnnš, Bdr sanulpattitvă, 
5 Ске äyssmā ānando. ° Bdr апара або, !° Sdr àyasma šuando. '! Sdr tl 
atha namh satthá dibbasotadbátuyšá sutvåâ. '? Sdr adds tunhi abos) tebi yàcito. 
18 Sdr adds bhikkhave. 14 Сіз mahisara-, Sër mahisaka-. !$ Hd» 3dr ságala-. 
38 Ба Sdr sšgalo. '7 Ch Bd Sdr viki- 18 Bd Sdr -tan. '# 9dr -niko 2° 
Bd Sdr -esiyo. A! 3dr otari, Bd -à otarihsu. °? Bds Sdr -si. 79 Rd Ce 
-pariväro. 2* Sdr parive-. 9° Ck sukhumo. ?* ВФ Sdr окайа. 
Jaara V 92 


5 


a 


338 XXI. Asidnipats. 


рауй suvannabarhsá Mánusiyasararmn' адапїуй* pahütagocare 
(авшіф уа!һавайһаш caritvë * sncitra-Cittakütarn * gantvë dhata- 
ratthassa йгосевщї: ..mahárája manussapathe Маппвїуо* оёша 
pademasaro sampannagocaro, ta. gocarurh panhitorn gacchámë““ 
*Ч. So .,manussapatho паша sasamko*, mā vo rucciti'“ pa- 
tikkhipitvàpi' panappuna vuccamáno „sace tumbákar8h ruccati 
gacchāmā“ 'ti варапуйго (аф saram аратаві, So аказа" 
otaranto радаш páse pavesento' yeva otari, ath' assa pšso 
pšdam ayasatthakena' bandbanto'"” viya ābandhitvā ganhi, 
ath' авва ‚,сһіодівваші пап“ ti ākaddhantassa ра(ћапағӣге 
cammam сћһіјјі'* dutiyavāre marmsam '* tatiyaváre паһагаш "°, 
рёво atthim ābacca atthási, lohitam pagghari'*, balavavedana 
pavattirhsu''. So cintesi: „зас` аһа Баддћагауаф '* ravissámi 
пасака ше utrastă ™ butvā gocaram араоћісха chātajjbattā va 
palāyantā™% dvbbalatāya samodde patissantiti“ so vedanarh 
adhivāsetvā™ ñatinam удуаданћаф caritvā” harnsakilarn'" ki- 
lanakāle mahantena saddena’' baddharāvam* ravi, (аф sutvā 
va te hamsā maranabhayatajjitā™ Citrakūtābhimakbā” pakka- 
тійфво '*%. Tesu™ pakkautesu Sumukho hamsasenaápati ,kacci 
nu kho idam bhayam mabăräjassa uppannam, jánissámi пап“ 
ti vegena pakkbanditvā purato gacchaotassa harnsaganassa 
antare M-am adisvā majjhimaharhsaganam vicini™, ta. рі"! 


adisvā ,„‚оіѕвзафѕауаф tass’ ех’ еїаїї?* bhayam прраппап“ ti 


"Ва ssaiyah-. ? Sdr gantva. > Bd Sdr «іса-, < Cè sucitrucitrakütam, Bd su- 
bitan citta-, Sdr eIttarnkutarn. omitting воста. ° Bd manussi-. © Sdr sa- 
р^(їЫћауо. ° Sdr ruceatiti, Bd ruecittbàti,. ® Bde Sdr add tebi. ° Sdr -esto 
10 Uks Hd Sdr -вапіо. 1' Rd Sdr -mattakens, B? -patta-. cfr = '3 Bd kadha-, 
Ве kaddhe-, Sdr ghate-. !3 Che chindi. !* Bd sdr add chijji 1s Cke omit 
таһагшйа, Rds адд chijji, Sdr has ubāru cbijji, adding catuttbavāre во. !° 
Sdr ган. 11 Rd Sdr omit ра. 1* Bd bandharavari. Sdr handhanaravam. !* 
Bd utterāsā, Sdr cittuträsi, 20 Ске ti. ?! Sdr adds yava. %% Ва kbāditvá, 
Sdr gocararn ganhitvăà #? Ва Sdr hernašnarn. 3“ Сіз omit sa-. 2° Bd handhana- 
татат, Sdr bandharavah. ?* Bar Sdr add hutw. 27 Bd sdr citta- 5 Sdr 
pakkhsndirnsu. 7" Cks pi. 30 Sdr -nases viciultvā. 3! Sdr adds umh. ™ 
Sdr tassovatai. 


1. Cullaharbsajataka. (533.) 389 


nivattitvā ёрассһапіо M-am рёве baddharn' lohitamakkhitarh 
dukkháturarh parhkapitthe nipannam дївө& „mâ Ъауі mahë&ráëja °, 
abarh mama }їуйаш рагіссајіуё tumhe pásato mocessāmîti“ 
vadanto otaritvā М-ап assāsento parhkapitthe пізійі. Atba 
паш vimarhsanto M. pathamar g. à.: 
1. Sumukha anopacivantã’ pakkamanti vibañgamā, 
gaccha tuvam pi, mā karnkhi, о’ atthi baddhe'° ваһдувќа ti. 1. 
Та. anupacinantāt ¢l віпећепа ёауатдвепе5 anolokento 6, palka- 
mantiti etu channasutiharpsasahaesñ ñauúvihañgamša mam’ chaddetvāă gacchanti 
tvam pi gaccha ша idha thënarn  akarnkhi evarh hi рёвепа baddhe шаў! sa- 
bāyatā nima ш’ atthi na hi te abar idāni kiñcl sahäyakiccaro Шаїчїп saskkhis- 
Sami kin te mayá nirupakárena papañcain akatvā даесһ` evā 'ti vadati, 
'Tatopararn'; 
з. Gacch' eváharh pa vā gacche па tena amaro siyarb, 
sukhitam tar upásitvá бдоккЬ каф '° tarh katharn jahe, 2. 
з. Магапап vā tayā saddhim jīvitah уй tayá vinā 
tath’ eva '' marana зеууо yañce jive (ауй vinü. 3. 
+. № esa dhammo mahārāja yam tai“ evamgatam jabe, 
yā gati tuyhah sā mayham ruccate vihañgādhipą™. 4. 
s. Kā'* nu рёѕепа baddhassa ' gati aññā таһапавй, 
sā kathah сеѓаудпазвза '° muttassa (ауа '' ruccati. 5. 
в. Каш vå tvah развазе'* attharo mama tuyhañ са pakkhima 
ñåtinam vâvasitthānam nbhinnarh jivitakkhaye. 6. 
т. Yan na kañcanadepiccha'" andhena tamasā раѓа ?° 
tādise sañcajarh'' райпап kam attham abbijotaye’’, 7, 
e. Kathan nu раїаїаш ве! Ша dbamme attharh ра bujjhasi, 
dhammo apacito santo attharh dasseti” páninam. 8. 


1 Sdr bandha disvk. 2 Sdr -j8 ti табға. 2? Ck anapaçinantš, C? апарауїпап(В, 
За» anuvi-. “ Ck паратіпапіа, Сз napavin-, Sdr anuvi-. > Cks šlapanava-. 
9 all four МУЗ. -(о. 7 Cks omit шат. ® Bda Sdr vàsarn. ? Sdr adds sumukbo 
аһа. 1° Che omit dukkhi. 1 Bd? Sdr tadeva. 12 Оке etah, !! Sdr -pā tl 
tato М. аһа, !* Rd? kin. 1% all four MSY. bandh-. !'* Ckscetasa-. |" 
Che ava. 1% Sdr -sl. 19 Sdr dve piccha, Che -da vlñca. 20 Sdr katab, Bd 
Каа. 2! Sdr sañcaja, Bd sañcacajarh. 2% Sdr adda tl sumukho аһа 75 Che 
dassati, Bd dassetari. 
22* 


Чч 


° 


30 


20 


35 


840 ХХІ. Asitlnipāta. 


•. So ‘hah dhammam apekkhëno' 
dhamma c` ашат samutthitamn n 
bhattiñ са tayi sampassamh” návakamkhëmi" јїтйат. 9. 

19. Addhá eso satah dhammo уо mitto* mittam ápade 
па-ссаје јїуііаввёрі hetu dbammam anussaram'. 10. 

и. бу-ёуаш dhammo са° (е cinno bhatti са viditá mayi, 
Кашат? karassu mayb’ etarn, gacch'evánumato * mayá. 11. 

1s. Арі tv-evah’ gate kale уат bandharh'° ñátiparm mayá 
tayá tam buddhisampannam'' авза paramasarnvutam. 19. 

1в. Ice-eva !' mantayaotānar агіуёрпаф ariyavuttinarmn 
paccadissatha'' nesado áturánarn іу" antako. 13. 

14 Те sattum abhisamikkha !* digharattarp hitë dijā 

P ёварӣ. 14. 

в. Dhataratthe са disvāna samuddente '* tato tato 
abhikkamatha уедепа dijasattu dijādbipe. 15. 

ia, бо са vegen’ abhikkamma äsajja parame dije 
paccakampittha'' nesádo'° baddhā iti vicintayarn 16. 

аз. Ekañ ca baddham stoarn abaddhañ са punâpararb 
āsajja baddham азїпагп pekkhamānam adtnavarh. 17. 


їапһїт âsiitha ubhayo па са sañcesum 


в. Tato so vimato yeva pandare ajjhabhāsatha 
pavaddhakáye'" āsfne dijasanghaganadhipe: 18. 
з». Yan по рёѕеоа mahata baddho na kurute desah — 
atha kasmā abaddho tvam bali pakkhi па gacchasi. 19. 
зо. Kin по t' йуаш dijo hoti, mutto baddham орќваві, (IV $32 
оһВуа вакирӣ yanti, kirn еко avahīyasi™®. 20. 
s. Rājā me so dijámitta' ѕакћа рйпавашо са me, 
п" eva паш vijahissāmi yāva kálassa pariyāyam*. 21. 


! Ck ava-, C? avakkháto, Hd spekkhanto. * С^ Sdr ватрһаввап. # Chs -kháva, 
Ва -khàpi. + Сі -e, ° Sdr -ranti talo M. ёћа. * Сёз kha. ? Sdr kayan. * 
Сш расећеғи а-. 9 Ck.va. 20 во Ck; Сә khandharn, B4* Sdr Марда. '' 
Bd vuddhi-> !2 Bd: -varh. '? Cke pabbadi-, Bde 9dr paccudi-. 14 Ba абћівањ- 
cikkbl, Che abhisarncikkha, !5 С^ navasañcops, Bd saücalesur, В? ssücesurb, 
Sdr вайсеви. 32 Cke -ddante, Sdr -ddente. '!! Ck: panda-, Bd pañca-, Ba 
pacchá-, Sdr mañca-. 16 Che -de. '° Ck pavatthlkāse, Cs pavattakāye, Bd pa- 
vadha-. ?9° Sdr -sīti sumukho hba. 3! Rd dijamitto, Cte dljomitto, cfr. IV sss. 
33 Sdr -yanti nesšdo ёћа. 


1. Сиаһатазјаіака. (533). 341 


зз. Каћа рапёуаф vihago' пёйдаѕа? pāsam odditam, 
padam һ` еѓагӯ таћапійпайћ, bodhum* агаһапіі* ëpadam °. 22. 
з. Хайа parābhavo hoti poso jīvitasamkhaye (IV 422 
atha jālañ са päsañ са авајјёрі па bujjhati®. 23. 
2. Арі tv-eva mahapuñña' раза bahuvidhā tatā’ 
gülham авајја bajjhanti' ath' evarh jivitakkhaye ti. 24. 


Imàsarn gáthànarñn sambandho Palivamen ета !0 veditabbo; ta. gacchevā 
*ti шаһёгәја аһа ito gaccheyyarn vā па vā nàharn!' tene gamanens!t và 
agamanena vå amaro siyah, ahah ito gato pi agato pi шагапа(о!? amutto va, 
Но puhbe рапа sūkbitah (ай upåsitvā idāni dukkhitarn katharn jaheyyan ti 
vadati, шагапаф vā ti ташап hi šgacchantasss!! vā tayā saddhirm maranarh 
bhaveyya gacchantassa уй сауа 35 vină jivitarn, tesu dvisu! уай tayā sad- 
dhim шагапай tad ova me уага уат pana {ау& vinā jiveyyarh na me {аш 
varan ti a, ruccste t! уё va tava gati Dipphatti'! sā va!’ mayharn ruccati, 
sā kathan ti samma Sumukha mama! ‹ёта dalhena vñlapasenaf3° baddh 
parahatthapatassa ss gati ruccatu tava pana cetayānassa’! sacetanassa paññā- 
vato muttasaa?? kathai ruccati, pakkhimā ?’ti раккьавашраопа!?, abhinnan 
ti ewhâkań dvinnari jīvitakkhaye узай tvan шаша vā tava vü avasitthañāti- 
паі 2% vā kam attharn ра&вав!?Ф, yar па ’'ti еЦһа nakāro upamāne, kañ- 
canadepicchā?’? "і kañcanadvepiccha ??, ayam eva vā pšátho kañcanasadisa- 
uhhayapakkhá 'ti a, tamasă ti tamasi, gatan ti Ка!агй?®, ayam eva vë pātho, 


purimassa nakārassa imini nambandho, na katan ti katah viyā ti a, i v. b.: 
tayi рапапһ cajanta рі 2* acajante рї?# mama jivitassa abhāvā yarh tava рёпа- 
sañcajanam аф 30 andhena tamasi ketam viya kiñcid evarüpakamtnarh арассак- 
khaganaih, tàdise tava apaccakkhagune pànasañcaJane 6! (тай рёпаф sañcajanto 
һай attharn Јосеууёв?с 34, dhammo apacito santo ti kin nu dbammo pūjito 
mānito 52 яештапо, atthaí dasaettui 9% vaddhiù 3 dasaeti, ареккі&по ti 
apekkhanto, dhammia catthan t ti dhammato са?! айһап mamulthitaih 


1 Bd Sdr vihañgo. * Ск -sā. * Cks buddhum. * Віз -Һай. 5 Sdr -danti в. A. 
* Sdr -tīti певадо š. 7 Ck apitvevamaharn maüñe, Се apitthevamaham maññe, 
Bd apitvarn varn шаһаройӣв, ° Ck tathā, Bd katā, Sdr gat? # Sdr va-, Bd 
hu-. 10 Bds Sdr -nayeneva. !! Ске ham. '? Ске maggena, !% Сіз ana, t 
Bdr ag-. 15 Chs адд vā. !* Ске omit dvi-. '? Sdr omita tava бац. 16 
СМ уа ca. !# Ch: khama, Bd omits шаша. *° Sdr уй!зшауаравапа ?” Sdr 
metayånassa, Ck metanāyassa, C? cetani ва. эз Ске yu-, 2% Віз -am. 
34 Bd Sdr -иһапай пё-. 25 Ck passi. %* Cks depipicchā. >? Cks -dopiccha 
38 Ско kati. 3° Che -tenàpi. 20 Cki omit tah. 31 Bds Sdr sañcajanto, omitting 
рёпа. 3 Bd kimattharh Jáneyyšslti, Sdr kimattharb mabhijoteyyositi. !5 Bds Sdr 
add sammanito. 34 Chs давва-. 55 Ва buddhi, Sdr vudhi. ° Cka Bd vatthan. 
эт Ok еа. 


10 


15 


15 


30 


342 XXI. Asidnipata. 


раввапіо, bbattiu ti sinehern, satarn dbammo ti panditšnarm ssbhšavo, yo 
mitto ti yo mitto ëpsdàsu mittsii па! caje, tases асајапіавна! еза sabbāvo 
nima addhë satarb dhammo vidito5 pākațo Jâto, kamarh karassū ’ti elarh 
kipsh mayš icechitsch mame karassu, api trevar gate kāle tl арі tu ova 
geto kâle mayi imasmirn (báne pšàsena baddhbot, paramasamvatan ti parama- 
paripunnarh, icceva mantayantšnan ti gaccha na gacchàèmÎti evan ka- 
Mm, paccadiasatha 'ti käsävini väsotvâ 


thentáanam, ariyanan tl šcàraari 
rattamále  pilandhitváë muggararn адёуа бассһапіо? va адівва(һа, šturšnan 
ti gllšqšnarn maccu viya, аЪћіваші кка ® 't| bhikkhave ti abbo рі sstturn 
ñysntarn passitvá. hitā ti digharattam añĀemaññassa hitë muducitü, па са 
sañcesu šsanš!'?0 ti ёзвнаќо па сатови yatbā півіпоё va ahesurb, Sumukhho 
pana ауаз nesšdo âgantvâ paharanto '! шей ра(һашатп!! pebaratū ‘ti cintetvâ 
M-ari pacchato katvš nisidi, dhataratthe t bamse, samuddente'? ti marana- 


Ъһауепа ito c' ito ce uppatante dia Ава)ја '(1 Паге dve Jene wupagantva, 
paccaksmpitthšá "і haddhā ла baddhš ti cintento upadhārento akampittha, 
теда hāpotvā вака agamâsi, ёвајја baddban ti nibaddhab M-am 
upagantvă nisinnam Sumukbar, adinavan t| šdinavam eva botvā M-ar 
olokentarn disvš, vimato ' kio nu kho abaddho baddbassa santike nisinno 
këranari pucehíssšëmiti vimatijāto’? bntvå tla. pandare ti bamse athasë pari- 
suddhe nimmale зашраһа!{һе kañcanavanne (1 a., pavaddhakāyo ti vad- 
ді кёуе məbäsarīre, yannü 't yan tāva eso mahBpšse baddho рі na kurato 
disan 11 palâyanatthâya ekarnù disarn na vajati? tarh yuttan ti adhippăyo, ba lì ti 
balasampenno hutvëpi, pakkhitl хаф &1араб, ọbāyā “і cbaddetva, yantitl 
зезавайипа gacchanti, avahiyasiti ohlyvasi, dijâmittā ‘ti dijānah ашна 
yšva kalassa parlyāyen ti уёта maranassa таго ágacchati, katha panáyan 
ti wath гаја me во ti vadasi гёјапо са wama paņditā bonti, itl'™* pandito sa- 
māno kena kàranena odditsrn рават па !* addası'”, padarth hetan ti yasama- 
hatta vä ñanamabattarn vå pattānarn attano гредеђојјһапат !° пёша радат 
kšranam, tasmāå te āpadain’? bodhuri arahenti, рат3һһауо ti avaddhħi, 
авајјёріс upagantvëpi па bujjhati, tatā ti яаа odditā, gūlhamāsajjš’? 
"Е tesu pāsesu уо?! gülho29 paticchanno páso tsrb?) âsajja bajjhanti, atbevan 
ti atha evam jivitakkhaye bajjhant evā “і a, 


Iti so tam? kathāsalläpena muduhadayarh Каїуа M-assa 
jivitam yácanto: 


1 Sdra ° Bda Sdr add mittassa. ° Сёз vijitāti, 88 tihividito. * во CG; 
Ск Ваё Sdr bandho. ° Bd Sdr -van. * Be Sdr аш, ? Sdr áàg-. 6 Checa. * 
Bd abhiciñcakkhä, Bz Sdr abhisañcikkha. !? Ck: пайсавайсорё, Bd nasaccelesn-, 
Вг паса sarnceturp-, Sdr nacslañcesunti. !! Sdr omite pa-. 12 Chs harnsasamu- 
dente. !# so Cke Ва; Sdr mati-. !* Ва Sdr bbajati. ?* Bd Sdr add рі. '& 
Bd pāsanarh, Сї» omit па. '! Bd adassa, 84" addesam. 1° во С^; СЕ ар-, 
Bd spadarm-. !* Bdseap-, 20 Sdr guyh-. ?! Сіз во. 33 Chs рё лаф, Bz pacë 
tarh. 2° Ck sarhtarnao, Сг sanar so, Bd so, omitting tam. 


1. 


Collaharnsajštaka. (533) 


343 


з. Арі п” āyar tayá saddhirn sambbāsassa' sukhudrayo, 
api no anamaññasi', арі no jivitam dade ti р.а. 25. 


Тз. арі nāyan ( арі nu ayab, sukhudrayo ti sokbaphalo, anu- 
maññasiti? Cittakütarn t gantvà ñâtake passiturn apl поё апојёпеууёаі, у ї91- 


tam dade tl арі no imaya kathšáya ° uppannavlssšso na màreyyšsitl. 


So (азва madhnrakatháya bajjhitvā 


з. Na c' eva me {уаш baddho si, na рі icchāmi te vadham, 


kámam khippam ito gantvñ jiva {таш anigho ciran ti g. А. 26. 


Tato Sumukho catasso gáthá abhāsi: 


az. № evâbam’ eta icchámi аййаїт` etassa jivita, 


васе ekena tuttho° ві muüc'etarn° тай ca bhakkhaya ™. 27. 


з. Атоһарагїпйһепа '' tuly' asmá vayasā ubho, 


па te lábhena jio’ atthi *™, еїепв'” niminā tavai. 28. 


a. Tad irngha samavekkhassu '*, hota giddhi їауйзшави, 


mam pubbe bandha рёвепа pacchë muñca dijáadhipam, 29. 
зо. Tüvad eva са te lábho Каїавв&'* yācanāya са 
теит са dhataratthehi yávajIváya (е siyā ti. 30. 


Та. есап ti yarn aññatra etassa Jivitë mama jivitain etarh abarh n° Іссһаюі, 


tulyaemiš ti samānā homa, пїшЇпа tuvan ti parirattehl tvan, tavšsmasü 


ti tava ашһеви giddhl hotu, kin te etene, шау! lobham uppadehitl vadati, 


(табеті tl tattako yeva, yâcanâya сё `1 yá mama уёсапа så katā аввё ча. 


Iti во tāya Чһапипайевапйуа tele pakkhittakappāsapicu 


viya mudukatahadayo M-am tassa дават Каїуй dadanto йһа: 


s. Passantu no mahësarnghë taya muttai ito gatarn 


mittamaceš са bhaccá'* са puttadārā са bandhavā. 31. 


эз. Na ca“ te tādisā mittā bahuunam idha vijjati 


yathā tvah dhataratthassa pāņasāãdhāraņo sakhá. 32. 


s. So™ te sahāäyam тибсаші, hotu гаја tavánugo, 


kámam khippam ito gantv& ñátimajjhe уігоса(ћа `1. 33. 


1 Bås Sdr sarovå-. 2 Ске -est, Bd Sdr -šsí. 2 Ra Sdr „ав. ( Cks chra-. 5 
Bds 847 (тап in the place of ар! no. 


Сы navš-. * Ck ku- 
Bjs Jirstthi, Sdr onatà. 


16 Chs аи. 


1? Све nā се. 


* Сік mañ-. 
18 Cke add тай. 


16 Ске se, 


10 Cs -ysm. 


* Ва» Sdr gàtbaya. 


11 Вф Sår -ре.. 


? Sdr. пашета-, 


11 Ск Sdr -nā, 12 во Che 


15 Б4 Sdr katessa 


16 


20 


15 


344 XXI. Asitinipata. 


Та. по tl nipatamattari, taya muttan t imar hi tvah бета muñcasi 


паша tasmā imar tayš muttarn ito Citrakütapabbata-gatam ' mahantă ñátisarnghë 
са? ote са mittšdayo passantu ettha, bandbavā ti ekhalohitasambandhi53, 
viJ)sttiti vijjanti, раравёдћагапо 1] sādbāraņapāpo avibbattajivito *, ysthš 
ivar etassa sakbš etādlsā впбеват bahunnarn 1062 5 паша па vijjanti, tavā- 
пово ti еїзтї* dukkhlrarn афауа purato gacchantessa tava ayen auugo botu, 

Evan vatvá pana nesádaputto pemacittena М-ат upasarn- 
kamitvā bandhanarn chinditva āliñgitvā sarato nikkhāpetvā’ sara- 
tire tarnnadabbapitthe° pisīdāpetvā раде baddhapásam mudu- 
cittena sanikam mocetvá' dūre khipitvā M-e balavasineharn 
paccupatthápetvá mettacittena udakam ādāya lohita dhovitvå 
panappuna parimajji, tassa mettacittānubhāvena B-assa pāde 
sirā вїгаһ1'° тпаїйватп marhsena cammarh cammena ghattitarh '', 
tāvad eva pādo ватпгї]һо'” sañjātachavi™ sañjatalomo ahosi, 
abaddhapādena nibbiseso B. sukhito pakatibhāven’ eva nisidi. 
Atha Sumukho attánarm nissāya M-assa sukhitabhávarh діѕуё !* 
jātasomanasso’* nesādassa thutim akāsi. 


Тат attham pakārento Satthā аһа: 
sa So patito pamuttena Ыһайїипё bhattugáravo 

ajjhabhāsatha vakkango уёсаф Каппазикһаш bhanam: 34, 
ss. Evam luddaka nandassu saha sabbehi natibhi 

yathàham ajja nandāmi шуйаш disvā dijadhipan ti. 35. 


Tattha vakka'ñgo tl тагпадїто. 


Evaro luddakā 'ti imami '* (һо) katva Sumukho B-a å.: 
„mahârāja, iminâ amhškam mahāupakāro kato, ayam hi am- 
hākari уасапат akatvā КЇЇЙһагпве no' katvā issarānam dento 


bahun dhanamh labheyya, māretvā™ тагат vikkinanto pi 


labhetha ", attano рапа jivitam anoloketvā amhákam vacanarh 


1 Ва» -tarn камта. 3 Bd yeva, Sdr yere. 5 Cis эп... * Bd -vako, Sdr 
-viko. Š Ске -їпап. 6% Сёг ettha. 7so Ckə for -metvā? Bde Sdr nikkhami-. © 
Bde _dabbatinapitthe, Sdr -dabbbatiņna-, ° Cks temetva, Bde morltvá. 10 зо Che, 


Bde -reh1, Sdr slrāsirā. !! во Sdr; Rds -karn, Ck запїша!й, C# eanikari, 2° Ва 
sammärulho. 133 Bd Sdr succhavi. 14 Sdr vidíitva. 15 Bd Sdr sañjata-. 16 
Bs 847 omit imarn, Bd bas imam pans, 17 В» -so nà. '* Gdr adds vā. b 


СЕ labheta, Bd mūlain pilaāheta, Sdr hahüdhanar labheteva, 


1. СаПайатва}дайз. (533.) 345 


kari, imah гапбо santikarh netvā sukhajivikarn karomā“ ‘ti. 
М. sampatțicchi. Sumukho attano bhásáya M-ena saddhirn 
kathento puna тапивзабћавёув luddaputtarn āmantetvā „samma 
{тай kimattham рӣве' oddesîti“ pucchitvë ,dhanatthan“ ti 
vutte ,evarh sante tavai’ amhe ādāya nagaram рауівібуй rañño 
dassebi, bahurn?' te dhanarn dápessamiti*“ а. 
sa. Ebi’ tarn anusikkhámi уа{һа tvam api* lacchase 
labharn yathâyarn” dħatarattho рёрат kiñci па dakkhati". 36. 
ы. Khippam antepnrarh netvā raño dassebi no ubho 
abaddhe pakatibhüte kaáce° ubhayato thite 37. 
зв. Dhatarattha'° mahārāja harnsadhipatino ime, 
ayarh hi гаја harnsánarn, ayarh senāpatîtaro. 38. 
s. Asanmsayarm іта disvá harsarajarm narádhipo 
patito sumano vitto'! bahu dassati te dhanan ti., 39. 
Те. anusikkhāmiti апиваѕёоі, pāpan ( атакай, rañño daesohi 
по 1 ашһе ubbo pi rañüo dassehi, B-asea paābapabhāvadasseosttharh і: attano 
mittadhammassa Bvibhávanattharn luddassea dbanalábhatthari rañüo sile patit(há- 
panattharn сё ') catübi käraņebi evan &., dhatarattha!? ti netvā ce рапа 
таййо evar âcikkbeyyâsi'f; maháršJa ime dhataratthakuləe јака dve harisádbi- 


patino)5, etesu ауап гаја itaro senapatiti, iti пап sikkhāpesi, patito ti ádini 
бї рі iutthākāravøvacanān’ eva 16, 


Еуа vutte luddo „sāmi, mā хо rajadassanarh '" 


ruccatu ", 
гајапо пата са)асїца, keliharhse™ vā vo™ Катеуушп mára- 
реуушћ vä“ ti vatvā „samma mā bhāyi, ahan tādisah kak- 
Кһа!аш luddarh lohitapanim dhammakatháya mudukam katvā 
mama pādesu pátesirn*', rājāno пата puññavantë ca pañña- 
vantā ca subhásitadubbhaásitaññü °” ca, khipparñn amhe гаййо 
dassehîti“ vutte „tena hi má mayharh kujjhittha, аһат ауйво?” 


› Bd Sdr -sar, 2? Bd Sdr omit tuvam. ° Bd babünam. * Bd peseamiu. ° 
См add ca. 6 Che tuvam М. 7 Båt Sår tavāyah. * Sdr rakkhati, * Ck 
káve, Bd које, Sdr каје. 10 Ck# Sdr -а, Bd -о. !! Bd Sdr citto, Ck vinto. 
э Rds panñabbava-, Sdr paññšnubhavarb-. © Che -о. 14 Cks -sīti. 15 Che 
jâto vehasadhi-. '* Ва tutha-. '7 Ске ršJa-, Sdr rañño емай dassanarh. !* 
Hd sti, Sdr rucci. !# Hd kila- altered to kilš-, Sdr kila-. #9 Cke omit vo. ?! 
Sdr pšdesíi, Bd patemi. * Sdr -tain dubbbàsltarn Jananti. * Ва Sdr savasqarh. 


10 


20 


95 


10 


LEJ 


346 ХХІ. Asttinipšta., 


tumhákam ruciyā' nemiti“ ubho рі касат? āropetvā гӣјакошайћ 
gantvá гайбо dassetvā raññë puttho yathâbhūtarh árocesi. 


Tam attham pekāsento Sattbš ha: 
о. Tassa tam vacanam sutvë Каттапй upapadayi, 
khippam ап{еригып gantvā габбо hamse вівззвуі 
abaddhe pakatibhūte Касе? ubhayato thite. 40. 
a. Dhatarattha * mabërëja hamsëdhipatino ime, 
вуаш hi гаја barnsënarm, ayar senāpatitara‘“. 41. 
a, Kathah реп’ ime vihaga' tava batthattbam ` āgată, 
kathan luddo mahantšnarm ізғаге-т-ійһа-т-ајјһара°. 42. 
аз. Vibitë sant’ ime рёвв' pallalesu janādbipa 
yam yada yatanam maññe dijanam pāņarodbanam, 43. 
“. Tādisam рёѕатю ёзејја hamsaraja abaijhatha, 
tam вЬвдіһо upāsīino шетёувш ajjhabbāsatba; 44. 
«s. Sudukkarsm anariyehi dahate bhavam uttamam 
bhattur atthe'° parakkanto dhamme yutto vibaōgamo. 45. 
в. Attan’ ayam сајітапа jivitam jivitaraho 
anutthunanto йзїпо bhattu yācittba jivitam. 46, 
a. Tassa tam vacanarm sutvă pasádam ` aham ajjhagam, 
tato {аш pámuñcim pāsā anuññüsim sukhena ca, 47. 
s. So patito pamuttena bbattunā bhattugārayo 
ajjbabhāsatba vakkañgo vëcam kannasukkham bhanam. 48. 
«ә. Evam luddaka nandassu saba sabbehi ñatibbi 
yathàbam ajja nandāmi muttam disvá dijadhipam. 49. 
so, Ehi" tem anusikkhámi yathš tvam api lacchase 
lābharù yathñyam dhatarattho papam kiñci na dakkbatis, 50, 
si. Khippam antepuram gantvë гаййо dassebi no ubho 
abaddhe pakatibhüte Кйсе!* ubhayato ќе. 51. 
sa. Dhataratthë '* таһёгаја hatsādhipatino ime, 
ayam hi råjā hamsānām, ayam senapatitaro. 52. 
ъз. Азатзауаш imam disvë hamsarájam paradhipo 
patito sumano vitto'* bahurb dassati te dbanam. 53. 


Y Ва ruecayä. > Bd» Sdr käjah. ° Ваг каје, Sdr Маш. “ Bd -0о, Sdr -a. 
5 Sdr adda їшїп eutrā гаја аһа * Bd Sdr vihañgi. ! Sdr hatthattham. ° 
Ва Sdr -re idha a-. ° Sdr һата, '° Bd Sdr atthe. © Che ра-. 19 Che 
add са. '? Sdr rakkhati. '* В4* Sdr ше, )š Сіз Sdr -o. 16 Càs citto. 


1. Cullaharmssjitsku. (533.) 347 


sı. Evam etassa тасвоё& ünita 'me ubho maya, 
etth' eva hi ime assu ubho anumatā mayá. 54, 

эь. бо 'yam evamgato рвЕКМ dijo paramadhammiko, 
шёдізазза bi luddasss јаовӯуеууёіћа maddavam, 55. 

se. Юрвуапаш hi! te deva nàññam passāmi edisam 
sabbasākunikagāme’, ќаш passe manujadbipë 'і, 56. 


Та. kammanaá t upapadayiti yam во атаса tarh karonto kāyakammens 
вашраїеві, gantvā t! һагп3агаё]впа blsinnakacakotiin * uccatararh sonàpatinā ё 
півіппако(іг + (Лока nicah ketvā ubbo pi* ukkbipitva!' harhsarājā са senā- 
pati са räjänah разаіќшп gacchanti uesaratba ussaratbhā ‘ti јапат uasäronto 
evarüpš? sobhasgappattë suvanpavannabarhearkjāno” па ditibapubbā ti!? ma- 
Dussesu pasarsantasu’! ШЫрраш sntepurah gantvā, adassayiti harmaa- 
тёјёпо tumbe datthum igatš t! rañño ёгосёресуё tena tutthacittena âgacchantū 11 
"і pakkosápite'? atibaritvà даввауі '*, hatthatiban) ti һапһе atthar ’* 
pattan ti vatta boti, mabantānan ti yasamahantarn pattânarni витаппа- 
уаппйпагп Чһа(ага{!һаһат1вёнатп issara'? sšmino Каћа tvaru luddo butvă 
adhigato ti pucchati, isaeramidhamajjhagată'® ti pi ра|һо, etesarn lssariyarn 
tvara 19 kathai ajjbagå ti a, vibltā ti yojitâ, yah уада yatanah шаййөә 
ti шеһёгдја yah yah samosaranatthšuarm dijènain pàèparodhanaro jivitakkha- 
yakarah таййёш! ta. ta. mayå pallalesu равё vibitá, tādisan ti шёповіуё 2% 
ваге tathšvidharn pāņərodhanarn mayá vibitah раа), tan ti чат etah ta. 
baddharh, upäsino tl attano jivitah aganetvë upagantvā nisinno, mamäyan 
tl marh ayar senšpati abbšsatha3!, шауё saddhirm kathosi, sudukkaran ti 
tasmir Капе өза amhišdiasehií впагіуеһі sudukkararn akásl, kiro #2 tan ti dahato 
bhāävamuttaman (1 attano uttamam ajjhbåsayarh даһа vidabi райавау!??, 
attanšyamn ti attano ауьш, anutthunauto tl bhattu gune vanuento tassa 
jivltarn2t mam уёсі, taasā 'ti tassa tathā?' yäcantasaa, sukhena са ’tl уабё- 
sokban Citrakutarn $ gantvā Oátiesrpgharh passathâ “tÍ ca enujānih, etthovă 
"і mayš рапа ime dvs ettha’? Màònusiyatb sata yeva Cittakü(agamai 
matà ahesurp, evarbgato ti sactuhatthagato, јапауеууёсћа maddavan ti 
айаш! wettacittain јапеві, upàyanan3 ti pannškirarn, sebbasškupilka- 


* Bd upayanañca, Sdr upayanañca, Ске upàsanarh Ы. 2 Ck: sabbe - - kågimo. 
з На §är -unš. + Bd -каја-, Sdr -kåpañkotih. 5 Bd Sår -ti. * Ва Sdr pi te. 
1 5dr ра- * Bd Sdr add пёша. # Sår -näāh-. '0 Bd Sdr add muduhadayena. 
1) Ва Sdr hisasmpattesu. '? Rd Sdr -atū. !% Bd 3dr -tọo, 19 Ck daseasl, 
Bd Sdr daesesi. '* Che hatthapatthan, В4 hatthartan, Sdr batthatthan. 16% 
Bd Sdr hatthesu âgatern. !? Bd Sdr -re. 16 Bda ydr issars --gā. !* Сло omit 
tvah. 20 Bd mànussiya, Sdr manussiya. 31 Bd Sdr ajjhabb-. “3! Sdr ka, 
Bd omita kiiùtanti, 35 Bd -bati - - seti. 94 Bde Sdr add шойса ti. #5 Che 
qassotassa уасьё. 3€ Bd Sdr сіце-. 2! Cks ete in the plece of dve ettba, ** 
Ck npšyan, Bd Sdr upayänan. 


10 


16 


20 


35 


30 


15 


20 


95 


348 XXI. Asitlnipata. 


game ti вађравоіт pl ваңип!Шараше abah аййып tava evarüparh Кепасі 
såkunjkena šbhatapubharn upáyanarn' na passāmi, tah passš "H tah mayá 
šhhatarh upaáyanarn ! passa manujadhipà ti. 


Evar во thitako va Sumokhassa gune kathesi. Tato 
гаја harnsarañño maháraham āsanam Sumukhassa са suvanna- 
bhaddapithakarn dāpetvā (езат ta. nisinnānah suvannabhá- 
janebi lājaąmadhuphāņitādīni’ dāpetvā nitthite papa * bhojanakicce 
añjalim paggayha M-am dhammakatharn yácitvá suvannapithe 
nisīdi. So tena yācito patisantháram (ауа akási. 


Tam ааш pakāsento Sattha аһа: 
sz, Disvë nisinnam rājānam pithe sovannaye subhe 

ajjhabhasatha ғвккабдо тасаш kannasukharm bhanam: 57. 
sa. Касс}* nu bhoto kusalam, kacci' bhoto апётауаш, 

Кассї* rattham idah phitam dhammena-m-anusissati °. 58. 
во. Kusalañ c' eva me bamsa, atho hamsa anamayam, 

atho rattham idah phitam dhammena-m-anusissati*. 59. 
во. Кассі* bhoto amaccesu doso Косі na vijjati, 

kaccin’ nu te tav' atthesu návakarmkhanti }їуйаш', 60. 
вз. Atho рі те amaccesu дово Косі ов vijjati, 

atho р’ ime теп' stthesu nàvakamkhanti jivitam'. 61. 
вз. Каосі te зёдізт Ьһагуа assavā piyabhünini 

puttarüpayasüpeta {втв-ссһапдватазвпидаё'. 62. 
вз. Atho рі те sñdisi Ыһапуё аѕввуё piyabhünini 

puttarüpayasupetë mama-cchandavasanugë ti. 63. 


Та. гёјапао ti Sakularájānaii 20, таккай ео ti ћагаагёја, dham mena- 
manusissatîti’! dbammens anusissati’?, doso И арагайћо, {атас һевй 
"4 орраппеви tava yuddhādisu attbesu, nšávakarnkhautiti urah!’ datvá 
pariccajantā Касс1* attano Jivitarn па patthenti Jivitarn cajitvā tav’ ov’ attbari karonti, 
sšdisiti samajātikā, авватӣ ti vacanarn)t sarupaticchiká, риїїагйрауавч- 


1 Bd Sdr upayāänai. ? Ck -panlyadini, ©? -pāniyādīini, Dd -panltšdini, 94 
-pāniņltādini, В• .phanlta-. 5 Ckə рапа * Bd kiñci, ° Bd -sshsisl, Sdr 
-asesiti, adding гаја šba. * Bd -sāsabautł, Sdr -salseahanti, adding m. šba. 
т Sdr jivitet. adding гёја àbe. ° Sdr -tanti, adding m. ëha. * Sdr -gšti 
гајёһа, '0 Cks sakuna-, Bds Sdr sāgalarā-. '! Сіз -eīti, Bd -asâsasiti, Sdr 
-sāsasiti. '? Cks -sëšs[ssati, Bde -säsati, wanting in Sdr, 32 Ck udarah, С 
upadarari. !* Bd Sdr -na. 


1. СаПаһафвајасака. (533). 349 


реё t| puttebl ca rüpena са yasena ca upetá, tavacchandavasšnuga ti 
kacci’ tav' ev ajjbasayarh tava мава anuvattail па attano cittavasernávatlatiti" 
pucehat!, 
Evah B-ena ра{ївап{һаге kate puna гаја tena saddhim 
kathento å.: 
вг. Bhavan tu kacci' nu mahásattnhatthatthatarñ * gato ° 
dukkham йра}}ї vipularnh tasmirb pathamamāpade. 64, 
вв. Kacci' yan п` āpatitvāna dandena samapothayi °, 
evam etesah jammanam pākatikarh bhavati távade' 65, 
вв. Khemam āsi mahārāja evam apadi sarbsati* 
па cáyarh kiñci-r-asmāsu ва{їй va samapajjatha. 66. 
s. Paccakampittha nesádo, pubbe va ajjhabhasatha, 
tadáyarn Sumukho yeva pandito paccabhšsatha' 67. 
e, Tassa tah vacanarh sutvā раѕадат ayam ajjhagā, 
tato тат pámuñci рава anuññāsi sukhena са. 68. 
вә. Idam рї'° Sumokhen’ eva etadatthāya cintitarh 
bhoto sakāse āgamanarh etassa dhanam'' icchatā'*. 69. 
то. Svāgatañ с’ еу` idarb bhavatarh patito" с` asmi dassanā, 
eso api™ bahurb vittarn'° labhatam yávat' icchîti'', 70. 
Та. mahåāsattuhatthatthatari gato’? ti mahantassa ñattuno bat- 
thatthatah 49 gato, äpatitvānā ‘і upadbāritvà, păkatikan t ракайкай, 
ayam eva vā pāțho, J. v. h. etesac) hi japmmānaih (ётад eva етап pakatikarh 
hoti sakune dandens potbetvā jivitakkhayarn pápetva!t va dbanarh?° labhantiti’!, 
kiñcirasmasü 'tl kiñci amhesu92, sattu уй 'ti sattu viya, paccskampittha 
‘ti maharšja esa amhe disvá baddhā”? ti saññaya thokarh osakkittba?™!, pubbe 


та "і ayam eva pathamarn 5 ajjhabhási, ta dà 11 tasmlm kile, etadattbāyā 
Ы etnssa nesādaputtassa attháya cintitari, dhanamicchatšá ti etamsa dhanarh 


1 Ва кіда. ? Bd Sdr -na-. * Ck hhavannu-, Bd bhavantam kicl, Вг bhaga- 
vantaih-, Sdr bhavanto-. < Сёз -karb, Sdr habhattha. * Cha -ā. * Ck» -thayi. 
7 read: pakati boti- -? Sdr -evā tl barhsarājā аһа. Š во Ско; Bdz evamâpari- 
yawati, 3dr evərmëšriyaseti. ? Sdr ajjha-, 10 Bas Sdr idara. !! Che ҹіц-. 18 
Che -akà. Sdr -tāti г} аһа. 2 Ck panito, Се ро, Bd Sdr patito. M 
Hds Sdr сар. 5 Be 9dr citean. !* Bde Sdr yāvadi-. 1? Rd -karhgato, Sdr 
hattbatfhagatá. '" BA hattattha, Bz hatthatthan, Sdr Һал һә, !*# Bd Sdr 
pšpento. ?© Bd vsttanan, Вг Sdr vetanarn. 3! Ва labhati, Sdr labbissati. ?? 
Sdr adde idab vuttah hoti те saha. 23 Bd һапдһапа, Sdr hardbš. + pd 
Osakkatha, Sdr usakkittha. 2?5 Ch# vë pátho шаш. 


10 


95 


10 


15 


25 


350 ХХІ. Asitinipáta. 


Ісеһапіепа tena tava ssntikah ambikarh ёкашапаш! clintitah, svāgaterm 
cevidan? tl må bhonto cintayantu bhavatarn idarn idhāgamanarh svagatam eva, 
labhatan ti labbatu. 


Evañ са pana vatvá rājā aññatarar amaccam oloketvā 
„Кіп karomi devā“ "і vatte „imah nesádarh kappitakesa- 
massor nahátánulittam  sabbálarkárapatimanditarn karetvá 
ānebîti“ vatvā tena tathā katvā йпЇїавва tassa вагпуассһаге* 
satasahassutthánakarn* ратат dve vithiyo° gahetvā thitarh° 
сеһат га{һауагат' айбай ca bahum biraññasuvannarh айаві, 


Tem attharm āvikaronto Satthā: 
зз. Santappayitvá nesñdam bhogehi manujādhipo 
ajjhabhásatha vakkañgam vëcam kannasukham bhanan ti g. ё. 71. 


Atha М. rañño dh. д. бо dhammakatbam sutvā tuttha- 
hadayo „dhammakathikassa sakkararn Кагівва тісі“ setacchattarh 
datvā r. paticchāpento й.: 

зз. Yar khalu dhammam adhinarh' vaso’ vattati kiñcanarh "° 

sabb’ аЬ’ issariyah bhavatarn pasāsatha yad icchatba. 72, 

тв. Dâānatthah upabhotthum vā yah с' аййап upakappati 

etah dadāmi vo vittarn 1ївзагал1 vissajāmi vo ti аһа. 73. 

Та. vaso vattatiti yattha ca mamas vaso’! vattati, Кібсапац!? ti 
appamattakam рі, sabbatthissariyan ti sabbsrn bhavatarh yeva 168агїуап 
atthu, yah caññamupakappatiti puññakammatšya!3 dánattharb và cbattarb 
ussåpetvå r. esa upabhotturñ vå узт та aüñarn tumhškarh гиссай tab karoths, 
еса! дайёті vo vittah, saddhih setacchattena mama santakaissarlyarn 
vissajjāmîĵti. 

Atha M. габпа dinnar setacchattah рипа '° tass’ eva 
айаві. Вајарі cintesi: ,,hamsarañña tàva me dhammakathā 
эша, luddaputtena pana ayah Sumukho madhurakatho ti 


1 Sdr ga.. 1 Sdr -tantevi-, Bd repeats sam-. * Bd Sdr add kata, > 
Bds itthiyo, * во Cha; Bde {агпшаһашап, Sår mabantah. "7 Bd Sdr -гайса, © 
ao Ce; Ck -dinarn, Bd -dhinam, Sdr -ракіпаф. # во all four MSS. for vase? 
10 Bd 5де kiñci-. '' Che vā-. 1? all tbree MSS. kiñci-. !2 Bd Sdr -kāmatiys. 
14 Сї avar. !5 Sdr pana. 


1. Cullaharhsajšataka. (533.) 851 


ativiya vannito, imassápi dhammakatham sossāmîti“ во tena 
saddhirh sallapanto апапќагаћ р. й.: 
re Yathā са my-āyarn Sumukho ajjhabhāseyya' pandito 
Кашава* buddhisampanno tam my-šssa paramappiyan ti. 74. 


Та. yathë ti yadi” i. v. h.: yadi ca me ауап Sumukho pandito buddbl- 
sampanno kámasš! sttano гасіуё ajjhabhāsəyya tam шө paramappiyarn assi 'u, 


Tato Sumukho aha: 
тв. Aham khaln mahárája оёрага)ё-г-іу’ antararn 

pativattum na sakkomi, па me зо уіпауо siya. 75. 

зв. Атһакат eva‘ уо settho ‘уай са nttamasattavo 

bhūmipālo manussindo püja° bahühi hetubhi. 76. 

зт. Тева ubhinnam bhanatarh vattamëne vinicchaye 

nántarar pativattabbarn pessena Inanujadhipá 'Ч. 77. 

Ta nāgarājárivantaran ti selàaysbbhantararh pavittho nâgarājâ viya, 
pativattun t) tamhàkarn dvinnarh antare vatturn na sahkkomi, па meso ti 
васе vadeyyarn' па me во уіпауо bhaveyya, amhäākañ сөзі '11* channavutiya? 
harnsasahassánarh, uttamo aattavo ti uttamasatto, püjš ti ubho tumhe 
шауһат bahübi kāraņehi рй}атаһа c’ eva pasarnhsárahü са, pesse naa ‘ul possa- 
увсапаКагепа? sevakena. 

Rājā (авва vacanarh sutvā tutthahadayo jāto™, nesāda- 
putto vannesi'' „аййепа tumhādisena madhuradhammakathi- 
kena nāma па bhavitabban“ ti vatvā а. : 

тв. Dhammena kira nesādo™: pandito andajo iti, 
etādiso siyā Ч, 78. 


n 


na h’ eva akatattassa nayo 
зә. Evar aggapakatimā evarn uttamasattavo 

yāvat' atthi mayá ditthá пайдаў passāmi ейїваш'*. 79. 
во. Tuttho smi vo pakatiya vākyena madhnrena ca, 

ево сарі mama chando: ciram равзеууа vo ubho ti. 80. 


1 во all four MSS. $ Ске -уё, > Сіз yad, Sdr omite yadi. * Сг pd Sdr 
-kañcova. Š во all four MSS. for pujja? * Bd Sdr add amhškañceva. 7 
Ва sdr -д. 6 Bd реуепё. ° Bd veyyāvaccskarena, Sdr veyyüavaccakšáranena, 
Ck ревввпатасапавагела. 10 Ck chaneturh, Се (ћасшш. '' Bd Sdr -u. 11 Сіз 
te saddo. Ска паво. 3 Sdr 1-. 


10 


90 


15 


15 


80 


352 ХХІ. Авймриа. 


Та. dhammenā ti sabhàvena казапепа, akatattassi ti asampidita- 
attabhšvassa mittadupbhisi nayo ti paññá, aggapakatimi ti aggasabhavo, 
uttamattavo ti utlamasatto, yavatatthiti yavata mayi ditflha піша atthl, 


pšáñüan t| tasmirip mayá ditthattháne оййаш етатйрата па разва), tuttho 
smi? vo pakatiyā ti samma һафвагаја ahah pakatiya pathamam eva tuam- 
hšàkarm dassanena tuttho, väkyenā 'ti idèni? vo madhuravacanena tuttho өші, 
cirah раваеууа то ti ісс-еса vasipatvā muhatiam рі avippavasanto cirarh 
tumba раввеууап ti esa ma chando t| vadati. 


Tato M. гајапат раватзаріо ёћа: 
з. Yam Кійсі* parame mitte katar° asmásu tam (ауд, 
pattā nissarnsayam їу-атһа bhattir автйви yë tava. 81, 
es. Адий са nüna sumahá ñatisarnghassa-m-aptararh, 
adassaneua amhākarh dukkharn bahüsu pakkhisu. 82, 
ss. Tesah sokavighštšya (ауд anumată mayarh 
tarh padakkhinato katvā 0811 passem’ агїпдашв*. 83. 
e. Addhàbarh vipularn pitin bhavatarh vindámi dassanā, 
eso cápi' таһё attho Āātivissāsanā siyā ti. 84. 


Та. katarasmisü 'ti katah? amhesu, pattå п1звашвауап tyamhā 
ti mayah nissahsayena tayá pattë уеға, bhattirasmăsu уйа tava ' уа tava 
amhesu bhatti Шуа bhattiya шауат tayà азашвауепа patiå yeva, na ca vipps- 
yuttā vippavutthëpi sahavšsino yeva nama mayan ti dipet, афпП ca пона 
sumaha t) etañ са ekarpaen eva sumahantarh, fištisarnghessamantaran 
ti amhehi dvihi јапеЫ rahitassa mama Āätinarhghassa antaran chiddarb, as mâ- 
kap ti amhakarp dvinnai айавзапепа bahüsu palkhisu dukkharm uppannam, 
passomarindamā 'ti” passeyyáma arindama, bbavatan ti bhoto dassanena, 
eso сёрі!9 шаһа attbo ti yš eså'! ñátisarnghassrnkbšta !* ñativissšsana 
siyā eso cëpi'!'? mahanto attbo. 


Evar vutte гаја tesarn gamanain anujáni'" М. pi rañňo 
pañcavidhe dussile ádtfnavam se са апівафваф kathetva'* 
„imari silah гаККһа', dhammena r. karebi'', catübi sam- 
gahavatthühi janarn'" sarhganha“ ti ovaditvā Cittakütam agamāsi. 


1 Bd Sdr —assa. ? all three MSS. simim. % pd Sdr add pana. * Che kicca. 
Š ao all four MSS. * all four MSS. 041, Ва Sdr -murin-. ! Bd vähi, 34r 
våpi. ° Sdr katarah. * Bd Sdr -murln-. '° Bd Sår сёр. 1! Ch: pi yam- 
pisāsai. '3 Che ñatlsarngabassrh-. 12 Sdr -nāu. !* Sdr -esi, !5 Bd Sdr 
Takkhatba, !“$ Sar -etba, Ваз -esi. '7 Sår msbàráJanam 


1. Cullabaisajåātaka. (533.) 353 


Таш attbam pakāsento Satthā āhea: 
as. Idam тата dhatarattho hamsaraja naradhipam 
uttamajavamattāya ' ñštisanmgham ирёратиш. 85. 
ав. Te aroge anuppatte disvāna parame dije 
kekā ti-m-akarum °? hamsā, putbusaddo ajayatha. 86. 
вт. Те patitë pamuttena bhattuna bhattugarava 
samantā рвгїкапшви aņdajā laddhapaccayā ti. 87. 


Та. upšgamun ti aruņuggamanaveläyam eva шайһирапайїпї# pari- 
bbuñJitvá тайба са deviy& са dvihi suvanpatălavaņtehi* ukkhlpitvë gandhema- 
14411 katasakkârā tšlavantebit otaritvā rājānah padakkhinarn katvā vehšsam 
uppatitvš таййё anjali раррауһа gacchatha sšmino ti vutte sihapanjarena 
nikkhbamitvā,’ uttamena jJavena gantva йай апап ораватітео*, parame ti 
uttame, kokā ti attano sabbšvaravena kekā 7 Ч saddam akarmnsüu, ЪЪ або вагата ti 
bhattari sagāravā parikarirnsü 'ti bhattuno muttabhâvena tuftbš tarh bhatta- 
Tatı samantà рагізётауітап, laddhapaccayā ti laddhapatittha. 


Evar рагіуйгеќуа pana ќе hamsá,.,kathari тойо ві ma- 
һага}8‹* `1 pucchimsu. M. Sumukhar піввёуа muttabhāvarh 
Sakolarājaluddaputtehi" katakammañ са kathesi. Tam sutv& 
tuttho' harnsagano' ,,Sumukho senápati са räjā са luddaputto 
са sukhitá niddukkbā cirarh jivantū“ 'ti (роб akāsi. 


Tam веһәй pakësento Satthë osõnagātham â.: 
ва. Evah mittavatam attbā sabhe honti райакКЬпй 
hamsš ува '° dhataratthā пйїїзашдһаш upāgamun ti. 88. 


Та. mittavatan ti kalyšánamittuasampannšnarp, padakkbiņā tl sukha- 
nipphsttino vnddhiyuttá, dhatarattbë tl һагппаага}а!! Sumukbo rañña г' eva 
luddaputtena са 'ti dvihl evam ubho рі te dbatarattha kalyanamittasampanua, 
yathá ñatisarngbam upâgamur ñitisarnghüpsgamanassrnhkhato певат attbo pa- 
dakkbino Jšáto eva aññesam pl mittavatarh апһа padahkhinë hontîel. 


% Bd -manvāya, Sdr -mandāya, Bs -manšya. 3 Ck: -nim-. ? B4 jalëámadhu- 
pāņitādinl, Sdr madholājapānitādini. * Bē -tālapenņehi, Sdr -pattebi. * 
Bd Sdr nikkbantā. 6 Sdr upasañkamimau, ? Bdz Sdr keke. ° Ck sakularājā-, 
Bd вёдаіагаја-, Sdr sàgslaraññs са luddakena ca. ° Sdr -á. 10 Ch add pi. 
11 ao Bd; Oks add sumukhaádihi. 

jema. V. 93 


10 


15 


20 


95 


354 ХХІ. АзїЧпірйіа. 


S. 1. d. а, „па bhikkbave бёр’ ета pubbe рі Anando тат" 
atthäya jivitam рагіссајій“ vatvë j. s.: „Тайй пезёйо! Сһеппо' 
вћові, гаја ° Sariputto, Sumukho Anando‘, патџііћафавзећавѕё° Buddha- 
рвпай, hamasrajá aham evä" ‘ti, Cullahamsajatakam', 


2. Mahšáhamsajšátaka. 

Ete hamsšá pakkamantiti. Idem S. Veluvane у. therasea! 
jivitepariccãgam eva а. Е. Vatthum vuttasadisam ета, idhe pana S. 
айный aharanto idam ёһагі: 

A. Вагйпазїуаї Seyyassa' пата Вагапавїгаййо Khemā 
nëma aggamahesi аһові. Тайї В. navutiharhsasahassaparivnto 
Cittaküte vihāsi. Ath’ ekadivasah Khemë еу! рассйва- 
samaye воріпакаг? addasa: suvanpavannaharhsë agaptvë гӣја- 
pàllarhke nisīditvā madhurassarena' dhammakatharn kathe- 
suh, deviyā™ sādhukārarù datvā dh. sunantiyá"” dhamma- 
savaneua atittāya eva ratti vibháyi'', harsâ dhammakatharh 
kathetvā вїһарайјагепа nikkhamitvá agamamso, вй vegen’ 
utthāya „palāyamāne hamse ganhatha ganhathā“ ‘ti vatvå 
hattharn pasārentī yeva pabojjbi. Tassā katha sutvā pari- 
cãrikāyo „Киһїй hamsš“ ti thokam avahasirnsu, sā tasmir 
khane smnpioakabhávarm?  ñatvë cintesi: „ahah abhūŭta па 
passámi, addhā ітавгоіо loke suvannaharhsá bhavissanti, васе 
kho pana “suvannaharnasšnarn dh. sotukám' amhîti’ гй}йпаш 
vakkhāmi ʻamhehi suvannaharhsá оёта па ditthapubbš, ham- 
вёпат са kathá пата ahhütë уеуй’ °1 vatvā niruasukko'° 
bhavissati “dohalo' ti vutte рапа Кепасі'* ирёуепа рагіуевівзаб, 
eva me manoratho і)јһізвайи sā gilānālayarh dassetvā 


1 Sdr suddho. ® 9dr channatthero. > Sdr sagalo гаја. * 84” sumukhasenapati 
ca ānandatthero аһові ce. 5 Bds Sdr chana-. © Sdr -sā dhataratiho pana 
lokapštho етаго harstha јабакап ti itl játakatthakathā asitint. 2. би. = Ѕитокћо. 
1 Bds anandattherassa. ® Bd? sarnyamassa. ° Bds „пат, !° Bd -saddena, !! 
Ck -vimh, Cs -viyarb, Bd -viyā. !5 Cke -tleā. 1# Che vihāyi. '* Bd supinabh-. 
14 Сш pirusssko. !* Bd yena ke-. 


2. Mahāhaisajātaka, (534.) 855 


paricarikáapam saññam jkatvā пірајјі. Баја гајёвапе nisinno 
tassá dassanavelāya {ап adisvà ,kaham Kbemā deviíti“ puc- 
chitvá' „gilānā“ ti sutvā tassā santikan gantvā sayanekadese 
nisiditvá pitthiyarn parimajjanto ,,арһазокап“ ti pucchi. „Deva, 
арЬёвикат n’ atthi, dohalo pana me uppanno“ ti. „Вһапа* 
devi yarh icchasi, вїдһаїй te upanāmessămîti“.  ,,Maharaja 
aham ekassa виуаппаһафѕазва getacchatte' rájapallarmke ni- 
аїппазаа gandhamáládíhi püjarh katvā sādbukārah дайатапа* 
dhammakathaih soturh іссһаті, sace labhāmi їсс-өїагп kusalarh 
noce jīvitah me п’ atthîii™“. Atha nam rājä „васе mannssa- 
loke atthi labbissasi, mā cintayiti“ assāsetvā sirigabbhā* nik- 
khamma amaccehi saddhirn mantesi: ,hambho*, Khemā devi 
“suvannahamsassa dhammakatharm воќиф labhanti jīvissāmi, 
alabhantiya me jivita o' atthiti' vadati, attbi nu kho su- 
vannavannahamsá“ ti, „Deva amhehi n’ eva ditthapubbā па 
sutapubbá“ ti. „Ке рапа jáneyyun“ ti. ,„Brāhmaņā йеуй“ 
ti. Rája brahmaneə pakkosāpetvā’ pucchi: „honti nu kho 
ācariyasuvaņņaharhsā*“ ti. ,„Аша mahārāja amhaákarh ‘macchā 
kakkațakā kacchapā migā тогай Һафза ti ete tiracchānagatā 
suvannavannë' hontiti' ágatam '° “ta. dhataratthakulaharnsá '! 
паша panditá ййпавашраппа' iti mannssehi saddhirh satta su- 
vannavanna hontiti“. Баја attamano hutvā „„Каһап пп kho 
ñcariyadhataratthaharmsá vasantîti“ pucchitvā „па jānāma 
mahārājā“ `. Atha „ke jānissantîti““ ,luddaputtë%“ ti vutte 
sabbe attano vijite luddake sannipātetvā'” pucchi: „tātā' sn- 
vannavannë dhataratthaknule'” hańñsā nëma kahar vasantitit'. 
Ath’ еко luddo ,.Himavante kira deva Cittakūtapabbate ti" 
knlaparamparāya kathentîti“ š. ,Jüaušsi рапа tesa gahanü- 
рёуап“ ti. ‚Ма ]8пйтї devā“ "і, So brābmaņapandite 


1 Ваг pucchi. ? Bd tena Ы bhs-. ? В4' samuseitase-. * Bd -nam. * Bd 
-мо, * Ві am-. 1 Bd adds sakhārańh katvā è Ва -уё., ° Chs suvannë. '° 
Uk 8һа-. Bd араса. '! Che dhatarattbahawsskalā, !? Ва -tāpetvā. !? Bd ~a. 
1: Bd adds no. 

73" 


10 


20 


30 


356 XXI Asitiuipita. 


pakkosápetvá Cittakāte suvannahamsánam atthibbāvarn âro- 
сестё ,„jānātha nu kho tesarn gahanüpáyan- ti pucchi. ,Maha- 
гаја, kin tehi gaotvā gahitehi, upāyena парагазаш1раш ānetvā 
раһеввашй““ чі. „Ko pana upâyo* ti. .Mabârâja nagarato 
nttarena'tigavutappamánarm khemah’ оёта saram khanāpetvā’ 
ndakassa püretvá nānâdhaññāni ropetvā pañcavannapaduniasañ- 
сһаппаф* Кагеќуа ekam panditam ° nesádam paticchāpetvā 
manussñnarh upagantum adatvá catüsu kannesa (ћіќећі* abhayarn 
vatvā ghosápetha, ta sutvā’ nānāsakunā’ otarissantiti, te pi 
barhsā paramparāya tassa sarassa khemabhavarm sutvā арас- 
chiesanti, atha ое välapāsehi bandhāpetvā ganhšpeyyatháë:'- ti. 
Таш sntvá гаја tebi vuttappadesehi' vuttappakāraro sara kā- 
retvå™ chekam oesādaro pakKosāpetvā tassa sahassam dápetvá 
„буага ito patthaya attano Катташ mā kari, puttadaram te ahari 
posessāmi, tvah appamatto Бһешап saram rakkhanto manasse 
patikkamápetvë catúsu Каппеви abhayam ghosápetvë āgatā- 
gatasaknne'' mama acikkheyyási, suvannahamsesu йра{еви 
шаһапїагп sakkaárarn labhissasiti“ (аі samassisetvë khemam 
вага paticchâpesi. So tato patthaya raññë vuttanayen' eva 
ta. patipajji'”, „Еһешаш saram rakkhatiti“ с` assa Khemane- 
sådo tv-eva' оёташ udapādi. Tato pattháya папарраЁКйага 
sakuná otarimsu, ,khemar nibbhayam saran“ ti paramparā- 
ghosena nānābarsā ágamirnsu: ра(һашаш tava tinaham=sa 
&ратїгїви “*, tesam ghosena panduharnsá'° tesar: gh. mano- 
silaharnsá '*°, tesarn gh. setaharmsá'',tesam gh. раКаһагйва'*. 
Tesu āgatesu Khemako rañño агосевї: „deva pañcavanna- 
һашза йдапїуй sare gocaram gocaram gaņhanti, pšákaham- 
вёпап1 agatattë idāni katipāhena suvaņpņaharhsā āgamissanti, 


1 ра avidūrena. ? СЕ tigåvutamatte tigavutappamšnas-, Bd tigåvurtamattorigi- 
vuttappamāņai-. * Bd kārăpetvā. * (Юе 3 В4 -а. 6 Сіз Ы. 7 Œu 
omit tarh sutvā. ° Bd adds dasadisā. ° Bd -se. '° Ра käripetvi. !1)4 
<tesa-. 12 Rd patijasgi. !* Ва tevassa. ™ Jid -ыйзи. !5 Rd adds igamibsu. 
16 Сш -Jā vannā, Bd adds agamirnsu. 


2. Mahaharnsajataka. (524.) 857 


wā cintayittha devš“ "и. Tar sutvā rājā' ,aññena ta, па 
gantabbarh, yo gacchissati' hatthapādacchedañ са gharavilopañ 
са pāpoņissatiti“ nagare bheriñ carāpesi, tato patțthāya ta. 
koci pa gacchati. Cittakütassa pana ауїййге Kañcanagnhaya 
pškaharhsá vasanti, ќе mahabbalá, dhataratthakulena saddhirn 
tesan’ sariravanno ca уівево, раКаһашйзагаййо pana dhitá 
suvannavannë ahosi, so tar ,„dhataratthamahissarassa anu- 
rūpā“‘ ti tassa püdaparicárikarh katvā pesesi, sā tassa piya 
ahosi manapá, їеп' eva Кагапепа, tāni dve hamsakulāni añña- 
maññarn vissãsikāni jātāni. Ath' екайіуават B-asaa parivāra- 
harsá ракаһафве риссһїїїви: „tumhe ime divase* kahar 
росагатй ganhatha“ 'ti. ,Mayah Bá-ito avidüre Кһетаваге 
g. рапһата, tumhe pana kuhih ahindatha“, „asuka nāmā“ 
`Ч vutte „kasmā khemah saram na gacchatha °, so hi saro 
ramaniyo nënásakunasamákinno pañcavannapadumasañchauno 
nanádhaññaphaiasampanno nānappakārabhamaragaņanikūjito' 
catüsu kannesu niccappavattaabhayaghosano, Косі nah” пра- 
sarhkamiturh samattho оёта n'atthi pag eva айбат upadda- 
vam këáturh, evarüpo во ваго“ ti khemah saram уапровуїтпви. 
Те tesarn° vacanarh sutvå ,,BaáršánasisamIpe kira evarüpo khemo 
паша ваго atthi, pākaharsä ta. gantvš g. ganhanti, tumhe рї 
dhataratthamahissarassa йгосе!һа, sace’ anujānãti mayam pi 
ta. gantvā g. рапһеууйтӣ "і Sumukhassa kathesum, Su, 
rañño йгосевї, so cintesi: ,„папизза пёта bahumäyā™ npáya- 
kusalā, bhavitabbam ettha kāraņena, ettakarn kālam esa'! ваго 
п’ attbi, idáni атһакат gahanattháya kato Dhavisgsatiti“ so 
ба-а à.: ,,më te ta. gamanarh ruccatu 1, па во ваго tehi 
sudhammatāya kato, amhükarm gahanattham kato, тапиза& 
пата ' kharamantë npáyakusalá, tumhe ваке!* yeva росаге 


1 Ске omit râ-. ! Bd adda tattha. 3 Сіз говай ваййһїпї. * Bd -esn divasesu. 
5 amukari-- wanting іп Ско. “ Chr -rarudatikujito. 7 Bd omits nah. * 
Chete. ° Ске оріс васе. 10 pd adda hharamasanto, Rs kharamsntú. !! Bd аво. 
1? Hds -tha. !3 Вдг add babumâyā. !* Сіз omit sake. 


m 


А 


5 


358 XX]. Asitlnipišta. 


carathā‘“ "і.  Suvannaharnsa ,,Кһешаф sarah  gantukám" 
amhā“ `ti dutiyam pi Su-assa йгосевиш, so tesarh ta. gantu- 
kámatarn М-авва агосеві. Atha М. „таша ñátaká marh’ 
піввёуа mā kilamantu, tena hi gacchāmā“ '*u navutisahassa- 
harhsaparivuto ta. gantvā g. gahetvā harhsakilam kilitvā Citta- 
kütam eva рассараті. Khemako teea caritvā gatakāle рап!уй 
tesan āgatabhāvarù гаййо äārocesi. Баја “tutthacitto hutvá 
„samma Khemaka еКаш vā dve vā hamso ganhiturn vâyama*, 
mahantarn te yasan dasesámíiti“ vatvā paribbayarb datvā ќат? 
uyyojesi. So ta. gantvā сабірайјаге nisiditvā harnsánam ca- 
гапв({ћарат vimarhsi. B-āâ пашта nilloluppacārino honti, tasuā 
M. otinnatthënato ра{{һауа варадёпат* sālim khádanto āga- 
mësi, вевйё ito с’ ito са khādantā vicarirbsu. Atha luddaputto 
„ауат hamso nillolappacári, imam bandhitum vattatiti“ cio- 
tetvá punadivase harhsesu sarar апо!їппези yeva cátipapjare 
півіппо tam tháqam gaotvā avidüre pañjare° attánam paticcha- 
detvá chiddena olokento acchi. Tasmim khane М, navuti- 
harsasahassaparivuto* hiyyo otinnattháne yeva otaritvā odhi- 
yam nisīditvā khádanto рйуйвї, nerádo pañjarachiddena' olo- 
kento tassa rüpaggappattarn attabhāvarb disvá „ayam harso 
sakatappamënasar[ro ' suvannavanpo tīhi rattarājībi gīvāya 
parikkhitto, tisso rājiyo galena otaritvā udarantarena gatā, 
tisso pacchābhāķena nibbijjhitva'” gatā, rattakanbalasutta- 
sikkāya thapitakañcanakkhaudho viya atirocati, iminā еїеваш 
raññá bhavitabbarh, imam eva ganhissñiniti“ cintesi. Нагвагӣ- 
jëpi baburh gocararh caritvā jalakilam kilitvā hamsaganapari- 
vuto Cittakütam eva agamāsi, iminā niyámena chadivase'' р. ganhi. 
Sattame '* divase Khemako kalaassaválaiayarh'" dalharb maha- 


1 Cts ñåtakinamh, 3 Наг -atha. ° Cle omit tar. * Fd sampadānacâri. > Га 
рабсатепа. ® Bd parikkhitto. 7 Ch» -re-. *lds rūpasobhagga-. ° Bd’ вака(а- 
пёЫЫ-. '° sọ C!s; Bé nippajji-. © Bd pañca. 13 Bd: cbathe. > Сї 
dalhar. 


2. Mehaharnsajataks. (534.) 359 


okāse Ootarissatiti“ tatvüto' ñatvă anto udake yatthipásarh 
oddi. Punadivase harhsarājā otaranto pádarh разе pavesento yeva 
otari, ath' авва раво радат ayapattakepa bandhanto' viya 
åâbaudhitvā ganhi, во ,chindissámi nan“ ti vegam janetvá kad- 
dhitvá pothesi', pathamavaáre' suvannavannam cammar chijji*, 
dntiyaváre kambalavannamarmsarm' chijji, tatiyavāre nahárum 
chijji, catutthaváre рап” авва pádá сһіпдеууші', ;rañño pana 
Мпайдаїй * паша ananucchaviká ti па уйуйтатп akāsi, balave- 
danë pavattimsu, so ciatesi: ,,sac' āham baddharavar ra- 
vissami паќака me utrastā’ hntvá g. agahetvā chātajjhattā va 
palāyantā samudde patissantiti“ во vedaparh adhivāsetvâ 
pšsavase'° vattetvā ва}пп caranto'! viya hutvā tesan yāvad- 
аһа caritvá hamsakilah kilanakále mahantena saddena 
baddharāvarh ravi, tarn sutvá harhsá purimanayen’ eva pakka- 
тіфви. Su. pi hettbavuttanayen' eva cintetvā vicinitvā tisu 
koțthāsesu М-агп adisvā ,,addhë tass’ eva tarn bhayarn пррап- 
nan“ ti nivattitvā „mā bhāyi mahārāja, aha mama }їуйаш 
pariccajitvă tumhe тосевзйшії(і“* vadanto otaritvå M-am аѕед- 
sento рафКкаріїёће nisidi. М. ,navutiy& ™ harhsasahassesn 
mar chaddetvá palātesu™ ayarn't ekako уа ágato, kin nu kho 
Іиддаросіавва āgatakāle mam chaġddetvā palāyissati udáhu по“ 
ti vimarhsanavasena lohitamakkhito pásalatthiyarn olambanto '* 
yeva tisso gāthā abhási: 
1. Ete һата pakkamanti:vakkañgā bhayameritā, (IV *24) 
harittaca'* hemavanna'! катат Sumukha pakkama. 89. 
з. Оһауа тага пайрапа ekam раѕауават раѓа 
anapekkhamānā gacchanti, Кіш еко avahiyyasi. 90. 
з. Рас eva patatam веба, п’ аі baddhe sabāyatā, 
ша апірһауз һареѕі, кашат Sumukha раккаша 'ti. 91. 


1 Cs Ва tattbato, В» tattato. ° ВФ kaddbanto. 2 Ce petbesi, Bd pādesi, Bz 
påtesi. * Ске omit pa-. * Cs chiddi. * Bd -vannarh-. ? во Ске Гог chijjeyyurm ? 
Bds райо chijjeyya. ® Вг hinasñgarh. °’ cittutrastë, !9 Сы pšsarm-. !! Вёз 
hkbšd-. !3 Bd -ti !2 Pde palāyantesu. 1° Bd adds sumukho. !° Bd -anto 
Сю. Ира е, 


20 


s5 


10 


15 


to 


е5 


s0 


360 XXI. Asitinipata. 


Ta. bhsyameritā ti bhayəna өгіє& bhayattita bbayacilitša', tatiyapade 
barti pl beman ti рі suvennass' eva nëmarh, во р! harittacataya bernavanpo, 
tena taro evam alapl, Su m akha "1 sundaramukbs, anapekhhamiana ti tava’ 
пабауо? anolokentā* nirālayā butvā, patevā 'Ч uppatāhi yeva, mā anīghīyā 
"И ito gantvà pattabbâya niddukkbahhšvšya viríyarn më hāpesi. 

Таш впїуй Su. „ayar harhsarājā mama bhávarn° па janáti, 
anuppiyabhánimitto“ ti marh sallakkheti, sassinehabhávam' авва 
dassessëmiti"“ catasso gāthā abhāsi: 

+. Náham dukkhapareto рі? dhatarattha tavar '° jahe, 
jivitarh шатапаш vā me tayā saddhirn bhavissati. 92. 
s. Náham dukkhapareto pi’ dhatarattha tavar " jahe, 
na шаш anariyasamyutte't kamme yojetum arahasi. 93. 
e Sakumáro sakhā ty-asmi sacitte samite thito, 
пасо senāpati ty-āharhù hamsšánam pavaruttama. 94. 
z. Kathaiı aham vikattissam '* ñātimajjhe ito gato, 

(аф hitvā ра(аїаш settha kin te vakkhám' ' ito gato, 

idha рёпаш сајіввёті, па anariyarh kattum ussahe ti. 95. 

Та. nāban (1 aharn mahărāja Кёуікасеќавікепа dukkhena puttbo рі tam 
na јаһатюі, anariyasarhyutte tl mittadübhikehi ahirikebi kattabbatāya anariya- 
ЪЬётела sarnyutte, kamme ti tain jahitva pakkamapakamme, sakurmšro u 
ekadivase yeva patisandhirn gahetvā ekadivase andaskomarh padäletvà ekato 
vaddhitakumiro t! а., sakhā tyasmiti ehai te dakkhinakkhisamo!! piyasa- 
hayo, sacittø ti tava паке citte aham thito 3 tava vase vattami tayi }їтайке 
Jivamtui 1  a., sarcitte'? ti pl pštho, tava citte abari santhito sutthito tl a., 


йё&%о ti sabbsbarnsëšnaru antare sañĀăto, тікасііевац!е сі kubin harnaarájš u 
pucchita аһат kin ti kathessámi, kinte vakkhüamiti tava pavattiù pucebante 


barhaagane kih vakkbami. 


Evain Su-ena catühi gāthāhi sīhanņāde nadite tassa 
gunam pakāsento M. å.: 
•. Eso hi dhammo Sumukha yarh tvara ariyapathe thito 
yo Ьһайагаф sakhāram mam па paricattum ussahe. 96. 


1 Се Bd са-. 9 Cks сепа. 3 Bd Āàtakāyo. “ Bd -о. 5 Rds mittabhavarh. * 
Oks -e, Bd anukampiyabbšvamiíitto. ' Bd зіпећа-. ° Ва adds cintento. * Cha 
ti, 29 Rda tuvarh. 1! all three MSS -умйзат-. !*# во Cks for vikattbi-? Ва 
vikitti-, 1% Ва adds samanskumiro. '' Ck -nakkbi-, Bd -nasmim-. !5 Bd 
hito. 15 Bd -ml na Jivante na jivāmiti. !7 Ске sac-. !° во all three MSS. 


2. Mahāhamsajātska. (534.) 361 


ə. Tam М me pekkhamānassa bhayarh па tv-eva' jāyati, 
adhigacchasi {уап mayharh evarhbhütassa jīvitan ti. 97. 


Ta dhammo ti ева porānapaņditānstù sabhāvo, bhattāram ва- 
Кһагап? ti sámikañ са sahayañ ca samânah, Ыһауап ti cittutrāso mayharh 
па jëyati, Cittakütapabbate harnsaganamajjhe thito viyeihoml, mayhan ti mama 
Jivitarn таф labhápessas!. 


Evarh tesan kathentánam ° luddaputto sarapariyante thito 
hamse tībi khandehi palāyante disvā „їп nu kho“ ti pā- 
Battbánàm olokento B-a pasalatthiyarm olambantan disvá 
sañjātasomanasso Кассһаф* bandhitvā тирдагап gahetvā 
kapputthānaggi viya avattharamāno , paņbiyā akkantakalale° 
upari sisena gantvá purato patante уерепа* upasarhkami. 


Tam ваш pakásento Satthá аһа: 
зо. Їес-еув? mantayantánam ariyánam ariyavsttinarn * 
dandam ādāya nesādo āpadi’ turito'° bhusam. 98. 
и. Tem apatantam disvëna Sumukho aparibrüūhayi ”, 
ațthāsi purato таййо hamso vissāsayah vyatham. 99. 
ie. Mā bhāyi patatam settha, na hi bbāyavti tādisā, 
aham yoga рауибјівваф yuttarn dbammüpasarmhitam 
tena pariyāpadānena khippam pāsā pamokkhasiti, 100. 


Та. ariyavattinan?? ti егіуёсёге vattamānānarh, bhusan ti dalhar bala- 
зва, aparibrūhayîti!? anantaragāthāyarh āgatarh '* та bbāyiti vacanarn bhan- 
anto! atibrūhesi 16 mahāsaddarn nlechăresi, а{1һЁвї!1 sace nesádo răjánato 
pahariseati aham раһйгагп paticchissšámitl!? jīvitam pariceajlitvā purato ațthāsi, 
vlesāsayan ti vissasento, vyathan ti vyathitah bhitarn!6 yájanarb, má 
bhüyitl imlnëš vacanena vissâsento, tädisā tl tumhâdiså ñaánavlriyasampanna, 
yogan ti virlyayogarn 1" yuttan ti anucchavlkarn, dbammūpasamhitan ti 
kâraņnanlesitarb, tena pariyâpadānenā 't tena mayá payuitena?’? yogena 
parisuddhena, pa mokkhasîti тиссіяваві. 


Evarn Su. M-ar assāsetvā luddaputtassa santika gantvā 
madhura mānusińh vācar nicchárento „samma tvar konāmo“ 


1 Bd teva. 3 Bd: -rarnman. ° Сёз omit evam - -, * Bds add dalhan. ° Bd: 
-!аш. * во Oks; Rd omits gantvā--ne. 7 Dd evarn. ° Bds -vu-. ? Ваз 
Врай. 10 Ска -tu. 12 Сіз та, 13 Ва -vu-. 18% Ске -giti. 14 Ске šhata. '$ 
Bde vadanto. !* Bd -isl. '7 Bds ѕатра-. !* Ва bhi-, Ch hi-. 19 Oke -ga, 
Bde бапат!гіуа-. 20 Bde vuttena. 


15 


20 


45 


30 


90 


95 


362 ХХІ Asiunipata. 


ti pucchitvå ,,suvanuavannaharmsarája ahar Khemako nāmā“ 
`ti vutte „samma Khema taya odditavalapáse уо vā so vā harso 
baddho ti saññam mā kari, navutiyá ` һатпзаваһавзйпагш pavaro 
dhataratthaharmhsarájá te раве baddho папауй* sīlācārasampanno 
sariygšáhakapakkhe ° thito, náyam māretuh yutto, ahah tava 
їшїпа * kattabbakiccah karissāmi, ayam рі suvanpavanno aham 
pi 
etassa pattāni gaņhitukāmo’ mama pattàpi ganha, atho pi 


` etass' atthăya attano jivitam pariccajāmi’, васе {уаш 


cammamarnsanaháruatthinar аййаїаагат gaņhitukāmo mam’ 
eva sarīrato ganha, atha паш КПаһафѕат kātukāmo зі mañ 
беуа kara’ jīvantam eva ;vikkiņpitvā, sace’ dhanam uppādetu- 
Каго mam'” vikkinitváa uppádehi, mā etam Āōāņādigoņayottarh " 
avadhi, sace hi vadhissasi nirayádihi па (nuccissasiti“ tam 
nirayabhayena santajjetvā attano madhurakatham gaphāpetvā 
puna B-assa santika gantvā tam assāsento atthási. Nesádo 
tassa kathah sutvá „ayar tiracchānagato samāno шаппазеһї 
pi kātu asakkarüpam '* karoti, manussápi hi eva mitta- 
dhamme {һаїшй!* па sakkonti, aho ева ñünasampanno ma- 
dhurakatho dhainmiko* ti sakalasarīrarn pitisomanassapunnam 
katvä pahatthalomo dandami chaddetvā sirasi aüjalim patitthšá- 
petvë вппуаш namassanto viya Su-assa рипап kittento 
atthasi. 


Тат attham ракёѕеоіо Sattha aha: 
19. Tassa tam vacanam sutva Sumukhassa subhasitum 
pahatthalomo nesādo añjali "уза panümuyi't 101. 
14. Ха me sutam vā dittham vā: һһёвапбо'° 
6 


manusim dijo 
зпуаш bruvüno ° vakkaügo cajanto mënusim giram. 102. 
15. Kin nu t' âyarn dijo hoti, mutto baddhah upasayi, 
ohāya sakunë yanti, kim eko avahiyyasiti. 103, 

"Ва ~ti. 2 Rds omit và. ? Bd sambhavapekkhe, B° sshbhävapakklo. * Rds 
add aarirena. * Bdz add thatheva аһа. * Bd -jiasimi. ° Bd adds sime. * 
Rd kila. * Cls omit sace. '° Bde add Jivautah. 1? Bds add harisaräjănam. 
11 Баз saaakkuneyyarn evsrüpari. '? Bd каси. !* Ck renāmayi, Сә геп-. '5 
С tarn. !* Bd brühanto. 


2. Mahaharhsajštaka. (534.) 368 


Та. aĀjalissā 't! añjalim assa, па me ti’ gštbšy' авва thutih karoti, ta. 
mänusin t| menussavāäcaib, ariyan ti sundaran пїййозваш, cajanto ti 
vissaJjento, 1. v.b.: samma tvah dijo samāno ajja maya? mānusih збсаг bhaá- 
santo niddosam bruvšno? mànusirth giran cajanto paccakkhato dittbo, ito pubbe 
pana idah aechariyah mayā п’ ета sutao па ditthan ú, kiunu {уап 
ti уаш егат t (хай орёвауі kiu по tə aya boti. 


Evah duțthacittena* ро ћо So. ,ayarn muduko jāto, idā- 
nim авва bhiyyosomattāya mudubhaávattham mama gunam 
dassessámiti%“ cintetvā å.: 

16. Каја me зо dijamitta*, вапйрасс' assa Ейгауїтї, 

tam pade рагіссаќаф п' ussahe vihagādhipah’. 104. 
т. Маһарапйуа* bhattā me mā eko vyasanam ара, 

tathá tarn samma певёда : bhattâyarh ”, abhito'° rame ti. 105. 


Ta. повваће ti па samattho `mi, mabâganāyà!’ 'ti mahato hamsa- 
вапавва 12, må okọ tl)? mädiss sevake vijjamāne mā ekako!é vyasanaih ава. 
tatha tan tÍ уаїһ&һаш vadāmi tath’ eva tath, вашшй ’tl vayassa, bhattā- 
yarn!5 abhito reme ti bhatti ayain mama, eham авва ca abhito rame sentiko 
ramámi na ukkanthami. 


Тат '* tassa dhammanissitarn madhurakathar вуй во- 
тапаѕварраќо pahatthalomo ,,ac' аһа еѓат вїЇййїрипа- 
yuttah hamsarājānarh vadhissāmi са(аһі арёуеһі па muñ- 
сівваші, rājā шаш yad icchati tar karotu, аһа etah Su -~ 
вава däyarù katvā vissajjessámiti“ cintetvā р. а. : 


ів. Ariyavatt' asi'" vakkañga уо pindam арасёуаві, 


cajámite tarh bhattarar, gacchatu!° bho yathāsukhan ti. 106. 


Ta. ariyavattasiti mittadbammarakkhanasarnkbštena acaraariyánarb 


vattena вошапиёваѓо, pindamapacayasiti bhattu заціка laddhar ріодай '* 
püjesí, дасе аси! bbo ti dve рі Јакё sssumukhe ñštisarbghe 20 sahëyamEna ?! 
yathasukbarn gacchatha. 


1 Ваг pamassati ? Bd adda вайб. ° Bd brūbanto. * Сі omit ума. ° 
во Сі; Bd ekar tuthacittena so. * Ске dijom-. ? С -ра, Bd vibañgādbt- 
раф. * Hd -yarh. ° Ве -rarn, Cs bhattšharn. 10 Ck atihito, Се abito. '' 
Ва -уап. '* Bds add sšmi. *2 Ске ki, '¢ Bd -to. 1° Ско bbattaharm., 1 Rds 
nesšdo (аш. 1!" Bd -ttarnsi. 29 Bde -aptu, 18 Be agd зепёрви. ° Сї 
һїй. 2? во Ck; С bhayamana, Bd sahāsayamānâ. 


10 


15 


20 


95 


a 


15 


20 


364 XXI. Asitlniípšts. 


Evah vatvá певййо muducittena М-ат upasamkamitvá 
yatthih nšámetvšá parhkapitthe nisidápetva равауа{ їп! mocetvš 
ukkhipitvá sarato nfharitvā tarunadabbatinapitthe nisīdāpetvā 
раде baddhapāsarh вапїкап mocetvā M-tte balavasineharh 
paccupatthápetvá metteva” citteoa nudakarh ádáya lohitarh рип- 
jitvà' punappuna parimajji, ath' авва mettānubhāvena вігауа 
sira ‘ё marsena marhsam cammena cammarh ghatitarñ, райо 
pškatiko ahosi, itarena nibbiseso В. sukhappatto hutvā pakati- 
bhāvena nisīdi. Su. attánam nissāya rañño sukhitabhāvarh 
disvā sañjātasomanasso cintesi: ,iminá amhākah mahāapakāro 
kato, атћеһі etassa katarn° nāma n` atthi, sace h’ ева* гӣја- 
mahāmattānam’ atthāya amhe ganhi°' tesarn santikam netvā 
bahudhanarn labhissati, васе attauo atthāya ganhi amhe 
vikkinitva dhanarh labhissat' eva, pucchissāmi tāva nan“ ti, 
atha narh upakārarh kātukāmatāya pucchanto а.: 

19. Sace attappayogena ohito harhsapakkhinam 

patiganháma te samma еѓаф abhayadakkhinam. 107, 
зо. Мосе attappayogena ohito harnsapakkhinam 

впіѕваго mnñcarn amhe theyyam Кауігаві Іийдака "і. 108. 

Та. васе tl затта nesšda васе (гуё attano payogena attano attbāya 
һагпвёпай*# c' eva BesapskkhinaG са раво ocddito!9, апінваго ti апівваго 
hutvā ambe muñcanto уепіві апано!! tassa santakari ganhanto (ћеууат kayirasi. 

Tam sutvá nesādo ,,пёћаф tumhe attano atthāya ganhim, 
Bā-rañño'* pana sarnyamena ganháëpito `mhbiti“ vatvā deviyā 
ditthasupinato'' patthaya yāva raññā™ tesarn āgatabbāvarh 
sutvå „samma Khemaka ekam vā dve vā hatse ganhiturn 
vāyama, mahanta te yasar dassamiti“ vatvā paribbayarh 
datvá uyyojitabhāvo tāva sabba pavattiņ rocesi, “Tarh 
sutvā Su. „iminā nesādena attano jivitarn aganetvá amhe 


1 Bde «yä. ° Bd metta. P Bd dhovitvš. * Се sirah sira. 5 Bd иракёгат, 
Ве upakāro. * Bd pesa. 7 C» rājārāja-, Ck rājarāja-. * Ckə -hinti. * Ck na. 
10 Ва» ohito. !1 Ck ananto, С° ânanto. 2?” Bd -ā. !% Ck .tā, Bd ditthasi- 
euplinakālato. !# Се -о. 


2. Меһаһатвајабака. (531.) 365 


vissajjentena dukkaram kataro, васе mayar ito va Cittakütamn 
gamissāma п’ eva dhatarattharañño paññānubbāvo па ' mayhan 
mittadhammo pákato bhavissati na luddaputtjo mahantarh yasari 
lacchati па гаја pañcasu silesu patitthahissati? па deviyā mano- 
ratho mattbakarh pāpuņissatîti“ cintetvā ,,samma, evarh sante 
amhe vissajjetum na isbhasi, rañño по" dassehi, so amhe 
уаїһагисїтї * karissatiti°““. 
Imam attham paküsento: 


и. Yassa tvah bhatako rañño kamam tass’ ета рёрауа, 

tattha зашуашапо* raja yathābhiñūam karissatiti р.а. 109. 

Ta. tasser ‘tl tass’ eva santikarn nehi, tatthā ' авто nivesans, 
ysathaáabhlüñan ti узїһаїайбїрр&уаш ysthāruclin. 

Tarh sutvā nesádo „mā vo hhante' гёјайввѕапаф госсі°, 
rājãoo пате sappatibhayá, keliharnse vă vo kareyyurn mareyyurñ 
vā“ ti а. Atha nam Su. „samma ludda, mā атһаКаг cintayi, 
ahah tādisassa kakkhalassa dhammakathāya maddavarh janesim, 
rañño kin nu па јаоеввёші, гёјёпо hi panditá subhāsitaññū’, 
khippar no rañño santika nehi, nayanto са mä һаййһо'° 
nayi, pupphapañjare nisidāpetvā nehi, pupphapañjarañ ca ka- 


ronto dhataratthassa mahanta setapadumasañchannam шаша v 


khuddakarn rattapadumasañchannam katvă dhatarattham'' pu- 
rato тай pacchato nicatarah katvā ādāya khippam netvá 
гаййо dassehiti“ а. So’ tassa vacanam sutvá ,Sumukho rëja- 
nam disvā тата mahantarh yasarth dátukámo bhavissatiti“ sañ- 
jātaromanasso шиййһї latáhi' pañjare katvā padumehi сһа- 


detvā vuttanayena te раһеѓуй agamási. 


Tam attham pakāsento Satthë aha: 
эз. Iec-eva't vutto !° пезайо !° hemavanue harittace 
ubhohatthehi samgayha рабјаге ajjhavodahi. 110. 


1 Ска omit na. 3 Сёз patitthäti. 2 Ске add па. * Che rucim, 5 Che -aiti. 
+ Çka -mano. `! Ва bhaddante. ° Bd -ítta. ° Bë -tadubbhusitaññü. '° sọ Ог 
for -e; Bd? bandhanena. !! Cha add шай. '# во Се Ва; Ck вё corr. 


to sā for eàto? 13 Ва labbābi. 1% Fds «vain. !$ Che -е. 


15 


15 


зо 


35 


366 XXI. Attinipāta 


2». Те pañjaragate' pakkhi ubho bhassaravannine 
Sumukham dhatarattbañ ca luddo ādāya pakkamîti. 111. 


Ta. ajjhevodahiti odabi thapesi, bbassararannina ti pabhäsam- 
pannavanne. 


Evar luddassa (е? ādāya pakkamanakále dhatarattba- 
Һатво pākarājaharhsadhītararh*attano bhariyam saritvā Su-am 
aëmaentetvá kilesavasena vilapi. 


Tam аат ávikaronto Sattbā aha: 
t4. Напууавтапо dhatarattho Sumukham etad abravi: 
bálham bbāyăämi Sumukba sāmäya lakkhanüruyá 
asmükam vadham aññāya atb’ attānańn vadhissati. 112. 
as. Pákaharnsá ca Sumukha Suhemā Бетаѕиасё* 
koñci' samuddatire ув“ арапа nūna rucchatiti'. 113. 


Ta. bh&yámiti maranao ° bhäyâmi, sämāyå ‘t! яптапйзуаппбуа, lak- 
йһапйгпуа t! lsukhanasampannaüruya, уадћатюаб б буё 'ti уайһап jânitvā 
måritā t| ваййї? hutvä, vadhissatfti kim me plyasámike!° mate jîvitenâ 'ti 
тпагівпаі! 1 pàkaharnearájadbītā, Биһешї ti evannâmlkā, hemasuttacalh ti 
bomasadisasunudaratacã'?, rucchatiti’® yatbā loplasmkhātahn?? зашидйай 
otaritva mato patimhi koñcisakunikā'® kapaņnăā rodat! ovar nūns вё rodissati. 


Таш sutvâ Su. „ayan hamso aññe” 


ovaditurh yutto matu- 
gümarh пїввйуа kilesavasena vilapati, udakassa ādittakālo viya 
vatiyā uttháya kedárakhádanakálo viya ca jāto, yan nünáharh 
attano balena mātugāmassa dosah pakāsetvā etam saña- 
реууап“ ti cintetvā āha `": 
зв. Evarhmahanto ” lokassa appameyyo таһадапї 
ekitthim anusoceyya, na idah paññavato-m-iva. 114. 


a. Vāto уа ° gandham šdeti"” пЬһауаш chekapāpakar 


bālo ашакараккат va lolo andho va āmisah. 115. 


1 Bd -re-. * Cks tarh. ? Rd ракаћагевгаја-. * СЇ suvom8 hemasuttavi. ° 
СЕ Косі, Се koci, Bd koōcl. © Cks ca 7 Bd» rucca-. " Ok -á corr. to -rrh, 
Bd ato. ° Cha „а. 10 Сіз -iye. 1! Bd» айд раїаһапаа ti. !? Сїз -yuttavā 
18 Cko -rekattecâ. !* Cts ruccbiti, Bd гисса-. '* Bd 1опа-. !* СЇ kuñca-. 
1! Rd -arn. !# Cha omit &ћа. '* Bd mahāsatto. ?° Chaca 1! Chs -Ы. 


2. Mshabarbesjšátaka. (534.) 367 


s. Avinicchayañüü attbesu mando va patibhási' mam, 
Кїсеййїссатї па јёпёві sampatto kálapariyáyam °? 116. 

зә. Addhummatto ийїгезї уо seyyá°' таййав' itthiyo, 
bahG sšdhëraná h’ etā sondánarh va surágharam. 117. 

se. Māyā с’ ева marici ca‘ soko rogo с’ upaddavo. (I 2° ^ 
kharā са bandhaná с” etá тассорӣво° guhāsayo*, 
tüsu° yo vissase poso во naresu narãdhamo ti. 118, 
Ta. mahento t| mabanto? ветёпо, Іоказва 'ti barnsalokssss, appa- 

meyyo tl gunebi meturn ё аваккспеууо, таһёдап!11 mabantena ganona 


зашаппёда!о ganasatthá, ekitthin ti yah етагйро bhavarn ekarb ittbih anuso- 10 
евууа idab anusocanar na реб 


ato-m-lva, {ёл ап ajja tah bilo ti 
maññamhiti sdhippšáyan' evam ë., š detitl ganbšti, chekapišpakan ti випдагё- 
вопдагаћ, âmakepakkan ti šmakañ ca pakkañ са, lolo tl rasalolo, i. v. h ; 
траһёгаја yathā паша vàto радитаѕагайїпі pabaritvà sagandbam рі sarnkâratthā- 
пӧйїпі paharitvā duggandham рі ubbayarh сһейарёрайаз gandbah ādiyarl 15 
yathš ca bálo kumšrako атЬа]ашЬйпата betthā nislnno hattharn pasšretvš patita- 
patitah šmam pi pakkam pi phalah gahetvà kbädati yathā са rasalolo andho 
bhatte upenite yar) kiñci samakkbikam р) nimmakkbikem р! ашізагт adiyati 
етай ltthiyo паша kllesavasena addham рі duggatam рі kulinam рі akulinam 
р! abhirūpam pi virūpam рі ganhasnti bbajanti’, tādisānam рёрайһатсоёпат %0 
jtthinarh kšranš '° vippalapasi mabšrájà ‘ti, atthesü е1 käraņākâranesu, 
mando ti andhabilo, patibhasi!! man ti mama Qpatibšsl, kšálapariyá-' 
yan’? ti втагйрай maranakšlarh patto |imasmlín kšle idaro kattabbarb Idari 
па kattsbbarn idam vattabbarn Ida na vattabban ti na jinsli devš 'u, ad- 
dhummatto ti eddbamattako l? maññe butvā, udiresitl yatbë suram pivi- 95 
tvànā '1 matto puriso yeh vë tath vā іарей avar lapsstti m, seyyš)( (1 
varā’? uttamš!i, måyā сева t| disu дета Ittbiyo паш etā vabcanetthena 
miyā agayhüpagatthena marici sôkādînarh paccayattë aoko, rogo cupaddavo 
И тоёёд!1!%# апекарракёго upaddavo, kodbadibi theddbabhavena kharā, tā bi!* 
nissaya andubandbanădihi bandbanato™ bandbanāà cetš, Mttblyo!° паша 30 
aariragubâyarh puna тазапайатасси!# năma etå дета {12° káamahetu kimani- 
dána kimādhikaraņarn eva ršJëno corah gabetvā ti suttene р езе, айо 
dipetabbo ( — ?). 


Y Ва -ti. ? во all three MSS. for -рагувуат. * Ва -о. * Bd Cs та. + Rds? 
-š. * Ва tyasu. 7 Сї mahantattā. * Rd рете. ° Che add щїзїпап va. ° 
C% kihkāriņā, 1! Dds 0, © Ске -kiriyayan. !W Bd adhuma-. '* Bd -o. 
15 Bd omita cupaddavo--. !€ во Ва; Сг, Chel 1 Ваг Һајһапаіо. !P 
Cè -1, Cs -1. 19 C% савапакат. 3° Cke etsdevštl. 


10 


30 


?5 


30 


368 ХХІ Asitinipāta. 


Tato dhatarattho mātugāme pațibaddhacittatāya „tvar 
mätugamassa рораг na jánësi, panditá etah’ jānanti, па ега’ 
garahitabbā“ ti dīpento а. : 

s. Мей vuddhehi upaññátarh ko tarn ninditom arabati, 

mahëbhüt”' itthiyo nāma lokasmirm upapajjisuh. 119. 

м. Khiddā panihitá tyásu, rati tyāsu patittbitš, 
bijáni tyásn rūhanti yadidam sattā pajāyare, 
tásu ko nibbide* poso pánarh āsajja pāņibhi. 120. 
ss. Tvam eva n’ añño Sumukha thinarh atthesu yuñjasi, 
tassa ty-ajja bhaye jāte bhitena jáyate mati. 121. 
sı. Забо hi samsayam patto bhayarn ° bhíru titikkhati, 
panditá са mahantā по" atthe yuñjanti duyyaje. 122. 
зһ. Etadatthāya гајапо sūram іссђапіі шашїпат 
patibahati уаш ѕйго ёрадаФ аїїарагїуйуатї'. 1938. 
вс. Mā по ajja vikantirnsu° таппо sūdā mahānnse, 
tathā hi уаппо pattáuarn рћајаф уе]ит уа їаїп vadhi. 124, 
s. Mutto рі? naiccehi' uddeturn'', ѕауат bandharn '° правамі, 
so р’ ajja” sarnsayurn patto 

абат рапһаһї mā mukhan ti. 125, 

Та. уап ti уай matugámasainkhitarn vatthurn paññavuddhebi!t ñátamn 
tesam вче pškatarn па bšlanam, mahëbhüta (í шаһакипа puhanisarnañ, upa- 
pajjimaü '1 pathamakappikakšle itthiliñgassa pathamarh patubhütattë pajba- 
таш uibbattā tl а, tyšsü 'U Su-s (азо itthisu kayavacikhidda cs panihitā 
ohitā thapitë kamagunarati ca patitthitā, bījānîti Buddhapaccekabnddhaariya- 
Añàvakacakkavattišadibijani tasu rühanti, yadidan ti ye ete sabbe рі ssttë раја- 
yare ti sabbe lšsarb yeva kucchimhi saivaddhā ti dipet, nibbide'’ ti nib- 
bindeyya, рёпетёзајја pàníbhiti attano pšnehi рі (азап рапага šskdetvë 
attano jivited cajanto pl tā labhitvà ko nlhbindeyyš 'ti а, nañňo!® u na 
año, Su-a naya Cittahütatsle harsaganamajjhe uisinnana!? tah adisvā 
Каһа Su. ti vutte esa måtugāmaro gahetvà Кайсапарићёуаш uttamaratir !$ 


gnubhotiti vadanti, evam (ғаш eva thinarb atthesu yuñjasi yuttapayutto ahosl 


l Bd eva. 3 Che neto, 14 ne hi ta, Вг па hetå. > Ck эмп vaddhbehurb tva 
райбаший, С* sam saddhehupaibüštari, Bd уап bu-. * В4 nibbije, ° Bd 
sayaru. * Bd сашаһаіёпо, Cts mabhattāno. ? Bd attha-. ®© Cks -katti-. * 
Cks-sj, :0 Bds iccbas! 1: Che odd-. '? Ch baddhai, 1> Ске вајја 1 O 
-vudhehi. 5 Rd -je. '6 Cks nā-. !? Che -nne. 1% all three MSS. -tl. 


2. Mahšharnsajataku. (534) 369 


na аййо Ч a, tansa tyajjā 11 tassa te ajja шагаџабћауе јаќе iminë bhitena 
тагапађћаувпа! maññe ауа mātugāmassa dosadassane nipunë mati jJayste 
tl'adhippšyen' evam aha, sabbo hitl уо koci, вашаауарраб(о ti Jivitasarh- 
sayappatto, bhirü ‘ti bhiru hutv&pl bhayah adhiviseti2, шаһапї& по d уе 
рапа panditš ca honu mahante? са thāne* thitë mabantā no! te duyyuñje 
attho yuüJanti għațanti" všyamanti, tamâ mā bhāyi dhiro һо\1Ч (аф ussihento 
evsm &, åpadan ti sāmino ааш! āpadańh ева sūüro pațibābati etadatthaya 
süramantinath icchanti, attapariyāyan ti attaparittāņam pi са касиф sakko- 
siti pl sdhippšyo, vikantimhaū’ti’ chindimsu i. v. h.; Sum ukhatvab mayā 
attano апапсаге ёре thapito tasmë ajja yathë таййо sūdā smbe marmhsatthšya 
па kantanti’? tathā Кагоћі1, tšdiao b! amhäākamh pattavanno бай avadhiti 
вт-ёуаф vanno yathā иаша vejurh nissāya Jštarn рһајаф velum ova vadhati 
tathë mâ’? tam vadb! tañ са шашай ca må vadhîti adhippayeu' evam å., 
matto рїн!” yathásukheih Cittakūțapabbatarh gacchā 'Ч evarb laddaputtena 
mayà вады mutto visssjjito samāno рі uddituri '® na icchl, sayan ti rājā- 
пай dațthukâmo hutvā sayem eva bandharn'! upagato ti evam idah ешһайал 
bheyarh (аф 1% nissāya âgatah, so рајј&'* 'ti so pi"? ajja Jivltasarbanyarh 
patto, asttharb ganhFrhi më mukhan ti 1dšuí amhêkain muccanakarsnarh ! 8 
ganha yathë muceima! tathë väyäma, vsto va'? gaudbamādetiti 20 айти! vadento 
itthigarahatthāya’? mā шишһат pasirayi. 


Evan М. mátugëmam vannetvá Su-am appatibhánarh 
katvá tassa anattamanabhávarh viditvá idāni nam paggan- 
banto g. ã.: 
ав. So tvah’ уодатп payuñjassu ушаш dhammüpasamhitarn, 

tava pariyapadánena mama рёпевапаф carā” ‘ti, 126. 


Та. во ti samma Su-a во (хар, tab yogan Ц yarn pubbe abar yogan 
payuñjissarh упай dhemmüpasainhitan t avacãsl tah idāol payuñjassu, 
бата - - пепа ‘ti tava tena payogena parisuddhena, рагіуодіќера?* 'd pi pāțho 
parittanenë 'ti a, tayā katattā tava зашайепа?? parittānena mama Jivitapari- 
yasanarh?'t сагё ‘ti adhippišyo. 


1 Ваг add bhito. % Dd -ві. °? Cks-tā, * Cksadd са. 5 Bd adds atthe yuñ- 
janti duyūje ti. * Bd -eutl. ' Ckə-ta. ° Bd -titl 9 Cks vikatt-. 139 Cts 
katt-, 04е vikantihau. '! Bd omita mā. !? Cè» вї. 13 Cha od-. 1 Bd 
dham, Сї haddbarh, Сә vaddham corr. to heddharh ог һашаһап. !? Nd kerh. 
18 Oks айа, 07 Сіз ai. 18 Bd шойс-. 19 Ске са. #0 Ch dedit, Bd -debitl, 
31 ра -garabanate 22 Cka tarh, ?* Cla caran. ** Ck -dhātenā. “5 Bd eantl-. 
46 Ва . усгапагр 
haia У. 24 


10 


18 


зо 


370 ХХІ. Asitinipāte. 


Аа! Su.’ ,ativiya maranabhayabhito, mama balah па 
jānäti, rājānarh діву (окай Ка{һаш labhitvā jānissāmi, аввй- 
веввёті (дуа рап“ ti cintetvë g. å.: 

a». Ма bhayi' раќаіаф већа, па hi bháyanti (Айїлй, 
abar yogarh payuñjissarn yuttarn dhammüpasamhitarm, 
mama рагіуёрарадёпепа khippam pāsā‘ pamokkhasiti. 127. 


Та. pšsš t! dukkhapāsato. 


Iti tesa sakunabhásáya kathentánam luddaputto pa kiñci 
aññâsi, Кеуа]ай рапа te kácenádáya Ва - іш рауіві accha- 
riyabbhntajátepa pañjalinā таһёјапепа апирашташйпо*, во 
ršjadváram patvā attano šgatabhávam rañño ārocāpesi. 


Tam attham pakāsento Sattba aha; 
ко. So luddo harsakëácena гајадтатаф upágami, 

pativedetha шаш гайпо: dhataratth' šyam agato ti. 128. 

Та. psti-- тац ti Khemako Agato ti evarh rañüo шай vadethat, dha- 
taratthšáyan ti ayah db-o ägato ti cas pativedetba. 

Dovàriko gantvá pativedesi, гаја ѕайјасаѕотаоыаво „khip- 
раш agacchatü" ’ti vatvā amaccaganaparivuto samunssitase- 
tacchatte rājapallarhke nisinno Кһетакаш һашваКйсаШай 
ādäya mahátalarm abhirūlharọ disvá suvannavanne hamse olo- 
ketvā ,„sampupņpo me manoratho“ ti tassa’ kattabbakiccam 
amacce йпёреві. 


Таш stthem pakāsento Sgtthë aha: 

а. Te disvā puñüasarnküse ubho lakkhaññasammate ° 
khalu заййашёпо” гаја amacce ajjhahhàsatha: 129. 

аз. Detha luddassa vatthāni anngpánaüñ са bhojanam, 
КашаыштКаго hiraññ'assa'!° уйташо еув!' icchatiti", 130. 


Та. риййеваш ава ti айацо ройбавайіве, 1айКһаййазашта!е* ti 


пе{ћавашшаіе abbl5ñate, khalü "і nipšto, tassa te kbalu disvš ti purimapadena 
sambandho, dethā “i adi гаја pesannākārah keronto а., ta кашафікаго 


1 Che add narb. ? Bd adds ауыр, ! Ске -а, * Che „де, * Ck -gammâno, 
Hd -gacchamāno. * Віз nivedetha. ? Bd adds detha luddassa ti tassa. * Bds 
lakkhana-. ° Ckh2# wamñamano, Bd sarnyamsnuo. “9 read: Кашаф karobl yam 
аана? !! Ске еда. 15 Cha „aiti, 


(834.) 871 


biraññassš ‘Н Мтаййай! assa kümakiriya?' atthu, yá vanto tl ysttakam 
ova icchatl tattakarn hiraññam assa dethš ' а, 


Eva pasannñákárarn kāretvā pltisomanassasamussëbito * 
„gacchatha, пат alamkaritvā ānethā“ `{ а Atha namh 
amaccă rëjanivesapá otāretvå kappitakesamassum nahātānu- 
littam sabbālarhkārapatimanditah katvā rañño dassesurh, Ath° 
авва rājā sarnvacchare satasahassutthápake dvādasagāme 
ājaññayuttan* rathan alarhkatamahāgehañ cá “і mahantarh 
yasam dāpesi. So wahantarh yasarh labhitvá attano kammat * 
pakāsetuh „па te deva mayā yo vā so vā harso nito, 
ayam рапа navutiharnsasatasahassánarh rājā dhatarattho пата, 
ayam pana senápati Su. пётё“ ‘ti а. Atha паш rája ,katharmn 
te samma ete gahitā“ ti pucchi. 


Tam atthañ pakāsento Sattba айа: 
ч. Disvā одда pasannattari' Kāsirājā tadábravi': 
yad’ ayam' samma Khemaka риппё barsebi tittbati 131, 
4. Кашаш ruci majjhagatam päsabattbo upāgami, 
okinnarn ñátisarngbehi пїта]}һїпаш!° kathah gabîti. 132. ° 


Та. passnnattap (і pasannabhāvaii somanesssppettah, уедёуап!: ti 
vayassa!? Khemaha уай! ayah smbškern pokkbarani navutiharnsesabassehi punpa 
Uttbati, kstbarn тас! majjbagatau t| evan sante tvar teserh гиошаш 
р!уеймгалапай baisånah majjhagatarh еіаф !° Āätisahgbona okiņpaim, ni- 
majjhiman ti n eva wajjhimai n eva'* капі Бат uttamern barbsarBjšuarh 
Кааф pāsabattbo upšágami katbañi ganbil, 


So tarsa kathento аһа: 

а. Ајја me sattamā ratti йдапапї upásato'', 
padam etassa аптеватп appamatto bhavassito™, 133. 

46. Ath'assa padam addakkhirm carato йЧапевапатї'', 
tattháham ойаһип раза, ev’ etah dijam aggabin ti. 134. 


1 Che -o. ? во Bå; Che йашап. ? нё pitl-, Cè? plsom-. * Bd -а. > Chs kimam. 
* Bd abo ' Сё-ашар. ° Bd tadabravl. ° Rd увдуёуаф. ?° во all tbreo 
MSS. for uimm-? '! Cha yantvâyan, Нг yadviyan? Bd yadybyan, !2 С 
cayassa, Bde samma. 15 Bs erab. !‹ Cka omit neva, !5 Bas upága-. !$ 
Bds ghaja-. 11 Bd adšneserarn. 

94* 


15 


10 


15 


35 


372 ХХІ. Азїбріраа. 


Ta. šdšnanid àdšnāni gocaragobanatthšnëapid в, ayam ета vë ро, 
qpšesto' Н upazaccbsntassa, padan d goearabhümiyam skkantapadarh, bha- 
vassito? d catipabjaranissito2, atbassš ‘Н аһа cbatihe divase* šdsnesanam > 
сатањідзза padam айдак, everan ti ervah etab, dijam aggsbin ti sab- 
bai gshitopiyarn âcikkhL 


Таш sutvā гаја „ayam dvāre thatvá pativedento pi dhata- 
ratthassa' evágamanam pativedesi, ідапі рі ʻetai ekam eva 
ganhin' ti vadati, kinnn kho ettha Багапәр“ ti cintetvā р. å.: 

a. Ludda dve ime’ sakupá, atha eko ti bhësasi, 

cittan nn te ғірагіуаићһаф" айп kin nu jigimsasiti' 135. 

Та. viparlyatthau?' ti vipallattban, адо kinnu Jiginsasiu!? пйаһа 
kin го elntesl, kiih itaran gabetva аййызза dštokámo hotvš cintesîti pucchati. 

Tato luddo „па me deva cittam vipallattham nâpi abarh 
itaran аййавва dátukámo, арі" kto pana mayā ohite рӣѕе еко 
baddho“ ti āvikaronto аћа : 

sw. Yassa lohitakā tālā" tapaneyyanibhá'' subhà 

uram вафћасса '* titthanti so ше Бардћаф ® apāgami. 136. 

* ө. Atháyam bhassaro pakkhi abaddho baddham áturam 


агіуаф bruváno * atthási cajanto' mānusih giran (і. 137. 


Ta. Johitakä tl rattavanpa. 6818 ti гајіуо, uram sam baccëš!5 'ti uram 
šbacea, L v.b.: maharája yass’ olā rattasuvan0Dasappatihhaga tisso lohitakš 
ršjiyo givarb parikkbipitvā urab šbaccs Ш{{һап so еко та тапа!" päso ban- 
dhan upagato'? ti, hhassaro ti parisuddho pabbšsampanno, а{пгап ú gilä- 
пай dukkhitam attbšasiti. 


„Dhataratthassa baddhabbavám паха nivattitvā еїаш sa- 
massāsetvā шашарашапаКа!е paccuggamanarm katvā ākāse yeva 
mayá saddhiù madharapatisantháram katvā manussabhāsāya 
dhataratthassa gune kathento atthási, mama hadayam mudu- 


1 Ckz upibatoso, Ва upāgato. * Bas bbavi-, Bd» ghaja-. ? Ck càdri-, Bd сай-. 
+ Bd adds etassa. * Bd adānesararh, C% _nesarb. * Cke ше. ? Dd -yattai, 
СЕ -yatharn, C? -yatarn. * Сд Jibissiti, Се chiginsa-, Bd jiglgs-. ” Сї -yatan. 
Ва -yattan. '° Ch jibim-, C*chig-, B4 jigis-. U bd арі ca. `? Che kilah. 
13 Ide -niyā. 1 Ck urasammā, C’ пгазаптйсса, lid пгайзатаһаПса, Ве urasan- 
Һабса. !5 Ске haddharu. !* Ck brumāno, Hd brahmano. '7 Dds vadanto, !# 
СЕ urasambhada, Сг nrassrh-. !# Сіз marn. #9 Bd qpš-. 


2. Mashišhainsajštaka. (534.) 373 


kam katvë puna etass' eva рпга{о atthësi, atbâhah deva 
Su-assa subhësitarn sutvā pasannacitto dhatarațthah via- 
sajjesith, iti dhataratthassa pásato mokkbo, ime hamse ādäya 
mama idhágamanañ ca Ѕотокћеп’ eva katan“ ti evam во 
Su-assa gunam katbesi. Таш sutvā гаја Su-assa dhamma- 
kathah sotukámo ahosi, luddaputtassa sakkáram karantass` 
eva suriyo attbagamito, dīpă pajjalitā, bahü khattiyádayo 
sannipatitã, Khem& devit рі vividhanátakaparivárá' raño 
dakkhiņapasse uisidi, tasmim Кһапе rājā Su-am kathápetu- 
кашо р. &.: 
во: Atha Кіп пи дап! Sumukha һарӣ samhacca titthasi 
adu’ me рагіваф patto hhayā bhfto по bhāsasîti. 138. 
Та. аай һассё і madhurakatbo kira tveb atha karmā 1дёпі mukhab 
pidhāya tlithasi, Adü t| kaccl’, Ъһауй b;hîto tí рагівазёгајјађћауела bhitu hatvā 
Тап sutvă Sumukho abhitabhávarh dassento à: 
sa Náham Kásipati bhfto ogayha parisan tava, 
náham bhayā па bhásissarh vākyarh atthasmirn tádise ti. 139. 
Ta, tâdiso ti apl са kho рапа tathārūpe ане uppanne vškyarh bhaá- 
olasmi) vacanokisarn olokento півіппо 'mbit а. 
Tam sutvë гаја kathah vaddhetukámatáya paribhásar 
karonto а. : 
ss. Na te abhisarar passe na га(ће пёрі* pattike 
пёвва camma уа kitah уй vammine ca dhanoggahe 140, 
вз. Ма hiraññam suvapnarm уй парагатї* vë sumáëpitam 
otipnarn' parikham duggarn dalham attšlakotthakarmn 
yattha pavittho Sumukha bhāyitahbam’ па bháyasitis. 141. 
Тг. abhiseran 11 rakkbanatthäya’ psrivaretvë {Һа avudhahattharh 
parisan tena passāmi, nšssš 'U ettha авза "11 nipšátamattarm, cam man ti sara- 
parittanacammam 10, kiItan t! hiakern catipšlarh vuceatl, cštikapšlahatthëpi te 
santike!! п' апы dipetl, vammine б vammasannaddhe, na hiraññan Ч 
yah піввёув па Ъһауав!!? tarh biraññam рі te па passimi. 


1 Сия dovi tividbā пё(ака-. 2 C% ай 3 В айу ti ШОЧ. * Bd ла. 5 С» 
Ске пеБђатањ. * во Сї, Bd okinnam. ! C% bhšsi-. © Che Ьһава-. ° СЕ 
-па-. 19 Се -па-. È Cker santi. 12 Cha bhšseyyësiti. 


15 


30 


374 XXL Asiúnipata 


Evai гаййй ,kim te asbhašyanakáranan*“ ti vutte tam 


kathento å: 


54. 


Na ше abhisaren’ attho парагеоа dhanena và, 

ара(ћепа patbarn yama antalikkhecarā mayah. 142. 
Sotā са рапдиа ty-amhá пїрапа atthacintaká ', 

bbásem` atthavatib vāca вассе" с’ assa patitthito. 143. 
Кїй са tuyharn asaccassa anariyassa karissati 


musāvadissa loddassa bhanitam рі subhasitan ti. 144. 


Та. abhísarenā 'ú årakkhaparivärena, attho ti etena mama Ёїссаш o’ 


atthi, kasmš уаашё арагепа! tumhšdisšnaro amaggena maggaib' mapetvë yama 
škšsacšrino mayan” ti, panditš tysmbiš ti taya заг amb, ten` eva karsnena 
ambaxsrm Gwantikš dhemmasotukâmo kira no gihāpesi, saccecassā `Q васе“ 


pana 


Стат sscce paGtbito asss аатай Кагалап!азїшїп тайса bbšseyyama, 


asaccassš '1 vacisscearabitasea tava subbāsiteh mandasse dantasuci! vipya 
kib karissari. 


kih 
hîti 
ыт. 
ы. 


во. 


Таш sutvë гаја „Кавша таш mosāvādi apariyo ti vadasi, 
mayñ katan“ ti áha. Atha nam Sumukho tena hi snnà- 
vatvá å.: Е 

Tarh’ brahmanánarn vācanā' imam Кћетюіћ' акагауі, 
abhayañ са {ауа рһоићат imáyo dasadhā disá. 145. 
Ogayha te роккћагапій vippasannodakarh висі 

рашай сёдвоаш '° tattha аһїшвй c'ettha pakkhinam. 146. 
Idar sutvāna nigghosarh ágat' asmà'' (ау' antike, 

te te baddh' asmā '* рёвепа, е(атй'* te bhësitarn musā. 147 
Мавйуйайдаш porakkhatvā icchalobhañ ca pāpaka 

ubbo sandhim atikkamma аваїатп upapajjatîti. 148. 


Та. tan ti tvan, Кһешїп!* ti evannamikarh pokkbaranih, ghbutthan 


ti catüsu kannesu thatvā ghosapitarn, давад а ti Іа tā damadha (Мы ti! 
dísšsu tayš abhayam gbuttheh, ogayhbā “tí ogahitvā šgatānarb santikâ, pabū. 
tañcidansn!t ti pabūtsñ са Ppadumuppalasšliádikarn adanan’, {даш 


1 Ck etta-, Bd catta-. 7 Ске sabbe. ° Bds арићепа * Bas рааш. ? Che 
vayan. * Ck save, Се sacce. 7 so all threa MSS. 5 Cks -паф. ° Bd -ai 
10 Ck modanarb, Bd khā-. l! Bd -tambā. '? Bd bandhanasma. ! Bd ekan. 
16 Bde „ап, 1% so Cks; Bds dasadhë disš tah tan. !* Cke „сёфап-, Ваз -кһа- 
danan. !? Вёз kbadenarm. 


2. Mabaharnaajštaka. (534.) 376 


sutvanë tl tesarn tava pokkharanim ogabltvā agatšnarn santikš Idah abhayath 
sutvá tava santike tava вашїре ќауё karítapokkharanir ёда smbš ti a, te te 
ti te mayarù tava равепа baddhā, purskkbstvš ti pursto katrā, {саћа- 
lobban ti icobasarbkhatarb pšpakarb lobbam, ubbo sandhin tí ubhayam 
devaloke са manusssioke ca patisandhíirh, Imam eva pšpadhamme! purato katvā 
caranto puggalo sugatipatiaandhim atikkamíitvšá, asātan ti пігауаш upapajjatiti. 


Evarh parisamajjhe yeva гаўапатп 1ајјареві. Atha nam 
rājā ,,náham Snmakha tumhe māretvă marnsakháditnkámo? 
рапһаревїт, panditabhávarn pana vo sutvå subhëásitarn sotukámo 
ganhāpesin ti“ ракавепќо й.: 

s. Nâparajjhăma’ Sumukha, па рі lobhā уаш aggahir, 

sutë са panditá ty-attha пїрипа atthacintakā*. 149. 

ө. Appev' atthavatirn vácarh vyákareyyurn'* idhágata, 

tathá (ат samma пезйдо vutto Sumukha-m-aggahiti. 150. 

Ta, парагајјһашаз tji шігепо avarajjbati° паша mayar па mëšrema, 
lobbšvamaggahin ti marnsarh khāditukāmo butvā lohhš vah’ tambe na pl" 
авам, paņnditā tyatthā ti pandita ti eut’ atthe’, attbecintakā 0 pa- 
Чееһаппапаш attbânarh cintaká, attbavatin ti кагабапіваікаф, tatbā t! tena 
kaáranena, vneto ti mayá vutto hutvá, Sumukhamaggabîti аара, mskâro 
sandhikaro, aggahiti dhammarh desessatitl’? tumhe ganhi. 

Tam sutvā Sumukho'' ,ayuttam te katem mahārājā““ `ti 
vatvā å.: 

вв. № eva bhitā” Kasipati upanitasmim jivite, 

bhāsem’ atthavatim vācah sampattā kšlapariyáyam ". 151. 

sa Yo" migena пірат hanti реккћић vā pana pakkhiná 

sutena vā sutar kine’ ki anariyatararh tato. 159. 

в. Yo ca ariyarudarn bhšse auariyadhamm’ avassito 
ubho so dharbsate lokā idha с' eva parattha ca. 153. 
ве. Na majjetha yasan patto, na ууа(ће'* pattasarhsayarh , 
vāyameth’ eva kiccesn, sarhvare vivarāni ca. 154, 


з so Ско; Bd jmeva dbemme. ? C, Md marbsa-, ? Ck’ nāva-. * Ва tyattha- 
3 зо Сї” Bd byšhareyyurm. 6 so Ске; Bd avirajhati, В? avirujjbati. ? Cs -vi 
Вә. -va. ° Ad паһий. ° Bd sutà attharn. !9 Rds desetu. !! Bde add subhšsitarh 
sotukāmena. !? Bd bbü-. `! read -рагуауап. !* Cka ye. !° Bd у, Bs 
kinyá. !% Ваг hyadhe, 


10 


20 


30 


15 


20 


25 


30 


376 XXI. Asitinipāta. 


er. Ye vaddhā abbbatikkaotă ' sampattā kālapariyāyan’ 
idha dhammam caritvåna ev' ete tidivah gatā. 155. 

вв. Idar sutvā Kasipati dhammam attani pālaya 
dhataretthañ ca muñcāhi harnsápam pavaruttaman ti. 156. 


Та. upanitasmin ti maranasantikarn” upanita, kišlspariyšayan ti 
maraņakālavārarh pattā вашапа{* Ьћёвіввёта° na hi! dbammakathikarn bandhitva 
шагапабһауёпа tajjetvë 4һашшатп supanti, ayuttan te katai, migenā 'ti 
qutthusÍkkhapitepa dipaksmigena, hanttti banti раккћіла ti dipakapakkbinā 
са, sutenā ‘ti khemah nibbhayan ti vissutena dipakamigapakkhisadisena pádu- 
таватепа, butan ti рапфіво cittakatbiti eva sutan dbammakathikarh, kiy et 
ti dhammam sossâmfii” pāsabandhanene vå уо? kineyya bšdheyya, tato ti 
tesarn kiriyato uttari aDüsrn апас[уаќата nāme kim stthi, ат!уатцдап ti 
mukhena arlyavacanarh sundaravacanarh bhšsati, dhanımavaseito ti kammena’ 
anariyadhammarh !2 avassito, пЬһо (1 devalokā са manussalokā сё 'ti ubba- 
уашЬй, idha сезй '1 idhe upapanno'i рі рагайһа apapanno'' pi evarüpo 
dvibi augatiokeh! diarhsitva nirayam eva upapajjati, расавай qayan tl Jivl- 
tasarnaayapamāņarh 1? р! dukkharb patvā пе kllameyya, pavare- - сӣ 'И attano 
chiddāmi randhâni’'® sarovareyya pidaheyya, vaddhā ti gunavaddha panditū, 
abbhatikkantā ti (шаф шепоззаіокат !< atikkantā, рат1уйуап tÍ marapa- 
kâlapariyāyapattā hutva, orete t| ovar ete, idan ti lda maya vuttarù attha- 
півваф vacanam, dhamman ti pavenidhammam '° p! sucaritadbammam рі. 


Таш sutvå rëjá аһа: 
вә, Aharant' одакай pajjarn '° йвапай ca шаһйгаһаш 
pañjarato pamokkhámi dhataratthaín yasassinah 157. 
т. Тай са senãpatih dhirah nipunam atthacintakarh 
уо sukhe викћіёо '" rañño dukkhite hoti dukkhito. 158. 
n. Etādiso™ kho arahati''pindam арӯси ” bhattuno 
yatháyarn Sumukho rañño pāņasādhāraņo вакћа ti. 159. 
Ta, udakan ti pšdadhovanam, рајјап ti pšdabbhañjanain. sukhe ti 
sokhamhi sall. 
Каййо vacanam sutvā tesańh &sanāni haritvë ta. пївїппй- 
narn gandhodakena раде dhovitvá satapákatelena abbhañjayirhsu. 


1 Cks abbhāe, ° read -paryayarn. 8 Сіз -ka. * Bdsadd ns. 5 Сі -щі, * 
Ва kilyá, Ва kiņyā. 7 Bd девевай-. * Се во. ° Ске каштапаі. !0 Віз 
-yahdhamma, 1! Ckə uppa-, * Bds -вауашёраппаш. 1! Bd дхагёпаш. " 
Cks omit аЪћа --, 15 Bæ -піуа-. 1% Bds majja. 1° Cka да. !% Chs .ā, 
19 Che santi, O Ck авап, Ba bhasmatu, Сг asmātu. 


2 Mahåhainsejātake. (534.) 877 


Sattbā tam attham рекёзепіо аһа: 
та. Pittbañ са sabbasovannamn stthapādah manoramam 

mattharm ' kasikavatthinam * dhatarattho upāvisi, 160. 

тв. Kocchañ са sabbasovannam veyyarghaparisibbitam ` 

Sumukbo ejja pāvekkhi dhataratthass ` anantarā. 161. 

т«. Tesan Eañcanapattehi' puthu ādāya Kāsiyo 

bamsšnam вЬһїһагеуушп аррагайпо pavāsitan ti. 162. 

Ta. matthan t| karanaparinitthitain, khFasikavatthinan' (1 käsike- 
vatthena atihatah, kocchan ti majjhe sasrnkhittacyaghhacammaparisibbltam * 
mañgaladivase aggàmahesiyā nisidanapithakam, kañcanapattehĵîti suvanna- 
bhâjanebi, puthüú ti babujanā, Kaslyo ti Kāsiraithavāsino, аЪћіһ агеууоо 
ti upanëámesum, aggarañño paväāsitan tlatlbasatasuvangapaátui!' pakkhittarb 
harhaarañño pannaákaratthaya Kâsirañño pesitain nënaggarasabbojanarh. 


Evam npantte рапа tasınih Кйазїга}й tesam sañgahattharh 
sayarn suvannapátiñ gahetvá upanāmesi, te tato ca madhulāje 
khāditvā madhurodakarn' рїуййви, atha M. rañño abhihárañ ca 
pasādañ са" disvá patisanthárarñ akasi. 


Таш pakāsento Satthā aha: 
т. Disvā abhibatamn aggam Kāsirājena pesitam 
kusalo khattadhammānam tato pucchi anantarâ: 163. 
те. Kaccin' nu bhoto kusalarh Кассі'° bhoto anámayat, (IV $37 v 25е 
Кассі rattham idam phitam dhammenn-m-anusissati'!', 164. 
тт. Kusala с’ eva те һаїза або һаїзп апйтауапш, 
atho гаИћат idah рЫўаш dhammena-m-anusissati ™. 165. 
тв. Kacci bhoto атассези doso koci пе vijjati, 
kaccin nu te ќау` stthesu nàvakamkhanti jivitam. 166. 
то. Atho рі me атассеѕи doso Косі па vijjati, 
atho рі te mam` айћези nñvakamkhanti jivitam. 167. 
во. Кассі ќе в8йїзї bhariyā assevā ріуаЫћапіпі 
puttarüupayasupetë tava cbandavasānugā. 168. 
a. Atho me sādisī bhariyā assevā piyabhanini 
puttarūpayasūüpetā mama chandavāsānugā. 169. 


3 Cha maiiba, Bd patba, Вг шанЬай °? Bd -vattinarb, Вг -vattbinņnar Cts 
pattblunar for patiinan? 2 Bd -parisuppitarh, Ckz -sibbitā. * Bd -mattebi. 
5 Ск -pattlnnan, C? -pattbiyņan, Bš vattinnan. * СЕ -ta. 7 Bd Jsatapalasu-, 
Вг -vanpapalapatih. ° Cke madhukab. ° Chesabhikarapasa, '° Bd kiñci 
throngbout., !! Bd -säsatl, Ве -sãsasi. 1? Bds »sâsâmi. 


m 
° 


5 


35 


30 


378 XXI. Asitinipars. 


at. Кассі rattham апиррПаш! akutociopaddavain 
asābasena dhammena samena-m-anusissati*'. 170. 
вз. Atho rattham вриррПат skutooiupaddavarmp 
asāhasena dhammena samena-m-snusissati'. 171. 
s<. Кассі santo apacitā asanto parivajjitā, 
noce dhammam niramkatvā adhammam Rnnuvattasi °. 172, 
вз. Santo ca те apacitā авап{о parivajjitā, 
dhamme c’ evânuvattāmi’, adhammo me niramkato. 173. 
вв. Kacci nånāgatah' digham samavekkbasi khattiya, 
kacci matto madaniye рагаіокаш' па santasi". 174, 
пт. № ahan’ впардаіаф digba samavekkhāmi pakkhima '°, 
thito dasasu dhammesu paralokam па santase'': 175. 
вв. Юйёпаш silam pariecagam ajjavam maddavam (араш 
akkodham атїһїшзвй са khantiñ са avirodhanam 176. 
вә. Ісс-еќе kusale dhamme thite равзёті attani, 
tato ше јёувќе piti somanassañ c` апарраһаш. 177. 
әс. Sumukho ca acintetvë vissaji pharusam giram 
bhávadosam апаппйёуа ssmāk’ ёуаф vihangamo. 178. 
эз. So kuddho pharusam тёсаф піссһёгеѕі ayoniso 
yëán' asmāsu na vijjanti, па idat '" pañōavatām ivā 'ti. 179. 


Ta дівта ti tan bahuaggapänabhojanam disvā, pesitan ti âharāpetvà 
upanitam, khattadbammānan ti pathamakārskosu ра{!вапн1һагайһаштлапаш, 
tato pucchi enantară ti tasmim kâle kacci nu bhnto tl anupatipštiyá puc- 
chi, tā pana cha вафа hețthāvuttattbā yeva, апоррї!ап 19 ti kacci rattbavāsino 
yanto ucchum viya па pilesiti pucrhati, akutoclupaddavap ti kutoci 
anupaddavam, samenamanusisaatiti! t kacci tayš!5 rattbarh dhammena 
namena anusšsiyat[!%, santo ti s#lladiguqayuttëa sappurisãā, nlrsihkatva ti 
chaqdetva, пёпёвасат !" digban tl anāgatarn attano Jivitapavattih kacci 
dighan ti па samavekkhasi šayusarhkháranarh parittabhávarn jānāsîti pucchati, 
madaniye ti тпаййуаһе!® rüpšdiàrammane, ла santasiti't° na bháyas!"n, 
i. v. b. : kacci rüpadisu Катапевш amatto’! appsmatto hutvā dënadinarmn 
kusalānarh Каба paralokarb па bbišyssiti, dasssü 'Ц dassau таја- 
dhammesu dánšádisü dassvetthukäcetanādānarn pañcasiladasasilādisilah deyya- 


1 Bd anupi-. ЭВФ -sâsati. 3 Rds -sāeīimi. + Bds -, 5 Cks шета-, Віз dham- 
тепетеашапи- “Ва nunà. ! Віз ke. ° во all three MSS. ° СЕ nāgam, 
Bd aham. 10 Віз -mā. !! Н» santasi, Ck naccintase. !° Bd yidam, ™ all 
three MSS. аппрї. 14 114 -sasatiti. 15 Nde tava. 18 Bd -süsasi. !7 Ckz naga- 
tam, Bd anāgatam. !5 Bd? madāre-, )° Chkz „06е. ?° во all three М55. ! 
Ва omite аш-. 


2. Mahiaharbsajataka. (534). 379 


dhammam садо рапссадо ujubhāvo гјјетаф mudubbšvo таййатай uposatha- 
һзашшаш ќаро mettāpnbbabhágo akkodho! karupšápubbabhšgo avihirpsë adhi- 
vāsanā khanti svirodho avirodhanarb, асі пета t! mama imam gunasampattirn s 
aciutetvā, Ьһаувфовап t| cittadosarn, esnsüñayš 'd ajīnitvā, ssmškam рі 
cittadoso nima n' atthi, yam ева Janeyya tarh ajânitvā pharusarb kakhhalarh 
giran visssjjesi, ayoniso Й anupāyene, yānaşsmāsū '1 yani vajjâni amhesu 
па santi’ (апі таай, na idan ti tasmâssa‘ дап тасапайз peññavatáamiva 
па hoti ton’ eva samma па pandito viya орацЬёЧ. 


Тат sutvā Sumukho „„тауй guņasampanno уа? гаја apa- 
sādito, so ше“ kuddho, Кћатёреввёті nan“ ti cintetvë å.: 
эз. Atthi me tam atisáram vegena manujádhipa 
dhataratthe са baddhasmirh dukkham me vipulam ahu. 180, 
а. Tvam pita viya'puttánam bhütánarn @һагапї-г-їув° 
asmākamh adhipannšánar khamassu rājakuñjarā 'i. 181. 
Ta atisšran ti pakkhalltadii’, vegonā 'ti sharh ега Каћа kathanto 
vogona sahasā kathesih, dukkhan ti cetasikadukkharo mama vipulah abosi, 
tamā kodhavasena yam 10 шауё vuttaih tam ше Шһаша!! mabārājā 'ti, puttānan 
ti tvari ambākarn puttānarh pitä viya, 4һагап1т1з]& 'ú jpāņabbūtānańh pathavi 
viya ca {таш amhakarp avassayo, adhipannanan ti dosena aparadhena ajjhot- 


thatánain, khamasaŭ ‘ti idah so âsanā oruyha pakkhehl añjalih katvå â. 


Atha narh гаја āliñgitvā ādāya suvanpapithe'" nisīdāpetvā 
ассауепа '' desanar patiganhanto ā.: 

a. Etan {е anumodáma yam bhávamr па nigühasi, 

khilah pabhindasi pakkhi, ujuko si vihañgamā ‘ti. 182. 

Та. anumodămă `t! otan ta dosam khamama, yan Ч yasmā tvar attano 
cittah paeticchannsbhavarp na gühasi, klilan ti eittakhânukarh. 

Idarn vatvā рапа răjā M-assa dhammakathāya Sumukhassa 
са ujubháve pasiditvā ,,раваппепа nëma pasannăkāro kátabbo“* 
ti nbhinnam pi tesar attano га}}азїгїїї niyyādento å.: 

s. Yam kiðci ratanam вёсћі Kāsirājanivesane 

rajatarh jātarūpañ са шиа velariyă bahü 183. 


1 Hds ahodho, Ске adhihkodho. 3 Ck gunarn-. ? Bd vłjjanti. * Bd tasmë шаша. 
5 Ске himayā. ° Ck semeke, Се seme. 7 Cks та. ° [8 -niviya. * Bd adds 
katharn. 10 Chs лат. 11 Bd khamastha, Ck (овоа Шһаша. '? Ch puttapithe, 
Се punnapithe. '8 B® - уа. 


9 


15 


30 


10 


15 


35 


380 XXI Asiítinipšta. 


эв. Мапауо' samkhamottañ са vatthakarn' haricandanarm 
вјіпаф ' dantabhandañ са loharh Ккајауакаф * bahar‘, 
etai dadámi vo vittam, 1ззагаш vissajāmi vo ti. 184, 
Та. stthiti nidahitan, muttá ti viddhāviddhamuttā, maqayo’ й 
mayibhandakāni, вайһашпїїайеа ti dahkkhinavattasarpkharatanañ t са 
ámalavattamuttaratanañ" са, vatthakant ti sukhumakišslyavatthšni, ajinan ti 
ajiuamigacammath, lobar ка| ауввап? t tambalohañ cs kšlalohañ са, issaran 
ti kañcanemilena setacchattena забір dvådasayojanika Вагёпавіпадаге rajjarh, 
Evañ са рапа vatvā ubho pi te setacchattepa pūjetvā r, 
paticchápesi. Atha М. гаййй вайЧһїш sallapanto а.: 
». Addbā apacitā ty-amha sakkatā ca rathesabha, 
dbammesu уайашйпйпаш'° (уа no ācariyo bhava. 185. 
эз. Ácariya samanuñüñtá ќауё апиша(а mavam, 
tam padakkhinato katvā Паїї passem' Arindamiá " чі, 186, 
Ta. dhammesü ti kusalakammapathedbammesu, äcariyo tl tvar amhehi 


wyattataro tasmā uo !? ācariyo hohi, арі ca dasaunah ràjadbammānamh akae 
thitattë 19 Bumukbassa dossi dasservë accayapațiggabanassa’* katattåpi tvarb 


ашһёкаф ācariyo va '°, tamā idāni pi no ācârasihkhäpadena !* âcarlyo hhavš ' a., 
раввошагіпдашё!! Чі равешо Arindama. Я 


So tesan sarngamanam anojāni. B-ttassápi dh. kathen- 
tass’ eva arunarh utthahi. 

Tam atthum pakāsento Satthë аһа: 

ss. Sabbarattim cintayitvë niantayitvë yathatatham 

Казігаја anuññási һешвапеш pavaruttaman''ti р. а. 187. 

Та. yathātathan tÍ уай kiñci attham® tehi saddhim clutetabbañ са 
maytstabbsñ са sabba (аф сішќеіу& са maptetvá сё 1 a, apuüñasiti 
Racchathš 'ti апаййїө!. 

Evam tena апаййа(о В. гёјапаф ,appamatto dhammena 
г. kárehiti“ vatvā"™ райсави silesu patitthapesi. Rajápi геѕаф 


1 Ва (уо ? Che -ikan ё СЕ apita, Bd ајіппап < Ck һа]атю-, Bd kšla-. 
* Ck Bd -a. * Ва „iyo. * Bd dakkhinavattarp-. ? Bj amalakavattarn-. * Сї 
-lyan Bd ikan, * Ck kala-, Ва kāläyan. )° Bá vu-. Ваг -morind-. !* СЫ sa- 
mno tattha In the place of tasmë по. 15 Ска -mmiškathi-. 1$ Che parigg , C 
perigganbassa, Bd patiggabanasra. 18 Che са. 1$ Ckç -patena, Bë acariyasi-. ' 
Сї „шо. "8 Сіз anthi. '® Bd ovaditva. 


2. Маһяһагі:зајајака, (Б34.) 381 


21 


kañcapabhajanehi madhulāje madhurodakañ' са upanetvë 
nițtbitāhārakicce gandhamālādīhi pūjetvā В-аш suvaņņa- 
cañgotakena sayar ukkhipi', Khemā devi Sumukham ukkhipi, 
atba ne sibapañjararn ugghátápetvë suriyuggamanavelāya ,,gac- 
chatha зётіпо“ ti уівзајјевотћ. 


Tam attham ракаѕепіо Satthë аһа: 
100. Tato та{уй vivasane suriyuggamanam pati 
pekkhato Kāsirājassa bhavanë te? vigāhisun ti g. ё. 188, 


Tauba vi!igahisun ti škšsarh pakkhandiírheu. 


Tesu M. suvannacañgotaká' uppatitvā ákšse thatvá „mā 
ciotayi mahārāja, appamatto amhëákam ovāde vatteyyāsiti“ 
т&]йпатп samassãsetvā Sumukham ādāya Cittakütam eva gato. 
tāni pi kho navutibarnsasahassāni Kañcanacuhato nikkhamitvā 
pabbatatale nisinnāni* te āgacchante disvā paccuggantvă pari- 
уйгевиш, te ñātigaņaparivutā Cittakūțtatalarh рауізіфва. 


Таш айаш pakāsento Satthë aha: 

101. Te aroge anuppatte disvāna parame dije 

keke ti-m-akarum' hamsā, puthusaddo ajāyatha. 189. 
зов. Те patitā pamuttena bhattunā bhattugarava 

зётап{ё parikarimsu" andajā laddbapaccayā. 190. 

Ta paramo ti uttame, akaran ti mahäsaddahn niccháresurh, keke ti 
attano sebbārena koke t| esddam sharbsu, bhattugāravā parikarimeā 'Ч 
bhattuno pamut'abhāvena gantvå attšnarb (bhattāram? )ватапіё parivarayirhsu, 
laddhapaccayi tl 1аддћара: (һа. 


Evar parivāretvā ca pana te hamhsā „kathan mutto si 
mahārăjā“ 'ti pucchihsu. M. Sumukharn nissāya muttabhávarh 
Saryamarājaputtehi katakammañ са kathesi, tarh sutvā tutthá 
һашйвадапаё ,Sumukho pana genëpati ca rājă са luddo са 
sukhitā niddukkhā nacirarn jivantū“ ‘ti šharnso. 


+ Cke madbudahaü. ? De -pămetvā. 2 Ва ukkhipatsā. * Rds bbavanato. 5 
Bd -kato. * Bd -ппё, Вг nlpanná, ? Ck--tl samakaran. ° CEs -kiresurh. 


382 XXI. Asitinipāta. 


Tam attham pakāsento Satthā аһа': 
тоз. Evam mittavatam atthā sabbe honti padakkhinā 

hamsë yathā’ dhataratthā ñātisahgbam upāgamun ti. 191. 

Tam Cullahamsajšátake vitthšritam? ета, 

5. i. d. a. j. s.: „Теда luddo Channo ahosi, Khemā devi 
Khemë bhikkhupi. гаја Sariputto, рагіва Ваддһврагівё, Sumukho 
Anando, dhetarattho aham eva" ‘ti. Mahāhamsajātakam. 


3. Sudhabhojarajšátaka. 


Nuguttame! ti. Idah S. J. v. ekam danajjhasayam bhik- 
khum ё. k. So kira Sāvatthiyah еко kulaputto Satthu -dhamma- 
katha шута pasannacitto pabbajivë silesu paripūrakâri’ dhutanga- 
gunasamannagato sabrahmacárisu pavattamettecitto divasassa tikkhat- 
tuh Huddhadhammasamghupattháne appamatto ёсагазашрарпо danaj- 
jbāsayo ahosi. ѕёгаріувдһаттарігако attanå laddham patiggšbakesu 
vijjamānesu chinnabhatto butvā deti yeva, tasea' зо düanajjhasayo 
dānābhiratabbāvo bhikkhusamgbe pākato ahosi, А’ ekadivasam dh, 
k. в. „āvuso asuko nëma bhikkhu Чапа}}һазауо dānābhirato attanā 
laddham pasatamattarh’ рёріуаш pi lobham chinditvā sabrahmacārinam 
deti, Bodhisattass” ev’ asse вјјһёзауо“ ti, 5. tam katham dibbāya 
sotadhātuyā sutva Gandhakutito nikkhamitvā ágantvā „k. n. bh. e, 
k. s. Чор. уі. n.“ ti v. „ayam bhikkhave bhikkbu pubbe adanasilo 
шассһагї tinaggena telabindum рі адаса ahosi, atha tah aham dametvë 
nihbisevanam katvë danaphalam vannetvë dane patitthapesim, зо 
pasatamattam udakam рі labhitvë ‘ʻadatvā па pivissamiti' mama santike 
тагаш aggahesi, tassa phalena dānajjhāsayo danabhirato** ti уа{уй” a. 6. : 


А. B. Вг. г. k. еко gahapati addho ahosi asitikotivibhavo. 
Ath’ assa гаја setthitthaparn адаві. So rajapüjito nagara- 
janapadapūjito hutvá ekadivasarm_ анаро sampattim оіокеѓуё 
cintesi: „ayah yaso mayá atitabhaven' eva° niddáyantena 
káyadaccaritádini karontena '° (add: na) laddho sacaritāni pana 


1 tattha parame - - - - - аһа wanting in СЮ, 2 5d» add рі. 5 Hd vuttattham. 
4 so Che; Bd пета піраші э: пета кіпаші, Вг па guttame girivare. ° Bd 
paripüri-, С pāripūra-. * Bd tasmš ' Pd pasata-. * Ваз айд tunhi ahosi 
tobi yacito. ° Ck atibháveneva, Hd atitaveneva, 10 СЮ -to ца, 


3. Sudhaábbojanajataka. (535.) 383 


рӣгеіуа laddho', anāgate pi mayá mama patitthar Ейїшї 
vattatiti“ so rañüo santikarn gantvå „deva шаша ghare asiti- 
kotidhanarh atthi, tarù gaņphā“ `{} vatvë „па тауһаш tava 
dhanena attho, bahom те dhanarh, tato?’ pi yad icchasi репћа“ 
'ti vatte „kin pu deva mama dhanam dānam’ dáturh labbā- 
mîti“ š. Аа raññá ,yathárucim karohîti“ vutte catūso 
nagaradvāresu nagaramajjhe nivesanadvāre са “і cha dāna- 
sālā‘ kāretvā devasikah chasatasahassapariccágarh karonto 
шаһаййпаш pavattesi. So yāvajlivah Чйпаш datvā „imam 
mama danavarmsam mā ncchinditth&° 'ti putte anosăsitvā* 
jivitapariyosāne Sakko hutvä nibbatti. Putto pi "вва tath' eva 
бапаф datvá Cando hutvë nibbatti, tassa potto Ѕогіуо butvā’ 
tassa potto Mātali hutvá' tassa putto Pañcasikho hutvā nib- 
batti. Tassa pana potto chattho setthi" Maccharikosiyo nāma 
ahosi asitikotivibhavo yeva, so „mama pitupitâmahā vālā 
аһевшй, dnkkhena sambbatarn dhanarh chaddesum, аһа pana 
dhanam rakkhissāmi, kassaci kiñci na dassămîti“ cintetvā 
dünasñlarn viddharhsetvā agginā jhápetvë thaddhamaccharī 
ahosi. Ath’ assa gehadvāre yācakā sannipatitva bāhā pag- 
gayha ,nahšsetthi mā attano pitipitamahánam уашвап nāsayi, 
Чаёпаш dehiti“ mahësaddena рагібеуіфзо. Taro шуй mahá- 
jano ,,Maccharikosiyena attano vaso’ ucchiono“ ti nam 
garahi. So lajjito vivesanadvāre yācakānar "° (Һарај nivāre- 
turh агаккћаћ thapesi, ite nippaccayā hatvā ропа tassa geha- 
. ёуёгаш па olokesurh, во tato patthaya dhanam eva sam- 
gharati'', o° еу’ attanā paribhoñjati па puttadárëdiínarh deti, 
kañjikadutiya '* saknndakabhattam bbuñjati, mülaphalamatta- 
tantáni # thullavatthāni niváseti, pannachattam matthake kāretvā 
jaragonüyuttajajjararathakena' yati, iti (авва аваррогіваѕва 


3 бї, t Ві ito. 3 Bd omite dā-. * Ва -ауо, * Bd -datbā. * Che 
-aāritvā, 7 Ва абда nibbatti. * Bdzjaddho se(hithënam in the place of 
вены. ° Chs -e, Bd danavamso. '° Віғ add āgatånah. !! Bd sarbhari. 15 
Bd kiñciyarn bllañgadutliyarh. !* во Cs; Bd dbülskspamatu-. '* Ва Jaraggena 
yuttena јајјага-. 


- 


° 


5 


15 


90 


85 


384 ХХІ. Aasttinipata. 


tattakarh дһапаф sunakhena laddhanālikerarh viya abosi. So 
ekadivasam rājupațttbāna gacchanto ‚„‚аппве{{һїш ādāya ga- 
missāmîti“ tassa реһаф agamāsi, tasmiñ са khane anusetthi 
puttadbītāhi parivato navasappipakkamadhurasakkharacunnehi 
ваткһаќаф рауаваїйй bhuñjamšuo nisinno ahosi', so Maccha- 
riyakosiyarh disvâ üsaná vuttháya „ehi mahâāsețțthi imasmirh 
pallamke nisida' рауйваф Ыһий}їззаёша'“ ‘ti а. So‘ tassa pā- 
ysam disvā уа mukhe khelo nppajji, bhuñjitakāmo ahosi, evam 
pana cintesi: „вас' ёһаф bhuñjissámi eetthino ° mama geharmn 
āgatakāle patisakkáro kátabbo bhavissati, етай me dhanarh 
nassissati, па bhuñjissámiti“ а., а(ћа* punappuna уёсіуашёпо 
рі „idāni me bhuttam, suhito smîti“ па icchi, anusetthimhi' 
bhuñjante pana’ olokento mukhe saüjáyamánena' kheleua nisi- 
дієта (авва bhattakiccávasáne tena saddhih rājanivesanamh 
gantvā™ puua! attano geharm anuppatto pāyāsataņhāya pili- 
yamāno cintesi: ,,зас° áhar “рйёуазаш bhuñjitukāmo 'mhiti' 
vakkhāmi mahajano bhuñjitukāmo bhavissati bahutaņdulādayo 
nassissanti, na kassaci kathessámiti“ во rattindivah páyásam 
eva cintento vitinámetvápi dhananāsanabhayena kassaci aka- 
thetvā va pipásam adhivásesi, auukkamena adhivāseturn asak- 
konto uppanduppandukajáto ahosi, eva eante рї dhananësa- 
bhayeva akathento aparabhāge dubbalo hutvā seyyah upa- 
gāhitvā nipajji. Atha nar bhariya upasarnkamitvá'* hatthena 
pitthim parimajjáná „kin te ваші aphásukan“ ti pucohi, ,,tav' 
eva sarire арһавикаш karohi“. „Mama арһћёвикаћ n'atthiti“. 
„Sami, panduvanno ві jato, kin пи te Касі cintá atthi, udáhu raja 
kupito, ādu '* puttehi avamāno kato, atha уйёрї kāci їапһа ирраоё“ 
ti, „Ата!*{апһа '* uppannë“ ti, „kathehi sāmi", sakkhissasi nam 
rakkhituu“ ti. ,,Rakkhitabbayuttakame rakkhissámiti.“ Evam 


1 Bd boti. ? Сх -81. ®© Bd -miti. * Ско omit so. + Dde апозе-. * Bd 
adds narh. 7 C*e omit an-. * Bd puna, ' Bd sajja-. !° Bd adde rajanarh 
ršjanivesanato otaritva, !! ріг omit puna, 13 Bd sayana, !®# Ba -gantvā. 
M Edsa- !5 Bd kama, !* 04 add me. '! Cks omit (1 kathehi sāmi. 


3. Sudhābbojanajātaka. 1535.) 885 


рі 4һапапйваЫһауепа kathetarh па ussahi, tāya рапа punap- 
ропа plliyamšno kathesi: ,,bhadde аһаф ekadivasarm anu- 
setthih sappimadhusakkharacunnehi sarhkhatarh páyásar) bhuñ- 
jantarn disvā tato pattháya tādisah рӣуйваф bhuñjitakámo 
јао‘ ti. „Asappurisa, Кій tvan duggato, sakala- Bārānasi- 
väsinah pahonakarñ pāyäsarh pacissãmîti.“ Ath’ авва в1ве 
dandena pabaraņakālo viya аћові. So tassā kojjhitvā „jānām’ 
aham tava mahaddhanabhávam, васе te kulagharā bhatar ' 
atthi påyāsatn pacitvā nāgarānarn dehîti“ á, „Тепа hi eka- 
vithivasínarn pahonakam katvā pacāmîti“. „Kin te tebi’, 
attano santaka khādantū" ti. „Тепа hi ito с' ito ca satta- 
Дһагатйвїпаїї* райопаКаш katvâ‘“ ti. , Kin te tehîti', , Tena 
hi їшавтїш gehe parijanassā“ ‘ti. „Kin te teng" "ti, 
„Тепа hi bandhujanase’ eva’ pacamiti“ Кіп te etenā“ “ti, 
s Tena hi tuyhañ ca mayhañ ca pacāmi sāmîti“. Кізі (уай, 
tuyham na vattatiti“ ,Ekakass' eva te расёті вагу 
„Мауһай са шй ресі, веће! расаоіе bahü рассёвіфвапіі, 
шауһаш рапа pattharn' ќаофоіёрай са catubhágam КМгавва 
апсћагай sakkharāya karandakarn'”madhussa екаб са pacana- 
bhājanarh'® debi, агайдай рауівісуё tattha pacitvā bhuñjissamiti““. 
Sā tathā akāsi. So (атп sabbarh cetakena'" gābāpetvā рассћа"* 
„asukatthāne titthā““ ’ti'“ ta purato pesetvā ekako va 
ogunthikarh katvā айпа!аКауевепа'' tattha gantvā naditlre 
ekasmih gacchamüle uddhanarn kāretvā dārudakarn āhbarāpetvā 
„tvah gantvā еКазтїї'* magge thatvā kañcid'" eva disvā 
mama saññam dadeyyási, mayá pakkoaitakāle ágaccheyyasiti““ 
tar pesetvā aggih katvā рйёуйваш paci. Tasmimr khane Sakko 
devarājā dasasahassayojanam alamkatadevanagarah" satthi- 


1 Ck Bd kha-. " Rd kinta etehi. 3! Ck? aattasatta-. * Bd adds раса. ° 
Bd ete-. * Bd ві-. 7 Bds add раһопакат katvk. ° Bd tena hl ekassova 
раһопайай katrā. ° Bd adds vutte. '° Bd adde pans. !' ВФрһаш. ™ 
В4е add варрівва ШагапфШаш. 2 Сг panabba-. 14 Che -ke. !5 Chs omit 
Baccha. !® Ва -nań dttbahiti. !? Ck» aĀĀatara-. '* so all three MSS for 
etasmlim? !° pd ki-. 20 Cks -tarhdeva-. 

тишле. V. 95 


10 


16 


20 


386 XXI Asidnipáta. 


уојапаш Suvannavithihn’ yojanasahasesossitarn' Vejayantam 
pañcayojanasatikarn Sudhammarh ' satthiyojanarn Pandukambala- 
вїЇйвапаш pañcayojanávattam ‘ Kañcanamălasetacchattah addha- 
teyyakotisarnkhádevaccharšalarmkatapatiyattarn' attabhāvan ti 
imam attano sirih oloketvā „kiu nu kho katvá mayá ayar 
yaso laddho“‘ ti cintetvā Rārānasiyarn setthibhütena pavattita- 
dānarh addasa, tato „шаша puttădayo kuhirm nibbattā“ ti 
olokento° „putto me Cando devaputto hotvā nibbatti tassa 
putto Suriyo“ ti’ sabbesarh nibbattih disevā ,Pañcasikhassa 
putto kidiso“ ti olokento attano varhsassa ucchinnabhāvam 
passi, ath’ assa etad ahosi: „ayar asapporiso шассһагї hutvā 
n’ еу’ attanå paribhuñjati па paresam deti, mama tena varmnso 
ucchinno, kālarù katvā niraye nibbattissati, ovādam assa datvā 
mama vamsam patitthëpetvë etassa imasmim devanagare nib- 
battanákárarn karissámiti“ so Caudādayo ракковёреќуа „etha 
шаппявара{баш gacchiesāma’, Maccharikosikena"' amhakarn 
vaso ucchinno: дапазё]а jhāpitā n’ ev’ attanā paribbnñjati па 
рагевай deti, idāni pana рёуёзаф paribhuñjitukāmo” butvā 
ghare paccante аййавайрї páyáso'' dātabbo bhavissatiti агаййаш 
pavisitvā ekako va pacati, etarù dametvā д&парћаіа jānāpetvä 
āgamissāma, api' kbo рапа amhehi sabbehi'* ekato yāciya- 
müno tatth' eva maregya'*, mama pathamam gantvā páyásarh 
yācitvā nisinpakale tumhe bršášhmauavannena patipátiyá ёдап!уй 
yáceyyñtha“ 'ti vatvā sayam {ата bráhmanavesena '° {аш upa- 
samkamitvă „bho kataro Bărāņssigamamaggo“ ti pucchi. Atba 
nar Maccharikosiyo „kih ummatto si™, Ba-maggar pi па 
јаоӣѕі, Кіп ito esi etto yābîti“ а. Sakko tassa уасапаш!* 
asunanto viya „kih kathesiti“ (ат upagacchat' eva. So pi 


3 Ck -vitih, Сә -withi, Bd vittiņnarh. 2? В4 -ssabbedharh. `? Bd -asabħharh. * 
Ва -ttah. ° Rd -kbātã-. * Bd -etvā. 7 Ва adda tassa putto mātali tassa 


putto pañcasikho ti. ° Bd gami-. ° Bd -yena. !° Bd omits pari. !! Cks 
omit pāyãso. '? Bd арі са. '? Ck sarebi, Bd omits sabbebi. !* so Che; Bd 
pareyya, rosd: vareyya?) !? Ræ -vannena, !* Cks 1]. Bd omits si. ' Bd ti. 


10 Ва adds autr, 


3. Sudhādhojanajātakā. (536.) 887 


„ёге badhirabrāhmaņa kirh ito esi parato yāhîti“ viravi. Atha 
пай Sakko ‚bho kasmëá viravasi, dhümo paññáyati, арр 
раййауай, pāyāso рассай, brābmaņanimantanatthānena' bha- 
vitabbah*, aham pi brahmanánarm bhojanakāle thokarh labhis- 
sāmi’, Кій mam nicchubhasiti*“ vatvā „n' atth' ettha brāh- 
mananimantanarh, parato’ yāhîti“ vutte „tena hi kasmë kujjhasi, 
tava bhojanakāle thokarn labhissāmîti“ а, Аа nam зо 
„aham te ekasittham‘ рї па dassāmi, thokah idam' mama 
yāpanamattam eva, mayâpi с’ etam” yácitvá va laddhakam', 
{тат aññato'° taváháram pariyesā“ 'ti'! bhariyam'' yācitvā 
laddhabhavam sandhay' evarh vatvā: 

1. № eva Кіпаші na pi vikkinami, 

па cápi me sannicayo ca atthi, 

sukiccharüparh vat'idarh parittath, 

patthodano nálam ayam duvindan'ti g. а. 192. 

Tam sutvá Sakko „aham рі te madhurasaddena ekar 
silokam kathessámi?*% sunšhiti% vatvā „па me tava silokena 
attho“ ti tassa '° vārentassa várentassa 

.. Appamhā appakam dajjā anumajjhato majjhakarh, 

bahumhá baħakarn dajjā, adanam па орарај)а‹і. 193. 

s. Таш tah vadāmi Ковіуа: dehi dānāni bhuñja са!* 
агїуатп " maggarh samëruha'°, 

п’ екӣвї '' labhate sukhan ti 194. 
gāthadvayam аһа. 


Та. anumajjhato majJhjakan tl appakam рі majjhe chetvš {аза kot- 
thāse karitvā ekabotthāsain datvā tato svasesato апишајјћаќо рі puna majjhe 
chetvā eko kotthšso dštabbo yeva, адёпаф па ~ - іі appar và bahu vā din- 
пад botu! 2, adšnarh паша na hoti, tam рі дёпейў eva mahapphalam еза 'ti. 


1 Bd -nënari-. 2 Bd -ami. ° В4 -шіу. * Bd niccharayasiti. * Bd pūe, * 
Bd -з1ћаб. 7 Bd imar. ° Bda mayšpacitarn. # so Cka; Bd va ше laddhai 
ki, 20 Ва айбаш. 3! Bd adds таста. !2 Che ya. 2° so Bd for duvinnan? 
Cks vidunnain. !* Bd adds tah. !* Cks omit tassa. !6 Bd а. 1! Ck -ya, 
Cs -ya. 18 Bdz.yha, '9 Cks -ві, Bd nekālapī. 2° Віз hoti. 

28* 


16 


20 


95 


388 XXI Asiúnlpáta. 


So tassa уасапаш sutvë „manāpan te bráhmana Каћа, 
pāyāse pakke thokarñ labhissasi, nisīdā“ ‘і а. Sakko eka- 
mante nisidi. Tasmih nisinne Cando ten’ eva nayena' празаш- 
kamitvá tath’ eva kathah pavattetvā tassa уйгепіавва vāren- 
tass’ eva 

< Mogbañ с” assa hutarm hoti mogba câpi samihitam 
atithismin yo nisinnasmirh'eko bhuñjati bhojanam. 195. 

s. Тат tam vadāmi Ковіуа: debi dānāni bbuñja ca’, 
ariyamaggam samārūba‘*, 

п’ ekási' labhate sukban ti р. á. 196. 


Tattha samihitan Ц dhanuppädanaviriyam. 


So tassa vacanarh sutvā* kicchena kasirena „tena bi ni- 
sida, (һойаш labhissasîti“ а. So gantvā Sakkassa santike 
півїйі. Tato Suriyo teo’ eva nayena правашКашїбуй tath’ eva 
katham pavattetvá' tassa’ vārentassa vārentass’ eva 

e. бассаг tassa hutarn hoti saccañ cápi samihitarh 
atithismim уо pisinnasmimn 

п? еко bhnñjati bhojanam. 197. 

v. Таш {ап vadāmi etc. gáthadvayam' аһа. 198, 

Tassa pi vacanarh sutvá kicchena kasirena „tena bi ni- 
sīda, thokarn ІаЫһізвавісі" š, So gantvā Candassa savtike 
nisidi. Atha nam Matali ten' eva nayen' ораѕзафкатііуа tath’ 
eva katham pavattetvā (авва vārentassa várentass' eva 

s. Ѕагавай са yo juhati'" bahukáya Gayāya са 

Done Timbarutitthasmirh sighasote mahávahe 199. 

э-1о. Atra с' assa hutar hoti atra с’ assa samihitamn 

atithismim yo- ~ sukhan ti іта расћа abhasi. 200- 201 

Таваф attho: уо purlso nàagsyakkbšdinarn Бай Ї! karomitI samuddaloni- 
pokkharaniádisu 12 yarn kiüc| saran upagantvå jubati'®? tattha balikımmam 


1 18 піуёшепа. 3 Cks -amhi ? Bd tha. * Rd: „туһа. 5 Сіз -ві, Вг -pi. * 
Bds add tstheva kathan pavattetvā. 7 Chr kethetvā. ° Cè omit tassa, ?* Bd 
gātham. !° Rda add poso. !! Bd pbalikammar. '!? Bd -пё во. `š Bd -titi. 


3. Sudhabhojanajataka. (535.) 389 


` karoti афа babukaya nadiyā Gayšya! pokkheraniyā Оопапйшайе cs Tim- 
barūnāmake са tittbe, sighasote mahante värivahe?, atra санаа '(1 yadi atrápi 
otosu’ sarādīsu авва purisassa hntaü с eva #amlhitañ ca hoti saphalarh sukhu- 
draya“ eampajjati, atitbismim yo nisinnasmim neko bhuŭjatl bhojanan ettba 
vattabbam ета п’ atthl, tena tah vadámi Kosiya дёпёоі ca dehi аауаб са 
bhuñja arlyäpah dānābhiratānah Buddhaádinarn magga abhirūha na hi 
еКйвїї!* еко va bbuñjamāno sukhan nma” labhatiti®. 

So tassápi' vacanarh sutvá pabbatakütena otthațo” viya 
kicchena “ „tena hi пїзїда, thokarh labhissasiti“ 8.  Matali 
gantvā Suriyassa santike nisîdi. Tato Pañcasikho ten’ eva 
пауепа upasarhkamitvá tath’ eva Каћа pavattetvā tassa 
vārentassa уйгепїавв' eva 
иза. Balisa hi so niggilati'* díghasuttarn sabandhanam 

atithismirn yo nisinnasmim eko™ - - sukhan ti 202-3. 
gāthadvayam йһа. 

Maccharikosiyo tah sutvā dukkhayogena nitthunanto 
„tena hi nisida, thokam labhissasiti“ а. Pañcasikho gantvā 
Matalissa santike nisīdi. Iti tesu pañcasu Ыгаһтапевп ni- 
sinnamattesv-eva™* pāyāso рассі'*. Atha nah Ковіуо ud- 
dhan otāretvā ,tumhákam pattāni āharathā“ 't â Те 
yathāuisinoã'* va hatthe' pasāretvā Himavantato māluva- 
pattāni ёһагітзо. Kosiyo tāui disvā „tumhākarh etesu pattesu 
dātabbapāyāso n’ atthì, khadirādīoarnh pattāni āharathā“ ’ti. 
Те {арі āharihsu, ekekapattarn yodhaphalakappamānarh '* ahosi. 
So sabbesam dabbiyā pāyāsam adāsi, sabbantimassa dānakāle 
рі ukkhaliyā ūnam™ па paññayi” Райсаппаш рі datvā 
sayan ukkhalih gahetvā nisīdi. “Tasmim khane Pañcasikho 
uttháya attabhávarh jahitvā sunakho hatvā (ева purato pas- 
‚ sävarh karonto āgamāsi*", Ъгаһшапа attano рйуйваїї pattena 
pidahimsu, Kosiyassa hatthapitthe passāvabindu’ pati, bráh- 


1 Bd дауа. 2 Ске najivahe, Ве vârasahe. * Bd ekesu. * Bd sukhindriyarh. 
$ Ва -rühanti. 6 Bd ekāpīti, Cks ekšsi. ? Bds add na. ° Ck» -siti ' Ваг 
tasaa, 10 Ca ottharo, Bå ottako, !! Bds add kasireua. !3 Ck» yo, Bae nigi-. 
13 Ске neko, !* Cka -tteyeva. 15 Bd paci. '* Chs tathā-. '? Ваз -ah. !% Bd 
yēvapba-. '? Вёз talan. "° Bd райдаріу!, Che pañDāsi-, 3! Ck eg, 2? 
Ске -um. 


390 ХХІ. Asitinipšta. 


тапа kundikáhi одакаф gahetvá páyásarm abbhukkiritvá Ъһап- 
jamānā viya аһевші. Ковіуо ,mayham рі ndakam detha, 
hattharmn dhovitvā bhuñjissámiti“ š.  ,Tava udakam йһа- 
гісуй hattharn dhovš“ “ti. ,,Mayš tumhškam рйуйво dinno, 
mayham (ћокаф пйаКаш dethá%“ `ti. ,,Mayam pindapatipinda- 
kammar оёша pa Кагошй“ ‘ti. „Tena hi imah ukkhalimn 
oloketha, hattharn!dhovitvá ágamissšmiti“ nadim otari. Tasmim 
khane supakho nkkhalirn раввёуепа * püresi, so tam passávam 
Кагопіаф disvá mahantarn йапфат адёуа tajjento āgacchi, зо 
assăjāniyamatto hutvā tarn anubandhanto' пёпйауаппо abosi, 
kālo pi hoti seto pi suvannavanno pi kabaro pi ucco pi nīco 
pi, evan nánávanno butvë Maccharikosiyah anubandhi, во 
maranabhayabhito brahmane upasaikami, te pi uppatitvā äkāse 
thita. So бева tam iddhim disvā: 
19. Лагаувора vata brāhmaņā ime, 
ауаш ca vo sunakho kissa hetu 
оссёуасат vannanibharm vikubbati, 
akkhátha no brāhmanņnā: ko пи tumhe ti. 204. 
Таш sutvā Sakko devarājā: 
14. Cando са Suriyo са ubho idhágata, 
ayam рапа Mātali devasārathi, 
Sakko "Һат asmi tidasānam indo, 
ево ca kho’ Pañcasikho ti vuccatîti g. vatvá 205. 
tassa yasarn vannento: 
1s. Рёпіввага mutiūgā са mnrajálambarani са 
suttam etarh pabodhenti, patibuddho са* nandatiti р. а. 206. 
So tassa vacanarm sutvā’ ,evarüpam dibbasampattih kinti 
katvëá labhantiti“ pucchi°. ,Adāoasīlā tava pāpadhammā mac- 
charino devalokah па gacchanti, niraye nibbattantiti“ das- 
sento: 


1 Bd vassa. ? Ck ambandhato, 5 Ске во. * Ско va. > Bda add sakka. * 
Ва adde saklo 


3 $айһаЬһо}апа]н!анв‚ (535.) 891 


16. Ye kec’ ime maccharino kadariyá 

рагібћавакё samaņabráhmapānath 

idh’ eva' nikkhippa вагїгадеһаш 

kāyassa bhedā nirayam vajantiti 207. 
imam gāthah vatvā dhamme thitānah devalokapatilabham 5 
dasseturn: 
ат. Ye kic’ ime suggatim аѕавӣоӣ? 

dhamme thitá sarnyame samvibhāge! 

idh' eva uikkhippa sariradeham 

kāyassa bhedá sugatim vajantiti р. аё. 208. 10 

Та. šsasšna?)' ti šsimsantá, ув кесі sugatirn äsimsanti eabbe te заш- 
yamasarhkhâte dasssiledhamme ssibvibhagaserikhate dinadhamme са (Ш 
hutva idha #arirasarhkhátarn dehari nikkhipitvá tassa Кёуавва bhedâ sugatirh 
vajantit[ a. 

Evam vatvá ca „Kosiya, по mayam tava santike рйуй- 15 
satthāya йра!й, Кагиййепа pana (ай anukampamana йраї' 
апһа“ ‘ti tassa pakāseturh : s 

is. Туай no si* пайї purimāsu jātisu 

во macchari говаКо* рёрадћашпо, 

tav’ eva atthāya idhágat' amhā 10 

mā pāpadhammo nirayam apattbā `ti аһа, 209. 

Ta. во ti во tvah mü pàpadhammo ti aysh ambšksin 0211 påpadhammo 
må nirsyarh agamă ti etadatthsmi ägåt’ amhā `ti a. 

Tam sutvå Kosiyo ,„atthakāmā kira me ete, таш пїгауй 
uddharitvā sagge patitthāpetukāmā“ ti tutthacitto: эв 
19. Addha [hi] таш vo‘ hitakāmā уаш mah samanusāsatha ?, 
so `һагп (аһа karissāmi sabbarh vuttar ® hitesihi. 208. 

зо. Евёһат' ajj' eva upáramami '°, 
па сёр’ abar ‘' kiñci kareyya'? papam 


1 Сы add te. * Ck аввёпа, Bds asiyamana. * СЕ sssānā, Сг āssānā, Bd aslsa- 
mânå, Ве äsihnsamānā. * Ck omit ві. ° Bd ковіуо. * Ok ке. ? Bde# samanu- 
bhässths, * Ck utto, Се vatto. ° Bd ево-. !0 Ва эра. 1! Bds сара-. !? 
Bde -ууаш. 


392 ХХІ. Азїйпїр&їд. 


па сёрі me Кїйсї-ш-айеууаш atthi 

па сёрі datvá udakam p’ аһа рїуе!. 211. 
n. Evañ са me dadato вађьакёіаш' 

bhogá ime Vásava khīyissanti*, 

tato aharh pabbajissāmi Sakka 

hitvána Катапї yathodhikānîti аһа. 212. 


Та. шап ti mama, vo * ti tumhe. уаш man ti уела mam samanusäsaths 
tena me tumhe blitakāmā, tatbā Ч? yathà vadatba tath’ eva karissimi, u pāra- 
mámiti’ maceharibhávato upāramāmi*, adeyyamatthiti Ho patthiya шаша 
Blopato upaddbam pi adeyyarn паша n’ atthi, па сёр! datvā ti udakapasatam 
pi cáharn labhitva adatva na pivissãunl, khiylasantiti vikhiylsnanti', y athos 
dbikaniti vatthukâmakilosskāmavasona yatbatbitakotthšsšnl yeva. 


Sakko Maccharikosiyarn dametvá nibbisevanarh katvā 
dānaphalarh jānāpetvā dhammadesanāya pañcasu sīlesu pa- 
tittbāpetvā saddhim tehi devanagaram eva gato. Macchari- 
kosiko рі nagara pavisitvā rājāņnah anujānāpetvā gahita- 
gabitabhājānāni pūretvā ganhantü ti yácakánam dhana datvā 
tasmim Кһапе nikkhamma Himavato' dakkhiņapasse Сапрйуа 
с” ета" ekassa jātassarassa (add ca?) antare раппавй!атп katvā 
pabbajitvá vanamūlaphalāhāro tattha cirarh vihāsi jararo püpuni. 
Tadā Sakkassa À së Saddhë Siri Hirîti catasso dhiítaro honti, tā 
bahudibbagandhamālar "° ädăya udakakilanattháya Anotatta- 
dahar gantvā tattha kīlitvā Manosilátale nisldimsu. Tasmirn 
khana Магайо рата Ъгаһшапаїйраво Tavatirnsabhavanar8h 
divävihäratthāya gantvë Nandavana-Cittakūtalatāvanesu " divā- 
уїһагай Ката ` pāricchattakapupphah chattam viya сһа- 
yatthāya dhārayamāno Manosilátalamatthake'" attano vasa- 
natthanam'' Kañcanagnharh gacchati. Atha tā tassa hatthe 
tam puppharh disvá уйсїшви. 


1 Ваг piv3mi in the place of paharup'ye, С* paharnpipe. > Bd -le 2 so all 
tbree MSS. for -уіваои. < Oks te, 5 Cks -kāmattbā ti. ° Bdr upa-. 7 С 
omit vi. * Bde -vantato. * СЕ? -yameva. !° Bds bahurh-. !! Bas omit küta. 
13 Bd „репа. !% Ске omit (bānam. 


3. Sudhābhojanajātska. (535.) 893 


Таш atthah pekësento Satthë ha: 
за. Naguttame рігітаге! Gandhamadane 
modanti të devavarābhipālitā °, 
` athàgamë isivaro sabbalokagū* 
supupphitam dumavarasákham adiya 213. 
з. Suecim sugandharh tidasehi sakkatarn 
pupphuttamam amaravarehi sevitam 
mladdha maccehi* vā йёпате vā 
aññatra devehi {айвгаһаш h’ idam. 214. 
sa Tato catassa kanakattacūpamā 
uțthāya папуо* pamadadhipa ° типій 
А.а са Saddhā св tato Siri Hiri 
їсє-аһгатша' Nāradadevabrāhmaņnan’: 215. 
эь Sece anudditthem ќауё mahāmuni 
puppham imam pāricchattassa brehme 
dadahi по, sabbagatī te ijjbantu°, 
tvam pi no hohi'° yath' eva Vāsavo. 216. 
зе. Tam yācamānâbhisamekkha '!! Nārado 
ice-abravi samkalaham udirayi: 
па mayham atth'atthi imehi koci nam. 
yā yeva vo seyyasi sā pilayhathā™ ‘ti. 217. 


Ta. girivare tl purimassa vevecanami, devavarábbijpaálltša)!? ti Sakkena 
Takkbilâ, sabbalokagū ti devaloke ca manussaloke са sabbattha gamane- 
samattho, dumavarasäkbamädlyā tl sâkhâya jätattā dnmavarassa Sakhan ti 
Jaddhanämapoppharh '* gahetvă, sakkatan tt katasakkirah, ашагатагоћій 
Sakka sandbaáya vuttah, añ atra devehiti #hapetva dere са iddhimante ca 
aüñehl manussebi vä yakkhädīhi vā sladdham, їайагаһаш bidan tj tesaro 
yeva bidan!’ arahan anucchavikam, kenakattacūpamā tí kanakūpamattacā, 
utthbāyā 'Ч syyo mālägandhavilepanādipațivirato'* puppbarn na pilandhissati 
ekasmih padese cbaddessati, etah yäcitvă puppham pilandbissimâ 'ti hatthe 1? 
pseāretvā yācapânā ekappahāren’ eva о{{һаһісуё, pamadādhbipā'® tu pama- 
danam паша, munin ti lalih, anudditthan ti asukassa паша dassámiti an- 
udditthah’”, sabbagati te ijjhantū ’ti sabbā ta cittagati ijjhatu patthita- 


1 Ck birivâre, ' Сёз varābi-. 5 Bd omits взЬһа-. * Bde# таппеМ. ° B4 nā-. 
* Ва pamudâdbipā, В» pamadišyipš, Cks раю. 7 Ck -vam, В-ти. ° Bde 
-darnde-. ° Cka Ijjha. 10 Ck Ваз hoti, C? hosi. 1! Сә -nābissm-. 2 Ва 
Plladdheyatbš, Ве уй pilandbetha. 15 Ск -rābi-. 1¢ Bd -nâmmh-. !° Ok Маф. 
38 Ck -panāchavivirato. 17 viyakkbā - - - batthe wanting іп Cs. !*# Bds pamu-,. 
1 Bd i. 


10 


16 


30 


10 


15 


20 


35 


80 


394 ХХІ. AsttinipEta, 


patthitasse lšbhi hohid! assa? mañgalah vadenti, yatheva váaavo ti yathā 
amhākam pitë Všsavo icthiticchitah deti tath’ eva по tvam pl hobîti, tan ti 
taù puppham, abblsamekkhā 'Ч disvš, samkalahan ti nānâgāhah kalaha- 
vaddhanarn kathab udīresi, Imebtti imehi pupphehi паша mayharo attho n' 
АЙМ, pativirato араб máladharanato ti dīpeti, уй yeva vo seyyasit! yë tamhškarn 
antare је ЫЕ, sā pilaybathã?” 'ti sâ etarh pllandhatü 'ti a 


Та catasso pi tassa vacanarn sutvā gātham āhbarhsu*: 
s. Tvari по ‘ато vàbhisamekkha' Nārada 
yass’ icchasi tassam anuppavecchasu, 
уавв& hi no Nārada (твп padassasi 
sā yeva no hohiti setthasaminatá ti‘. 218. 


Та. tvah nottamo? ti uttamanishàmuni tyam eva no upadhêrehiti. 


Тавыйп vacaparù sutvā Nārado 14 ālapanto : 
зз. Akallam etam vacanath sugatte, 
ko bršhmaqo ko’ kalaharn udiraye, 
gantvāna bhūtādhipam eva pucchatha 
васе pa jānātha idh' uttamádhaman ti g. а. 219. 


T. а: bhadde? вивайе, idari tumhehi vuttah vacanarn mama ayuttam, 
етай bi sati mayá tumhesu ekami settharn sesā һ1їпё!® Шагоп(епа!! kalabo vad- 
dhito bhavisseti, Шо са bihitapapo brābmano kalaban ийїгөууа!% vaddbeyye, 
evarüpaesa hí kalabavaddhanarh nâma aynttarn, tasmë ito gantvå attano pitararh 
bhütádhiparhn Saskkam eva pucchatha saco а((апо uttama vå айһашазш vā па 
јёпања ti. 


Tato Satthā: 
so. Та Матадепв рвгаоврракоріќа 
udiritë vannamadena mattā"?’ 
заКйзе!* gantvëna Sahassacakkhuno 
puechimsu bbütšdhiparn: kā пи seyyasiti g. а. 220. 


Та. parainappakopitā ti pupphari adentena ativiya kopita tassa kupitá 
hutvš, udirita ti bbūtādhipam eva pucchatha 'ti vuttā, sahassa-- (1 Ѕаккавва 
santikarh gantvë, ЫЁ nū чі ambāhamh antare ketarä uttamá ti pucchirmsu. 


1 Çkəilabbī hohi. ? Bd» tassa thuti 2 Bd piladdhoyyatā, Вг pilaudeyyathā. < 


Cke omit g. š. 5 Ваг -mevā-. * Сіз add g. а. 7 Bd» -mevā. 5 Bde omit ko. 
» В вайде. '° Ck binā, Cs bhiua, B Ыпап, Вг bhītā. !! pd katbentena © 
Bd uddiseyya, Ве udisseyya. !%# Hd pattā. !* Bds -sam. 


3. Sudhābbojanajātake. (595.) 395 


Evañ pucchitvá thitã: 
eo. Tā disva|' āyattamanā Purindado 
icc-abravi devavaro katañjali : 
sabbā va vo’ hotha sugatte' sādisi, 
ko n' еуа* bbadde kalaha udrirayiti, 221. 

Ta. tādiavā ti bbikkhave catasso pi attano santikarh āgatā disvā, ày at- 
tamana ti ussukkamanš i vyüvatacittš, katañJallui namassamánābi devatāhi 
paggahltaĝjall, sa disiti sabbâ va tumhe sādisiyo, Копехё? ' ko пп eva 
kalaham udirayitl imam папёрйһаїп viggabarb kathesl vaddhesl., 

Ath’ assa tā kathayamaná: 

и. Yo sabbalokarn carako° mahāmuni 
dbamme thito Nārado вассапіккато" 
во no bravi girivare Gandhamådane : 
gaptvana bhūtādhipam eva pucchatha 
васе па jānâtha idb’ uttamâdhaman tig. šharnsu. 222. 


Tatha 6accanikkamo!° ti tatbaparakkamo 


Tam sutvā Sakko „їїшй catasso pi пауһаї dhitaro, sac’ 
ñham etësu ekă дипаватраооё uttamä ti vakkhämi вевй kujjhis- 
santi, ua sakkā ayam atto уїпїссһїпїпш, ішё Himavante 
Kosiyatāpasassa santika pesessāmi, so еійваф atta vinicchi- 
nissatîiti“ cintetvā ,,аһат {итһаКап attam mna vinicchinëmi, 
Himavante Kosiyatâpaso náma atthi, tassáham attano sudhá- 
bhojanam ревеввёті, во рагавва adatvë па bhuñjati dadanto'!' 
са vicinitvá дипатапійпаф deti, yá tumbesu tatth'assa hatthato 
bhattarn labhissati ва uttama bbavissatiti'* ācikkhanto : 

эз. Аво Ътаһагаббасаго mahāmuni 
nádatvë''bhattar varagatte bhuñjati, 
viceyya dānāni dadati Kosiyo, 
увввё hi so dassati să va seyyasîti™ g. а. 223. 


1 до all three MSS. for dieva. ? Ске va co, Bd са vo. Š Oks -ena. * Вёз nadha, 
3 СЕ ussukkamanë, Се ussukkamānā, * Ck са. 7 Bas nedhà. ° Bds -lokacsrato, 
* Ck ¿tikka-. !9 Ске -tikka-. 11 Ске bhuñjanto. 19 so all three MSS. for 
=tva. 19 Che sā nu-. 


10 


15 


90 


95 


30 


396 XXI. Asitlnipata. 


Ta. braharaññacaro ti mabāarnññavāsi. 


Iti во tāpasassa santikarh pesetvá Måtalih pakkosāpetvā 
tassa saptikarh pesento anantaram g. ã.: 
es. Asū hi уо! sammati dakkhinam disah 
Gañgāya tire Himavantapasmani’ 
sa' Kosiyo dullabhapānabhojano, 
tassa sudham* рёрауа devasšrathiti. 224. 
Та. sammati ti тавак, деккЬіпап ti Himavantassa dakkbinaya діввуа, 
pasmanitl’ passe. 
Tato Satthā аһа: 
se. Sa Mâtali devavarena pesito 
sahassayuttam abhirūyha sandana 
sa khippam eva upagamma assamam 
adissamāno mupino sudha ад&* ti. 225. 


Та. adissamäno ti bhikkhave so Маса! deverājassa vacanath sampațic- 
chitvā təh assamarh gantvš adissamānakâyo butvā tassa sudba айа, dadamāno 
ca rattirn райһапаш anuyuñjitvā paccüsasamaye sggiih paricaritvā vibbātāya rattiya 
ndentar suriyarh naimassamanassa thitassa tassa hattha sudbšbhojanam patitthapesl. 

Kosiko tariù gahetvā thitako va gāthadvayam å.: 

ав. Udaggihuttam upatitthato ғ hi me 
рабһатКагат lokatamonud’ uttamam 
sabbāni bhūtāni aticca° Vásavo, 
ko n’ eva те pāņisu kirnsudh' odahi. 226. 
ав. Samkhūpamarh setam atulyadassanam 
suci sugandharh piyarūparn abbhutarn 
adittbapubbam mama jëátacakkhuhi 
kā devatā рапіви kirhsudh' одаи, 227. 

Та. udaggihuttan ti udaaggihuttarn parlcaritvā udasaggisâlato nike 
khamma pannasaladvare tbatvà pabharhkararh lokatamonudarm uttsmam &@ссаш 
upatitthato mama 'sabbšni bhbütšni ейсса? atikkamitvá тайашапо Үйзауо nu 


kho evarn [mama рёліви kimsudharn !2 kih nām’ etarb odahi, зат khüpaman 
ti ādihi t(hitako sudham vanneti. 


1 Bds во. ?Bd -tupasmini, Bz -tapasmint. ? Bd зо. “Bd sukham, C% sudat, 
$ Bds pasml-. * Cks райда. ? Сло -tthito, Bd upathato, © во Cks; Bds айМсса. 
» Bde adhicea. 19 Cks sudhāvā. 


1. Sudhšbhojansjštaks. (535). 397 


Tato Mātali āha: 

er. Аһаф Mahindena mahesi pesito 
sudh’ ābhihāsim' turito mahëmuni, 
jš&ušsi mam Маќаіі? devasārathi*, 
bhuñjassu bhattuttamarn, mă vicárayi?' 228. 

s. Bhuttā са за dvádasa hanti pápaka: 
khudarn pipásam ага(іф duraklamarn * 
kodhüpanáhañ ca vivadapesunarh 
gltunhatandiñ ca rasuttamamh idan ti. 229, 


Та. sudhabhihbasin? ti idam sudbšbhoJjanarn tuyhar abbihariro, jà nš- 
sîti Janasi шаф tvarh, ahah Matali nāma devasārathîtl а, mü vicšárayitl* 
Da bhunJimi ЧаррайккМірієға bhuñja, mā рарайсаі kera’, рёрёке Ч syam 
endhë bhutta dvēdasa рарайһашше banti”, khudan (1 pathamam (ата chita- 
bhšvar hanti° dutlya pāniyspipäsahn tatiyarn ukkanthitarn сабо һаг kaya- 
Qaratharh pañcamarh klamarb” kllantabhavarm chatthsrh kodbarh nattamarh upa- 
näha а|{һашаш v[lvšdarb рееңпап›!9 давашаш sitan ekādasamamh unharn dvā- 
dasamaro tandirh âlesiyabhâvsrno, idab rasuttamarn uttamarsearo sudbábhojanarh 
ime dvädasa pâpadbhamme hanti. 


Таш sutvå Kosiyo attano vatasamādānam avikarouto: 
s. Na kappati' Matali mayha bhuüjitum 
pubbe adatvā iti me vatuttamarn, 
па сёрі еКавапап ariyapüjitam, 
asamvibhágI ca sukharh na viudatiti g. vatvā 230. 
»bhante tumhehi parassa adatvá bhojane Каш Човаш disvă 
idah vata samādinnan“ ti Mátaliná puttho йһа: 
«w. Thīghātakā уе c' ime" pāradārikā `° 
mittadduno ye са sapanti™* subbate 
sabbe са!* te maccharipañcamádhará '*, 
tasmā adatvā udakam pi пйёвпїуе''. 231. 


» Che -bbasirn. 3 so all three MSS for -im? ® Bd màábbivarayl. * Bd dara- 
thakkhamarn, Вә дагааккашаб, 5 ("kr _bhësin. * Ck picš-, Bd babbivišrayiti. 
т Bde -гі, 6 Ва banati. ° Bdz omit klamarn. '° Ck -narb, '1 ali three MSS. 
-ti 12 Cha came. '3) all three MSS. ра-. ' Ck savanti, '5 Bd va. 1% 
В4 -magama. '! Bdz nasmi. 


15 


15 


35 


30 


398 ХХІ. Asitlnlpato. 


а. Зо! `һ' itthiyā vā purisassa vå рапа 
dassami dánar vidnsam pavannitam, 
sabbá vadaññü idha vīitamaccharā 
bhavanti h’ ete sucisaccasammatā ti. 232. 


Та. pubbe tl pathamarñ sdatvš2, atbavā itt me pubbe vatuttamarn, ідеф 
pubbe va maya уаќаф,2 samâdinnau ti dasaetl, па сёр! ekšsanan ti ekakassa 
ñssnanm па ariyehi [Buddhādībi püjltan, sukban ti dibbamšnusakasukhain Па 
labhati, thīgħātakā ti Ittbighátaka*, ye clme3 ti ye са ime, aapantiti® 
akkosanti, sunbate ti dhammikasamanabrāähmane, maccharipañcamā tl 
maccharipañcsmo etesan ti шассћагірайсатё, айћащё Н ime рабса adhama 
пата, баі &(1 yasmā’ ahah pañcamaadhemmabhāvabhayene’ adatvā udakam 
p! nāsmlye' na paribhuñjiasamit] imam vatah samädiyih’, во10 hittbiyá và 
ti s0’? abaro Itthiya vå, vidusampavannitsn ti vidūbi panditeh! Buddhadihí 
vaņņitan, sucisaccasammata 1 ete окаррапіуаввддЬгуа samannâgetä 
vadañūū vigelamaccherā purisš suci с’ eval’ uttamassmmatë са bontiti a. 


Тап sutvā Mātali dissamanakayena atthási. Тавтїї Кһапе 


(а catasso devakaññā catuddisam attharhsu; Siri расїпайїайуа 
atthási, Ава dakkhinadisáya atthási, Saddhë pacchimadisāya, 
Hiri ottaradisãya. ç 


Tam nttham ракёѕерќо Satthā aha: 
4з. Ato murt&' ° детаувгепа pesita 
Каййа catasso kanakattacupama: 
Аза св Saddhâ са Sir Hiri tato 
tam assamam йёрапип yattha Kosiyo. 233. 
«в. T disvü' sabbo paramappamodito 
subbena +аппепв sikhë-r-iv' aggino 


Каййа catasso свбиго'* catuddisā 
ice-abravi Мёќашо са sammukhā: 234. 
4. Ригітагт disah Ка tvam pabhāsi devate 
ајашЕа(а їйгатвга va osadhi, 
pucchāmi tam kañcanarvelliviggahe'°, 


ācikkha тє (уаш Каќатёѕі детаіё. 235, 


1 Cka yo. `! Сів sutvà. > Bd tava in Ше place of чабат, Cha саш, * Cks -ka, 
5 Сіз came. * СЕ suvan-, Cs ватац-. 7 Сќе tama, ê Cha -main sdhammi-, 
Bi pañcamaadhama-. * Bdz -dayi. !9 Cha уо, '! Bd sucl-, Che sucimeva. 
13 Ваз ma-. !3 so all three MSS. '*4 Bd caturo. 15 во Cha; Bd -vella-. 


3. Sudbābbojanajātaka (535 ) 399 


«s. біг" aham' dev) manujesu’ pūjită 

apapasattüpanisevini sadā 

sudhavivadenag {а+` antim āgatā, 

{аш mam sudhāya +агвраййв bhājaya. 286. 
+в. Yass&ham icchami sukbam mahāmuni 

за? sabbakāmehi naro pamodati, 

Siriti шаш jānahi* jūbat’ uttama, 

tam mam sudhāya varapañña bhājayā ‘ti. 237. 


Ta. ato ti tato, muta? ti anumatā, аа devavarena anumată є eva 
posltā сё l a, nabbo-- to ti anavasseso* hutvāļatipamudito, sāman tl pi рё(ћо, 
tā devatš samarn disva ti a., caturo” t| caturà”, ayam eva vā pátho cštoriyena 
samanpágstš ti a, (ёгауагё U tărānaú varā, Кай cana - - Баће tÍ kañcanarü- 
pakasadisasarire, Slršhan ti Siri shar, tavantimāgatā ti tava santíkarh 
šgatá, bbaJaya '1 yatbå тай sudhā bbajati " tetbā karobi, водһай me дһ 
a, Jáënšhiti Јёла?, Jūhatuttemā tÍ aggin Jühantánam обата. 

Tam sutvë Ковіуо šha: 

ат. Sippena vijjacaranena buddhiyā 
пага apetā paguná sakammaná'° 
{ауа vihiná ра labhanti kiñcanam, 
tay-idam па sšdhu yadidai tayā katam. 238. 
а. Раввёті posam alasan mahagghasam 
sudukkulinam рі arüpimam пага, 
tayánugutto Siri jatimam арі 
peseti'! дават viya bhogavá вий. 239. 
«a. Тап {аш азассаф avibhajjasevinirn 
jänāmi mūlharù уідогаоорёбіпіћ ", 
па tëdisi arahati ёѕаойдакаф 
kuto водћа ', gaceha па шауһа госсавій. 240. 

Та. віррепа 'ti hattbiassarathatbarusippidiná!'3 vijjšcaranena 'ti vodattaya- 

sarhkhštšya vijjāya c'eva silenaca paguna, вайашшапй!* ti attano purisšakárens 


padhšánagunasamannëšgata, kiücanan ti kinci appamattakam рі yazarı vā sukha 
vā na lebhsnti, yadidan ti уаш еба jasariyatthâya sippšdIni uggahetvā'* 


1 во all tbree MSS. >? Ва» -ebhi. 3 Bds во. * Ваг јапё-. ° Bds ша-. * Оі» 
аё. T Ва сё-. ° Ск bho-, C? bhā-. ° Bàs Jänāto. ° Bd -unā, '' Bd -si. 
19 Oks -nipá-, Bd vidōrāä-. '? Rds dbanu іп tbe place of theru. 14 Вёз -unë. 
13 Bd ugganbi-. 


20 


10 


400 XXI Asiunlpšta. 


сагап&&патп tayš vekallarh katar (ат! te na sšdhu,arü piman ti virüpam, ёауапо- 
gatto ti taya annrakkhito, Jštimamapiti jätisampannam рі sippavUjácarana- 
buddbikammeb! sampannam pl, резесї И pasanakirarh 9 karoti, {ай tan d 
tasmā tah, asaccan ti sabhivasarhkháte вассе avattanatšáya < азассай uttama- 
bhävarabitah, avibhajJasevinin t! avibbajitvā yuttayuttam aJánitva аіррайі- 
аашраппе pi кеге pl зеташёйаш, vidurānupātinin ti panditánupátinirb 
pandito? раїеїта® potħatvā? vihelhetváë caramšnar, kuto sudha ti tādisāya 
niggunâya kuto sudhābhojanah, na me ruccasi gaccha mā idha tithš ‘ti. 


Sä tath' еу" antaradhāyi. Tato so Авйуа saddbińh salla- 
panto ā,: 

во. Ká sukkadâțhā patimuttakundalá 
cittangadá ° kambuvimatthadhárist, 
osittavannam paridayha sobhasi’ 
kusaggirattarp apilayha maūjarih. 241. 

ө. Migiva bhantá'° saracāpadhārinā “' 
virādhitā mandam iva udikkbasi, 
ko te dutiyo idha mandalocane, 
na bbāyasi ekikā Карапе vane ti. 242. 


Та. cittañgadât ti cltrebl añgadehi samanr краха, kambu--nîti karaga- 
рагіоі&пела!5 vimatfhasuvannalarnkáradhárini, osittavaņņan ti avasitts- 
udakadharavannarp dibbadukülam, рагідаућа `'ti оітазеіта ca pàrupitva са, 
kusagglrattan tlkusatinaggisikhavannarn, apilayba mañjarin tl sapallavun 
asokakaqpiksrn kapne pllandhitvá tì тобаш hoti, saracāpadhârinā’* ti luddhens, 
viradhltá ti viraddbapabārā, mandsamivā ’tl yatbš sā migi bbītā !# vanantel* 
thatvš tab mandai oloket! evar olokesl. 


Tato sã: 

м. Na me datiyo idha-m-atthi Kosiya, 
Masakkasárappabhav' ambi devatā, 
Ава sudhásáya tav’ antim ágatš, 
tab mam sudháya varapañña bhājayā ' g. š. 243. 


Ta. Masakkasšrappabhavamhbíti!? Tavatinssbhavane вашЬһа+й. 


1 Све -omit tarh. ? Bd omita sippa - -- pl. 2 Ck -na-, Bd -rakern. * Che avat- 
шуа. 5 Вг -ebi. * Ck pape-- 1 Bd omita ро-. * Ске ја, * Bd tu. 10 
Cs hantă, Bd вапда '1 Bd -no. 139 Сї „Ја, 19 Ва -nitbitena. !* Сіз -по, 
15 Cke hitā, Bd bbi-. '* Bd „(аге Ч Oke „тай. 


З. Sudbšbhojanajitaka, (535. 401 


Тап sutvā Коѕіуо „tvar kira уо ќе гиссай tassa ãså- 
phalanipphádanena двай ' desi, уо te па ruccati tassa па desi’, 
п’ atthi tayā samapatti tattha vioāsakārîti™: dīpento А, 

se. Asšya yanti уёпіја dhanesino, 
návam samāruyha parenti annave, 
te tattha sidanti ао pi ekadā 
jīnādhanā enti vinatthapáhhatá. 244. 
sı Авйуа khettāni kasanti Кавввка, 
vapanti bījāni, karonti 'páyaso, 
ftinipátena avutthikáya vā 
па kiñei vindanti tato phalágamarh, 245. 
ss. Аһ’ attakáráni karonti hhattusu 
ёва purakkhatvë пага sukhesino, 
te bhattur atthë atigšlhita puna 
діва panassanti aladdha kiñcanarh. 246. 
se. Jahitva° dhaññañ са dhanañ са баќаке 
āsāya saggādhimanā sukhesino 
tapanti 1йКһат рі tapar cirantaram, 
kummaggam āruyha parenti duggatim. 247. 


м. Asñvisarhvadikasammata ime, 


Азе зийһйуа* vipayassu attani, 
па tádisi arahati йвапйдайаш 
kuto водћё, gaccha па mayha ruccasiti. 248. 


Ta. parentiti pakkhandanti, јіпёдћала ti jinadbanā, iti tava vasena 
eke eampajjanti eke vipaljanti ш’ atthi tayā sadieà pāpadhamnā ti vadati, 
keronti рёуаво ti tam tari kiccarh upáyena кагопсі, ïtinipātenā ` vlsavā- 
tamūsikasalabhasukapāņakasetalthikarogādīinarh ssssupaddavënarh aññataranipātena 
vā, tato ti tato sassato le! Шбс! рһа)агп па vindanti®, tesam рі šsacchedaka- 
hamman tvam eva karosîti vadati, sthattakārāníti yuddhabhümisq purisškare, 
Ааай purakkbatvë ti lssariyšsarp?* purato katrā, bbstturattha ti sšmino 
atthāya, atigàlbită tl paccattbikehi atlipilitë vilnttasápateyya viddhastaväbanā 
hutva, panassantiti’’ palāyanti, alsddbs kiñcenan ti kiñcl isssriyarn 


1 Oks з. 2 Сі dehi. 3 Bd -sikåti. * Bde panayanti. ° B4 -1та, * СЮ 
anudbš вап, ? Ck kena. 5 СК. vindati. ° Bd -уа amar, Вг -ya tāeam, 19 
Bd: pansyantiti, 

ите, 9. 2 


10 


10 


15 


20 


25 


402 XXI. Asitnipšta. 


alabhltvā, iti otesam pl lssariyàâlābhain tvamevs karosit! vadati, saggādhlmanā 
ti saggah adħigantumanā’, lükban ti nirojah pañcatapādikarb kayaklla- 
matha, cirantaran ti cirakšlarnt, āsãvisabvādikasammatā іше ti өтап іше 
вайа snggšsayš?' duggatiíb gacchanti (зера tvari Asš піша visarhvhdikasammatë 
visahvâdikā 11 вафкћай байа, Аве tl tah ñlapati. 

Sâpi tena patikkhittă tatth' еу' antaradhāyi. Тао Sad- 
dháya saddhirn sallapanto р. â.: 

ss. Daddallamānā yasasā yasassini 
dighaññanámavhayanarn' disarh pati, 
pucchëini (аф kañcanavelliviggahe 
ācikkha me {уаш Каќатаёві devatā ti. 249. 

Та. daddallamānā ti jalamānà, digħhaāūōanāämavhbayanan‘* (1 арага 
ti са pacchimā ti ca етап digbaññena lšmakena рёшепа +иссашалап disam 
pati daddallamānā titthasi5, 

Tato ва gātham aha: 

вә. Ѕадаһ&һаф * деғї manujesu pūjită 
apápasattüpanisevini sadá 
вийһауіуёдепа tav’ antim йраїй, 
tah mam sudhāya varapañña bhājayā ‘і. 250. 

Та. Ѕабдһа ti yassa kassaci vacanapattlyãyanā’ вае ватајјарі hoti ana- 
уајјарі, р0јіса ti anavajjakotthšsavasena? pūjitā, арёра гаёсӣрарігеті- 
ufîti anavajjasaddhāya'? са ekantapattiyayanasabhšvšya paresu pi ра!Чулуа- 
uavidahanasamatthšya devatáy etah nimen. 

Atha nam Kosiyo „ime sattā tassa tassa’ vacanam 
saddahitvā tah tai karontā'? kattabbato akattabbam eva 
bahutaram karonti, tam sabba tayā kāritan паша hotiti%“ 
vatvā evam аһа": 

вв. рапаі damañ сарат atho рі sarnyamam 
ādāya saddhāya karonti h’ ekadā, 


1 ali three MSS. -luhmanå. > Bds -вёуа. ? Che digharnña-; Bd dissaññe-. 
$ 0 Jigharnña-, Ва dighaüñe-. > Rds etl. * во all tbree MSS. for -ha. 7? 
СЕ -sayanâ, C: -аёуапё. Bd vacanumattlyàyanā. ° Bd omite вё. ° Bd -]]Шо!- 
{һава-‚ Ске -sevasena. '° Bd -ddhā. 11 Bd yassa kassaci in tbe place of 
tassa tassa, '* lā ~to. !? in Bd imesatta - - evam аһа come after v. 62 and 
before tattha dinanti 


3. Sudhâbhojanajātaka. (535.) 403 


theyyarm musákütam atho рі pesunam' 
karonti h’ еке puna viccutā tayā. 451. 
в. Bhariyāsu poso вайівїво * pekbavă 
sIlūpapannāsu patibbatásu pi 
vinetvā’ chandarh kuladbītiyãsu* рі 
karoti* saddham pana kumbhadāsiyā. 252. 
e. Tvam eva Saddhe paradārasevinī 
papam Кагові kusalam рі гїйсавї*, 
па tādisī arahasi āsanūdakam 
kuto sudhā, gaccha па mayha ruccasîti. 253. 


Та. danan?' ti savattbnkarb puññacetanarn, daman сі jndriyadamam °, 
cigan t! dayyapariccágerh °, sfahyaman ti silah, šdaya saddhāyā 'ti өш 
dšánadini'9 таһёсіваговёпі kătebbānfiti vadstarn кесапат saddhāya âdlyitvā 
karonti okadā, Шй{ап ti tuläkütädikərn Ша{та!! gamakütádikarmn!? vå karonti, 
heke ti еке manussă evarūpəsu nima kilesu imeəsañ са atthāya theyyädīni 
kattabbânfti kosañci vacanarn ваййаЬИта еѓёпі рі karonti, pana viccutā (ауа 
ti рапа (ауа viyuttā sávajjadukkhavipakan'etšnl па kattabbānîti vadatarn vacanarh 
apattiyāyitvêpl 12 karonti, itl tava vasena anavajjatn pi sávajjam рі kareyya, tava '* 
sBadisisü 'Ч jätigottasilädihi eadisfsu, pek ћ avā (1 рекЪё voceati tanha, satanho!5 
Ч а, chandau ti chandarāgah, saddhan ti kumbhadisiyápi vacane saddharb 
karonti іавзё 14 abaro tumhakarn imañ пёша upakararn karissãmiti vadantlyá !7 
pattiyāyitvā kulitthiyo рі chaddetvë tam ета nisevanti! ° asukā пёша tumhesq 
pațibaddhacittā t! kumbhadāsiyâpi тасапё saddharh katrā са!# paradirarh aevanll, 
tvam eva Saddhe39 paradaraseviniti yssmš tam taù patriyayltvë tava 
чавепа paradaárarn əevanti рараш! karonti kusalarn jahantI tasmā tvam eva para- 
dšrasevini {тап pāpāni karosi kusalarh г\йсаві 1, p'autthi tayā вашапа lokavi- 
nāsikā pšápadhammi, gaccha na me ruccasiti 33. 


Sā tatth' еу’ antaradhāyi. Ковіуо pi uttarato thitáya 
Нїпїуё saddhir sallapanto gāthadvayam йһа: 
e. Dighañõarattih arupasmi"” ühate 
y& dissati uttamarūpavaņņinî 


1 Ck -narn. 3 Cks sā- 2 во all (тее MSS. for -tva. * Bd kuliethiyāsus 5 
Ba -ontl. * Bd ni гіссаві. 7 Cks jā-. ° Bd -damanam. * Dd деууайћашща-. 
10 Bd etäya ädānā-. ™ Bd vā, !? Bd adds Кашшаф, !*# pd &р-. '4 Cks teva. 
15 Оке omit satanho. !* Bd tasmā. !! Ска -ia5. !® Сз patl-, Bd pați-. !*Bd 
va. 80 Ске o, 3! Ba nirlccasi. 33 Ck stiti, 23 all three MSS. -Im. 

26* 


10 


15 


80 


10 


15 


404 XXI. Азїйшїрїїа. 


tathàapama mam patibbási devate, 

acikkha me tvarb katamësi accharā. 254. 
в“. Kala nidāghe-r-iva aggijët' iva ' 

anileritá lohitapattamáëlini 

Ба titthasi mandam ivávalokayam?, 

bhåsesamānā va’ gira па muñcasiti. 255. 

Та. dighaññarattlu ti pacchimarattirn, rattipariyosâne ti a, bato ti 
arune uggate, уа ti уа puratthimā disä rattasuvannatáya uttamarūpadbarā hutvā 
dissati, kš 15 nidagheriva 'ti nidaghasamaye kalasavalli viya, ag8!J ауа `ú 
aggijā’ iva sûp! navaljhñmakkhette* pathamajātā viyá ‘ti a. lohitapattama- 
linitl lohitavannebl pattehi parivutā, kā titthasiti yathā вё tarunakialavalli 
vâteritå viläsamānā sobbamana tiithati evan kâ пара (таш tilthasi, bháse- 
samăn +8 "1 maya eaddhirm bhbāsitukāmā viya hos!’ па ca girah muñcasi. 

Tato sā gātham аһе: 

es. Нїг' āha’ деті manujesu pūjitā 
apāpasattūpanisevin! sadá 
sudhävivädena ќат’ antim āgatā, 
sā багі '° па sakkomi sudham pi уйсїїшшї, 
kopinarüpë viya уйсап' itthiyā'’ ti. 256. 

Ta. Ьігаһап!? ti Hiri abah, eudhampitisš aharh sndhábhojanarb tato 
yšcitum р! na sakkomi, КіфКётапё !° ti, корїпегӣра vlya yšácanirthiy&!“ 
узата! itthiyā yācanā inëma kopinarūpā viya rahassavivaraņasadisā!* hoti, 
nlllajja!! viya hottti а. 

Tar sutvá tāpaso dve gāthā abhāsi: 

es. Dhammena ñayena sugatte lacchasi, 
eso hi dhammo na hi yācanā sudhā, 
tarin (аш ayacantim' ahan nimantaye, 
sudhāya yam p` icchasi tam pi dammi te. 257. 


1 Ва aggijälārlva, Вг -Jarlva. Cke -jānica? ? Ваз igā-. 2 Ва ЬЪавввашЕпагїта, 
Ске bhāsemimātāva. * C% agga-, Bd aggljālārivā, Bs -jāriva. 5 Cke agga-, Bd 
авкіјг1&, Вә -Jate. * Rd п{]һаша-. ! Ck bhâsesimanácā, Cs bhäāsesimānāvā, Bd 
bhšsesamënariva. ° Bd ahosl. * Cs Bd -hah. !0 Rd» har, !! Ваа -nitthiyš, 
С^” yācanatthikā. !3 во all three MSS. 13 Cke -пап. !* Chr -natthiya, omit- 
Чив ti. !® Bd tasmš. 1# Bdz rahassañgavi-. 17 Ваз .е-. 15 Bd payaá-.j 


3. Sudhabhojanajataks. (5235.) 405 


e. Sā {уаш mayá ajja sakamhi assame 
nimantitá kañcanavelliviggahe, 
tva hi me sabbarasehi püjiya, 
tam püjayitvána sudham рі asmiye' ti. 258, 

Ta. dhammena "t sabhävena, ñayena "і Кагапвца, na hi yācanā 
sudhā ti na М yācanâya sudhā jlabbhati, tən’ eva Кётапера itarā tisso па 
lebhirùhsu, tarh tan ti ізеті tah, yamicchasfti na kevalarh nimautemi’ yeva 
yañ ca sudharb #cchasi tam pi dammi te, kañcanavelliviggahe ti kaca- 
Waršslsassirikasarire?!, pūjiyā ti na kevalah audbāya añüebl рі sabbarasebi 
tvarn mayá püJetabbayutukšá' va, aamiya! ti (ат pūjetvā saco sudhāya’ 
avasesarh bhavisssti aham рі bbuñjissāmi. 


Tato врага abhisambuddhagāthā’ : 
‚ вв. Sñ Козїуепёпитаїйё jutimata 

addhë Нїтї rammam pavisi-y-assamarm ° 
udanñnavantam ° phalam ariyapūjitarn 
apāpasattūpanisevitan ваја. 259. 

a. Rukkhaggahanë'” babuk’ ettha pupphitā 
ambā piyšlš рвовва са kimsuka 
sobhanjana lodda-m-atho рі padmakâ 
kekā св bhañgā tilaka ca pupphitā. 260. 

зо. 5818 kareri bahuk' ettha jambuyo 
mssatthanigrodhamadhukë са тейіѕ6 '' 
чада1вКа patali sindhuvarita 
supuññagandhë '* mucaliodaketakā, 261, 

21. Harenukë velukā venutindukā 
samakanivara-m-atho pi сіпека 
moc kadali bahuk’ ettha säliyo 
pavihayo ābhujino pi'' tandulā. 262. 

зз. Tassa са uttare passe jštë pokkharani віта 
акекказа араһЫһвгё ѕёди appatigandhika ™. 263. 

тв. Tattha macchë sanniretā khemino bahubhojana 
siñgusavamka sakulā'* заїаташЕй ca rohitā 
äligaggarakākiņņā pāthīnņā'* kākamacchakā. 264. 


1 Ска „Авы. 3 Bd -esi. + Bde -sadíse. * Che pūji-, 5 Che (таш. * CH omit 
au~. 7 Ске omit tato- -. * Ске pavislya ав-, Bd pāvisiyas-; read: pavlsi 
ramma astama? ° Bd udakarvantah. 10 Ck .ggahanš, С° -ggabanš, Bd 
rukkhagahaná. Ч во Bat; Ско -dbukacetasā, !? Bds manunga-. !5 Bd са, 
Yt Bd sadumapp-. '* Ва slñgupavañga vañkulá, !* Ck рап, Ва pātiņā. 


s 


B5 


406 ХХІ. Asitinipata 


z< Tattha pakkhi sanniratā khemino bahubhojanā 
hamsë койса mayüră са саккатака ca kukkuha 
Ккипёјака bshucitrā sikhandijivajivaká. 265. 
zs. Tattha pānāya-m-āyanti nānāmigaganā bahü 
sihā vyagghā varābā ca acchakokataracchayo. 266. 
ze. Palāsādā' ca garajā mahisā rohitā rurū 
eneyyā varābā с' eva ganino nikasūkarā* 
kadalimigā bahŭ с` ettha bilārā sasakannika? 267. 
зт. Chamagin pupphavicitrasanthatë 
dijabhighutthë dijasarnghasevitā ti. 268. 


Та. jutimatā tí šnubhavasampannena, pāvieiyassaman ti pávisi assa- 
mam, yakšro vyaüjapasandhikaro, udaññavantan: * jti tesu tesu tbānesu uda- 
kasampannarh, рЬаіап ti anuekaphalasanipannam, ariya-- tl nivaraņadosa- 
rabitehi Jhanalabhihl ariyebi püjltarn pasatthah, rukkbaggabanā’ ti pup- 
phüpagaphalüpagarukkhagahaná*, sobhañjanša iti siggurukkhš?), loddamatho 
рі pad maka ti loddarukkhâ ca padmarukkha ° са, kokā ca bhañgā сё 'ti 
evannëšmakš rukkhá eva, Кагегї11 10 karerirukkhš, uddilska ti väātaghátakā. 
mucalindaketakă ti mucalindā са pañcavidhaketakā са, һагепи Ей ti apa- 
таппа}& ti, velu kë ti varbsacorakšá, vonū'' И araññamšsš timbarurukkha, ci- 
сака ti kbuddakarājamāsi, mocā ti attbikadali, eāliyo ti напаррашйга- 
Jštaasararn upanlssāya játā nânásāliyo, pavîhayo ti оёпарракёга vihayo, 
šbhujino ti bhüjapatta, tandula ti nikkundakathusš sayañ Jhtatandulasisšán!, 
tassa са 'ti bbikkhave tamma са assamassa uttaradisabhšáge, pokkharaniti 
pañcavidhapadumasañchannajšátassarapokkbarapi, akakkasš ti тассћарі((авеға- 
ládiíkakkasarahitá, apebbharā ti acchinustata'? samatitthā™, appatigan- 
dhiyá ti appatikkülagandhena sugandhena adakena samannāgatā, tattha ’ti 
tassă роккћатапіуё, Шһеш1но 11!* sbhayáa elūgū ti ādini tesao шассһапап 
паша, kunālakā t! kokllš, citrā ti clitrapattā, sikbaqndîti wutthitasikha 
шота añe pi vå matthake jātasikhâ pakkhiuo, panayamaysntiti pānāya 
àyanti, ра1йв&йа ti khaggā gavajā, ganiuo ti gokappă, kannika) ti 
kannikamigā!*, chamagiriti'? bhūmiyam patthatā pltthipasšáná, раррһа-- 
tā tl vlcitrapupphasanthata, dijabhighuttha ti madhuraesareh! dijohi abhi- 
ghuttha, evarūpā yattha bhümipabbata ! ti 


Evari Bh. Kosiyassa assamam vannesi. Idāni” Hirideviyë 
ta. pavisanādīni dasseturh áha: 


) Cko palšsaja, Bd palasadá, Bs pallasadā. ? во Cz; Ck nika-, Bd niñga-. 3 Cs 
-akà. * Bd udakavantan. 5 C% -пё. * Ck риррћаравагоккћаваћпа ti, Се 
-каћапа ti. 7 Cks -a, Bd siñgarokkhā. # ВӘ -padukā. ° Bd padura. 10°С 
karotīiti. '1 Bd kenu. !# Bd -talâ. 13 Bds supatithā. !* Ск add khemino. 
15 Cha „аа. 16 Ch .aka-. 17 Ске ја-, 18% Bd tattha. !?% Сіз imāni. 


3. Sudbābhojanajātaka. (535.) 407 


т». Sā suttacá nīijadumābhilambitā 
vijjumahëmegha-r-ivánupajjatha 
(авва susambandhasirarn kusamayarh 
восіћ sugandham ajinñpasevitam 
atricchakoccharh, Hirim etad abravi:l 
nisida kalyāņi sukha-y-idam' йёвапаш, 269. 

зә. Tassá tadá kocchagatāyā Kosiyo 
yad icchamānāya jatájinarhdharo * 
navehi pattehi sayah sabüdakam 
sudh’ šbhihási turito mabāmuņni. 270. 

e» Sã tam patiggayha ubhohi раш 
icc-abravi attamanā jatadhararh: 
handâham etarahi pūjitā tayā 
gaccheyya' brahme tidivarh* јийуіої. 271. 

э. Sā Kosiyenânumatā jutimatā 
udīritā vannamadena matt 
sakāse gantvāua sahassacakkhuno; 
ayam sudhá Vāsava, dehi me jayam, 279. 

в. Tam ena’ Sakko рі tadā apūjayi 
sahiudá са devá surakaññam uttamarh 
sā рап]а!ї devamanassapūjitā 
pavamhi kocchamhi yada upāvisîti. 273, 


Та. виіќаса ti suchasl. niladumnmabhilamblta ti nīiləsu dumesu abhi- 
fambita hutvå, taro аг  niladumeasákharn parāmasantity-attbo, шаһатерһа- 
тіма ’ti tena nimantitâ mahameghavijju viys (авза tarn añsamarb ратіві, (аваё 
ti tassā Hiriya, susambandhasiran ti susambandhasisari?!, kusšámayan 


4] usirādimissekakusatiņamayarh, sugandhan ti цеїгепд с' eva aññena са 
sugandhatinena miasakattà sugandham, ajinüupasevitan 11 upari stthatena 
ajinena upasevitan, atricchakocchan tl evarūparh kocchāsanah paņnesila- 
drire attharitvā, sukhayidam Авапап ti sukharn nleïda idam šsanarh, yan tl 
yäāvadatthai, iccbamānāyā 'ti sudhah icchantiyā, navehi pattehbîti tai 
khanar ñeva pokkharanito àbhatehi sllapaduminipattehi, sayan” tt sahattbena, 


1 во all three MSS.. read sukhedah. 2 Rds -juurndbaro. 8 Rd -am. * Chr 
ta-. 5 Bd: anai. * Chti. 7 Bd suthusampannasisarn. ° Ско sāyan. 


15 


s0 


15 


95 


408 ХХІ. Atitiniípata 


sahüdakap ti dsakkhinodakasahitarn, sudhišbhihbšsiti sudharb abhibari, 
turlto ti somanastavegena turito, handă “l vavassaggatthe! nipšáto, jitāvi- 
niti Jayappatta hutvë, anumatā ti idáni yathšrucim gaccha 'ti anuññata, u di- 
ritë ti tidasapuranm gantvā Sskkasse santike ауар sudhš tÍ udirayi, sura- 
kaüññan tl deradhitararb, uttaman ti рататап, варабј - - tā ti pañjalīhi’ 
devehi ca menussehi са püjita, уада il yada nisidanatthšya Sakkena даре 
пате kañcanapi(thasarhkháta kocche så upášçvisi tadá tarh (а, nisinnarh Sakko ca 
sosadavatā ca paricchattakapuppbadibi pūjayithau. 


Evaú Sakko tar pūjetvā cintesi: kena nu kho káranena 
Kosiyo веѕёпат adatvā imissā va sudharh adāsiti. So tassa 
káranassa jānanatthāya puna Mātalim° pesesi, 


Tam attham āvikaronto Satthā: 
вв. Tam ета samsi punar’ era Matalim 
sahassanetto tidasãnam indo: 
gantrāna vākyam mama brūhi Kosiyam 
[Asšya Saddhs-Siriya са Kosiyam| (cfr. v. во) 
Hiri sudhah kena-m-alattha° hetunā ti g. а. 274. 


Ta. paristti abhāai", våkyar mamā 'ti mama våkyarn Kosíiyarn brūhi, 
Asaya Saddha- Siriyā сё 'tl Asāto ca Saddhāto ca Sirito ca Hiri yeva 
kena hetunā sudbam alattha. 


So tassa vacanarn sampaticchitvá Vajayantaratharp āruyha 
agamāsi. 


Tam attham pakasento Satthë аһа: 

es. Таш ‘suplavattham™ udatárayi ratham 
daddallamanam ирекігіувзёдіѕвіл 
jambonadisam tapaneyyasannibham 
ñlamkatam kañcaumscittasantikam°. 275. 

вв. Suvannacand'ettha bahü nipātitā 
hatthigavassā kikivyagghadipiyo° 
епеууакё lamnghamay' etthu pakkhiyo 
mig’ ettha теіцгіувтвуё '° yudhāyutā. 276. 

ве. Tatth’ assarājaharayo вуојвушт 
баваѕаіёпі susunāgesādise '! 


1 Hd upasagg-. > Ске абј-. 3 Сә -1ї, Ck Bd -н. * Bd enad. > Bd aladdhā. 
* Ck аһаві. СЕ аһ. ! Bd ашађьћатакћаф. ° во Ске; Bd -sannibham. * 
На ріброгіва іп the place of kiki. '° Ска -yâ-, 11 Cks -aă, 


3. Sudhābbojanajātaka. (535.) 409 


alamkate kañcanajšluracchade 
ётеЇіпе saddagame' asamgite. 277. 
вт. Tam yanasettham abhiruyha Matali 
dasa disã іма abhinādayittha 
nabhañ ca selañ ca vanaspatini ca 
sasñgaram pavyathayittha тейіпіњ. 278. 
as. Sa khippam eva upagamme assamam 
рётёгашекашвакаќо katañjali 
bahussutam vaddham vinitavantam 
ice-abravi Mätali devabrāhmaņam: 279. 
зе. Indassa такуа nisamehi Kosiya, 
düto аһаш, pucchati tam purindado: 
Asšya Saddhā- Siriyā са Kosiya 
Нїп sudham, kena-m-alattha hetunā ti, 280. 


Та. (ат suplavatthan” ti tah Vejsyantaratham sukhena plavanattharn, 
udatârayîti uttäresi, ukkhipitvë gamanasajjam акёзі, upakiriyasšdisan 
ti upakarshabhandehi sadleam, yathå tassa абв івікћавашёпатапоёні > jalanti tatth` 
ava jalltan ti a, jambunadisan ti jJambunedasachkhatarattasayannamayarh 
Tear, kañcanacittassntikan*t t| Кайсапашауепа sattaratanacittena attha- 
meñgalonas samannagatarn, suvanpacandetthš "і suvapnamayā candakë 
ettba гае, batthiti suvannarajatamanimayā hatthi*, gavšádisu pl es' eva uayo, 
larbghimayettha pakkhiyo* ti ettba rathe lamghamayā пйпагаїапашвуй 
pakkhiyo ! ра(ірёуй са (М5, yadhăyută ti attano attano yüdhena  ssaddhim 
yuttă hutvë dassită, аѕвагајаһћагауо" ti harivapnamanomayaassarājâno, 6u- 
вапааазай!вв!9 tl balasampattiyā tarunanaágansdiso', kañcsuasjJšáluracchade 
ti kañcanajšlamayena uracchadšlarkiarerna aamannāgate, š veline ti švelasarth- 
Васем 1! kanpalachkárebl yutte, saddagame ti patodappabārab тіпа sadda- 
matten’ eva gamanasile, ават вісе ti nissañge sighajave, evarüpe sssarñje 
tattha yojesun ti a, abhinšdayitthá `*ti уйпавайдепа ekanipušdarh акёчі, 
vananpatini си 'ti vansspatini ca vauasanide cš. "ti a, pavyatbayitthā `ti 
kampayittha, (а. škasatthavimanakampanena nabhakampanarn veditabbarh, pā- 
všramokarhsakato ti ekarnaakatapavsradibbavettho, vad dhan ti gunavuddharp, 
vinitavantan tí vlnitena acšravattena samannagatarn, iccabraviti ratham 

аавв tbapetvā осагіста evam abravi, devabrābma n an ti devassmarn!9 
brahmanarn. 


1 Che -hame. 3 Bds-tthun. 2 Bd adds upakarapāni, * Bde -aannibhau. ° 
во all three MSS. * Bd -ino. 7 Bd pakkhigaņāpi. * Cks Bd уц-. ° Che 
răjā-. !9 Bds „ай, 71 Cis H<. 19 Dd setha. 


10 


15 


90 


35 


30 


16 


15 


to 


25 


410 XXI. Азбпірага. 


Šo tassa засапаш зоїуа: 
a. Addhá Siri таш patibháti Мага! 
Saddhā апісса pana devasārathi 
Аза visarnvadikasammatà bi me 
Hiri са ariyambi gune patitthita и g. а. 281. 

Ta. addhā ti sippšdisampanne рі asampanne рі bhajanato addhë ti merh 
patibhati, арієеа (і Saddhš pana tah tai p'etthal [vattharh раһауз nüüñasmirh 
sññasmirn % uppsjjaminato?! burvë аһһатайзгепа* апісса G mam patibhâti, 
visarh- -matš t Ава pana yasmā dhsanatthikë пазауа samudderi. pakkbanditvà 
vinatthapšábhata 5 enti tasmá visahvâdikā ti mam patihhăti, ariyamhi gnüDe 
ti Hiri рапа hirottappabhavasarpkhšte* parisuddhe ariyaguņe patitthitā ti. 

Idáni tasaā сопаф vannento аһа: 

s. Кашйапуо уа с” imā gottarakkhitá 
jinná ca уа уа са sabhattuittbiyo 
të chandarágam purisesu nggatam 
hiriyá nivárenti sacittam attano. 282. 
э. Samgamasise sarasattisarhyutte 
parājitāna patatam ра!йуїпаш 
hiriyā nivattanti jahitva' jivitarp 
te sampaticchanti рппа һїгїшапа. 283, 
эз. Velā уаїһа вйдагауедауйагїп1* 
hir' āya hi' pápajanam nivāraņī, 
tam sabbaloke Hirim ariyapüjitan 
Indassa tan vedaya devasārathîti. 284, 

Та. јіпрё ti vidbavä, sabhattü "і sassåmikā taruņitthiyo, attano ti 
tā sabbâpi parapurisesu attano chandarăgaro uggatah viditvà ayuttam etai 
amhākan ti hiriyä sacittah nivārenti, hiri pāpakammami па Каго(і!°, patatarh 
ра)ёуіпап ti patantanan са paliyautânañ ca antare, jabitvà jivitan ti ye 
birimanto (оли attano jivitab cajitvā hiriyā nivattanti, te ti evan пїтайа!! 
са рапа te hirimanš ропа attano amikaro sampaticchanti amittahatthato mo- 


cetvi ganhanti, pàpajanarh nivšraniti pšpato Janam nivāriọī, ayam eva vā 


% Віз omit pettha. ? Ba only one айй-. 3: Rds uppajjanato. * Bd -va-, Be 
abhātā-. * Chr -tthā-. ¢ Bds -ppasabhāva-. !' Bd -tvā. ° Bd -dħārini. ° во 
©; Rd omits hi; read -ya hi? '° omits hiri, and resda karont. © Bd се 
bi evan nivattš, Cka te ti evan ti vatvā. 


3. SuqdhabhoJanajataka. (535.) 


pštho, tan ti tar Hirirn, ariyapüjitau ti ariyehi Ruddhadihi pūta. 


411 


Indassa tah vedayă 'ú yasmë evarb таһадопа arlyapūjitā с' ева авта (ап 


evarh uttamå паш` esš ti Іпдазва Каћећі. 
Таш sutvá Mätali. 
ə». Ко te imarn Kosiya ditthim odahi 
Brahmá Mahindo atha vā Pajāpati, 
Hir’ āyarn devesu hi setthasammataá 


dhīitā Mahindassa mahesi jáyathá `й р. а. 285. 


Та. ditthan! ti Hiri mahšguna ariyapūjitā ti laddhir, odahit hadaye 
pavesesi, 6etthasammatš ti tava santike sudháya laddhakālato patthšya 
Indassa santike kabcanasanari labhitva ssbbadevatahi pūjiyamānā uttams- 


sammataá Jayatha. 


Evah tasmim kathente yeva Kosiyassa tam khanam 
бета cavanadhau mo" játo. Atha nam Mātali ,„Kosiya āyu- 


sarnkháro te’ ossattho dānadhammo* pi samatto°, kin te ma- 
nussalokena, devalokarh gacchāmā‘“‘ "і іа. netukāmo hutvā 


эь. Hand’ ehi dëni tidivah вашаККаша“* 
rathan samāruyha mamâyitar imar’, 
Indo ca tah Inda-sagotta karnkhati, 


а}]' eva tvarh Indasahavyatarn vajā ' g. а. 286. 


Ta. mamāyitan ti piyar шапёрат, Indasagottan t! purimabhave 
Jndena sagottein’, Катю Касі Ц tavêgeamanam icchanto karbkhati. 


Iti tasmim Kosiyena saddhim kathente yeva Kosiyo ca- 


vitvā opapātiko devaputto hutvā āruyha dibbarathe айһаѕі. 


Atha narn Mătali Sakkassa santika nesi, Sakko ќат disvā 
tutthamánaso attano dbitarah Hiridevirh tassa aggamahesirh 


katvā adāsi, aparimāņam assa issariyarh ahosi. 


Tam atthah viditvā .anomasattānam kamman nāma evam vi- 


sujjhetiti* S. osānagātham йһа: 
əə. Evah samijjhanti apāpakammino, 
ао sucinpassa phslam па nasseti, 


1 ао all three МЗЭ. ? Bd: nassanadbam-. ? Ck ро? Bd omits te. * Bd: ca- 


vanadham-. Š Bd sampatto, * Bd? apakkama. ° Bê (dam. 


8 Ва samänago-. 


20 


30 


10 


5 


29 


?$ 


412 ХХІ Asklnipata 


уе keci-m-addakkhu sudhāya bhojanam 
sabbe та te Indasahavyatam gatăā ti. 287, 


Та. epāpakammino ti apāpakammā' 88012 етай visujjbanti, ye kecim- 
addakkhun tl ye keci заа tasmir Himavantapadess ізба Ковіуепа Hirlyë 
Ч1ууашйпагп ‘eudhābhojanah addasarnsu, sabbevate ti sabbe рі tam Чапат 
anumodltvá сі бат pasādetvā Indasshavyatanin gati ti. 


5.1. . &. „na bhikkbave ідёп’ ета pubbe р' etah adanabhiratam 
thaddiamacchariyam ' зашапат aham damesim ета“ 'ti увіуё j. s.: 
„Тада Hiridevatā Uppalavanna аћові, Kosiyo dānapati bbikkhu, 
Pañcasikho Anuruddho, Mātali Anando, Suriyo Kassapo, Cando 
Moggallāno, Narado Sāriputto, Sakko aham evä" `ü. Sudhãbho- 
janajātakamn’. 


4. Kunšlajataka. 


Evamakkhaysatiti. Idah S. Kunâladabe v. anabbiratipilite 
pañcasate bhikkhü а. k. Tatràyah anupubbikathā: Sâkiya-Koliyā* 
kira Kapilavatthunagarassa сь Koliyanagarassa ca antare Rohinim 
пата nadim eken' eva avaranena bandhāpetvāâ sassâni kārenti. Atha 
Jetthamülamase sassesu milāyantesu ubhayanagaravásinam pi kamma- 
Кага? sannipatirnsu. Tattha Ко-уёѕіро vadimsu: „idah udaka uhhato* 
nihariyamānah” п’ eva tumbākam па amhákam pahossati', атһакаш 
рапа sassam ekaudaken' eva nippajjissati, idam ийайаш amhakam 
dethü% `ti,. Ka-våsino vadimsu: „tumhesu kotthake pūretvā thitesu 
mayah rattasuvaņņnanilamanikāļlakahāpaņe gahetvā па ѕакЕһівзёшв 
pacchipasibbakādihatthā tumhākam gharadvāre vicaritum, ambākam рі 
sassa eken’ eva udakena nippajjisseti, idah udakam ambākam деа“ 
`ч. „Na mayah dassāmā" ‘ti. „Mayam pi па даззётё" ti. Evah 
kathah” vaddhetvā eko utthëya ekassa pahāram adāsi зо рї апаз 
ЧЧ evam aññamaññam paharitvë rājakulānah jātih ghatetvë'° kalaha 
yaddhesum !'. Koliyakammakarā vadanti: „tumhe Ka-vāsike '” gahetvā 


' B-a. °? Bds-ri. è Bd -harm, ngan nithitā. 4. К. = Kuušlo, 
s. = askano. Ка. = Kapilavattbu. Ко. = Kollyanagara. ВЫ. = bhikkhave. Р. 
= Puniamuklo, ph. = phuasakokilo. ® cfr. Dbammapada р. 351. Weber's Ind. 
Studlen Rd. 5 р. 412. Ѕепагев Mahšvastu Т. 1 р. 335. * Ва -všslkanam, > 
Bd ksslkamme-. * Bd -уаќо, 7 Сё niha-, Се tiba-, Bd her-. 6 Bd раһой. ° 
Ва» kalahani. 20 Ва ghatietvë għhattetvā. !! Bd ратацә-. 18 Bd -väsino 
sahlyadárake, 


4. Kunālajātska. (536.1 . 413 


gacchatha, уе sopasigālādayo viya sttano bhaginihi saddhim vasimsu 
etesam hatthiassădayo vā phalskāyudhāni vā ambakam kim karissan- 
titi". — Sakiyakammakara vadanti: „tumhe dāni kutthino dārake 
gahetvā gacchatha, ye anātbā niggatikā' tiracchānă viya kolarukkhe 
Yasimsu etesam hatthiassādayo vā phalakāyudhāni vā ambākarh kim 
karissantiti. Те дарға tasmim kemme niyuttaamaccanam kathesum, 
amaccā rajakulanam kathesum, tato Sākiyā ..bhaginihi saddhim sam- 
тёзікапеш" {һашай cs balañ са dassessāmā“ ‘ti yuddhesajjā nikkha- 
mimsu, Koliyàpi „kolarukkhavāsānarn’ {һётап ca balañ ca dasses- 
såmā" ‘ti yuddhasajja nikkhamimsu. Apare рапёсагіуё: бёкіуа- 
Koliyanam dāsisu udakattbāya nadim gantvā cumbatšni bhümiyam 
nikkhipitvā sukhbakatbâya* nisionāsu ekissā cumbatah ekā saka- 
sañnaya ganhi, ќаш піззёуа „tava cumbatarn mama cumbațan“ ti 
kalahe pavatte kamena ubhayanagaravāsino dāsakammakară с eva 
sevakabhojakāmaccauparājāno* сё 'ti sabbe yuddhasajjā nikkhamimsü 
'ti vadanti, imamhā pana nayā purimanayo va bshüsu attbakathāsu 
gato yuttarüpo сё °t sv-eva" gahetabbo. Te рапа вйуапһе` yuddha- 
sajjā nikkhamissantiti. “asmim samaye Hh. Sávatthiyam ” viharanto 
расейввазатауе lokam volokento ime evam yuddhasajje nikkhamante' 
addasa, diavā’™ „mayi gate еза kalaho vūpamissati nu kho no" ti 
upadhárento „aham ettha gantvā kalahavupasamattham пї jātakāni 
kathessāmi, tato kalabo vūpasamissati, atha samaggidipanatthaya dve 
jātakāni kathetvā Attadandasuttam dessessãmi''. desanan sutvåā 
ubhayanagaravāsino аффћеќеууёиі əddhateyyāni kumārasatāni dasses- 
santi '*, ahan te papbajessāmi, mahanto samágumo bhavissatiti san- 
pittháparn Кабуё !° sarirapatijagganam katvā Sāvattbiyaro pindaya caritvā 
pindapåtapatikkanto sâyaņnhasamaye Gandhakutito nikkhamitvā kassaci 
anārocetvā’‘ sayam eva pattscivaram айауа дуіпоаф зепёпаш antare 
üñkàse pallamnkarm Ābhujitvā'* tesan sarnvegajananattham disvë andha- 


karam Каби kesaramsiyo vissajjento nisidi, atha tesam sarmvigga- s 


шапазёпаш attānam dassento cbabbannabuddharasmiyo vissajjesi. 
Ka-vasino Bh-tam disvā ,.атһакаш nmatisettho S. agato, dittho nu 
kho ambëákam kalahskaraņabhāro'®" ti cintetvë „па kbo рапа яакка 
S-ri agate amhehi parassa sarire sattham Ppateturm, Ko-vāsino amhe 
1 Bd -thä el пірваЫса. 2 Cka vagitakānarb. ? НЯ koliyarukkhanagatavâsinani 
* СЕ sukhataya > Bd sevakagāmabho-. * Bd so va. 7 Bd .һазашауе. 5 CXe 
-ttbimn. ° Bd nikkbante, !° Bd adds ces. !' Buttanipšts p. 153, C5 dasse-. 
13 Cha daesanti, 11! Rds add pátova. !% Crs -сі-, 13 Bd ābhuñj-. 16 Ско -bai-. 


s 


414 XXI. As;itinipšta- 


hanantu vë pacantu vå” ti šyudhšni chaddesurn. Ko-rësino рі tath' 
eva skamsu. Atha Bb. otaritrë ramaniye padese välikāpuline pañ- 
Gattararabuddbasane nisidi anopamšya Buddbasiriyā virocamëno. te pi 
гајапо' БВ-шый vanditvë nisidimsu. Atha ne 5. jānanto va . Балша 
ёсас attha mahārājā“ ti pucchitvë .„п` ета hhante nadidassanatthāya 
ра’ kilanatthaya' imasmim pana (апе ѕашрётаир рассирайћёреіхё 
āga amha ti. „Кип піввёуа то kalabo таһагаја“ ti. .„Сдакащш 
nissšya ° Ыһаме ti, „Udakam kim agghati mabërëja- `ti. „Appar ° 
bhante" ti. .Pathavi паша kih agghati ш." ti. „Anagghā bh." ti. 
.„Kbattiyā kim aggbantiti“. „Кһаіуа паша anaggbāà bh" ti 
.„Appaggham udaka швзёуз kasmā mahagghe kbattiye nāsetha m.“ 
ti „kalabasmim hi азьёйо пёша o` atthi, Кајаһатакерв bi maharaja 
ekâya rukkhadevatāya kålasihena saddbim baddbāghbāto* sakalam рі 
imam kappan anuppatto уетй* `ti vatvä Phandanajátakam kathesi. 


Tato ..parapattiyena пата mahārāja оа bhavitabbarm, parapattiyà’ 
hutvåpi ekassa sasassa” katbāya tiyojanasahassavittbate Himavante 
catuppadagaņā” таһазатиёйаш pakkbandino аһевшї, tasmā para- 
pattiyena na bharitabban* ti vatvā Daddabhaj. katbesi. Tato „kadāci 
maháraja dubbalo pi mahabbalassa randhe'° passati, kadāci mahabbalo 
pi dubbalassa '', latukikápi sakuņikâ hatthināgam gbātesîti“ vatvā 
Latukikaj. kathesi. Evam kalahavūpasamanatthāya tīni jătakāni 
kathetvā sámaggiparidipanattháya dve jātakāni kathesi: ,samagganam 
hi' mabārājs koci otārai '' паша passitum па sakkotîti“ vatvā Rukkha- 
dhammaj. kathesi, tathâ „samaggānah mahârāja Косі vivaram '* pasai- 
tub nàsakkhi. yadá рапа аййашайпаш vivādam akarsu stha пе eko!* 
nesādaputto jivitakkhayam püàpetvë аЧйуа gato, vivāde assādo обща 
п' atthiti“ vatvå Vattskaj. kathesi. Evah imani pañca јаќакапі ka- 
thetvā вүвзёпе `Attadandasuttam kathesi, Вајапо pasannā „sace 5, 
någamissa maya вйпзашаййаш vadhitvë lohitanadim pavattayissama, 
S-ran оізвёув по jivitam laddham, sace pana S. agaram ajjhavasissa 
dvipasahassadvayaparivërarm '° catumahadiparajjam '* hatthagatam аһһа- 
vissa абігекаввпазё ™ kho pan' азва puttë mbhavissamsu'° tato khatti- 
увраліуёго abhavissa "°, tam kho рап' ева sampattin pahâya nikkha- 


1 Cks таја, ° Cks omit na. 3 ВФ add арі са kho pane. * Cks omit ш-. Š 
Rds appagghain. * Bd bsandha-. ! Bds -уо. ° Наз вавакавва. * Bar -пайзуо. 
10 Ва anatthu, 11 Hd adds apattharn passati. !? Bd ока 1> Ва vivädam. 
14 Chs omit ne еко. !5 Ві іїрарзгічагаш, бә dvisahassadipa parivāram. 6 
Bd adds авва. '7 Віз -arn. !% Сда abhavisaa, !*# Bd -ro ca йсйгїзва. 


d. Kuņālajātaka. (538), 415 


mitvā sambodbim patto, idāni рі khattiyaparivāro va уісагаій“ `t 
ubhayaņagaraväsino addbateyyüni addhateyyāni' kumárasatáni adamsu, 
Bh. te pabbājetvā шаһатапаш agsmasi, punadivasato райћёув tehi 
parivuto ekadā Kapilapure? ekada Koliyanagare ti dvisu nagaresu 
pindāya carati, ubhayanagaravāsino mabâsakkāram karimsu. Тева 
garugāravena na attano гисіуё pabbajitanam anabhirati иррејјі, 
purënadutiyikšyo pi tesam Bnabhiratijananatthaya tah (аш vatvā 
sāsanamh pesesi?, te atirekataram ukkantbimsu. Bh. āvajjanto (еза 
anabhiratibbavam Пата „ime ЫМКЕһи mādisena Buddhena saddhim 
ekato vasantă ukkanthanti, katbamrūpā nu kho tesan dhamma- 
kathā* sappāyā“ ti upadhārento Kuņāladhammadesanan passi. Ath’ 
assa etad sahosi: „abah° ime bhikkhu Himavaotam netv& Kunäla- 
kathāya безаш mātugâmadosam pakasetvë anabhiratim baritvā ° sotā- 
pattimaggarm dassamiti so pubbanhasamayarm nivāsetvā pattacivararn 
üñdaya Kaepilavatthum pindaya caritvā pacchábhattam pindapatapatik- 
kanto bhattakiccavelayam ета te” рабсаваќе bhikkbü āmantetvā 
a ditthapubbo vo bhi. ramaniyo Himavantapadeso" ti pucchi. „No 
b’ idah? bhante" ti. ,Gacchissatha рапа Нішаунибасёгікаш“ ti’. 
„Bhante еріддћішарід * mayar, кафат ратіззёшё“ ‘ti. „Sace pana 
vo Косі gahetvā gaccheyya gaccheyyāthā" "і, „Ama bhante" ti. 
S. sabbe рі пе attano iddhiyë gahetvā ākāse uppatitvë Himavantam 
gantvā gaganatale thito va ramaniye Himavantapadese Kañcanapabba- 
tam '! Manip. Hiñgulap. Añjanap. Sënup. Phalikapabbatan ti nānăvidhe 
'* Kannamundakam Rathakšáram Sihappa- 
pštarn Chaddantarn Tiyaggalam’? Anotattarn Kunaladahan ti sattadahe 
dessesi, Himavanto пёта mahā™ pañcayojanasatubbedho tiyojanasa- 


pabbate рапса таһёпадіуо 


hassavitthato, tassa imam гашапіуеш екадеващ '* attano ānubbåvene 
дазвеѕі, ta. katanivāsāni'* sihwvyagghahatthikuládini catuppádüni рі 
ekadesato dassesi'', ќа, ārāmarāmaņpeyyakādīvi puppbaphalūpage ruk- 


khe nānāvidhe sakunasamghe jalathalajapuppháni Himavantassa pu- ` 


ratthimapasse suvanpatalam pacchimapasse biāgulatalam dassesi, 
їшезаш тётапеуувкафіпаш '* dițthakâlato pattháya tesam bhikkhunam 
purāņadutiyikāsu chandarāgo раћіпо'”, Atha S. te bhikkhü gahetvā 


1 Oks опју опе ad-. > Bd -lavatthupure. > Сіз -sur. * Віз dhammi-. > 
Ck: omit ahah. 5 Bds viuodetvā. ? C% omit te. ° Bd hetarn. * Bd adds 
vutte. 10 Bd -to, 11 Bd adds ratanap. !? Bd adds satte шаһазага. !° Bd 
ulyañgaları. ?* Bd: edd patbavito. 1? Bd екаш-. !# Bd -vāssnāni. " Bd 
-ti 18 Bd -piyakānaib. !# Ва bahino. 


95. 


416 ХХІ. Авзїйыїрйїз. 


G@kšsato otaritva Himavantassa pacchimapasse satthiyojanike silátale ` 
sattayojanikassa kappatthikasšálarukkhassa hetthâ tiyojanāya’ manosi- 
lāya° tebi bhikkhübi parivuto cbabbannabuddharasmiyo vissajjento 
алпатаКисеһиш khobhetvë jalamāno suriyo viya nisiditvë шайһигазаа- 
ram nicchërento te bbikkhü mantesi: bhi. imasmim Himavante tum- 
behi adittbapubbam pucchathā“ ti.  Tasmim Кһаре dve citrakokilā 
ubhosu kotisu dandaka mukhena базієтуё* majjbe attano ьёшікаш 
nisidāpetvā attha cittakokilā purato attha pacchato attha dakkhinato 
attha ташаќо вира hetthato ° attha upari chayam katvë evam tam 
citrakokilam parivāretvā akasenàgacchanti. Te bhikkhü tam sakuna- 
samgharm disva S-ram pucchimsu: „Ке nām’ ete bhante закопа“ ti. 
ВЫ. mama еза* porāņako vamso. maya tbapitapavepi' mam pubbe 
evam рвгіғагипѕо°. (ада pan’ esa sakunagano mahā ahosi. addhud- 
dhāni 4ї]айапйазаһаззап! mam  parivërimsu, апироћћеов © parihāyitvā 
idāni ettako јао“ `ti. ..Kathamrupe''! pana bhante vanasande еба 
біјакайба tumhe pariceriwsūü“ `Ч. Atha nesam S. „tena hi bhi. su- 
nåāthā“ ‘ti satih upatthapāpetvā atitam аћһагііта dassento аһа: 

Evam akkhāyati evam anusūyati; sabbosadhadharanidhare 
uekapupphamalyavitate'"” gajagavajamahisarurucamarapasada- 
khaggagokannasihavyaggbadipiacchakokataracchauddárakakada- 
limigabilarasasakannikánucarite '° аКїппапе!атапда1атаһауага- 
banāgakulakaperasarnghādbivutthe" issammigasākhammigasa- 
rabhhammigaenimmigavatammigapasadammigapurisallukimpurisa- 
yakkharakkhasanisevite '° amajjamañjaridharabrahatthapup- 
phapuphitagganekapaádapaganavitate '* kuraracakoravarana- 
mayüraparábhütaj1vajivakacelavakabbirnkarakaravikamattavihañ- 
gasatasampaghutthe' añjanamanosilaharitšálabingulakahemara- 
jatakanakadhaátusatavinaddhapatimanditappadese'" — evarūpe 


khalu kho ramme vanasande Kunalo nama sakuno pativasati 


1 Bd mano, “* Bds -пікёуа. > Bd -sīlatalāya. * Bdr раһеіуі. 5 Bd hetiha. 
* Ck aka, Bd esa mama. ? Ck: pameni. ! Ck -eār-. ? Che mama. '° Rd 
adds рапа. !! Bd katharh əvarüpe. !? Ck -malyā-, Bd -malla-. !3 Bd -cama- 
ri-taraechayo-udišrikadali-, C% каппакё-, “14 Bd -nënšknulakarenn-vuthe. 13 
Bds -pūrisālū-. 1% Bd -pahațbapupphapussitaggā-vitate. !? Bd -kurura-, Cl 
—cakurs-, Bde -sarabhūta-, Cka -karavira-, Bd satatarnaatn-. 15 Bd Jkanakane- 
kadhatusata. 


4. KunBajataka. (636.) 417 


ativiya citto ativiya cittapattacehadano, tass’ eva khalu bho 
K-assa s-assa addhaddhăni itthisahaasãni paricârikā dijakaññāyo. 
Atha khalu bho dve dijakaŭñāyo kattham mukheua dasitvá 
tam К-а s-arh majjhe nisīdāpetvā uddenti, „mā nam К-аш 
в-аш addhánapariyáyapathe kilamatho ubbáhetth&'%“ `ti, Pañ- 
casatadijakaññáyo' hetthato hetthato denti’, ,sac` āyarh K. в. 
йввоё paripatissati* mayan ќат pakkhehi ра{1рдаһевзашй“* ‘ti’, 
Pañcasatë dijakaññayo uparūpari* denti, „mā nah К-аш s-ar 
ātapo рагийёрїнї''. Pañcasată dijakaññáyo ubhatopasse denti" 
„mā пап K-arn в-аф sitam vā unha vā tiņah vā rajo vå 
vāto vā ussāvo vā upapphusiti“, Pañcasatë dijakaññáyo purato 
purato denti’, „mā nam K-am s-am gopálaká vā pasu- 
pälakā vā tiņahārakā vä katthaháraká vā vanakammikā vā 
katthena vā kathalena '° vā pāņinā vā leddunë vā dandena vā 
satthena уй sakkbarāhi™ vā раһагат adarhsu''” mâyai K. в. 
gacchehi vā latāhi vā rukkhehi vā '' thambhebi vā pš&sánehi vā 
balavantehi уй pakkhihi sarngāmesîti'““, Pañcasatá dijakaññáyo 
pacchato denti’ ваоһаЫ sakhiláhi mañjübi' madburáhi vā- 
cãhi вашодёсагапііуо, ,,máyarm U” K. в. āsane pariyukkanthiti“. 
Pañcasatá діјакаййёуо '° disodisarh denti'' nekarukkhavividha- 
vikatiphalam &harantiyo, smáyam К. в. khudaya parikilamitthā“ 
"і. Atha khalu bho dijakaññáyo tam K-a s-am ārămen’ 
eva āråmam пууйпеп' eva пууёпаф nadititthen’ eva n-arh 
pabbatasikharen' eva р-аф ambavanen’ eva a-a jambuvanen’ 
eva j-am labujavanen’ eva l-a nálikerasaüjádiyen' eva" 
n-irh °° khippam eva abhisambhonti ratattháya ' Atha khaln 
bho K. s. tāhbi dijakaññahi divasarn" paribbü]ho” evam apa- 
1 Ваг -othā. > Bd adds mukhe, 3 Ck naccentl, Bd hethako denti. * Che -{18- 
вай. ° Bd -ml, omitting tl. * Ck evarüpari. 7 so С^” (ог -12рауїи? B4 
-tapeti. Š СЕ” naccenti, Bd nadenti. * Ck nacceenti. '° Bd каа\вуа. 1 Сі 
-áyā. !2 Che addasu. 13 Bd adds sškhehi vā. !4 Chz -messasîti. 15 Ck 
naccenti, °% Bå maññšhi. !! Chs та гап, Bd ya шап. '° Ck omit di-. 
19 go Chs; Bde -sañcirlyenevs. #9 ВФ-зайсап, °! Bd rati-, 2° C%s -ae 
22 Ck -he. 
мака Ў. 97 


35 


15 


20 


35 


30 


418 ХХІ. Asitinlpšts 


ašdeti: „nassatba tumhe vasaliyo, vinassatba tuwbe vasaliyo 
согіуо dbattiyo asatiyo labucittiyo katassa appatikárikáyo 
anilo viya yenakámargamáyo“ ti. 


Tatrêyah а!Шатаппап&: ҺЫ. yo таппазэодо evam akhhayati evañ са 
anusüyati kin (1 kathiyati: sabbosadhadbarapidbare Ч vitthäro, ta. sabboss- 
dhadharanidbare t| sabbosadhadbarepimbi mūlatacapattapupphādisabbosa- 
dhadbaršya! дһегаріуг samannägato ti a. sabbosadhsyutto vā дһагадійһаго", 
so hi padeso sabbosadhadharapidharo ti eram akkbiyati evañ са anusüyatil, 
tasmiù vanasande ti vuttarb bot, sesapadayojanāya рі ез’ ета nayo, neke- 
pupphamalyavitate ti nekebl’ pilandhenatthäya* uppannapupphehi c' eva 
pilandbanamalyebl ca vitate, гага 'ú эйтапратавра migâ, uddārā u upadra- 
migi’, bhllåră t mabėbilārā nelsmendalaro voceati taronā bhihkaechëcamande- 
lahn‘, mahararšhi ti mahabatthino, škinnpanelamandslamshavaršhena gocari- 
kadibhedena dasavidhena nšgskulena c' eva hanerusamghena? ca adhivnutthe* ti 
a, іввашшівё? ti Каана, vätammigā t pəsummigà'? ti cluamiga, 
parisajlū?' (1 vslavsmokhayakkhiniyo, kim purisš ti devakinnsracandakinnara- 
дотакіог aradandamšuavakakontasakunakannapapuradibheda Мпоагё, ашајја- 
mañjaridharabrabatthapupphapupphitagganekapādspagaņnavitate 
U makuladharebi e' eva mañJaridharehi са supupphitebl ca aggsmattapupphehi!* 
c' anekehl pidapaganehl ca vitate, vāraņā nāma baithiliñgasakuņâ, colapaka 
119 pi еке 1! sekunā yeva, hemañ ca kacana сё “і dve suvannajátiyo, 
etehi añjanădibi nekadhātusatebi anekebi vanpadhāturājihi '* vinaddbapatimaņdi-« 
tappadese, hho ti dhammllapanamattam etath, citto tì mukbatundake'* Һе!{һа- 
udarabhšge pl! citro'" sa, addhuddhānin™ tiņi sahassáni pañcasstániti a., 
аддЬгперагіуёуараќћ е ti addhâneasamkhäte gamanamagge, пЬһаһе!1һ&?* ti 
badhayittha?', upapphusiti upagentvā phusi, pahħärami адафей 'ti ettha тё 
nan ti pad mivasen’ attho veditabho, samgâêmoesiti samšgami, san bi- 
biu matthābl?”, sakhilähiti’? piyabl, mañjübitl вакы, шайһчга- 
biti madhurassarābi, samadâcarantiyo (1 қапдћакагепатазвпа paricarantiyo 
Dekarukkhavividbavikatlphalan t| nekchl rukkhehl vividhavikatiphalarh, 
ёгёшепета аташап ti pupphšršmadisu айбеіагепа ёгёшөп’ eva aüñarh ārā- 
шташ пеп!!! a., üyyanadisn рі еа’ eva nayo, nàlikirassñjšadlyeni)t ti nàlí- 
kiravanen' eva айбай па!!Ёїгатапага abhisambbotitl eva реіта tsttha паш 


1 Сіз -rā, # Сіз ге, 3 Bd anek-. * Bd phalatthāya. 5 so Cs; СЕ upadraü- 
cha? Bdsuddā. * so Се; Ck hhirbjakacchšca-, Bd tarunabbígacchšapa-, Re 
bhiúgacchāja-. ? Bd kerenu-. ° Bd -vuthe. * Р4ә |ввашівё еіс. !° Вёг 
pasada-. !! Ске -р, Bd -ваїа., !3 Pd -puppbírebi, 35 Cre -y baska tl. '* Bd 
ete. 15 Bd „гав. 28 Bd Ы, !! Bde uparibhogehi. °° Сюе. 19 Bd adds 
addhacetutthāni. ?? Pd -etha. 31 Rd bābittha. #3 Сі mayihi, Bd mathšhl. 
9 Che saddhiralābhīti. ®t Ckz salilāhi. 95 so Cka; Bd -вабјёгіуепеза. 


4. Копаіїајабака. (536.) 419 


КМрраћ дета ratattháya! рарапепи, діеазаф? paribbülho ti sakaladivasarh 
vülbo!, аравёдеі іи tā kira tah evah divasam рі paricaritvë пітазагокіће 
otāretvā parivāretvā rukkhasikhšsu 01810675 app-eve паша madburavscanarp 
lsbheyyâmā "1 patthayantiyo Iminë uyyojitakále attano vasapDatthánarh gamis- 
ваша 'd vasanti, Kunqšlarajë рапа tš uyyojento павваЊа 't| 881 vacanehi 
apssšdeti, їз,* vinassatbë '11 sabbatobhágena nasnatha gebo dhanadhañüšdinarh 
nāsanena coriyo bahumáyataya dhuttlyo natíhasatitšya 'asatlyo anaçvatthitacitta- 
tàya lahucittäyo Ке(етілзвепела mittadübhitšys eppatikāriyo tl. 


Evañ ce pana vatvā „iti kho bhi. вһаш tiracchānagato pi 
itthīioam akatanñutam bahumāyatatı anācāratam* dussilatañ ca jānāmi, 
tadā p' аһаш* авай vase avattitvë tā yeva attano vase vattemiîti“ 
imāya kathāya’ tesam bhikkhūnarh anabhiratim haritvë S, tunhi abosi. 
Tasmim khane dve kalakokilë sámikam dandakena ukkhipitvā bețthā- 
bhâgādisu catasso catasso hutvā tah радеваш agmimsu, (арі disvā 
te S-ra puecchimsu, S. „pubbe ҺЫ, mama sahâyo Punnamukho 
nāma phussakokilo° abosi, (азвйуаш vamso” ti vatvā purimanayen' 
eva tebi bbikkhūbi pucchito áha: 


Tass’ eva’ khalu bbo Himavato pabbatarājassa puratthima- 
disëbháge susukhumasunipupagirippabhavā” haritupayantiyo '' ti. 


Та. sutthusukhumasanhasakhilatšya'? susukhumasunipunš!! 611114 eti- 
Warb рађћағ& 18 ti giblppabbsvšë!* Himsvantato sandamānā, harltatinamissa- 
о&һа!ауа harita-Kunšjadaharn upsgamanena Upayantiyo ti sukhumasunjpuna- 
Eirlppabhavš!? baritupayantiyo ! ° evarūpā nadiyo yasmir santiti а, Idšni уай 
КадёЈадеһат 15 upayanti (а,!?# pupphāni vapnento ёћа: 


Uppalakumudapadumanalinasatapattasogandhikamandalaka- 
sampattivirülhasucigandhamanuññapávakappadese ”° ti. 


Ta, uppalan Ч niluppalarn, nalinan tí setapaduməam, satapattau ti 
paripunnasatapattapadumarh, sam pattiti etehl sampattivirülhehi abhinavaJátehl 
sucigandhənas с? eva шапиййепа ca hadayabandhenasamatthataya рёуакепа ?! са 
padosena зешаппёдаѓо 11 а. Jdàni їлзтїїй даће rukkhšdayo vannento абв: 


1 Bd гац, 2 Che sa. > Pd paribbülho. * Bd adds nassatbð ti gaechatha. > 
Ске „та, * Bd pāharb. | Bd gâthāya, °’ Cks Bd рц-. ? Ске етай. '0 СЁ 


-рраһётё, Ñd -расата, !! Ck bharl-, Сг bharitūpasantiyo, Bd tassa susukbumnia- 


вапіропё in the place of сайћа. '? Pd -salllatāya. '? Сіз -по. !* Cka giri, 


Па giri. `° Сїт рађЬёчо, Bd pabbaro. 16 Che ebhävà. !? Ck -bhàvá. °? Ck 
baritšlayantiyo, Сә haritülapayautiyo. !* Ré -yantliyo їйїп, 7° Ch edālava-, 
Э1 Біг шата-. 


97* 


10 


30 


10 


35 


50 


420 ХХІ. Asitlnipšts. 


Kuravakamncalindaketakacetasavajulapunnagavakulatilaka- 
piyakahasanasñlasalalacampakásokanágarnkkhatiritibhüjapatta- 
loddacandanoghavane kálágalupadmakapiyañgudevadarukacoca- 
gahane' kakudhakutajaarnkolakaccikárakannikárakanaverako- 

randakovilárakirnsnkayodhivanamallikamanañganamanavajja- 
bhandisnrncirabhagipimáládimalyadhare játisumanamadhugan- 
dhikadhanukárikatálisatagarausirakotthakacchavitate atimuttaka- 
sarkusumitalatávitatapatimanditappadese harmsapilavakádamba- 
kárandavabhinadite vijjādharasiddhasamanņatăpasagaņādhivutthe 
varadevayakkharakkhasadānavagandhabbakinnaramahoragānu- 
сіппаррадеве’ — 

Evarüpe khalu bho ramme vanasande Punnamuk ho оёта 
phussakokilo pativasati ativiya madhuragiro vilasitanayana- 
mattakkho, tass’ eva khalu bho P-assa ph-assa addhuddháni 
itthisatäni рагісӣгіка dijakaññaáyo. Atha khalu bho dve dija- 
Каййёуо kattharn шиЁһепа dasitvá tari Р-аш ph-arh majjhe 
nisidapetvá uddenti, „mā пап P-ar ph-laù аддћапарагіуёуа- 
pathe kilamatho ubbáhetthá'“%“ 'ti. Paññāsa dijakaññáyo hetthato 
denti, ° „,вас"” йуаш Р. ph.' āsanā paripatissati' mayat) tam 
pakkhehi patiggahessëmñ“ "і. Pamññása dijakaññáyo uparüpari 
denti‘, „mā паш Р-аш рһ-аф ātāpo paritāpiti“, Paññása 
dijakaññáyo оЪћа(оразве denti‘, „mā паш P-arh ph-am sitam 
vā unham vā tinam vā rajo vë vāto vë ussávo vā npapphu- 
siti Paññāsa dijakaññšyo purato' denti*, „mā nam P-am 
ph-am gopåālakā vā pasupālakā vā tinaháraká vā kattha- 
háraká vā vanakammikā уй katthena vā Ка{һа]епа" vā pāņinā 
vā leddunā vā dandena уй satthena vā sakkharāhi уй раһёгаћ 
айашви, тауаш P. ph. gacchehi уй latāhi vā rukkhehi vă 
thambhehi vā pāsāņehi vā balavantehi vā pakkhihi!' sam- 
gümesiti“. Pañāāsa dijakaññayo pacchato'' denti sanhëhi sa- 


1 Bd kurå- ketakavidisamaññnlapunnagabahüla- ріуайкіћаяапаватајасашракіавока- 
kàlagulupaduka- дёгопаќесеваћапе. !* Bd tattbevayakkha-. 3 pd etha. * Ck: 
naccenti. > Bd adds вакопо. 6 Ck -pati-. 7 Cke repest pu-. 5 C? naccenti. 
* Ch kalena, Bd kathalšya. 1° Сіз -ohi, В4ә -ibi. !! Che repeat pae, 


4. Kunalajataka. (536) 491 


khilāhi mañjāhi* тадһогаһі vācāhi samudácarantiyo, ,,máyam 
P. ph. йвапе pariyukkanthiti*t“. Paññāsa dijakaññayo diso- 
disam denti nekarukkhavividhavikatiphalam āharantiyo, „mâ- 
yam P. ph. khudáya parikilamitthā“ ‘ti. Atha khalu bho dija- 
kaññāyo tam P-arn ph-am агатеп' eva агёашаф пууйпеп' eva 
uyyápam nadititthen' eva n-arh pabbatasikharen’ eva p-ar 
ашбатапеп' eva a-arh jambuvanen' eva ј-аф lambujavanen’ 
eva ]-arh nálikerasañjádiyen' eva?’ п-їїш* khippam eva abhi- 
sambhonti° ratatthāya*^. Atha khalu bho P. ph. tëhi dija- 
kaññahi divasarn paribbülho' evam pasamsati: ,„sādhu вё һа 
bhaginiyo, etam kho bhaginiyo {итһаКаш patirüpam' kula- 
dhitánarn° yam tumhe bhattárarh paricareyyāthā™“ "і, Atha 
khalu bho Р. ph. yena Kunalo s. teo’ upasamkami, addassurh '* 
kho K-assa s-assa paricáriká dijakaññáyo tahm Р-аш ph-arn, 
dürato ágacchantam disvána yena Р. ph. ten'upasarhkamimsu'!', 
upasamkamitvá tam P-am рһ-аш etad avocur: „ayain samma 
P-kha Kunšálo в. ativiya pharuso ativiya pharusaváco, app-eva 
nāma tavam'* рі ёратта piyavácam labheyyåmā“ 'ti. ,.Арр- 
eva náma bhaginiyo“ ti vatvā yeua К. в. ten’ upasamkarmi, 
upasamkamitvá K-ena s-ena ваййһїїї patisammoditvá eka- 
mantah півіроо kho P. ph. tam XK-am в-аш etad avoca: 
skissa tvah samma K-la itthīnah sujātānab kuladhitanarh 
sammiüapatipannšpam micchapatipanno *™, amanapabháninam рі 
kira samma K-la itthinah manápabhániná bhavitabbarm ki- 
mañga pana шарӣраЬћёпівап“ ti. Evah vutte' K. s. tam 
P-a ph-am eva apasādesi: „nassa tvah samma jamma 
vasala, vinassa tvarn samma jamma vasala, ko nu tayā viyatto 
jāyāyācitenā'*“““ ’ti, evarh apasādito va" pana P. ph. tato h’ 


Y Ва maññüht. ? Che рапа-. > Сх -Jātadiyeneva, Ce -Jadiy-, Bds -sañcarl- 
heneva. * СЕ -sañjátādi, Bds -sañcirarmn. $ Ва -bhenti. * Bd гац. 7 Cha 
divasapari-, Bd diväseipari-. ° Che -ра. # Ck -dhita. ° Bd ран-, 1 Ck 
addassu, Сё addasšsu, Bd addasāsub. !! Bd omits upa-. 1? Bd taù. !* Bå 
adda el. !° Ва -о. 16 во Cka; Dd Jàyājinenā, '7 Rd ca. 


35 


10 


15 


5 


422 XXI Asitlnipata, 


eva' patinivatti. Atba khalu bho Р-авва ph-assa aparena 
samayena nacirass' eva' kharo ābādho uppajji lohitapakkhan- 
dikā pabálbá vedanā vattanti' maraņantikā. Atha kbalu bho 
P-assa kokilassa рагісёгікарат dijakaññánarm etad abosi: 
„ābādbiko ayam Р. ph., app-eva оёта imambā ābādbā‘ vuttha- 
heyyā“ “і, eka adutiyahù ohāya yena K. з. ten' upasarh- 
kamimsu, Аддава° kho K. в. tā dijakaññāyo dūrato va āgac- 
chantiyo, disvāna tā dijakaññayo etad avoca: ,kaham pana 
tumhākam’ vasaliyo bhattā“ ti, „ābādhiko samma K-la P. pb., 
app-eva пата tamhā ābādhā’ vutțthabeyyā“ 'ti°, eva vutte 
K. з. tā dijakaññāyo evar apasādesi: ,,nassatha tambe vasa- 
liyo, vinassatha tumhe уавайуо coriyo dhuttiyo asatiyo lahu- 
cittiyo° katassa appatikārikāyo anilo viya yenakāmamhgamāyo“‘ 
ti vatvā yena P. ph. ќео’ upasamkami upasarnkamitvë tam 
Р-аф рһ-аф etad avoca: ,,ham'° samma P-khá“ ‘ti, „ham 
samma K-lā‘“‘ 'ti. Atha khala bho K. s. tam P-am рһ-аш 
pakkhehi ca tandakena са pariggahetvā vutthápetvë nānā- 
bhesajjáni рауйревї!!, atba khalu bho P-assa рһ-авва во 
ābādbo patippassambhiti. 

Ta. ріуака (1 setapupphš, hasani ti bakáro sandblkaro, авапйуаза!?, 
«іг И ekarukkbajáti, caadanā ti rattasurabhicandanā, oghavane ti ete- 
sa овһепа ghatāya'’ samanndgate vane, devadārukacocagabane't (1 
devadárurokkbehi c’ eva kadalibi ca gahane, kaccihārā ti ека rukkbajātt, 
kapikārā Ц шећариррЪё, каппікагё ti kbuddskapupphä, kimsuka tl vi- 
ghátaká!5, yodhiká ti yudbiká!%2, vanamailikamanañganamanavajja- 
bhandisuruclirabhaginimalamjlyadbare ti malljlkánañ са anañganánarh 
anavsjjanañ са bhandiparb suruciranañ са bbaginīinarib pupphebl malyadhaáraya- 
mâne, dbanukäri:i dbanupištall, 4а1}вй ti tāllsapattarukkbā, kedcharitate!" 


И etehl sumanadibl víitatapadikacchapabbstakaccbe!' sarmkusumitalesta 18 t 


tesu tesu [һапези sutthukusumitsatimuttakebi!" с eva nānāvidbalatāhi ca 39 
Yitatapatimanditappadese, tüpasasamanaganadbivutthe ti etesarh vljJa- 


dbaršdinain gspehi adblrutthe, P-mukbo ti?! mukhaparipunnatáya P-kho 2°, 


1 Bde увуе, % B2 adds ассауепа. 2 Bd рау-, * Bd adds паш, Bena. * Bà 
=ва. * Bd ќошһат. ' Ваг айа па. ? Bd ві. ° Bd ayo. 10 Che Һай. 1 
Ск увуй-. 19 so Сї# for авепо yeva? Pd šsanšyeva. 13 Вӣг вабаіарћа-. 14 Ска 
=cova-. 13 Ва уабадћајакё. !* Ck yutikš, Се suyūtbikā. '7 Ва gaccha-. '? Che 
-1мө. 1 Bd adbl-. #0 Ске „Јака omitting ca. 21 Ске omit pemukho ti. 23 Cka -КЪа. 


4. Kunišlajštaka, (526.) 423 


рагећі putthatāya phmussakokllo, vilasitanayano! ti vilasitanetto, mattak- 
kho 11 yathå mattšnarh akhhiní rattăni bonti evarh rattakkho pamānayuttanetto 
vā, bhaginiyo (1 ariyavohšárena šlapanarn, раг1сатеууаїһл 'tlsakaladivasarh 
gahetvā vlcareyyšths, Iù so р!уайа!һатй kathetvá uyyojeti?, адас! рапа K. э, 
һарагїтато P-mukbarn dasaanāya gaccbati kadäct Р. K-lassa santikarn gacchati, 
tenába: stha kbslu bbo tl, ssm ia 'И vayasse, ёрашта ti pațicce upanissiya, 
labheyyámia ‘tl K-nssa' santika piyavacanarh labheyyāma, appevanëmi 'tl 
apl nama labheyyama, vakkhami nan tl, sujātānan ti samanajitikanain, nassš 
"4 pslšya, jem ma 't! Іашака, vyatto ti ko nu? sadieo añüo vyatto пата 
аиы, јвуёувсі белпа t Jayajitena 5, ayam vā рИһо, аташ Ittbiparajitena tayā 
sadieo ko паша vyatto stthîti, tarh puna evarüpassa vacanassa ābbananatthāya® 
apasâdeti, tato һета? 'ti kuddho m. K. ti clntetvë tato yeva pajinivatti, so 
nlvattitvë saparivāro stano тавапа{{ћапаош eva agamāsi, appeva nāmā 'ti 
Barnsayaparivlitakko Imambš ābidbå vutthebeyya tã na vă tí етап cintetvë tam 
oháya pakkamimsu, tumben’ ti tumbákern, app-ora пата ‘tl tambā dhā 
vutthebeyya тй па vā, amhâkar šgatakšle mato bbariasati, mayah bi idšn' ева 
marlesatiti басуй tumhākarn pádaparicárikš bhavitu;h ааа tl, ten' upasarm- 


kamiti їшї itthlyo sümlkassa matakále āgatā patikkü]š bbavissáma 'ti tarb pabāya 
ägatā’ бапта mama sahâyan pupphaphaládini nānâbhesa)jáni sarnharitvë âro- 
garhi? kariseāmîti clutetvë nāgabalo M. ёківе!! uppatltvā yena во ten upa- 
sankami, һап ti uipāto, Jivasi sammā 'ti pucchanto evam йһа, itaro рі ‘ава 
jivâmîti vadanto Һат sammā ` аһа, pjäyäpesitl pšyesi, patippassambhiti 
тОравапќо. 


Тарі діјакаййауо tasmim aroge jāte āgatā. К. рі Р-Кһаф 
katipáharn phalāphalāni'* khādāpetvā tassa balappattakāle 
„samma tvsh idāni агоро ', attano рагісёгікаћі saddhirn vasa, 
aham рі attano уаѕапайћапайћ gamissámiti“ š. Atha nam во 
„imā” mam balhəgiláanam pahāya palātā'*, na те etšhi dhut- 
ПМ” attho“ ti а. Tam вшуйё M. „tena hi {е samma itthinam 
pāpabhāvarh ācikkhissāmîti“ P-am gahetvā Himavantapasse 
manosilátalarh netvā sattayojaniyasālamūle manosilāsane'* nisIdi, 
ekasmim разве P, sapariváro nisīidi. Sakala-Himavante deva- 
Еһоѕаоёсагі'": „ajja К. вакопагаја Himavati'° manosilāsane 
nisiditva Buddhaliiháya dh. девевваќі, tarn sunáthš“ ‘і param- 


V Ва -nā 2 Ba -s1 ? Ва adds tayā. * Bd јзуајіпепа * СЕ Bd Јауё-, * 
СА äbanattháya, Се ађћапас-, Ad аЪћапас-, Ве abhananat-. ! Bd yevā, ° Ск 
Чуаћап, С» tuyban. ° Ва adds ti ahah, Ве аһа. '° Bd а-. 1! Bds -ena, 
19 ра „Јепа. 1° Bd adds samme. !* Bda palšyauti. 5 Bd vasalihi, !°В4 
-lâtale, :' Bd деғаса-. 16 Bd -vante. 


10 


15 


424 ХХІ Asiinipšta, 


paršghosena chakāmāvacară devā ñatv&' yebhuyyena’ sanni- 
patińhsu, babū nägasnpappagijjhā ataviyam рі! Чеуй“* tarh 
atthath ugghosirñsu. Tadā Änando паша gijjharājā dasasa- 
Һавваріјјһарагіёго Gijhapabbate pațivasati, во pi tah kolā- 
halah sntvā „dh. sunissëmiti'“ saparivāro jāgantvā ekamantam 
nisidi. Nārado pi. рабсёъћійбйідраво dasasahassatápasapari- 
vuto Himavantapadese viharanto (атп Чеуарһовапай sutvā 
ssaháyo kira me K. itthinarn agunarh kathessati*, mayápi tarb 
desanarh sotum vattatiti' tëpasasahassena" saddhir iddbiyā 
ta. gantvā ekamantarn nisīdi. Buddhënarb degsanásannipáta- 
sadiso mahasamágamo abosi. Atha M. játissaraññánena itthi- 
dosapatisamyuttam atitabhave ditthakaáranarmn Р-аф* Кауа- 
sakkhim katvā kathesi. 


Tem attham pakāsento Satthā аһа: 

Atha khalu bho K. s. tam Р-аш ph-am gilânāvutthitam acire- 
vuțthbitan ре!айпё” etad avoca: ,dittha mayā samma P-kha Капһа'° 
dvepitikë '' pañcapatikā ув!° chatthe purise сїйаш patibaddhan ti" 
yā уайїййп kavandhe pițhasappimhiti'*“. Bhavati ca pan’ uttar 
ettha `` vākyam : 

1. Ath’ Ajjuno Nakulo Bhimaseno 
Yudhitthilo Sahadevo'* са rājā 
ete pati panca-m-aticca '' nëri 
akāsi'* khujjavamanena рёрап ti. 288. 

ЮНЬ тауа samma P-kha Ѕассвѓќарауї nāma samani su- 
вёпатајјће vasantli'' catutthabhattam рагіпёшеуашёрё, së °° tulāputta- 
kena’! рёраш аказі. Ditthë швуё s. P-kha Kākāti™ лаша dev 
samuddamajjhe уввепії bhariyā Venateyyassm? Națakuverena *' papam 
akāsi. ЮИШа mayā s. P-kha Kuraügavi' lomasundari”" Е|а- 


1 Bd sutvá. ? Bd adda tattha. 2? Bd -nnávijjadbaršdinarh pj, Bs -vjjjhštatavlaa- 
yampi. * Bd devatā. ° Cka япевашї. * Bd adds mahasamagamo bħavissati. 
т Bd -dasasahassona, ê Bd -khassa. * Bds gelañüštarn, Ска golaññańh. 1° Bd 
adde devī. 1 Bds dvī-. 12 sọ Cks for yasaā? Bd уо, Вә гаф. '* во Che; 
Bds -bandhi. 1* Bd pitha-, CEs pițțha-. 1% Ce pha-, Bd ma-. ìt Ва siba- 
17 Ва paticca, !% Bd акагі. '* ail three MSS. -1. ° Cks omit sā, 2! so (s; 
Ck tulahputtaibkens, Bd süravuttakena, Bz suradhu-. 33 Bd Ккакатаоц; se III 
р. 90. 2° Bd nəvat-. 1* -коррагепа ** Bds kuruñgadevi. ** СЕё _sudari. 


d. Kunālajātaka. 1536.) 425 


kamâāram' Кашауатёоа Chalañgakumāra - dhanantevāsioā’ pāpam 
akäsi, Evah һ' etan’ mayā ñatarm: Brahmadattassa mëtaram ohāya 
Kosalarājā* Pañcālacaņdena pāpam akāsi. Etë са аййй ca акашзи 
pāpam, tasmëham itthinam na vissase na-ppasamse, mahi yathā jagati- 
samānarattā vasundharā itaritarāpatițthā sabbasabā? aphandanā‘ 
akuppā tath'itthiyo!', tāyo na vissase naro 
з. Siho yathë lohitamarnsabhojano 
vālāmigo” pañcahattho° suruddho 
разауһаКһадї parahimsane rato 
tath’ itthiyo'°, tayo па vissase naro. 289. 
Na khalu'' s. P-kha vesiyo пйгїуо gamaniyo', na b’ etā bandha- 
kiyo" nâma, vadhikáyo nāma etāyo yadidam vesiyo nüriyo gamaniyo 
ti, сога viya veņikatā madir’ iva diddbā'' ғйпіја '° viya vācāsanthu- 
уо!“ ївзёзїйдаш iva parivattāyo uraga-m-iva dujjivhāyo sobbham 
iva pațicchannā рёїа!ат iva duppūrā rakkhasī viya duttosā'” Yamo 
v` ekantaháriyo sikhī-r-iva'” sabbabhakkhā nadi-r-iva sabbavāhi '* anilo 
туа уепвкаёшашсагё '° Neru viya avisesakōrā тіѕагикЕћо *' viya nicca- 
phalitāyo’” ti. Bhavati ca pan' uttar’ ettha vākyam : 
з. Yathë сого yathā diddho*' ғапіјо уа ** vikatthani?° 
issasiňgam ivàvattš' dujjivhaurago yathā™ 290. 
« Sobbham iva paticchanna pātālam iva duppurā 
rakkbasi viya duttosā Yamo у’ ekantahšriyo?' 291. 
в. Yathā sikbī nadi vāto Меги nāvasamākatā ° 
visarukkho viya pañcadhā*™ nāsayanti ghare bhogam 
ratanān’ antakaritthiyo;*' ti. 292. 
Ts. gilanavutrhltan t! patbamarb gllânara pacchavutthitan32, dițthā 
mayā tl atîte kira Brahmadatto Kasiraja sampannabalavāhşnatāya Кова!агајјаф 
gahotvä Kosalarajanarn maretva tassa аддашаћевіт sanplsinnagabbhari gahetva 


1 Cha elamšrskarh, Bd ејакакишёгатю. 2 Сг Bd -rarndha-. ? Bd evañhi-. * во С; 
Hds -jah 5° Сә sabbšsaba, Ck sabbissbš, * Ck atbenānā, ! Ck tali-, tathi-, B’ 
dati-. Š Сг valš-. ° Bd pañcšvuddho,. Bs -vudho, Ck pañcahatthe. !° Ck rat- 
thittbiyo, Се ttbiuhiyo, Bd tattittiyo. 1! Bd adds kho. !3 во all three MSS. 
19 Сіз na hetšvakavandhakiyo, !* so C»; Ck madirā viya visagiddhā, Bd madirš 
varițthā, 18 Bd -о. 1% Ck väcāyasatthutiyo. !? Ck dutto, Сг dbutto. !* all 
тее М59. slkbi-. 1° all three MSS. -. 20 Сіз -māvacarā. °?! pd -5, 3: 
Cha -liniyo. ?% Bd riiho. 3 Rd tí. 23 Ck vitattbati, Bd vikattani. 86 Bd 
lslñgamiva parivattā. 3! Bd dujivbš, 35 avisosa - - - wanting in Cs. 39 so Cs; 
Ck -вашёракё tl, Bd -samāgatā. '0 во Сә; Ck pañcada, Віз nlocapbelo. 3! СЕ 
ratanatthakaritthiye, Bd ratanānantaritthlyo, 33 Ck райса-, Bd paccānuva-. 


10 


15 


35 


20 


?5 


30 


35 


426 XXI. Asitulpata. 


Вагапазйй gantvi tab attano ageamahesih akisi, 34! aparabhāge dhitararn 
т1)ёуі, rañño pana? pakatiyā dbītā vā putto vā n` аны, во tussitvá: bhadda 
vararb ganhš?* 'i а., аа gabitakarn Каба thepesi, (авай pana komarikaya Kanha 


Чопёшай! karirnsu, ath’ assà vaysppattšys ratš t: ашта pitarā te varo dinno, 
tarh ahai ваһеста thapesirh, tava ruccanakarh vararh ganhâ “і ā.5, sk: шаућа < 
avijjamšnain? n`atthi, pətih gahanatthšya ° me sayaihvararn karehíiti kilesa- 
bahnlatāya hirottsppam bhinditvë mištarari â, së rañño šroceal, гіјЕ: уаїһї- 
гасі ° patiganhštü "(1 таста заумйуагый ghosišpesi. rajaügane sabbišlarhkšári- 
раїшапдИа babupurisa sanrnipatinsu. Kanbš pupphasamuggarm diya uttara- 
sihapañjare thitë olokenti ekam рі па тосеві, (аја Рапдогёјево((а(о!0 Ajjnno 
Макшо ВЬллавепо Yudhitthilo Sahadevo'' ti іше рейса Pandurijepnttë'2? 
Такказ(1ауа disapamokkha 
јёлівваша ‘ti vlcaranta Ва 


Ācariyassa вепике вірраті gahetva!3 desacārittarn 
вій» раїї&!* antonagare kolāhalath sutva россЬіке& 
tarn attbah ñatvë mayam рі gamissāmā ` Кайсапагораватёпагӣрё рабса 15 
рі ta. gantvā patipštiyš attharhsu, Kanhā te disvá pañeasu (еви patibaddha- 
сіна butva pañcannam рі sisesu mšlšëcumbatahšni kbipitvā: ашта іше paüca 
jane татошій !* å., ва rañño агосеві, гајё varassa dinnattë na labhissasití!" 
avatvà anattamano va kirpjštikš kasse рона ti pucchitvă Panduršjaputtsbbšvarh!9 
Qatvñ {ева 6akkarain katva tah pådaparicãārikarh adāsi, вй sattabhümakapáside 
te 19 kilesavasena sañganhi, еко рап' ass рагісёгіко khujjo pithasappI atthi, 
sā райса гајарице kilesavasena sañgaņhitvā tesan babinikkhantakšle оказа 
labbitva kilesena anudayhamānā khujjena saddhim рарап› karoti, tena са sad- 
dhiro kathontf: mayharb tayā sadiso ріуо п' atthi ršjaputte miàretvë tesath 
galalohitena tava рабе makkhapessšmiti!?t vadati, itaresu р! jJetthabhátikena 
misaibhütaksšle; imehi catühi Јапеһі (ғаш eva maybarh plyataro mayá jivitam pi 
tay’ attháya pariccattarb mama pitu ассауепа tuyharn yeva r. dàpessāmiti’? ca~ 
dati, itareh! saddhirh missībhūtakāle рі es' eva nayo, te ayah’! amhe piyšyatl 
isseriyañ ca no etah nissāya jātan ti tassā ativiya tusssnti, аб ekadivasaiı 
abadhika аһоз!, atha nań te parivāretvā eko sīrah sambāhanto nisidi eeså 
ekokain hatthaü ca pšdañ са, khujjo pana pšádamüle nisidi, aš sissrb вашЬаһа- 
müšuassa jetthabhaátikassa AJJunakumirassa: mayhan їауё piyataro п’ atthi 
jivamšnë tuyharn Jivissami pitu ассауепа {пуһаш r. dāpessāmiti sisena aaüüarh 
dadamānā tah sarbgarhi, itaresam рі hatthapšádehi tath’ eva saüññarh adāsi, 
khujjassa рапа: tvah бета mama ріуо ќат’ atthāya aharh jiviasāmiti jtvhäya 
ваййагп adāsi, (е sabbe рі pubbe kathitahhšvepa (Шуа saññāya tam atthsrb 
Jšnihhsu, tesu веза sttano діппавабӣёуо 2: }апїтвп, AJjunakumiro репа tassā 


1 Bd tå, Сїз omit ва. 7 Cis omit рапа. 3! Bd -hšáhi. “ Bd adds tar ёћа. Š 
Bd omits аһа. * Bd adds aññarn. ? во Сіз; Bd adda дһапаш. * Bd дапһапа-. 
+ Bd -Itarn. 1° Ck pandaršjë bhoggano, Сг pandarāja.bho. !! Bd sība-. !? 
Cis panda-. !? Bd ugga-. !* Bd patvā. !5 Bd adds paņndurājaputtā, '* Bda 
jane va me dehiti. '? C% -tīti. 1% CE -da ti. '? Bd -māti. 20 Bd papessa- 
witi. ?' Сёз се вап, 22 Hd -йуета. 


4. Kaonalajstaka. (536.) 427 


hatthapadajivhavikare disvā: уаһа mnayhari evarh зезїпаш рі ішёуа saüñaya 
diunach ! bhavisssti khujjena сёр! saddhin etlasš santhavensa* hhavitabban ti 
сіпќеста hhšataro gahetva hshi nikkhamitvā pucch!: (һа vo pañcapatika mama 
Sisavlikšrarn dassentiti, аше ditthë tl, kšraparb Jānāthā '1!, na Janama ‘И, Ideb 
nšàm' ettha karanarh : tumhšákar hatthapadehi dinnaaaññaya káraparh Jánšths "tu * 
amhikam рі ten’ ova kāraņena adšsiti, khujjassa Jivhávikšrena saññidianasss 
kšáranarh Jäoäthà '01, па Jjânāmā "11, atha nesarn Acikkhiträ Iminkpi saddbii 
etšya pšpakammarh katan tit, tesu araddhahauteau khujlarb pakkositvā pucchi, 
во ваһБЬаш pavawim каіезі, te tasea уасапагп sutvš (аяза vigatachandarāgā: aho 
matagëmo паша рёро dassilo, amhādise пёша Játlaampanne sobhaggappatte pa- 
Ьёув evarüpena Jegucchapatikkülena Шһи])епа seddhih раракаштәй Като, ko 
пёта paņditajàtiko eva) nillajjâh! papadhammiabi 100111 saddhim ramissatiti 
апекарагіуёуепа mštugšmarn garabitvā alam по вһагатёвепё ‘ti рїйсв janë 
Himevantam pavlsitvë kasipaparikammath katvā āyupariyosāne yatbákammarn 
gati, K. sakuņarājă Ajjunakumāro аһоз1, (вата 5 attenā dițthakāranarn dassonto 
dWthš шау ti šdlm 8. 

Ta. dvopltikš* t| Kosalarañño? Kisirañño ca vasen’ өй vattam, 
pañcapatikā уа “і paücapstika, yskāro nipātamatto, pațibaddbantiyā® ti 
pațihaddbhamanâ’, kavandhe!° ti’! tassa kira aiváya ^1 onamitva’® urar 
allinā tasmā chinnasiso viya khayati, pañcasmaticcš) “ti ete pañca atikka- 
mitvā, khujjavëamanenia ‘ti khujjena тётоаракепа :5, aparāni рі ditthapubbani 
dassento puna dltthš ti ādim šha, ta. pathamavatthusmiri (5а ауагп vibhāvranā: 
atte kira Bārāņpasiń nissāya Saccatapávi!! паше өөїавылапї susāno радпа- 
Bšlarh Кагебта ta. тавашалё сайа!!! bhattāni atikkamitvà bhuñjati, вакајапа- 
gare Cando viya Suriyo vlya са ракаја аһов!, B-sivāalno khipitvêpl'® khali- 
tvàpl пато Saccatapăviyã'® t! vadanti, ath’ ekasmim chanakile patbamadivase 
tšva suva0nakšrš ganabandhane 20 ekasmirm padese mandaparn kārotvāä?’! шассһа- 
Iarbsasurágandhamalšdini nətva?3 suršpšusrb šrabbirsu, ath' еко suvanpakšáro 
surådhltibako®? chaddento: namoSaccatapavlyš2?* tl vatvë akena panditens: ambho 
sndhabšla calacittāya itthiyā пато karosi aho bālo sitl 70110: samma mâ evarh 
атаса mà nirayasarhvattanikarh kamman’? kariti š., athe nar зо: dubbuddbi 
сапы hohl?" sahassena ahbhutarm Кага?? ahan te?’ Зассаїаріғій ?* Цо sattame 
divase alarhkatapaliyattarn Imasmir t(bšne лівіппо suravittbam >° gšáhšpetvà surath 


Vao Bd; Cke-i. 9 Bd вапдћетепа. ? Віз add ёша }апёта ti. * Dd adds 
vatvá. ° В tattha. © Rds adds са. 7 Ні? dvi-. * во Ck; RZ patibandhlyš, 
Сг patihaddhantibaddhaya, ° Cks ра(Байдһашарё, Bd -baudhamânā. 10 Oks 
tav-, Bd kaphante, '? Ске рі. 13 Bdsz givā. !3 Bd -etvá. +‘ СЁйрайсары!ша- 
Чеса, Cs pañcapatīmaticcã, Вё рабсаракіссё. !$ Bds адд idan vatvā, 16 Ck 
-рёрі, C#-páci, Bd -pāvi. 171 Bd adds divasšni. 8 Che omit рі. Ü all 
three MSS. раріуа °° B4 ganšbandhena. 1 Bd katsā. *: Bd šhareuvi. 32 
Chs -vitthako for vittako? 2* Ck -расіуё? Pd -papiyá. 2 Che omit ka-, #* 
Ва adde tl. 37 Bd karoti, 2° Bd ќат. 2° Bd -pāpi. 39 so Ско for -vittakarh? 
Bd -dhithakarh. 


10 


15 


35 


30 


10 


15 


30 


95 


80 


428 ХАІ. Asitinipats. 


річівеёші miütugamo dhuvasilo n attbîtl а, во па sakkhissasiti vatvë tena 
saddhirn ваһеввепа abbhutarh akāsi, зо! aññemarn аптаппаййгапап ärocetvă 
punadivase pšto va tāpasavesena suaānarn pavisitvā tassi үтазапа!{һапавза avi- 
dūre suriya namasssnto ațthā»sl, së bbikkhāäyaYgeccbamšnā tar dlssā: mabid- 
dhiko tåpaso bhavissatl ahan tāva susãnapsseo vasšmi пуа majjhe susānassa 


bhavitabham ass’ antarana?’ santadhammena vandissšmi man 11 upasankamitvā 
vandl, во n’ eva olokesi na рі šlepi, dutiyadicase рі tath’ eva akšsi, tatiya- 
divase pana vanditakšle adhomukho ve gacchā 'ttā, catutthadivase kacci5 
bhikkhāya na kilamasitl patiaanthāram akāai, sā palisanthāro mə laddho ti 
tuth pakkami!, pañcamadivase bahutarari patisanthāraro lahhitvá thokah nisi- 
ditvš даса, chețihsdivase pana їзїї āgaotvā vandltva nisinnarh: bhagini Ып nu 
kho ajja Bārānasiyańı mehāgítavāditasaddo “(Í vatvā: ayya tumhe na јапёћа 
nagare chano ghuttho ta. kilantāna ева saddo t! vutte: ettha nām’ osa saddo 
ti ajànanto viya butvá: bbagini katibhattānl atikkamasîti puechl, cattāri ayya * 
tumhe pana kati atikkamethë 'ti, satta bhagintti, 1дагй so musā abħāsi*’, dova- 
sika h’ өва ratti bhuüJatl, s07: kati te bhagini vassāni pabbajitāyā 'Ч 
pucchitvä tiya dvà vassānÎti vatte tumhāka kati hit! vutto' idar 10 
сһа!{һай vassen ti š., atha паб: atthi pina te bhagini santadhammidhigamo 
ti pucchitvā п' ettbi ayyš 1! tumhākam panat? atthitl vutte mayam рі n’ 
atthiti vatvå; hhagini mayah n’ eva kámssukham labhšma па nekkhammasqkharh 
Мг ашЬайат! yeva unbo nirayo mahšjanassa kiriyarh karoma аһа gihi'5 bha- 
vissāmi atthi шө !* mātu вапїайаг|!? dhana па sakkomi dukkhar anubhavitan 
ti 3., sā tassa vacanerp sutvā sttano calacittatšya!" tasmlth patibaddhacittā hutva: 
ayya aham рі ukkanthitā sace шат па сһафде!һа!! abam pi gihlni bhavi 
mîtl &., atha пап ao pi: ehi na taù cheddessāmi bhariya me bhavlasasiti 
(ar падагатп pavesctvë sarnvasitvi <пгёрїпатапдарап gantvă tāya suršvittha- 
кай !* gāhāpetvā surah pivi, itaro sahaseajito'?, ва taim ра(сса puttadhitšhi 
vaddhi, tadā K. putto”? аһові, so tah :kārənahm ābaritvā dasaento ditthš ti 
àdim a. 

Dutiyavatthusmirn #1 atītakathāya catukkanipāte Кай ātijātakavənņanāya?? 
vlitharita, tadā репа К. Garulo ahosi, tasmā attanā dittham pakāsento ditthá 
mayà ti ádim 2., tatiyavatthusmirh 3: atite Rralmadatto Kosalarājânarn vadbitva 
r. gahetvā tassa aggamahesirh gabbhinih?* ädāya Bārāņasiń: paccāgantvà Lassë 
gabbhinibhāvarn Jananto pi (ага aggamahesińh akási, sā paripakkagabbhā’’ su- 
уаппагарайазай1ваїй putta vijäyitvä: vuddhlppattam pi nam Bârānņasirājā esa 


1 Bd adds tarn, > Сә -tare, Bd -passabbhantare. ? ВӘ kiñci. * Bê аууёпі. 
5 CH bh * Bd во sadà. 7 Bå adde tarb. ° Ске omit te. 9 Bd kati vassâni 
ti vatto. '° Dd adds ше. !! Сіз omit natthi and ti. 1 Bè pi. '' Сөз, 
Ва М. 1#* На adds па. 15 Çh: -Ц-. '* Bd bāla-. 17 Bd -essatha. '? Се 
-citthakah, Bd -dhijhakan, !# Cs -mjito, Bd -ssena jito. 20 Bda suradhuttaho. 
11 Bde tatiya-. 32? cfr. III p. 90, Вё kākavati-, 7? Bs catukka-. ?* Bds 
sag-. ?* Bd раприппа-. 


3. Kunalajštaks (536.) 429 


ше рассёші(ќазва рио kib Imina ti шёгёревва! mā ше putto регаћа((ћепа 
шагай 'ti cintetvi: amma ima mama ! dšrakarh pilotlkarh attharitvë šmsakasusáne 9 
nipajjšpetvë ehfti &, dhšëti? tathā katva nahštva t расевдаші, Kosalarājâpl ma- 
ritvā puttassa šrakkbadevstë butvā nibbatti, tassënubbšavena ekassa elapšlansa 
(ваші padese elakā varentassa ° ека eļikā tah kumara disvå sinehaih прра- 
дета kbirarn pāyetvā thokarb caritva ропа gantvë dve tayot cattāro таге pā- 
yost, olakapālo tassa Mkiriyan: disvā tah thënarp gantva tarb darakarm disvā 
puttasineharñ paccupattbapetva attano bhariyaya айёві, sü pana sputtikā, ten’ 
asså thañüarh' n'atthi, atha nam elikā khirar eva payesl. tato patthaya devasikarh 
dve tisso ellkšë meranti, elakapālo: imasmirh patijaggiyamane sabbā elikā marissanti 
kih nojimina ti tariù ekasmirn mattikabbajane nipajjāpetvā aparena pldebltvā māsa- 
спппепа шокћаћ nibbivaraih limpitva? nsdiyā тівкајјев!, tam enar vaybamānarn 
boțthātittho rājanivesane jipņapejisarnkLārako eko candālo sapajāpatiko mukbarh 8 
dhovanto dlisvă vegena gantvă āharitvā tire thapetvā kim ottbāä `d vivaritvā 
olokonto датайай passi, bhariyëpi ‘вва aputtikā, (авва? tasmirh puttasineho 
nibbattj, atha nar geha netvà patijaggi, tarh sattatthavassahšlato patthaya 
mëtápitaro rājakularh gaccbantā абауа gacchanti, solasavassakšlato pajțhāya во 
св 10 babulah gantvā Jinnapatisarhkharariarh!i! karoti, тваййо. ca aggamahesiyā 
Kurañgavil) пата dbitá ahosi uttamarūpadbarä, sā tassa ditlhakaálato ра(- 
tháya іаво patlbsddhacitta hutvā aññattha anabhiratā tassa kammakarapatiha- 
nam ova āgacchati, tesan sbhinhadassauena'!?' aüñamaüñarn patibaddhacittšnarh 
antorājakule yeva paticchannokšáse ajjbācāro ратасіі, gacebante kale рапсап- 
häyo’* raño ёгосевшш, таја kujjb!tva ашассе sannipātetvā: iminā candāla- 
puttena imar’? nama katara imassa kattabbarh jānāthā 'u á., ашасса: шаһа- 
paradho ева nāoāvidbā’® kammakaraņnā’” karetva paccbā пай māreturo vațța- 
titi vadihea, tasmim khane кошагавза pità ärakkbadevatä tass’ eva kumärassa 
matu вагіге adhjmuccl, sā deršnubhávena!  rajanern цравафкатііча: mahārāje 
nëyam Кошаго candšlo esa mama hucchlemim nibbatto Kosslarañño putto аһаш 
putto me mato ti tumhäkah masā avacarh aham etam tambškam paccaámittassa 
putto ti dhatiya!? datvā āmakasusāne chsddāpesiin atha nah eko elapšlako 
patijeggi so attano elikāsu marantisu nadiyā ратаћеві atba па vuyhamânam 
ашһайатп :° gohe jlunapalisarukhaárako caņdālo diavā posesi sace оз saddehbatha 
to sabbe pakkosšpetva pucchathā "і, гаја dbātiń*! 2010 katva sabbó pakkosā- 
petvā pucchitvā tath’ ета tar pavattim sutvā jātlsampanno kumāro ti tuțțho 
Хаш nahāpetvā alarnkarapetva tas’ eva dhitararh adāsi, tassa pana olsbānam 


1 Cs Bd omit mama. * Bd ägamaka-. * СЕ ccātt? Се dhăti, Ad Jati, + Bd netvs. 
3 Ваз -ko сёгепіавев. * Chs tatiye in the place of dve tayo. ' Bd viie. * 
Ва makaci. * Bd tamā. '° Bd sveva !! Bd gebajinnapatiasñkbā, '? Bde 
kuruñgadevi. !2 Bd abhinnarbvad-. !* Bd adda sutvā, В» бабта !5 Bd idaro. 
16 Ва -a. !? Bd pam. 18 Bd dovata-. © pd -yo. 3° Bds tum-. *%' Ck 
дһай, Bd -tiyo. 


10 


15 


30 


10 


15 


26 


430 XXI. Asitinipato. 


mäāritattà Ejakamāro’ ti пашага Шагішеп ?, ath’ essa гаја sasenavšhanarh datvë: 
вассћа attano pitu santakarb г. ganhš ’ti tah’ uyyojesi, so Ы Knurañgavir * 
з@ёуа gantvš rajje patitibšsi, ath’ assa Вагадавітаја anuggahitaslppo syan ti 
sippasikkbäpanattbai Chslabgakumiararp паша šrariyarn t katvā peses), so tassa 
ñcariyo me t! senāpatițthānarn adāsi, aparabbāge Когабдатї‘ tena saddbih anā- 
сагаю skasi, senaparino р! paricārako* .Dhenanteršsi паша attbi, so tassa hatthe 
Когайватіуё! vatthâlankārâdīn! pesesi, вё tenâpi saddhic pāpam akāsi, R. tan 
kšraparh šharitvë dassento dittbë mayš ti айп iba. 

Та. Іошааопдагій romarajiya mandjituuudara?, Chalañgakum ára- 
dhanantevasinaëa ti Flakamaárakarn' райЬеуашгпёрі Chalañgakumarasena- 
patina 10 ca tass’ ета і! paricārikena dbenantevāsinā ca saddbi papar айазї, 
ovan anâcârå'? itthiyo dnuasija papadbamma, tenëham tä!’ na-ppasamsamiti, 
Idah M. вет abaritva dassesi, во Ы (айа ChalaŌgakumāro abosl, (азо 
attană dittbakárapari ёћап. 

Psücamavatthosmim рі atite Kosalaraja Baranasirajjarn gahetva В-вігабйо 
aggamabesirb gabbhinim pi aggamhesih Ша(та sakanagaram eva gato, ^а apara- 
bbáge puttan vijāyl. гаја aputtakattā сат puttasinehena positva!* sabbasippani 
alkkbāpetvä vayappattarn айапо pitu santakarh г. gaphā 'И ревев!, so tattha 
gantsā r. háresl, ath' авва 0214 рокат passitukám' amhîti Ковајагёјапага 
арпесһїїтї mehāparlvārā Матапазїй gacchanıī!* dvinneh ratthánam antare 
ekasmirm nigame pnivëssm ganbi, ta. eko Райса!асапдо nāma brahmanakumiaro. 
atthi ebbirüpo, so tagsš pannškaracb ujenesi!$, sā tah disva va patiņaddha- 
сиё tona saddhirn рарайашшаш!? katvā Кайрёђаф tatth' eva vitināmetvi 
B-sińh gantva рицмй disvā kbippam nivattitvā puna taemirm yeva nigame ni- 
vāsab gahetvă Кайраһаф (епа ssddhirm апасагаш_ caritva Kossisnagararh gata, 
sā tato patthšya пасігавв’ eva tarb (айб, kšraparb табха puttassa sanlikarh gac- 
chissamiti!* ;šJanarn āpucehitvā gacchanti ca āgacchantīi ca tamin nigame 
addbamāsamatia tena ssddhirn апасагаш сат}, seawpupnņpamukhalttbiyo паша!* 
duasila musāvādiniyo ti, idam рі абат dassento’? етап h’ etan ti"! 
adlm аһа. 

Та. Brahmadattassa måâtaran ti Вагаїп 


irajjah Шатеп{азва Hrabma- 
cando abosi, tamā (ип 


dattassa Котатавва шаага, (айа kira K. Pañ 
абала Āātah karaparn dassento втаф š, Etācā '1 samma Punnamuhha eti 
са рейса itthiyo paparh akathsu, һа аййа ti saññarh mà kari, atha kho eti ca 
añüš са bahü pāpakammakārikā ti, ішағшіт !hane 1һаїуа loko aticarininarm 
vattbüni kathetabban!, jagatîti yathā jagatisahkbātā mahi samānarattā t| 
pațigbābhävena sabbesu samaratta 32 hutvå ға vasundbsra itarītarāpatițțbā 


t Bds elakakumaáro. ? Bd akarùsu. 3! Che omit tah. * Bda kurañgadevi. * 
Ck аса. * Ck Ed ikọ, 7 Га kuruñgadeviyā. * Ске -udārā. * Bd: elskumára- 
kai. 19 Cks -kumárarngqe-. '! Bd -ввета. !? Cks-ra, 12 Che tarn. 1* Rde 
-etvā. 15 Ck eati, Рё -anto. 19 Bds -nāmesi. !! Bd pāpah. }% Bde gac- 
chamit, 1° Rds nāmetā, 9° Віз add mabāsstto. ®’ Ck hetanatthi, C! bəta- 
nanti. 23 Раз samāna-. 


4. Kanalajštaka. (536.) 431 


tE? uttamšnañ cs adhamanañ са patiitha hoti tathā? itthiyo pl kilesavasona 
aabbesam uttamadhamanam pailțthā honti, itthiyo bi okšsarh 1аЬһашапа® ke- 
nacl* ваййһиһ рёраф * karont! пата, sabbasahā ti yathā са ва® ааһһаш eva 
sahati na phandsti” ne kuppati? tatba Huhiyo sabbe рі purise' Jokassš- 
davasena!?2 ввћалії, saca tasaih косі рогіво citte patitthito va hotl (алза!! rak- 
Ъһапайһаш na phandsnti!! ла kolšhalarn karonti?? nama, yathā са вз па 
kuppati na celati evam itthiyo methunadhammena na kuppsnti na calanti па 
вакка tena pūretu, vålamigo ti dntthamigo, райсаһа!һо!* tl mukhassa 


e' eva catunnañ ca caranšnarh Vasen’ etan vutia, suruddho tl suluddo su-` 


pharuso, tath’ itthiyo tl yathā sihassa mukhaü с' eva! cattāro hatthapadi 
ti pañcavudhani tsthš ltthioarù rüpasaddagandharasapotthahhan] paücavudhani, 
yathā во attano hhakkharb ganhanto teh! pañcabl pi ganhati tathâpi!* kilosa- 
bhakhharn ganhamana rüpšdihi avodbehi реһагісуё ganhanti, yathā во kakkhalo 
pasayha khadatl evar etšpí kakkhala pasayhs khadika'", tathā h’ otā thirasile 
рі purise attano balena paseyhakārah katvā #Паз1пазапп papenti, yathā во 
рагаһїтївапө rato ета’ têpi kilesavaaena parahirbsane!" ratā, tayo)? (Ц tš 
етап agnuasamannagatá, tasu)2 па visssse паго, дашап!уо?! ti gaņnikāyo, 
I v.h.: samma P-kha уап’ etāni Ittbinar vesiyo ti айти пашапі па etšul 
шаат sabhâvato vutiânl’?, па h’ etā veslyo пата nāriyo пата na’! gamauiyo 
паша na vandhakiyo?’’ паша, eabhāvsnämato pana vadhikayo? nama etāyo yá 
etā veslyo пёпуо!* gamaniyo 11 хоссагиі?!, vadhikayo 117® samikaghštikayo, 
yam attho Mabäharsajātakena dipetabho, vuttarh h' elam: 

Mayá с' ева mariciva soko rogo с’ прайдато (supra р. вт) 

kharā ca bandhanā c’ eta maccupaáso2? guhásayo 2* 

tăsu yo vissase poso so naresu патафһешо ti, 
venikata ti Каѓағепіуо, yathë hi molih handhitva ataviyarm (hitacoro Janam 
vilumpail evam etåp! kilesavasarn2° netvā dhanamh?! vilumpanti, шадігіта 


dlddha! (1 vjsamissasurā viya, yathā sā?’ vikāra dasseti evam eva (йр! 
aññesu purisesu särattā kiccškiccarh sjānantiyo aññasmirh kattahhe айбаш eva 
karont! vayovikširarn t dassonti, vācāsanthutiyo? el yatbā vāpijo attano 
bhandassa vannam ova hhanati evam etåpl attano aguparh patlcchadetvá дипаш 
eva раказепи, parivattayo!$ ti ума issāmigassa’! sigah parivattitvš 
thitan eraro labucittatāya рі 95 parivattā yera honti, uragamirā 'd urago 


1 Che omit d. 9 Bd hatharb. * Cis -nam, * Cè? па kenaci, > Che add па. 
* Che omit să. 7 Ck pandati, Bd omits ph-. * Bd adds па calati. „’ Bd 
sabbesu pūrisesu, 19° Ck: naloh-, L Bd tassš, Ck omits tassa. !% Rds -ati 
18 Ва „он, 1% Bd? pañcavudho, 18 Ске mukhe ceva, !* Bd tathā р '! 
Bd -itā. 18 Bd -sāya. 19 Ck tae, 3° Bd omita tā-. 31 во Bd; СЕ gamani, 
Са gamatiyo. %12БФ sabhävanãmāni. ?* Cha vass-. 14 Bd bs-. ?5 Bd vadhitšyo. 
30 Ck adde па. $! Cks-antiti. 35 Ck omits ti. 2# Bd Qa. 20 Bd -vanah, 35 
Bd Јапаф. #? Ваз „гааг, 92 Pd yathassā. 9% Сә yovi-, Bd’ viparitākārar. 
93 Che „алое, Bd -запћа-. 3% Bds сіра-. 5! Bd jsimi-. (е Bd vi. 


15 


0° 


10 


15 


20 


35 


30 


432 XXI Asitnipata. 


viya musavaditaya dujjivha nama, sobbbamivā '(1 yatba pațiccbanno ' gutha- 
каро eva vatthālarıkārapațicchannā һи(тї vicaranti, умһа са? kacavaradi- 
ре(ісећаппо āvāto akkanto padadukkharb janeti evam еїїр1 viesāsena upasevi- 


уашёлі, patšlamiva '(1 уа(һ& mabāsamudde patalarnp duppüursrb evam өгёрі 
methunena ={Јаувпепа alarnkarena tl (Ы duppūrā, ten’ evàba: tinnam bbi. 
dhammanarb atítto matugamo ti ādi, rakkhasi vlya 'ti yatbā rakkhasi nama 
marhsagiddhataya dbanena па sakki tosstarn bahum рі dhənarüñ patikkbipitvä 
шабаш eva pattbeti evsm etñpi methunagiddhataya bahunêpi dhanena па 
Yamo 


tussanti dhanaiù aganatva methunam eva реићехиі, Yamo vā 'ti ум! 
ekantabaro? па kiñci paribarati evam е!йрї jatisampannadisu па kiñci paribaranti 
sabbarh kilesavaseDa silavinäsarh pāpetvā daotiyacittaváre nirayah wqpanenti, 
alkbirivā 'ti yatha sikhi suclm pi азпсїт рі заба bbakkhayatl tath’ eva 
thpi hinuttame sabbe sevanti, nadiupamāya рі es` eva nayo, уепаКашашсага 
ti bhummatthe karanavacanarn, ysttha atāsarnh kāmo hoti tatth' wa dhāvanti, 
Nerü 'ti Himavati oko suvannapahbato taib прадасі‘ kăkâpi suvannavanpápi 
honti, yatbä so evan etëpi nibbisesakarāä’ attānaı upagatarh ekasedisero katvā 
passanti, visarukkho ti ambasadiso kimpakkarqkhkho, so nieéam eva phalati 
vannadisampauno са? hoti, tena tah nirásarhká paribbuñjięvā maranti, eva 
etàpi" rüpádivasena ° niccaphalitä'? татапїу& vlya khäyanti, ветіуашёпа pa- 
mäda uppšdetva !! арауезц pātenti, tena çullarh: 
Хуацт 12 dosarn nëññaya '2 уо каше patisevatl 
vipākante bananti пат kimpakkam iva bbakkhitan ti 

умһа vā viearukkbo niccaphalito’* sadā апаа ча 15 boti evam etápi sîlādivi- 
nāsavasena’® yathā visarukkhassa mülam рі taco рі pattam рі puppham р! 
phalam pi visam evà '(1 niccaphalo tath’ etāsah'? rūpam pi -pe- potthabbarn 
pi visan vsā 'ti visarukkho viya niccaphalitajho Ч. punaruttaran!š й 
gātbābaudhħanena tam attbań päākatatarath'® katurn evam aha, ta. ratana nta- 
karitthiyo29 ti sãmikob! dukkbasambbatānarb ratananarh antarāyakarā ittblyo 
tani рагевага Јата snācārarn caranti. 


Цорагаш nānappakārena attano dhammakathavilasam dassento 
āba, сабаг’ imāni samma P-kha yani kicce jāte anatthacarāni”’ bha- 
vanti tāni™ parakule па vāsetabbāni: ропат dhenurm yānam bhariyam 
свійбгі еіарі pandito уапі gharā уірратаѕауе'° 


1 Bds рајагара(1-. 2 Сќг omit са, ? Bd -māro. < Сё -а. > Bd -ava. * Ві 
-kārā. 7 Ске va. Š Bd ekâpi, omitting етап. ° Bds -10аввапауавепа. !9 Bd 
À-lataya. 13 Сї#ара-‚ 12 СЕ ayati, Bd āyati, !*# Cke na 14 Bde Jlatta, 
5 СЕ апалі va, Са snattbš vaho, Bd ар аса сд. '* Bd -sanavasena, !? Bd 
tathovatāsu. !° Bds punamaru-. °° Bd „аф. ?° Bd -пепіка-. ?! Bd snattha- 
kāri. 33 Cks omit kicce jate anatthakari tani. C% рћегёпі пірра-. 


3. Kunalajataka. (535.) 433 


a. Gonam dbenui са уёпаб са! ` 
bhariyam ñätikule na +йзауе, 
bhajanti? ratharñ ajānakā’, 
ativāhens hangot(i puñgavarm, 293. 
z, Dohena hananti vacchakam, 
bhariyā Āētikule padussatiti. 294. 
Cha imëni samma P-kba уаш'* kicce jāte anatthacarāni bhavanti: 
agunam dhanum ñātikule* ca bhariyā cëram  nëvë' akkhabhaggañŭ 
са“ yānah düremitto pāpasshāyako” са kicce jāte anatthacarāni '° 
bhavantiti. Atthahi khalu samma P-kha thānehi itthi sāmikam ava- 
jānāti'': daliddatā абигаїа jiņņakatā surasoņdakatā muddhatá'' pa- 
mattutà sabbakiccesu anuvattenetā sabbadbammarh '° апоррадапера'“, 
imehi khalu s. Р-Кһа atthahi thānehi itthi sëmikar avajánšti, Bha- 
1 vākyanù: 
a. Daliddahn šturañ câpi jinnakam зигазопдаКаш 
pamattarn muddhapattañ са '* гайбат !' kiccesu '" hëpanam 
sabbakāmapadānena !* avajānanti sāmikan ti. 295. 
Navahi khalu s. P-kha {һёпеһї itthi padosan ābarsti™®: агёшарда- 
manasīlā ca hoti uyyānasīilā“' са hoti nadititthugamanasilë ca hoti 
ñātikulagamanasīlā ca hoti parakulagamanasilā ca hoti adásadussa- 
шарјапёпоуораш '° anuyuttasilā ca hoti majjapāyini ca hoti nillokanasilā 
ca hoti padvaratthayini?? ca hoti, imehi khalu s. P-kha navahi thānehi 
itthi padosam üharatiti. Bhavati са pan uttar’ ettha** уакуат: 
ә. Arãmasilă’™ иууйпаш ° nedi ñātiparakular '° 
dussamandanam'' anuyuttā уа с' itthi тајјврауіві‘" 296. 


vati са pan' uttar’ ettha 


14, уй са nillokanasīilā уй ca padváratbayini?' 

navahi etehi thānehi райозаш aharat' itthiyo™. 297. 
Cattālīsāhi khalu s. P-kha thānehi itthi рипзаш accāvadeti*' vijam- 
bhati vinamati уПазаі vilajjati nakhena nakham ghatțeti pšdena 
pšdam akkamati? katthena pathavim likhati darakam ulamgheti 


1 read: gavañ са - - yina са? 2 Bd bhuñjanti, Ck bhaJjanti for bbañj-? ? 84 
дуз. * Bd adds vatthüni. ` Ске „Ја, * во Ck [ог cara? Nd vāram, Сг ратый 
1 Ске паташ. ° Ba агіккћа hhañgañca. * Сг pāpāsbbācako. '° Bd’ -karani. 
11 Баг add hbavati са manuttarettha vakyarn. 12 Bd murhata, Вг muddatā ™ 
Вах sabbadhane. '* so Ilda; Ck anuppäpadena, С* anuppapana. !5 СЕ” panu-. 
16 Ва -ttarañca, '7 Ck rathanam. !® Bd sabbaki-. 1% во Cks; Bd panldbānena. 
зо Rd .antil. 3! Rds -gamapasila. W? Bd 20&ув-. 2?Š Сз pañcadvā-, Bd padviraylul, 
24 Bd ma-. 2° Bd add ca hoti. 2* во all three MSS. 3! Bd adayadu-. В adi- 
sadu-. 26 Bd -па- 39 Che -(thá-, 29 Bd erante 5: Bd ajjhārati, >29 Bd -ml. 
lataka. Y ов 


10 


35 


30 


35 


434 ХХІ Asiinipšta, 


olamgheti' Каб kīļāpeti cumbati cumbāpeti bhuñjeti bhuüjapeti' 
dadëti * āyācati* katam anukaroti иссаш bhāsati nicah bhāsati avic- 
саш bhāssti viviccam bLhāsati пассепа gitena vāditena roditena vilasi- 
tena vibhusitena jagghati pekkhati paticšleti guyhabhandakam sañ- 
саіеі urum vivarati ürum pidahati thapam дазѕеіі kaccharm dasseti 
nābhiù dasseti akkhim nikhanati' Ьһатикаш ukkbipati ottbam pali- 
khati° jivham palikhati' jivham nillāļeti® дизваш muñcati dussarm 
bandhati' sirasam muñcati зїгазатп '° bandhati, imehi khalu s. P-kha 
cattalisahi'' thanehi itthi purisam ассёғајай '°.  Pañcavisëhi khalu 
s. P-kha thšnehi itthi padutthā veditabba bharati: sāmikassa parāsnm 
vanpeti pavutthah'? na-ssarati agatam nàbhinandati avannam tassa 
bhanati vannam '' tassa па bhanati опвићаф tassa carati attham 
tassa па carati akiccarh tassa karoti Кїссаш tassa па karoti parida- 
hitvā sayati parammukhi nipajjati parivattakajātā ° kho pana hoti 
kumkumiyajātā '^ digham assasati dukkham vediyati иссагаравзайташ 
abhinham gacchati vilomam асагаќі parapurisasaddam sutvë kanna- 
sotam vivarati (ат odahati!'' nihatabhogā kho pana hoti pativissakehi 
santhavam karoti nikkhantapada kho pana hoti visikhānucārini ati- 
сагїһї kho pana hoti апке agšáravë padutthamanasamkappi '*, imehi 
khalu в. P-kba pañcavisáhi'*° thànehi itthi padutthë veditabbā bhava- 
6°. Bhavati ca pan ийаг ettba vákyurm: 
11. Pavāsam assa [vanneti] gatam nànusocati, 

disvā patim араат nàbhin8ndati, 

bhattāra *! уаппаш na kadāci bhāsati, 

ete paduttháya bhavanti 1аКЕһалё. 298. 

1з. Anattham tnssa?'? сагаї1*° asaññata, 

atthañ са hāpeti akiccakārini, 

paridahitva sayati `* parammukhi, 

ete paduttbaya bhavanti lakkbanā. 299, 


* Bd ulernghipesu. * Ck bhojā-, Са bhujá-. > Ске dadati. * Bde yas. 5 Сн 
-пай, Bd nikkhanati. * Bd upsikkbati. 7 Rd omita Jivharh ра-. * Bd nille- 
lati. * Bd patib-. !'° С mirarbsarh. 0 Bd sebi. 12 Bd agbācarati, © Bde 
—-tthari, Се pavumsarh, Ck ратиссаваш. !* Ck omit tassa bh. v. 15 Cka рата-. 
18 Ва kubupiya-, Вг kukammiyas-. 17 Ске omit tita. ° Ва adds абһїлһаш 
dvàre titbati kacchini angšni thanšui dasseti disodisarn garbtva pekhhati. '* 
Ваг -visatl. 20 Bds -antiti. 2! во all three MSS. 33% so Сх for anatthamassa, 
Ва anatthari; tasseva. °? all tbree MSS, -ú. 


4. Kunalajitaka. (586.) 435 


в. Parivattakajatë' са bhavati' kurmkumi, 

dighañ са assasati dukkha vediti’, 

uccārapassāvarh abhinha' gácchati, ete еіс. 300. 
1. Vilomam carati аКїссаКйёгїрї*. 

saddam nisāmeti рагаѕѕа bhasato. 

nihaiabhogā са karoti santhavam, ete ete, 301. 
зь. Кїссһепа jaddhah kesirābhatam dhapam 

vittah vinăseti dukkhen8 sambhatam. 

patțiviseskebi са Квго(ї santhavam, ete etc. 302, 
зв Nikkhantapādā visikbānucārini 

nicca sasãmimhi padutthamanasa 

aticārinī hoti tath' еу’ agāravāļ', ete etc. 303. 
12. Abhikkhanam titthati dvāramūle 
thanāni kacchāni ca’ dassayanti, 
disodisarn pekkhati bhantaceittë, ete etc. 304. 
Sabbā nadi vamkagati' sabbe katthamayā vanë 
sabbitthiyo kere papam labhamāne” nivátake. 305, 
Sace labhetha khanam vā raho vâ 
nivñtakarn !° vàpi labhetha tădisarn 
sebbā са itthi kareyyum no'' раёраш 
айдаш aladdha'”pithasappinápi [saddhin], 306. 
зе. Narānam ārāmakarāsu nārisu 

впекасійазч aniggahāsu са, 

sabb' айана '? pitikaràpi vesiyā '', 

па vissase, titthasamā hi оёгіуо (і. 307. 


Та. gonan dhenun ti libgavipallasena vuttab, пай кое padussatiti 
ta, вё nibbhayëá hutva taruuakalato patthiya vlesāslkebi dasadihi ваййЬїл› anā- 
сагай carati, пахакі ñatvåpi niggabarn па Кагоші attano akittltñ pariharamānā 
ajànantā viya honti, anatthacàšárinitl!3 anšsimsltabbaatthš! , akiccskarlnitl 1a., 
agunan ti Jiyarahltarb, раразаћауако ti dummitto, daliddatä ti dalidda- 
taya, sesapadesu pl es eva nayo, ta. daliddo alarhkaradinarb abhāvato kilesena 
вашдапЬйшї na askkotitl tah атајапаиц '®, gilàno pi!* vatthukimakllesakame 2° 
ganiganhituh па sakkotiti, Jarajlnno kayikaváraslkakhiddaratisamattho па boti, 


Y Ck parāvattaka-, С” parivattakš-. Hd parivattaka-. ? геад: boti. ° Bds vedayati. 
* read: -ha. 5 СЕ Ide atikicca-. © Нг apetagå. 7 Cks vi. Š Ck са, Bde „пайт. 
* Cha -nā, 10 Сів -ka. U so Bd; Ске omit по. !3 Cke ајапћа, ! Rd» 
*tthaná. '‘ Bds севіуё. '* во all three MSS. for anatthacaráni-? !% во Ce 
for -atthāni?; CE „айаш. Hd snacaritabbšni enattāni. '? во all three MSS. 
Гог -Шаганіі? !° Hd -nāti. # Bd pj, Ске piya. 3° Rd adds hi 


эз* 


10 


15 


s0 


85 


436 ХХІ. Asitínfpšta. 


suråsondo tassš hatthe' pllendbanadini рі suršgharath ñeva paveseti, muddho! 
andbabalo ratikusalo’ na hoti, pamatto дёвівопјо * butvá gharadâsībi* saddhir 
вагптазаї!, bhariyarn pana akkosati paribbāsat) tena (аш % avajánāti? sabbakiccesu 
anuvsttantarh ayarh nittejo таш ета anuvattatiti tar akkosati paribbësati, yo pana ° 
ваһЬЬайһапат snuppadeti kutumbsrn ра!іссһарей (авва bhariyā sabbaddhana- 
вагай batthe katva tahm дёват viya avajānāti ІссБасапа ko tayà attbo ti 
gharato рі (аго nikkaddhlssati’, mud dba pattan ti muddhabhavappattarmn, rattan 
ti pamattarn, padosam ё baratiti sāmike padosari aharati dussati раракаштат 


karotitl a., агатарашагп ika 10 апариссЬа va abbiņbarn pupphâ- 


ramàadisu аййабагат gantvš ta. snšcšarain caritva ajja maya šrëmarukkhadeva- 
tšya'l ballkanmarh katan ti šdini vatvà bšlasimikain saĀĀapeti, paņdito рапа 
addbā еза ta. anā ш сагай puna tsesš gantun na deti, evan sabbattba 
айо veditabbo, parakulan ti sanditthasambbattādinah gehat, tari să?” 
asukakulo me vaddbi payojitā atthi tšvakšlikarn dinna’? attbi tar sodbe- 
mit adini тебуа gaccbatl, nillokanasilš ti vātapānanterādīb!i olokanasi 
padvarattbayinitl attano añgapaccañgāni dassenti padvāre titthatl, accšva- 
datiti'’ atikkamtna carati atikkamma vadati!* sāmikassa ssntiko thitë ca)? 
aññasse nimittarn daasetiti a., vijambbatÎ ti’? аһа tarh disva vijambhiasāmi'® 
tiya saüññšys okásassa айат vā natthitarn ға !9 janeyyšsiti ра(һашат eva 
katasariketa vă butvā ekatasarnketá үйрї evan еза mayi bajjbissatiti samikassa 
passe thitë va vijambbati’? vijambhanam *0 dasseti, vinamacitl kiñcid eva 
Ъһйш!уаш pětetvā ша ukkblpanti viya onamitvā pittbirn dasseti, vilasatiti 
gamanädihi iriyăpathebi alarbkárena vilšsarh dasseti, vilajjatîti vilajjanti viya 
тацћепа sarirarn chádetl kavāțah vā bbittah vā alĦyati, nakbeni “і pādana- 
khena pädanakbao nsttbanakhena hattbenakbariw?®! ghatteti, katthenë "i 
dandakens, П аёгакап ti attano за puttar aññassa và puttar) gahetvë ukkhi- 
pati va ukkbipapeti vā, kîlatîti sayarn Касі дзгакаго kilâpeti, cumbanādīsu рі 
ев’ eva nayo, dadatiti tassa kiñcid eva phalah va puppham vă deti, уаса- 
titl tah eva ра(уёсаѓі, anukarotiti darakena каба auukaroti, uccan tí 


mahšsaddavasena vå thomanavasena’? và ucca, nica n ti mandasaddavasena 83 
vā amanāpavacanena và i paribhavavacanavasena’? vā піса, aviccan ti 
balujanamsjjhe apaticcban;e2%, viviccan ti raho paticcbannaw, пассепа 'ti 
otahi naccšdihi nìmittaiù karoti, ta. roditena nimittakaranena 3?! rattih deve vas- 
sante vštapánena batthih Bropetva setthiputtena nītāya purobitabrāhmaņiyā 
vatthuih kathetabbam, jagghatiri mabahasitarn Һава! 26, evam pi nlmittamn 


l Bd -а, ” Ck sa, Bd adds ti. > Ok -løo, * Bd „isu sondo. 5 Chet am-. * В4 
nañ. ? Ва -jânāni. ° Cks so, omitting pana, * Bd паш nikadhati. 1° Bd adde 
āpucchā vā. 1! Bds.me-. '3 Bd (азза. !% Bd dvinnakario. !* Bd ullos. ' Ва 
accãcaratiti. '* Bd omita а. vadati. !? Bd va. 1% Cha vijamh-. 1° Rd atthi- 
bhāvam vā їп tbe place of atthitan - -. 2° Ck vijamh-. 1! Bd omits hattba ғ ~. 
22 Са \һошаватапела. 3! Cs mandasavanavasena. :* Сіз omit amanāpa- -. ?* 
Cka -bhay asena, Bs -bhisa' 9 Bd ай, 27 Оке -karane. 3# Chs -anti 


4. Kunālajātake. (536) 437 


karoti, kacchan (1 upskacchakah, palikbatiti? dantehl Jikberi sirasan ti 
kesavattim eva, kesñnarú) mocanabandbane рі? рагаригївапагп nimittam karoti $ 
aniyâmetvā vā’ kocid eva sšrajjissatiti pl karoti уөта?, vedttabbā bhavatiti* 
ayah mayi padutthā kuddbā kojjbitvā pana micchā caratiti panditena veditabbā 
bharati”, pavāsan ti asaksgâme payuttadhanarh пазва(! gaccha {ап sādbebi 
vyavabārain’ karohîti âdîni vatvā tasmirh gate anācārah caritukāmā pavāsarn 
таппай, atthan ti avaddbirn, ак {ссал ti akattabbaynttakarn, partdahitva 
tl gšlbarn пітавеста, раг! таёќакај &(а% ti lto с' ito ca parlvattamina, ku rm- 
kumiyajātā tl koláhalsJatë padamüle nipanne upatihapeti dīparh Jāläpeti пёпарра- 
kšárakarn kolábalain karoti tasse kilessratirh паве dukkhar vedayatiti slsam 
ше rujjatiti šdinl vadati, vilomamiacaratiti аһагаг sitarh icchantassa unharb 
detiti Adinarn vasena paccanikavutti boti, nihatabhbogi ti samikera dukkbarn!’ 
eambhatãnain bhogānarn sorålolatādībi vinâsikā, santbavan!1 ti kllesavasena 


satthavarn'! karoti, nikkhantapādāă t| }атаввв upadbāraņattbāya nikkbanta- 
pädă, sämike patimhi agiraven era са ради Ъатёпаваёкуа ca аїЇсйгЇпї boti, 
aabbitthiyo ti (ћаре(тё vipassanāya tanukatakilesā ses sabb itthlyo рёрап 
kareyyurb, labbamiane ti’? 1аЬһашапе ssrhvijjamšáne t) а, nivātako ti rabo 
mantanake paribhedake khanarn! vë raho vā t! pāpakaraņatthâya okâsar vā 
paticchannatthānain và karayya?*, no t| ettba no ti nipštamattarh, alattbā!'* 
ti aladdhă ayam eva vā рићо, aññarn sampannapurisarn !* aslabbitvë pithasappl- 
пёрі tato patikitthatarenáp1!? раракаго kareyy' eva, Ārāmakarāsū tí! abbi- 
таЦкагікёви 19, aniggabāsū 'ti niggabena vineturh asakkuņeyyāeu, tittha- 
вашё ti yathā tittharn uttamādhamesu na Кіпсі 22 nabayantar йге! tathā 
etêpi raho va Шһэпе уй nirštake vā eati ne klñcl!° patikkhipanti. 


Tathâ hi: Atite pana Bārānņasiyarn Kandari *' патв гаја uttama- 
rūpadbaro, tassa devasikam amaccë°' gandhakaraņpdakesahassain āha- 
ranti, ten' assa nivesane paribhandam katvā gandhakarandake pháletvë 
gendhadārūni katvā ābāraro расапіі "°, bbariyā рап’ аззв'* abhirüpë 
ahosi namena Кіповга '° nama, purohito pi 'ssa samavayo Pañcaála- 
cando пёшв Ьоддћівашреопо °* shosi, тайпо papa pësšdarm ріввёуа 
апіорёкёге jamburukkho nibbatti, tassa sākhā pākåramatthake olam- 
banti, tassa сһёуёуа jeguccho dussaņthāno pithasappi vasati, ath’ 
ekadivasam Кіппага devi vātapānena olokenti {аш disvë patibaddha- 


1 Ва upallkkb-. ? Bd Ы. 2 Bde omit niyāmetvā vā, * Ck piyakaroti. > Bd? 
add райо(а. * Dd -antiti. ? Bd -anti. ® Bd# voh-. *Cks parā-. 19 Сг Ва 
-а. !! Bd вар(ћа-. !? Ck -no рі, Сг -no tl. !# Ck mattanakkhatarn, C? man- 
tapakkhana. !* Bds -yyuńm. ?* Bå ajaddhi. '* Се Bd -nnarh. 17 Bas patik- 
kūlata-. 18 СЕ adds ārâmakārāsu, Сг -karāau. !* В anıbhi-. 39 во all three 
МЭЗ. for kañci? *! Bd Шопаго. 32: Bd -ссаваһазваш. °° Bds расса. '* Ba 
різла. % Bd -ri. 24 Chs vuddhi-. 


10 


16 


20 


35 


30 


15 


70 


30 


35 


438 ХАІ. Asiulnipáta. 


cittā hutva rattim rājāvam ratiyā samganhitrë tasmim пїйдаш оККаше 
sanikam utthăya nëuaggarasabhojanam suvannasarake pakkhipitvë 
ucchañge' katvā sātakarajjuyā vātēpāpena otaritvā jambum āruyhe 
sākhāya oruyha pithasappim bhojetvā papam Каїуй āgatamaggen’ 
eva разайаш āruyha gandhehi запгаш ubbattetvā габра saddhim ni- 
pajji, eten’ upëyepa nibaddham ten` eva saddhiùi påpam karoti, rājâpi 
па jānāti. So ekadivasam парага padakkhinam Ката nivesanam 
pavisanto jambucchāyāya sayitam рагашаКагиййарра!!аш pithasappim 
disvà purohitam aha: pass’ etah” manussapetan“ ti. „Ama devā“ 
%1. „Api nu kho samma evarūpam patikkülam Кас: itthi сһапдага- 
gavasena upagaccheyyñ' ‘ti. Таш kathah ушта pithasappi mānam 
janetvë „ayah raja kim kathesi, attano deviya mama santikam 
ñgamanam па јаоаіі mane" ti jamburukkhassa aōjalim paggahetvā 
„suna sāmi jamburukkhe nihbattadevate, Шареёта tam ! айдо etam 
karanam па jāaātiti à. Purohito tassa kiriyam disvë cintesi: ,addha 
гаййо аррапећезі jamburukkhenâgantvā* iminā saddhim pëpam karo- 
titi“ so rajanam pucchi: ..maharaja детіуа te rattibhage sarirasam- 
phasso kidiso hotîti“. ..Samma айдат па passāmi. тајјіітауёте 
pan’ assā sarira sitalan hotiti*`. Tena hi deva titthatu айба 
itthi, aggamahesi te Kinnarā devi іліпа saddhiñ рарат karotiti". 
„Samma kim vadesi. evarūpā paramavilåsappattā“ kiù ішіоё рагаша- 
jegucchena seddhim abbiramissatiti“, „Tene hi nam deva parigaphā- 
hiti“, So „sādbū" `ti габи bhuttasāyamāso tāya saddhim nipajjitrā 
„pariganhissāmi ten" ti pakatiyă niddūpagamanavelāya niddupagato 
viya ahosi, sàpi utthāya tath’ eva akāsi. гаја tassà anupadam yera 
gantvā jambucchëyam піѕѕауа atthüsi. Pithasappi deviyā kujjhitvà 
stvan aticirāyitră йёда!й“ 0° hatthenpa kannasakkbaliyah” pahari, 
atha nam „ша'” kujjhi sāmi, гайпо niddüpagamanarm olokesin*" ti 
vatvā tassa gebe pādaparicārikā viya nhosi, teua '' рап’ азза pahā- 
rena sihamukhakundalam kanpato galitvā гапбо pādamūle pati, гаја 
е vattissati'' ettakan" ti tam gahetvā gato, зйрї tena saddhim ati- 
caritvā purimaniyamen eva gantvā ranña saddhim nipajjitum ārabhi. 
Баја patikkhipitvā punadivase „Kinnarā devi шауа dinnam'' заЬһа- 
lamkaram а\вфКкагіта еі“ ‘і апарезі, sā ,.sihakundalam ше ѕиталпа- 
Кагаѕзв santike“ ti vatvā пёрапі, puna резіќе рапа ekakundalā va 


1 all three MSS. осса-, ° Hd eka. 2? Hd hitan. * Ва -па-. Ó Cks hoti. * 


Ва -зазелораппё. ? Bd adds ва. ° Bd āgacchati. ° Ras -sañkba-. 10 Rd 
adds шаш. !! Cis te. !2 Rd vatte. !? Cka -a. 


4. Kunšlajataka. (536.) 439 
t 
ёратёві, гаја pucchi „kahan te kundalan" ti , suvannakarassma san- 
tike“ ti suvannakaram pakkositvā’' „„КїїїКйгапаё ітеззё? kundalam ра 
desiti” â., „пйһатп ganhami deva ti, гаја kujjhitvā ..раре сапда 
mādisena te suvaņņakārena Dhavitahbbgn*“ ti vatvā „tamh Кошоев 
'ригабо khipitvā purohitam а.: „samma saccam taya vuttam., gaccha 
sïsam взвё сһейёреһіі"‹. So tam гёјадеһе yeva ekasmim padese tha- 
petvā гајёпеаш ораваткатіќуё „deve mä Кіппагёдечіуё° kujjhi°, sabbā 
itthiyo evarūpā yeva, засе рі itthinam dussilabhāvai passitukāmo' 
dassessāmi ќе еїазаш papakam с` cva bashumáyabhavan ca, ehi añnā- 
takavesena janapada carāmā" ‘ti. Raja „sādhū“ "і mataram г. 
paticcbāpetvā tena saddhim cārikam pakkāmi, te samyojanamaggam 
gantvā malāmagge nisinnānarh eko kutimbiko puttass’ attbāya mañ- 
galah katvë ekam kumārikam paticchannoyāne nisīidāpetvā mahantena 
рапуйгепа gacchati, (аш disvë purohito” ā.: „sace icchasi imam ku- 
mürikam {вуй saddhim pápam karetum sakkā™ ti, „kim kathesi, 
mahāparivārā na sakkā sammā" “і, purohito „tena hi passa devā" 
"ti purato рапітё '° meggato avidūüre sünim '' parikkhipitvã rajánam anto- 
sāņiyam katvā sayah maggapasse rodanto nisidi, atha паш kuțimbiko 
disvā „tāta kasmā rodasîti“ pucchi, „bhariyã me garvbbārā, tam kula- 
gharah netun maggapațipanno `smi, tassă еп(агашарре yeva gabbho 
cali, езй ашоѕапіуаш kilamati, касі `ss& itthi santike n`atthi, шауйрї 
ta, gantun ов sakkā, na jăānāmi kim bhavissatiti“, „ekam іл 
ladhu таңа, mā rodi, bahō itthiyo, ека gamissatiti", „tena bi 
ауап! eva kumārikā gacchatu, еїіѕзёрі müngalam bhavissatîti“, so 
cintesi: „accam vadati, sunisaya pi mañgalam eva iminā nimittena, зё 
puttadbitáhi veddhissatiti'- tam eva pāpesi", sā ta, pavisitvā rājānam 
disvā patibaddhacittā hutvā pâpanm akāsi, rájàpi 'ss& angulimuddikarmn 
adāsi, atha паш katakiccam nikkhamitya agatam pucchimsu: „kim 
vijātā“ ti, ,suvannavannañ puttan" ti, kutumbiko tam ādāya pāyāsi, 
purohito рі гаййо santika рап{та „ditthā'’ te deva kumárikápi evar 
рёрё kimañga pana аййарї!, api pana te kiñci divnan“ ti, „āma anguli- 
muddikā dinnā* ti, .,пйёзза таф dassāmîti“ vegena guntvë yānakam 
gaghitvā „kim etan" ti vutte „ayam ше'* brāhmaņiyā ussisake 
thapitamuddikam раһеїта āgatā“ ti „dehi amma muddikan" ti, sā tam 


3 Bd -säpetvā. 2 Bd imlssā. > Bd деи. + Bd le. * Ска -Im. * Ва -ittha. 
1 Rds паєцкатюо. * Ва adds rājānah. ” Па sakkomi, !° Bd garhtvš, Ске omit 
gantvā. !'СЁ зари, Ва sadhana. 17 Наз pesesi, !3 Cka -ап. !* Bd ayameva. 


10 


15 


95 


s0 


15 


95 


440 ХХІ. Asitibipšta 


dadamānā Ьгаһшапат hattbe' nakhena vüjhitvë „ganba сога `ti 
adāsi. Eram bršhmano nānāridhebi ирйуеһ› айба Dahü atieariniyo 
rañño даззе{та „idha tšva ettakam boti’, aññattha gamissāma devā“ 
‘ti а. Каја sakala-Jambudipe cari, te pi ,.sabbš itthivo evarüpë bha- 
vissanti. kin по etābi. nivattama' `ti* Вагапазїт етв paccagantva 
„evam' тпаһёгаја itthiyo nama. evam pāpadbhammā pakati е(аѕа. 
khama ` dera Кїппагадезуй`` ti purohitepa уйсйо kbamitvā rājanive- 
sanato nam  nikkaddbëpesi. {(һапао рапа tam  apanetvë аййаш 
agwamahesim акаѕі, (ай са pithasaprim nikkaddhapetrë Jambusakbam ` 
сһедёреѕі. Тада K. Pancalacando ahosi. iti абара ditthakaáranam eva” 
аһагиуй dassento 
n. Yam уе '° disvë Kaudari-Kinnarënam '' 

sabbitthiyo па ramanti agare 

tam tàdisam maccam сајісха bhariva `° 

aññam disra purisam pithasappin ti g. а. 30. 

Т. a; Yam ve Капдагізза!° таййо Kinnaráy: са deviyi t imesam 
Kandari-Kinnarànam virāgakāraņarı abosi tam Фјѕта jånitabbah 6abbitibiyo 
attano samikšánarh па rampanti арёге, tatbš bi айба pitbasappiporisari disvà 
tam rājânah tidisarh ratikusalain macraiù cajitvš 1 bharlyš tena mannssapetena 
saddbiw рёарат akasiti 

Aparo: atite Bako паша Haraánasiraja dhammena r. karesi. (ада 
Bārānasivā рёс1їпайтагатазпо ekassa “daliddassa Рабсарёра пёта 
dhită sabosi. sā kira pubbe рі ека daliddadhita mattikam madditva gehe 
һе limpati, atb’ еко paccekabuddbo attano pabbhëraparibbanda- 
Karanatthai .kaham mattikaùw labhissāmfti“ cintetvë ..Baršnasiyani 
laddbum sakkā" ti'* pārupitvā pattahattho nagara pavisitra tas,a 
avidūre satihāsi, sñ kujjhitvā olokenti' ..samana mattikam pi па 
1аЬһазїн“* таста‘ mahantam mattikāpindam ābaritrā patte thapesi, so 
tāya mattikāya pabbháre paribhandam akāsi'*, tassā mattikāpiņda- 
1 Bd -паһайһат. > Bd hotu. > Ске nivattitçváa. * С^ imâ. Rd omits avam. ° 
Hd satha. < Cts omit nain. * Сз omit tam * Сб add agge ° Сї -Каћеха, 
Cs -kameva, B? -harananieva. !° Rd yañça. '! Rd kinnari-. !? read: -ttha 
bharyā. 19 Hd yañca kinnarikasss. 1 во al) tbree MSS. 15 Nd adds ci- 
тагагш. '* Bds add paduthens manasi matikampi bhikkhatiii avoca pacceka- 
buddho nivcalo va ahosi atha si paccekabuddham niecalitain disvà puua сїн 
pasšdetvà oloketvá. 7 Bd adds sukhummu. ° Bda add så nacirasseva tato 
<avitva tasmiņn yeva пагаге bahidráragarue duggatittbiyā kucchimhi patisandbirn 
ganbi ва dasamisaccayena mátukucchito nikkhami. 


4. KunņålajStaka. (536.) 441 


pbslena sariram -рһавзазатрвппап аһозї, kujjhitvā vlokitattā pane 
hbatthapādamukhaakkhinãsāni рёрёпі тігаралі аһезши, {ела nam Paŭ- 
сарара t’ ета! sañjanimnsu. Atb’ ekadivasam Bārāņasirājā rattim 
айпаїайауевепв nagaram pariganhanto tam padesamƏ gato, sàpi рата- 
darikahi saddhim kilanti ajānitvā va ršjanar hatthe ganhi, so tassā 
hatthasamphassena sabhšvena santhëtum' nàsakkhi, dibbapbassena ° 
puttho viya ahosi, so рћазввгарагано їа{һагїраш|' pi tam hatthe ga- 
hetvā „kassa dbitàsiti* pucchitvā ..dvaravësino' ti vutte assšmika- 
bhavam pucchitvâ „ahan te samiko bhavissámi, gaccha matapitaro 
anujānāpehíti“ š., зё mātāpitaro upagantvā „eko mam puriso iccha- 
Чие vatvā „so рі duggato bhavissati° sace tšdisam pi icchati, зйаһй“ 
"і vutte gantvā mātāpitūhi anuññatabhavam агосеѕі, во *tasmim yeva 
gele (вува saddhim vasitvā pāto та гајапітеѕапаш рӣтізі, tato patthay' 
eva rājā абпаќакатеѕепа nibaddham ќа. gacchati айбат itthi olo- 
ketun па іссһаіі. Ath’ ekadivasah (азза pitu lohitapakkhandikā 
uppajji, asambhinnakhirasappimadhusakkharayutto nāyāso іазав" bhe- 
sajjam, ќай te daliddatāya uppadetum na sakkonti, tato Pañcapāpāya 
màtáa dhitaram â.: „кію атта tava samiko pâyāsam uppādetum 
sakkhissatiti'', „amma mama sāmikena amhebi рі duggatatarena bha- 
vitabbam, evar sante рі pucchissāmi nam, тё cintayiti'" vatvë (аззй- 
gamanavelšaya dummanā’ hutvā nisidi, atha паш гај& āgantvā „kim 
Читтшапйвїн'* pucchitvā tam attham sutvā „bhadde idam atiissara- 
bhesajjam kuto labhissāmîti vatvā cintesi: „na ѕакка mayā nicca- 
kālam evam caritum. antarāmagge pariasayo, рі datthabbo, sace kho 
pana etam апберигап! nessãmi etisså phassasampadam ajananta 'am- 
hëkam гаја yakkhiniņ gahetvā āgato` ti kelim Капззаши, sakala- 
nagaravāsiao etissā samphassam jānāpetrā garaham mocessāmiti“, 
atha паш â.: ,„bhadde ша cintayi, аћагіззёті te pitu pāyāsan" ti 
vatvā (ауа saddhim abhiramitvā rajanivesanam gantvā punadivsse 
tādisah рауйазаш pacapetva pannüni eggabetvā" dve pute Кабуй ekas- 
miim’ рауйзаш pakkhipitvā ekasmim cülšámanim tbapetvā bandhitvā 
rattibbāge gantvā ,„bhadde mayam “dalidda, kicchena sampaditam, 
tava pitarah 'ajja imambā putë рёуёваш bbuñja'° sve imamha' ti 
yadeyyšsiti" 8.: sā tathā akāsi, ath’ assā pitā ojasampannattā 
рбуёзаязвь окап eva bhuñjitvë titte jāto, sesah mütu datvü sayam 


' Bd tveva-. Š Bå sandhāreturii. 3 Bá -samphassena. * Bd tatbâvirū- ° Bde 
-Mti ^ Вя va etassa. 7 Ске -no. ° Bde āharàpetvā. ° C% omit ek-. 10 
Ва -atu. 


5 


30 


10 


15 


30 


442 ХХІ. Atitinipāta 


рі bhuñji, tayo рі sukhita ahesurn, culëmaniputam punadivasatthāãya 
{һаревиш. гаја nivesanam gantvñ mukhari dhovitvā ..cülëmanim me 
āharathā“ “і та{та „па развёта ета‘ `ti vutte ,sakalanagaram 
vicinathë* °11 ā., vicinitvë na passirnsu, „tena hi bahinagare dalidda- 
gehesu bhattapannapute upšdáya vicinathü' `Ч vicinitvā’ tasmim 
gbare сїїёшапїй disvrā „(азвё mātăāpitaro cora? ti bandhitvá na- 
уйрзи, ath` ass риё „sāmi па mayam согё, aññenâyar mani ābhato" 
ti vatvë „kegā" ‘ti vutte „jāmatarā те? ti ācikkhitvā ,.kaham so“ 
ti pucchite „dhītā те jānātiti ā., tato taya saddhim kathesi: „amma 
зёпікап * te Јёпазіі“, „па jānāmiti“, „evam sante amhakam jivitam 
n` айі, „tāta so andhakáre ёрэпітё* andhakāre yeva уёіі, ten' 
assa гараш па jānāmi, hatthasamphassena pana паш jānitum sakko- 
тї", so гајаригіѕапат ёгосеві. te рі таййо ārocesum, гаја ajānanto 
viya hutvā „tena hi ter» itthiñ гёўайдапе` antosšniyam thapetvā 
вёп}уё batthappamāņa chiddam katvā nagaravāsiao sannipātetvā 
hatthasamphassenm coram gaņhathā" ‘ti й.. rājapuriså (аһа kātu 
tassā santikah gantvā rūpatn disvā va vippatisarino hutvā ahamsu° : 
ауа ° pisãciti™™ jigucchitvā phusitum'' па ussabimhsu, Ānetvā 
pana!” гајапрапе antosāņiyaro țhapetvā sakalanagaravāsino sannipāte- 
suth, аё âgatägatassa chiddena pasāritam hatthum gabetvä va „uo 
eso" vadati, purisā tas:ā dibbaphassasadise phasse bąjjhitvā apa- 
gantun па sakkhirmsu. „,зае` ayam daņndārahā dandam datvñpi dāsa- 
kammakarabhavam upagantvàpi etan рћаге karissāmā" `ti cintayimsu, 
atha te rājapurisā daņdehi kottetvàë pabbëjesurm `°. uparājam ādikatvā 
snbbe ummattakā viya ahesum, atha' гаја: ,.kiñci'" aham bha- 
теууап“ ti hattham pasáresi. tam hatthe gahetvë va „сого me 
gahito' ti mahasaddam kari, rājā te purise pucchi: „tumhe etàya 
hatthe gahitā kim cintayitthā'* 'ti, te yathabhütam агосезий, atha 
пе гаја â: „aham'' attano geha netun evam kāresim™', etisså 


'* ajānantā mam paribhaveyyun!?* ti vatva *° „tasmāř' тауа 


Е] 


phassam 
sebbe tumhe jānāpitā, vadatha *° їййпї kass’ езё gehe bbavitum yuttā" 


ti, „tumhākam devā" ‘ti, athe nam abhisiñcitvā aggamahesith айпёві", 


1 На Ce -nantá. ? Bd -го. ? Cka -го, Bd me jànamåtarā. * Che yan, 5 Си 
пайы. * Ck ägeñjitvā, Сг адайсһиза, 7 С^ adde sā, C? ва. è Ске ahaddhi. 
* də dhidhi. 1° Ck jisā-, Са pisàmiti, Bd рЫзёсёі. 1! Ске phuaitar, Bd 
phassi-. !3 Віғ add naii. !Š Bdo palàpesuinh, !# Rd adds паш. 15 Lks kañci. 
38 Bds add atari. 37 142 evamakāsi, '3 Сә -ā, Ck omits ph-. !* Cks -Ьһ-. 
30 Bda cintetvā. 2! Ске tassa. 22 Rd -etba. 2° Bd akāst. 


3. Kunilajšataka. (535). 443 


matapitunnam рі 'ssā issariyarn дареѕі, tato patthāya pana’ sammatto 
n’ eva хіпісеһауаш patthapesi па айбат itthim oloketi, tā tassā” 
antaran рвпуезййзи, sā ekadivasam dvinnam’ aggamahesibhāvassa 
supine nimittam disvā raño ёгосеыі, rājā supinapathake pakko- 
sāpetvā „evarūpe supine ditthe kim hotîti“ pucchi, te itaršsarn 
itthinam santikā !апсаш gahetvā „mahārāja deviyë ssbbasetahatthino 
khandhe nisinnabhāvo tumhakam maraņassa *ubbaninittam hatthik- 
khandhagatáya candaparamasanam  tumbákam  paccamittarajanaya- 
nassa * pubbanimittan'" ti vatvyā ‚бап kim kātabban tì vutte 
„deva imam māretuh na sakkā, nāvāya pana nam tbapetvë 
nadiyah vissajjetun vattatiti“ vadimsu, гаја āhāravatthālamkārehi 
saddhim rattibhāge nam nâvāyarn thapetvā nadiyah vissajjāpesi, së 
nadiyā vuyhamānā hetthanadiyá nāvåya udakakilam kiantassa Pā- 
vüriyaranüo abhimukhah“‘ pattā, tassa senāpati пйёташ disvā „ayam 
пбуй mayhan" ti й., гајё „uāvāya bhandam mayhan" ti vatvā āga- 
(ауа nāvâya tam disvā „kā пата tvar рівёсізадіѕ& `“ ti pucchi, së 
sitam katvā Bakassa гаппо aggamabesibhāâvam kathetvā tan” sabbar 
pavattiñ tassa kathesi, sā pana Pañcapāpā ti sakala-Jambudipe pä- 
Ка(&°, аа pam rājā hatthe gahetvá ukkhipi, saha gahanen' eva 
phassarāgaratto айбйзи itthisu'° itthisaññam рі akatvā tam agga- 
mahesitthāne thapesi, sà tassa pāņasamā ahosi, Bako tam pavattim 
sutvā ,nëharm tassa aggamahesim’' katum dassāmîiti® senam sam- 
kaddhitvā ™ tassa patititthe™ nivesanam katvā pannam реѕеві: „bhari- 
yam vā ше detu vuddhari vā“ ti, so'' yuddhasajjo ahosi, ubhinnam 
amaccã „mātugāman nissaya maranakiccam п’ atthi, purimasamikatta 
esā Bakassa pāpunņāti nāvāya laddhattë Pavariyassa'", tasmā eke- 


kassa gehe sattasattadivasani Поїц'* і mantetvā dve рі гајапо sañnña-. 


pesu, te ubho pi attamanā hutvā tittbapa(titthe'" парагапі māpetvā 
.vasihsu, sā dvinnam рі tesaň meahesittah™ kāresi, dve pi {азай sam- 
mattü'" аһезшй, sā pana ekassa ghare sattšham vasitvā nāvāya 
itarassa багаш gacchati'', navaú, рајеіта nentena ekena mahallaka- 
khañjakena ° vattena saddhim nadimajjhe papam karoti, Tadā K. 


1 Ids add tšya. ! Сә titassain, Chs të yassā. 3 Jdsadd тї}йпа!п. * Bd -га- 
jassa. > Ске -рзуа * Bd -Кһагһапать. ? Bd -ca-, 8 Cke omit tai. * Cke 
add аһевшї. '° Саб omit Itthisu 1! all three MSS. -аї. 33 Bds -ddhl, U 
Rds тазза рапа nadititthe, 14 ВФ add yuddharb давзёті na hharlyan t| табуа. 
15 Ck -riyayassa, Bds гјуазваті. !* Bas tithapatithens, '! Bd aggamahesitarii. 
18 Ck# samaggā. 1* Rd раге gacchanti. 7° Cks -ке, Bde -khujjakens. 


10 


30 


10 


15 


95 


зе 


444 ХХІ. Asitinipáts. 


звкипагаја Bako abosi, tasmā idah вара ditthakam' aharitvá 
dassento ё, : 
зз. Ваказѕа са? Ратёгікаѕѕа гайпо 
accantakāmānugatassa hbariya 
атасаг! ° baddhavasānugassa °. 
kem vë itthī* nâticare tadannan ti. 309. 

Та. accantakalanugatassš "j ассапбып кашат anugatasea, avi- 
сагі і? anšcšrarh сагі, baddhavasānugassā? 'ti baddhassa $ attano vasšnu- 
gatasaa attano pesanakarsssa santike ti a., karanatthe тё’ samivacanarn. tens 
saddhiri papam аказій vuttam hoti, tadañüan 11 katarari” айбай рогівага 
пёйЙсагеууа 'H s. 


Арагаш” рі: atite Brahmadattassa bbariyā Pipgiyani'" nama '' 
sihapañjaram vivartvā olokenti mangaealassagopakam disvā гаййо nid- 
dokkamanakāle™ тёќарёпепа oruyha tena saddhim aticaritvā puna 
pšasadam abhiruya gandhbebi sarirah ubbattetrā rañūā saddhim ni- 
pajji, аһ ekadivasah гаја .kin nu kho deviyà addbarattasamaye 
пїссаш ѕагігаш sitalam hoti. рагіраоћіѕѕатюі nan" ti ekadivasam niddü- 
pagato viya hutvā tam utthāya gacchantiņb anuganivā assabandbena 
saddhim aticarantim disvë nivattitvra sayanam abbirūhi '°, sàpi aticaritvā 
ёрапіта cullasayane'* nipajji. punadivase гајёшассатајјће yeva tat 
pakkosšpetvë tam Кїссаш āvikaritvā „sabbā та itthiyo pāpadhammā“ 
ti tassä vadbabandhanachejjabhejjarabam dosarn'` kbamitvë thänä 
cāvetvā айпып aggamahesim akāsi. Тада Kuņālarājā Brahmadatto 
ahosi, tena tam аіќапа ditthakam ñharitvë dassento рі: 

эз. Ріпріуапі'* sabbalokissarassa 
гайпо piya Brahmadattassa һһапуйа 
avācari baddbavasănugassa '', 
tam vàpi sā nâjjhaga kamskaminiti g. а. 310. 

Ta. tañ ti så evam aticarawti tah va assabandhamh (агы và 1° аррашаһе- 
sitbânan ti ubhayam рі na ajjbəga'?. ubhayato bbattbi аһозі, kāmakäminiti 
kime pattbayamānā, eratn papadhammi itthiyo ti, 


t Ва аһа. * Rds anācāri. ? Bd ра{һатавёпидма-‚ “ зо Cs; Ck каў visi 
itthi, Bd karn ғарі itthi, read: katin тарі ‘17 ° Bæ anàcărīiti. * Ва pathassa. 
1 Bds tab. # Bd adds tab. ° Б-га. '° Ce piñglyštl, Ck piglyati, Bd pi- 
yañgayšui. !! Ва adds aggamahesi. !% so Che; Bd niddupagamana-. '° Ва 
-rûybi. !* Ck tulla-, Bd cūlasayanake. !' Ck -bandhabajje bhejjarabamñosam, 
Bd -bandbachaljabhajja-, Сә -raharah-. ?* 84 piyañgayāvi. V Bæ апасёгі 
patha vasinugatassa. !° (Ске omit assa - -. !* Hd nàjhagamâ. 


4. Kunalajataka (536.) 445 


Atitavatthumhi itthimam dosam kathetvë aparena Pi pariyayena 
tasam dosam eva kathento aha: 
эч. Khuddanam lahucittānah akataññuna düubhinam'! 
nådevasatto puriso thinam saddhãtum arahati. 311. 
as. Na tā” pajānanti katan na kiccam 
па mataram pitaram bhataram va, 
anariyā samatikkantadhamma 
sass’ eva? cittassa vasam vajanti. 312. 
as, Cirāuuvuttham * pi piyan manāpar 
anukampakam" pāņasamam рі santar * 
Āāvāsu’ Кісееви ca nam jahanti, 
tasmšham itthinam па vissasãmi. 313., 
s. Thinaii bi cittam yathë уйпагазза* 
КаппарраКаппаш yathë rukkhachayá, 
calācalan hadayam itthiyanam * 
cakkassa '° nemi viya'!' parivattati. 314, 
39. Yada të passanti samekkhamana !° 
&йеуувгіраф '° purisassa vittem '' 
saphāhi уёсаһі nayanti-m-etam !* 
kambojakā jalajenëva assam. 315. 
з. Yadā па passanti samekkhamānā '* 
ādeyyarūparn '* purisassa vitta ` 
samantato nem parivajjayanti 
tinno nadīpāragato va kulla. 316. 
во. Silesūpamā sikhi-r-iva'" sabbabbhekkhā 
'® sighasota 
sevanti Һһ' etš piyam appiyañ ca? 
nāvā yathā orakülańh parañ ca. 317. 
s. Na të? ekassa na dvinnam ёраро уа '? pasārito, 


tikkhāmayā '* nadi-r-iva 


уо tā mayhan ti mapüeyya үйїаёш }а1епа badhaye?, 318. š 


1 Ва -nan mittadubbhinah. 2 Ско саф. > Сіз ваваёта. * Ck -ппицаш, 
Ва -эп{һаш. * Bd -kammarh. * Bd bhattarn, Ck santa, Се santih. Т Се Ba 
avâsu. ° Ва Ъвгапазва, Bz vara-. * Bd пай, !° Cks omit са- 1 so 
Bd; Ск петіуага, Сә nemlva. !? Bdz взреккћа-. 13 Cks a., Jš Сі ci 15 
С” Ва enam. !* Csa- 17 read: sikbiva? 8 во СЕ; Сә tikhhamayā, Bd 
tikkhamānā. 19 Cs Bd nadīrlva; read: nadîva? 10 во Са; Ck ysmampiyañca, 
Bdz yamappiyanıi. 31 Bds etā, 11 Сіз во, 33 Bdz bandhaye. 


10 


20 


15 


10 


15 


95 


30 


446 ХХІ. Агіпірац. 


в. Yathë пайї ca pantho св рёрарагаф зара papā 
етап! lokitthiyo пёте. velñ tësam па vijjati. 319. 
эз. Ghatāsanasamā h` etā kanhasappasirupama, 
güvo bahitinassëva' omasanti тагай тага. 320 
за. Ghatàsanam kuñjaram Капһазаррат! 
muddhabhisittan ратада са sabbā 
ete na so? niccayatto bhajetha, 
tesan bhave” dubbidu sabbabbāvo, 321. 
вһ. М№ассапіағаппа па bahüna ° kanta 
па dakkbinë pamada sevitabbā, 
па рагаѕха bhariyā па dhanassa hetu 
еб itthiyo рапса na sevitabba ti. 322. 


Та. khuddānan® ji khuddanam , Капатета]а!айе? viya baddhacore рі 
вйёгв}}апагта satidhāy’ їзїї vuttarn, lahucitcanan ti tari muhuttam eva рагї- 
vattauachttansri, Culladhanuggahajšlaken' etah kathetabbarn °, akatuññutā рапа 
etäsaÙw Ekanipáte Takkirlyajatakena dipetabbā, иі дөуаваќ(о tl пе adevasatto 
dovena asatto anüsatto° ayakkhagahitako abhûtâvatthito'® puriso thina bila- 
vantatarn !! gaddhāturii 19 пёгаћа( (2 bhūtävațto't pana saddaheyya, katan ti 
attano katari upekärai, kiccan (1 attana kătabbakiccah, na Dataran (i 
sabbe рі ñătake chaddetvá yasmiri patibaddbacittë honti tarh ñeva апобацадћа- 
nato ete гл214дауо na јёпап(і!5 nšma љмаћаралћакаоаса 16 viya, anaryā ti 
nillajjā, saasá 'tisakassa, ауавй!® "і арайави!?, kiccesü ‘ti tosu tesu karani- 


yesu, kanneppakannan ti otinuotinpani, yatbā hi visame padese rukkbac- 
chāyå ninnam рі urohati thalam рі abhirūbati?! tathš etšsam рі clttarn na 
kiñei uttamādhəmarh vajjeti, celācalan ti ekasmim yəva apatilthitarn, nemiti 
пека!авва gacchato саййвпепї viya, šdeyyarüpan!9 (і gahetabbajštikarh, 
vittau ti dhana, nayantitt attano vasan nenti, jalajenā 't! jalajāta- 
sevālena, Rambojakarattha-všsino kira уабё atavito asse ganhitukāmā honti tadā 
екавшііа tbau6 vati parikkhlpitvâ датага yojetvā assānan udakapánatitthe 
sovâlarh шайһипа makkhetvä seválasambaddhani2° sire?! tiņnāni адий ketvä уйта 
parikkhepadvāäră makkbenti, 2805 рапїуап! pivitvä rasagedhena madhumakkhitšni 
tiņāni carantš23 anukkamena tam (һала pavisanti, itl (6%? yatha Jalajena 


1 in Hd the second bemistich comes before the firat. ? Cke hahu-. ? Сіз Bd 
ro, Ве уо. * Bdshave. ° Ckbabunā, Bd babunns. * Вә luddā-. 7 
Сї -ги-‚ Вг kajavodā-. ° Bd dīpetabbań, ° во Ске; Bas па devasattot! па 
devasatto devena anāsatto. !0 во Cs; Ck abhuttávattíito, Hd abhūtapavattito. !1 
Ва» -vantatavādarh. 1? Bd sandhš-, '1 go all (тев MSS. !* СЕ -е, Bd 
bhüta vitto. 15 Bde -āti, 16 Che -pattbaka-? Bd -panhaka. !° Ck Bd ара-. 13 
Bds -тцуһа!. 19 Chs a-, #9 Ck -savaddhaáni, Сг -sarnvaddhāni, Bd sambasndhani, 
Не saanbandhanā. !! Bd omits tìre. 3 Rds kbidantā. 12 СХ ве, Bd yathå te. 


4. Кипајајасака. (536.) 447 


palobbetvā asse! таваф? nenti tatbā «ёрі dhana disvā (авва gahanatthšya 
sanhëbl тёсаЫі purisaú,) vasaio nentitl a, kullan t| tarapatthāya gahitarb уат 
kiñel, silesüpamā ti purisånarh cittabandbanena sllesssadisá, tikkhamayëš 
ti ukhinamayš3), slghaeotš nadīrivā "1 yatbā pabbsteyyë пайї sighasotiš * 
ti a, ñpano tl уаїһ& ca pasšáritapano yesarn mülarn atthi 'tesah yeva upskšro 
tatb’ etêpi, уо tā ti уо рогіво tā itbiyo, bādhaye tl уо vātam pl Jšlena 
bâdheyya 5, velä тава па vijjatiti yathā etasarn nadinam asukavelšyam өт" 
ettha gantabban t! velā n’ athi rattim pi divêp! Iccbiticchitakkhane upagantabba 
m eva asuken` evà” "ti pi mariyādā п" atthj atthihatthikena upagantabbā п’ ova 
{ ~?) tathå etëpitl a, gbatāsanasamā ti уаћа aggi indhanena tappatl etápi 
hilesaratiyš, kanha--ti kodhanatáaya upanáhitāya gboravisatāâya düJlvhatšya 
mittadübbitáyëá 'ti pañcahi kāraņebi Wanbaaappasirasadisā, tattha bahularšágatšya 
ghoravisatā pisuņatāya dūjivhatā® aticāritāya mittadūbhitā veditabbā, gāvo 
bahitiņassă? ‘И ymhā gāvo khäditațtbānaıih -haddetvi bahimana; 
tipassa varai varam omasanti khâdanti evam etåpi uiddhanam chaddetvå 
sadbanam eva gacchantiu!! a, muddhābhigittan И rájšnarb, pa- 
тайа ca sabbā t! abba tå ittblyo, ete’? ti ete pañca jane, niccayatto!? 
ti niccarn sarnñato npatthitasatl, appamatto va hutvá t! a. dubbidü чї duljano, 
sabbabbāvo ti ajjbâsayo, clraparicinno рі bi aggi даһа сігатіваёвіко рі 
kuüJaro gháteti ciraparicito рі sappo :Jasati ciravlssāsiko pi гаја anatthakáro 14 
hoti, evan clraparicinnëpi itthiyo vikāra dasseutiti, naccantavannă ti 
ahhlrüpavati, па babūna’'? kantā ti addbakāsigaņikā viya па babunnarn piyā 
тапарё, па dakkbinā ti naccagitakusalš, tatbārūpå hi'® bahumittë Lonti 
таёта na sevitabbá, na Чһапавва betü ti уа dhanahetu yeva bhajati så 
apariggahâpi na sevitabbā, ва hi dhanarh alabhamânā kujjbati, 


ева 10 


Ехаў vutte mahājano M-assa „aho sukathitan“ (і вайһи- 
kāram adiási, во etehi käraņehi itthipam agunam kathetvā 
tunhi ahosi. 

Тап sutvā Апапдо gijjharājā .,samma Капа)ага}а aham 
рї attano ñāņabalena таф арипагп kathessámiti“ уа{уй 
agunakatharn йгаЫһ. 

Tam dassento Вһарвтё!' аһа; Atha khalu bho А. gijjbarājā 
K-ssa sakuneəssa ādimajjhakathâpariyosãnam >" viditvā tëyam velšyam 
imā gāthãyo sbhāsi: 


1 Ck -¿, Cs -а, Bd -am. 9 Bd-e, 6 all three MSS., tikubamāyā ti tlkkhina- 
māyā. * Ck aïghamayā, Bd Cs add evarh sighamāyā. ° Rds bandh-, * Ck 
baddh-, Bda bandb-. 7 Cka -kenavă. 6 Се -tāya. ? Cks bahu-. !@ Oks -шанё- 
pamanāpassa. $! Bds bhaj-. !2 Ске еба. 33 Сә -yanto, Ck nicca yatto, Dd 
-yato. !'* Cs Bd -karo. 15 С babu, Bd babunnari. !* Сг Bd add bahūbi pat- 
ОМ. '7 Bas estthā. 1% Bd -gâthā pari-. 


15 


qo 


95 


30 


10 


15 


20 


95 


Щ] 


85 


448 


sa. 


67. 


“. 


ХХІ, Astinlpaáta. 


Punnam рі се 'mam pathavim dhenena 
дајј' itthiyá puriso sammatáya 

Іаддћа khanam втаййтуув tam рі, 
(азаш vasat msatinain na gacche. 323. 
Utthahakañ се pi alinovuttim 
komarabhattaram piyam manapam 
āvāsu' kiccesu са пай jahanti, 

tasmā hi itthinam ра vissasāmi. 324. 


. Na тізѕазе icchati тап ti poso, 


na vissase rodati те sakāse, 

sevanti h' etā piyam appiyañ ca 

nāvā увїһё oraskülahm рагаб са. 325. 

Na уіззаве sākhapurāņasanthatem, 

na vissase mittapuranacoram. 

na vissase rājā sakbâ? mamen. ti, 

пв vissase itthi dasanna mātaram. 326. 

Na vissase rāmakerâsu nārisu 

ассап(азїЇйзи asaññatāsu, 

accantapemëáënugat' assa bhariyā 

na vissase, titthasamā hi nāriyo. 327. 

Haneyyu’ chindeyyum pi chedayeyyurm * 

kantham` pi chetvā“ rudhiram pipeyyum', 

mü dīnakāmāsu” азайбаёаѕи 

bhávam kare Gangatitthupamasu. 328. 

Musà tāsatn yathā sacca saccam {азаш tathā” musã, 
gāvo bahitinasseva'° omeasanti varam тагаш. 329. 


+ Gaten’ etā palobhenti pekkhitena шіћіќера ` ca 


айо рі dunnivatthena mañjuna bhanitena са. 330. 


. Сопуо kathinë һ' etā vālā ca !аразаККһагё'*, 


па të kiñci па jānanti yam nüanussesu үапсапаш. 331. 


. Аза lokitthiyo пата, vela tāsam ne vijjati, 


sārattā са pagabbhā ca sikhi sabbaghaso yathā. 332. 
N’ atth'itthinam ріуо пйшв арріуо pi па vijjati, 
sevanti h° etâ piyam appiyañ ca 

пат& yathā orakülar paran са. 333. 


1Cks apassu. 3 Ске rāja-, Hd rājāsukhā. ° Сё» -urn, Bd Q-umpi. * Bde chlndá- 
реууошрі. ° Bde-ə 6 Ck jatvā, 7 Bd! різеуушт. ° Bde dinna-. ° БВ 


yåthå. 


19 Ске bahu-. ` ' ВЕ mitene, read: smitena or mhltena. !? Нг capala. 


4. Копајајасава. (536.) 449 


<, № atth' itthinam ріуо пата аррїуо рі па vijjati, 
dhanattë pativellanti lată va dumanissita. 334. 
ав. Hatthibandham assabandham gopurisañ са сапда!аш! 
chbavadabakarm [pupphachaddakam] 
sadhanam anupatanti пёгіуо. 335. 
ө. Kulaputtam рі jabanti akiñcanarh chavakasamar * 
sadisam api* gaechanti [anupatanti] dhanahetu* оёгіуо ti, 336. 


Ta, ādimajjJbakatbāpariyosānan* ti kathāya гдітајјћарагІусвёпаф, 
laddha khanan t| okšsarn labhitva, іссћаё! man ti таш еза icchatîti рі 
purlso itthinarh па vlssaseyya, sakhapuránassnthatan ti Мууо vā раге vā 
вап (абат puršáñnapanuasan(hatarn? na vissase, appotbetvā® apaccavekkhitva na 
paribhuñjeyya, tatra hl dighajātiho vā ратівіста tittheyya paccamito và sattharn 
nikkhipeyya, mittapuranacoran t! panthadübhanat(bšne {һИап coram 
purünamitto me {* na vissaseyya, corš!° hl уе! sarnjšánanti te yeva mârenti, 
вакћа maman ti so hi khippam eva kujjhati, tasma гајапагь sakhá me ti па 
viasase, dasannamātaran ti ayara mahallikă }йап! шат na aticarissat! attā- 
пат rakkhissatiti!” па vissasitabbä, rámakaršásü 'üu bilánarh ratikaršsu, 
accantasilasü "1 atikkantasilāsu, accanta--gstassüpiti sace рі accanta- 
anugatapema авва tsthëpi narb па vlssase, kirnkarana: titthasamä hi nâriyo 
ti sambandho, tittharù тіув sabhasādhāraņā ti a, baneyyun ti kuddhā vā 
аййаригівавага((8 vā butvā ssbbesarh tain bananādikah Кегеууот, mā dina- 
кашава!? 'ti biuajjhasayásu!t killtthassayásu, bhavan ti evarüpásu alneharh 
mă Кагі!5, Gañgatitthüpamasü 'ti sabbasadharanatthena Gañgatittbassdisšsu, 
musä ti musävädo (ват saccasadiso va, датепй '(1 šdisu pekkbitena palo- 
һһапепа!* UmmadantiJštakarh dunnivatthena Nalinijātakah mañjuna bhanitena 
ttuvalam kho ayyaputta šgaccheyyäsiti’ Nandattheraasa тайт kathelabbarn, 
согіуо tl aambhatassa'? vināsanena coriyo, kathinā ti thaddhabadayā, v| á 
ti duțțhā appaken’ eva kujjhanasilá. lapaaakkbarã’? t| niratthakalapanena 
ваккһагё т1уа madhurā, ава t! asatiyo lāmikā, sārattā ti sabbamárattë'", pa- 
gabbhā и kāyapagabbhiyâdīhi pagabbha, yathā ti yathā aikhī sabbaghaso етап 
tåpi sabbaghasā, pativellantíti рагївва]ап!! upagūhantt vețhenti, lata vā ’ti 
уза lata rukkhanisalta rukkharn vețheti evam etā purisarh parissajantiyo рі 
dhana 20 parissajanti nama, batthibandhadisu gopuriso ti vuccati gopšlako, 
chavadahakan ti chavansrh dahakarn susñusgopšusn!! ti vattarh hotl, pu pp ba- 
chaddakan ti vaccațphānasodbakain, sadhanan (1 etesu pl sadbanarh anu- 


т во all tbrae MSS. *# во Нә; Bå cbavakasama, Chz cataka. 5 read: abbi? < 
add va? * Bds -gaátbapari-. * Rds gātbāya. ? ВФ sākbā in tbe place of paona, 
5 eo Ске; Bd -țetvā. * Bds add tah. 1° Bd -о. 11 Cks yene, Rs yeye? » 
Се -sîtl. 1" Ck Bd dina-. !% Ck líta-, Се lina-, Bd hina-. !5 Сёз tare. 16 
Cka -пе 1? Bd adds dhan, 16 Ваг Јарапава-, !° Cke -dārattā. 20 Bd 
omita pari - -. 31 Bas susanapalan. 

пык V. 29 


10 


15 


95 


30 


36 


50 


450 XXI. Asitltpáta. 


gscchauti yeva, akiĀcanan ti adhanarb, chavakasaman! ti sunskhamarh- 
makhšdskacandšlens samarh sadisah tena nlbbisesam р! purissrh bhajanti gac- 
chanti’, Казшё?: yasmā апораќапіі dhanahetu пїгїуо. 


Evan attano ñáne {һа{та Anando gijjharājā itthinar 
a&gunam kathetvā tunhi аһові, Tassa vacanarn sutvá Nārado 
рі attano ñáne thatvá tāsah agunam kathesi. 


Таш dassento Satthā аһа: Atha khalu bho Nārado devs- 
bršhmano Anandassa g-assa adimajjbakathšpariyosñnam * viditvë tāyar 
Yelayam їшё gatháyo abhasi: 

һо. СвИёго ‘те па pūrenti, te me sunaátha° bbšsato : 
samuddo brâhmaņo гёја itthi cåpi dijampati. 337. 
м. багі sāgaran yanti уа касі pathavim sitë* 
të samuddam na pürenti, ünattāä” hi па pürati. 338. 
ъз. Bràhmano ca adhiyánam vedam akkhānspañcamar ° 
bhiyyo рі sutam іссһеуув, ünattë hi пе pūrati. 339. 
ss. Баја са pathavim sabbam sasamuddarm sapabbatam 
ајјһатаѕе vijinitva anaptaratanocitam. 

param samuddam pattheti, ūnattā hi ua pūrati. 340. 

s<. Ekamekāya itthiyá atthattha patino siya 

surš ca balavantā’ ca sabbakāmarasāharā, 

kareyya navame cbandam, ünattã hi па püurati. 341. 

вв. Sabbitthiyo sikhi-r-iva sabbabhakkha, 

sabbitthiyo nadi-r-iva sabbavāhi, 

sabbitthiyo kanthekanam'" pasākhā, 

sabbitthiyo dhanahetü vajanti. 342. 

se. Уйат јаіепа'! раго!? рагашаѕе 

osiūciyā ? sšgaram ekapāņinā 

sakena tālena'* haneyya ghosanam 

yo sabbabhāvam pamadāsu ossajeyya™. 343. 

sz. Corina bashubuddhinam yâsu sacca sudullabham (33) 

thinarn Ыһауо durājāno macchassêvòdake gatah. 344. 


* Ck catakasau, C? vațakasadiean, Bd chavakasama sadisan. # Ck bbags-, read : 
аЪҺ- 2 > Сә tasma. * Aæ găāthāparlyosāne, ° Bd suņātba шаша, * Rd 
-vissitā. ? C% ūnantā. 5 Ваг -апаш-, Cks -kubama-. * Bd -(0. 19 Се kauta-. 
м pd ја-; read: Jalaneva? 13 Bd: naro. > Bde -сөууг, Che -сіуавв. 1* Bde 
hatthana. !* Chs bbsssajeyya, Bd uyujje; read ossaje. 


4. Kunalajataka. (536.) 451 


ва. Аша!& mudusambhāsā duppūrā tā nadisamë (II se, IV 31) 
sidarnti, nam viditvana ёгака parvajjaye. 345. 

һе. Avattani mabāmāyā brabmacariyavikopanā (II 309, IV 21) 
sidanti, nam viditvāna агай рагіхвајјвуе 346. 

ви. Yam etë upasevanti сһердазё vā dhanena vā 


jātavedo та ввп ёрат Хһірраф опидвћапіі nan ti. 347. 


Те. diJampatid diJasetthakarn' Kunālarn älapati, serltā ti âd! tba- 
pitamāätikāya bbäjanattarh vuttarh, бйпаёса 0 adakapatițthänassa bl mahantattëá 
оза yeva, adhiyansu ti sajjbāyitvā, vedamakkhanapabpcaman” ti 
itlhäsapañceamsm vedacatukkarn, Gnattā ti sa hi ajjhasayamshantataya sikkhi- 
tabbassa na puratl, ratanocitan ti nānāratanobj citarh paclpuunarb, ūnattā 
ti so hí tanhamahantataya ле рӣгай, siyā ti alyurh, ayam eva vā pētho, 
sabbahämarasäbarä ti sabbesarn kamarasšánarh аһагапайй, na vame ti atthahi 
atlttibhivadassanattharn ушш, så pane dassme pi? tato Qttaritare p! chanduri 
йаго!' eva, ünattWë t) ва hi kámatanhamabantataya па pūrati, kantakšnar 
равакћа ti sambadhamagge* kantakasákbasadísa, yathā hi sákha laggitva akad- 
dhati evan etápl rūpādibi kaqdhanti, yathā əākbā hattbādīou vijjbjtva dukkham 
uppadetl evarn өїйр1 putphamattā va sarirasamphassena vijjbitvā mahāvināsah pā- 
penti, vajantiti parapurisah vsjanti, paršmase (1 ganheyys, osiñclyā ti 
паһзуйци оппо akena pāņină sakalasamudde* udaha osiĀceyya* gabetvá chad- 
doyya, вакепа ’tl ekena attano hettbena tam eva bsttharn banltvä” фһоваф 
оррадеуув, sabbabbāvan 1! tvah шеб Ittho kanto piyo manāpo t| vucca- 
шапо yo? puriso evam ev' etan (1 saddahanto attano ajjbâsayanh pamadāsu 
оввајјеууа 19 so }814@1һ1 vātagabaņădini kareyyā 'ti а, gatan ti дашапап, 
апа}й ti «і dbammehl alan (1 sacanarahitā, duppūrā tl yatbā mahānadi 
ndakena етай kiesaratiya duppūrā, sidanti паю - - 0а ti tatthall nan ti 
nipātamattaro, Itthlyo аПїпа саќйео spāyesu sidantitl vldltzš, āvatțenîti yatbā 
avattani mahājana һадаўай mohetvá attano vase vatteti evam etápiti’? a.. 
vikopanā ti nāsanattheua са garabanațtbena са brahmacariyassa kopiku, 
cbandasā vš'3 t| plyasamvāsavasena vā, dhanens үй d dhanahelu vå, 
santbäuan ti yatbā Jätavedo attano tbaparn yarn yarh padesann alliyati tai 
tarb '4 Jabeti tatbā өрі уат yam purisañh КПевағавепа alliyanti tah tw 
anadahanti mahāvināsah pāpenti. 


Evah Náradena ійһіпат agune pakāsite puna M. vise- 


setvá tüsarh agunam pakāsesi. 


‚ Сю devakkhīmanap-. 5% ВФ add vīsa- 
1 


1 Ва -}еһакый. * Ва badamskkbān 
time рі, * Ck sakhădba-, Bd sampāva-. * Ва -а. * Ck -өууа, Bd -eyyurn. 
Ва haritvá. " Bä tvam əra, ° В во. 10 Ра uga-. !! Bd: ettha. !% Che 
-pi attbo. 19 Ck chandavāsāsā. !* Cxe only one tam 


ож 


16 


35 


10 


95 


30 


452 XXI. Asitinipato. 


Таш dassetuh Satthë аһа: Atha khalu bho K, s. Nāradassa 
devabrāhmaņaasa ñdimajjbakathšpariyosšnam viditvă (йуз velāyam 
imë gāthāyo авЬһав!: 

aw Sallape nisitakhaggapāninā 
pandito api pisãcadosinā, 
uggatejauragam ' рі aside, 
еко ekapamadam '* hi nålape". 348. 
ва. Lokacittamathanā hi папуо 
naccagitabhanitamihitãvudbå ‘, 
bādhayanti anupattbitasati 
dipe rakkhasigano уа? vāņije. 349. 
вв. № atthi tasam vinayo na samvaro. 
majjamamsanirata взаппа{й 
tā gilanti purisassa pābhatam 
sāgare va makaran timiūgilo. 350. 
вз. Pañcakāmagunasātagocarā 
uddbatā aniyatā asañūatā 
osaranti pamadā pamadinam 
lonatoyavatiyamn va ёракё*. 351. 
es. Yam oemi uparamanti’ оёгіуо 
chandasā са” ratiyā dhanena vå 
jātevedasadisam pi tādisam 
rāgadosavatiyo’ dahanti nam. 352. 
вв. Addharn! ñatvā purisam mahaddhanam 
osaranti вайһапаш sal’ attanå, 
rattacittarm ativethayanti nam'' 
- sšla'' måluvalatä kānane. 353. 
вт. Tā upenti vividhena chandasā 
citrabimbamukhiyo alamkata, 
uhasanti pahasanti пёгіуо 
` Samvaro ув sati!'! māyakovidā, 354. 
вв. Jatarupamanimuttahhüusita 
sekkatā patikulesu nariyo 


1 Ва „аго ота-. 3 Ска ekarn-, Bds ekaya-. > Ске pamadā hi-, Bd ekaya pamudaya 
nâlape, В» ekiya pamadā М-. * во С“ for -tambl- ot -taemi-, СЕ -banitamt- 
hita udbā, Bd -tapita-. 5 Ck ganeva? Bd ganava. * Bd арава, В’ āpagā. ? 
Bd upalāpenti. ê Rds vā. * Bd -vadhtyo. 19° Bd ujdharh, read: addha байға? 
11 Ске па, 1° Bd „аг, 1% во Ck; Сге вап? Rd va samtatañi. 


4. Kunalajataka. (536. x 453 


rakkhitš aticarenti sãmikam 

dăānavarh va badayantarassitā', 355. 
ве. Tejavàpi hi naro vicakkhano 

sakkato bahuųjanassa pūjito 

naripam vasagato па bhāsati 

Rābunā upagato va candimā. 356. 
то. Yam kareyya kupito diso disam 

dutthacitto vasam āgatam ari 

tena bhiyyo vyasanam nigacchati 

nërinam vaságato ареккћата. 357. 
та. Кезаійпапекћесћіораќајјієа 

pšdapanikasadandatalita ? 

hipam eva’ upagatá hi пёгіуо 

tā ramanti kunape va makkhikā. 358. 
тз. Та kulesu visikhantaresu vâ 

rüjadhüëninigamesu vā puna 

odditan Namvcipāsavākarah 

cakkhumā parivajje sukhatthiyo', 359. 
зв. Ossajitva * kusala tapogunam 

уо anariyacaritani-m-acari * 

devatahi nirayarn nimissati 

chedagamimaniyar va vāņijo. 360. 
14. So idha” garahito parattha са 

dummati’ upagato звкаттипё 

gacchat; aniyato рвјарајат 

dutthagadrabbaratho va uppathe, 361. 
ть. So upeti nirayam Patāpanam 

sattisimbalivanañ ca-m-āyasam” 

āvasitvā[ua}] tiracchënayoniyam '° 

petarajavisayarn па muñcati*™. 362. 
тв. Dibbakhiddaratiyo ca'° Nandane 

cakkavatticaritañ са mānuse 

nāsayanti pamada pamëdinam 

duggutiñ са patipādayanti nam. 363. 


1 іе eyantanissitā. 2? all three MSS. -Каза-. * read: өч". * Bă -ЈЈеуув su- 
khattiko, C# -jjo sukhanayo. * all three MSS. ossajjitvā. < Cks omit уо, Bds 
have уо aleriyesu ca-. 7 read: idbā, 5 Bd dummedho. ° Bd ayasarb, Ha 
āyasarii, Ck mānasayaii, Сг māsayariı. '° Ске ayo. {1 Ck: macca. 1% Cks va 


15 


50 


454 XXI Asiünipárs, 


zs. Dibbakhiddaratiyo na dullabhā 
cakkaratticaritañ ca mânuse 
sovanpavyambanilayā * ға” acebara 
уе caranti рашайаһ` anatthihā. 354. 
те. Kamadhatasamatikkama gati 
rūpadhātuyă ЬЬйто оа dullabho 
vitaragavisayupapattiya 
уе caranti рашадаћ` anatthika. 362. 
зь. Sabbadukkhasamatikkamam siram 
ассап(аш acalitam ssamkbatam 
nibbutehi sucibi'na dullabham * 
уе caranti ратадёһ` anatthikā ti. 366. 


Та. sullape ti sace пауз saddhim sallapessasi sisan te pātessīmiti* 
vatvă khaggar ádšya thitenšpi* aallapitamatte yevs шт khaditva Jivitavinisarh 
рёрезгашіїй dosina butva thitena pisacenëpi ваййһїїї sallape, qpagatarh Jasi- 
(5 7 оёзезазшій tbitam’ uggatejah uragan? aside ув, еко рапа butva rabo 
ekáya'? pamadaya па bi ваПаре!!, lokacittamathana ti lokassa сійарћа- 
tika!” dipe rakkbasigano!3 ti yatháa yakkhadipe rakkhasigano!?2 шацоѕвела!* 
vosona ° vanlje раіобћеќуё 17 attano vasagate katvš khâdanti ovan imápi ката- 
gunehl attauo таве katvā satte mahavinšsari pāpentitli a, vinayo ti ёсёго, 
sernvaro ti mariyadá, pábhatan ti dukkhasambhatarn dhanam gllanti пазепїї. 
aniyatš ti anlyatacittā, lonatoyavatiyan tí lonastoyavantarn ватийдап!? 
tl a, ёраш ё!" ti špagš, syam eva vā phtho, yathá samuddah nadiyo osa- 
ranti evarh раозӣіпаф pamada ti a., chandasā (1 pemona, та1!уй el рабса- 
kšmagunparatiys, dhħhanena va ti dhanahetu vā, jātavedasadisan ti guna- 
sampattiyá agglm iva jalanta '" рі. răgadosavatlyo ti rāgadosebi vadhiki, 
тї]адовада!!уо%9 vi pi ра!һо, osarantiti madhuravacauena tari bandhantiyo 
upagacchanti, sadhanan?’ t| sadhanā??, ayam eva vā ра{һо, vatthšlarbkirattháya 
kici attano dhanarh datvâpi otarantiti а, ваһасбапі?? Nj attabhšvela sad- 
dhin а(апо?* bhavam pi tase’ eva pariccajantiyo viya honti, ativetba- 
yantitl dhanagabanalthšy3a ativiya vetbeutl pilonti, vivídhena chandasa ti 
пёлётідћепа акатера, citrabimbsmukhiyo ti alahkāraņarasena citrasarira 
vicitranmukbiyo va hutvá, ü basantiti mahāhasitam hasanti, pabamwantitl 
тапдгћавііаф hasanti, Sarivaro vã?’* ЧЇ māyākārapuriso viys aaurindo viya 


1 Ck -ryambi-, Bd anvannahyambi-. 32 Rds са. 8 Ске -ihl, Ва -Ibhi, Re -îhl. + 
Ск» -ā, 3 Ваг phāle-, Ck pathe-. * Bd adds ssliape. ? Ck tadayitvā. ° Bd 
tab. * Chs omit uragan. 1°? Сіз ekäya, !! Сі šlape. !? Bd lokacittaasa- 
ghštaka. 12 Bd -a, 1* Cks manuhbñena. '5 Bd vesevs. Сг omit vesena. !6 
Ваг upaläpetvā. 7 Ck vatta-. !* Bds арадап, Cke -kan. !? Ваг Jaltm. № 
Ch _dossva. 2! Cks -në. ## Chs „пат. 33 Ва Се апа, 3% Cka ca. 


4. Kunņāļajātaka. (536.) 455 


cal, dānavamh va badayantarass)tā’ ti yathā kuto nu agscchatha hho tayo 
јапа ti Karandakajātake® badayantarassită’ antoudaragatëpit dānavarh aticări 
evan aticarantl, arakkhiyo  h' etā t! dîpeti, na bbasstiti na virocati Hārita- 
Lomasaknassapa-Kusa-rajano viya, tenā'tl tato* amíittana katavyasanā atírekatara- 
туавапап ti a, арек Ећата ti satanho, kese--tajjitā ti akaqdhitva lūna- 
кев&ё? nakhehl cbinnagattë ° tajjitā pādšdībi са 18118 va hutvā уо? kelivasena 10 
ete рі vippakāre karotl’! tadisarn hinam eva upagatà nāriyo ramanti na’? ete 
vippakäro pariharant! madhurasamišcare!3, kirnkarapa: ramant! kunape va 
makkhiká tí yasmā jegucche hatthikunapadimhi makkhika viya tā hine yeva 
ташап a, odditan ti па etă itthlyo паша atha kho imesu {ћапево Na- 
mucino Kilesamārassa migapakkhizalbanattbsrn luddakehi odditan pāsañ ca vā- 
karañ cë '1 14 таййашапо paññâcakkhunā ca! cakkhumàa?t dibbamëánusakena]!? 
sukhena attbiko partvajjeyya, ossajjitvā ti devamanussesu mahāsampattidâ- 
yaka їародипай Ccbaddetvš!" уо puriso anariyesu !? pañcasu Шашадипевп 
kāmaraticaritān! ácaratl, devatāh[l nirayarh nimissstiti!? so sadovalokena 
parivattetvā 1 nirayarn ganhissati, сһедарат1шап1уаг va узп!}о (1 yatbā 
bšálavšánijo mahagghabhandarn datva chedagamllšimakarh manikarh ganbati tathá- 
тйро ayar һо a, во ti so lttbinarñ vasan gato, aniyato tl ettakarb kšálsrh 
apāyesu рассіввай, galāgaļan (1 devalokā сз?? шаповваіока са?? galltvå apa. 
yam eva дассһайи °? a., yathā Шш: duttba--uppathe ti yathë kütagadra- 
bhayuttaratho maggā Okkamitvā uppathe yeva дассһай tathā, sattisimbali- 
Yanan tl sattisadisebi kantakehi yuttam ayasasimbalivanarn, petarájavísayan 
ti petavisayañ ca kālaksñjakaasuravisayañ ca)!4, pamādinan ti рашацапатр, 
te hi pamadāsu pamattâ (авап sampattinah mülabhütarb kusnlarh па karonti, 
iti (овар pamadā sabbā tā näāseyanti паша, pațipādeyauti пап ti tatha- 
vidbarh ·рогівагт tå pamādavasen’ eva ekusalerh kāretvā duggathh pațlpādenti 
паша, вотаппатуашћап!1ауа ti suvannamaysrimānavāsiniyo, pamadā- 
banatthikā ti ya?’ purisa рашедаћ! anattbikā hutvā brabmacariyarh catanti, sa- 
matikkamā ti kamadhatusamatikkamena уа gati rūpadhħātuyā bhavo ti 
yo kámadhatusamatikkamagatisarhkhato rüpadbšátusambhavo?  tasarn na dullabho, 
vitarāgavisayüpapattłyā Ч yä?” vitarāgavisaye suddhavasaloke uppatti 
sêpi tesan na dullabbā Ч a, accantan ti anattarn 3  avinásadhammakarn 3*, 
acalitan tÍ kilesebl akampiteh, nibbutebîti mibbntakilesebi, sucihtfti 
parieuddhebi evarūparhn nibbānam pi na dullabharh. 


1 Oks yeva vā. 3 Bd ~yantaulssitā. 3 < Samugga- Vol. Ш p.527. * Сї attano. 
> Bdr лк. 6 Bd tamhā. °’ Ске -sa. © Ck Јіппа-, * Сіз ув. 19 Bd kijeosa-. 
11 Сме „ові. '? во Сіз; Bd nami. '2 Bs add 1. 34 Ско vākarajjañcāti, Bd 
vškuñce. '5 Ck ma, Bd omits райба-. ?* Bd adds puriso. ' Bd omits dibha. 
е Bd adda yo ti. 1*# Bd: add aparisuddbesu, 19 Ска -atia. *! Rds niva-. "i pd 
vå, 20 Bd» -lasaúti. 1* Ва asurā ca petaĀca. 25 Cke уо. 2° Bde -tuyš bbāvo. 
37 Ск sā, Bd omits ya. 26 Ске antātitan. 2° Rd -tarb, 


15 


30 


з0 


35 


80 


456 ХМ. Asiíiunipita. 


Evan М. apatamabâoibbāoam pāpetvā desanam nittha- 
pes. Himavante kinparamahoragādayo ākāse thitadevatā са 
„abo Buddhalilbšáya katbitan“ t; вабЬокагаш адатзѕо. Anando 
gijjbarājă Nárado devabrahmano Punnamukho са phussakokilo 
attano attano parisam ádáya yatháthanam ета рашітзо. М. 
sakatthápam eva gato. Паге pana antarantarā' ágantvá' Ma- 
hásattassa saotike ovadam gabetva tasmim отаде thatvá sagga- 
paráyana ahesum. 


S. i. d. а. j. samodhënento о$апара!һа abhasi: 
sn. Kunšlo Фаш tadā asin, Udayi phussakokilo, 

Ànando gijjbarājâsi, Sariputto ca Narado, 

evam dhëáretha jātakan ti. 367, 
Te pana bhikkbu рашапвКа!е Satthu ânubhâvene gantvë âgamana- 
kale attano attano ãnubhāvrena āgatā, tesa 5. mahāvane kanimatthanam 
kathesi, te (аш dirasam ета arahattarm pāpunihsu. Маһа devatá- 
samügamo abosi, atha Bb. Mahësamayasuttam kathesîti, Кипй!1а- 
jštakam. Asītinipātań'". 


5. Mahāsutasomajātaka. 


Kasmā tuvan ti. dam S. J. v. Aūgulimālattheram 
&. Б. Tassa uppatti ca pabbajjā са’ Añgulimālasuttavapņanāya vutta- 
nayena vitthārato veditabbā. So pana saccakiriyăya mülhagabbhaya 
itthiyā sotthibhãvah katvā tato patthaya sulabhapindo hutvā vivekam 
anubruhanto aparabhāge arabattah patvá abhiññato азишаћа(ћегараш 
abbhantaro‘ sahosi. Tamim kale dh. k. s.: „āvuso aho Bhagavatā 
tathārūpam luddam |оһїарапш таһасопый Angulimalam адапдепа 
asatthena dametva nibbisevanam karontena dukkaram katah, aho 
Buddhā пата dukkarakārikā" ti, S. Gandhakutiyam півіопо’ va 
dibbnsotene kathan sutvā „ajja mama gamana bahupakaram bha- 
Yiss8ti, mahādhammadesanā pavattissatîti" баќуа anopamāys Buddha- 
һауа dhammasabharm  gantvë panññattasane nisiditva „К. n. bh. е. 
k. ов,“ ti p. n i п.“ ú v. ,&nacchariyam bhi, ідёпі paramabhisam- 


! Rd anantarantā. 3! pd gamtv3a. 5 Bd аїһавва. * Ске omit ав101-. 5. Ofr. Morris, 
В. & Cariya-Pitaka р. 100. ° Bd» add upasempadā ca. * Rds -re yeva. ? Rds 
thito. * Bd -bhayarh. 


5. Mahāsutasomajštaka. (537.) 457 


bodhim pattene mayš е{аззв vinayanarn, sv-aham pubbascariyam ca- 
Tanto padesañāņe thito рі etari damesin“ ti vatvā' в, &.: 


A. Kururatthe Indapattanagare Koravyo nāma rājā 
dhammena r. Кагевї'. В. tassa aggamahesiyā kucchismim 
nibbatti', sntavittakatáya* pana tam Sutasomo ti вайјӣпітао, 
tam enar гаја vayappattarh° disāpāmokkhācariyassa santike 
sipparn gahanattháya Takkasilah ревеѕі, во ācariyabhāgarh 
ādāya nikkhamitva magga patipajji. Вӣгапаєіуат“ Казігаййо 
putto Brahmadattakumāro рі tath' eva үабуй pitarā pesito, nik- 
khamitvá tam eva magga patipajji. Sutasomo' maggarh 
gantvá парагайуйге sáláya phalake vissamanatthāya nisīdi, 
Brahmadattakumāro рі gantvā tena saddhirn ekaphalake nisidi. 
Atha пай Sutasomo patisanthārarh karonto ,,samina magga- 
kilanto kuto āgacchasîti“ pucchitva ,,Загараѕібо“ ti vutte 
„kassa putto“ ti” „Brahmadattassă“ ‘ti? „konāmo“ ti’ ,,Brah- 
madattakumāro паша“ '(1'° „kena Кагапева ágato siti“ pucchi. 
So „вїррараһапауйа!'“ 'ti vatvā tam рі maggakilanto ti ten’ 
eva пауепа itararh pucchi. So рі sabbarn acikkhi. Те ubho рі 
„тауаф khattiyā ekācariyass’ eva santike зіррараһапӣуа'? 
gacchāmā“ 'ti aññamaññam mittabhávam katvā nagararh pavi- 
sitvā acarivakularn gantvā ācariyah abhivādetvā attano játirn 
avikatvë sippagahanāya'’ āgatabhāvarh Каевшћ. So „sādhū“ 
‘ti sampaticchi. Те ācariyabhāgam datvá sipparn pattha- 
pesum, na kevalañ ca te yeva aññe pi tadá Jambudipe eka- 
satamattā rājapnttā tassa santike sippa ganhanti"”. Suta- 
somo tesarh jetthantevāsiko '* hutvá ѕіррат opadisanto nacirass` 
eva nipphattin pápuni, so aññesarn'" santika agantvā™ ,sa- 


' Rds add tunbl ahosi tehl yacito. # Bds add tadā ашһашай з Bds add 
dassmäse atikkante вптаппауаппал} рабат vljäyi. < Bds -vittatāya. ° Bds 
add dievi nikkhasahassarn datva. * Bdztada Bā-. 7 Rds atha Su-. 6 pa 
aiti. 9 Сіз -assa, omitting tl, Вёз read: kšsirañño putto И. !° Bds паша, 
omltting ti. >! Ске -пауг, B4:! sippuggahanattbaya. 12 Ваг sippuggahnatthāya. 
12 Ваг 205 5дассһап!!. 14 Сёз Је Һасагіуо. '® Rds -agsa, 14 Chs ар-, 


10 


458 ХХІ. Asitlnipata. 


bāyo те“ ti vatvā Brahmadattakumāram eva gantvā' tassa 
pițthiācariyo botvā khipparm sikkhäpesi, itaresam pi kamena" 
sippa nitthitah, Те аппуораш datvā ñcariyarh vanditvā 
Sutasoma pariväretvā nikkhamirsn, atha пе Sutasomo mag- 
gadhure' {һаїуй uyyojento „tumhe attano attano pitunpam sip- 
parh dassetvā rajjesu patitthahessatha‘, patitthit&ë pana mam’ 
оуйдат kareyyāthā“ ‘ti а. „Кіт ācariyā“ ‘1. ,Pakkha- 
divasesu nposathikñ hatvā mā ghaátam ° kareyyāthā“ ‘і. Te 
»Bādhū“ ti sampațicchihsu. B. hi añgavijjāpāțtbakattā‘ „anā- 
gate Bārāņasikumārah’ nissāya mahaábhayam nppajjissatiti*“ 
ñatvă са te еуаф° ovaditvá uyyojesi. Te sabbe рі attano 
attano janapada gantvā pitunnarh sippa dassetvā гајје 
patitthāya patitthitabhāvañ c` eva ovāde vattanabhāvañ ca 
jānāpeturn paņņākārena saddhirm paņņāni pahiņihso. M. tam 
pavattirn ñatvā „appamattā hothā”™ ti paņņāni pahiņi, Tesu 
Вагапавігаја шашвепа vina bhattarn оа bhuñjati, uposatha- 
divasatthāya рі "вва marmsarm gahetvā thapenti'?° ath' ekadiva- 
sar evam thapitamamsarm bhattakárakassarn pamādena rāja- 
gehe koleyyasunakhā khaádimsu, bhattakārako mamhsam adisvā 
kahāpaņamutthin ādāya caranto mamsam uppādetuh asak- 
konto „sace amarnsakabhattarn upanāmessāmi jivitañ me n` 
atthi, kin nu kho karissāmîti“ cintetvā ,atth' eso upāyo“ ti 
vikāle" āämakasusānarn gantvā tarnmuhuttamatassa '* purisassa 
ürumamhsarh āharitvā supakkarh pacitvā bhattarn upanāmesi, 
rañño marhsakhandarh jivhagge thapimattam eva sattarasaharani- 
sahassāni phari. sakalasarīrarh khobhetvā ațthāsi, kimkárana: 
pubbe!° веуййаїйуа'*, so kira atītānantare attabhāve yakkho 
hutvà bahun mannssamarmnsar khādi'*, ten’ assa tam piyar 


1 Cks omit gantvā, Віз read brabmadattassa kumārasseva santikah gantrā. °? 
Bds anutka-. 3 Ваз maggantare. * Bd pațițthahlssanti. > Bd ghătanam. 

Bd -pàtakusalattā, Ве -pâkatattā ? Ваә -pasiyan brahmadattakumaram, * 
во Ске; В tesarh in (ће place of са te өташ. ° C% hoptü. !° Ваг -eti '! 
Bd kale. 1% (йз -mattassa, Bde mubuttarn matassa, 2 Cks -ā. !* Bd sevaDa- 
(ауа, 15 Bd khāditapubbo. 


5. Mahašsutasomajataka. 537.) 459 


ahosi, во ,sac' аһаф tunhi yeva paribhuüjissami na me ауаћ 
imah marnsarh kathessatiti“ cintetva saha khelena bhūmiyarh 
pātesi', „пійдоваф deva khādāhîti“ ca vutte manusse patikka- 
mápetvá „aham etassa niddosabhavam јапёші, kim marnmsam 
etan“ ti „purimadivasesu paribhogamamsam eva devå“ "і 
„nanu aññasmim Кае ayam гаво n’ atthiti“ „ajja ѕпраккат 
Чеуй'* "і „nanu pubbe pi evan eva pacasiti'*, atha narh tunhi- 
bhütar) Па{уй „sabhāvar vā kathehi?'jivitarh vā te п' atthiti“ 
š,, во abhayam yācitvā yathábhütarn 'kathesi, rājā „mā saddam 
akāsi, pakatiyá pacanamarhsam ‘уат * khāditvā mayhan manussa- 
marnsam eva pacāhîti“ &., „nana dukkaram devā“ 'ti, „mā bháyi, 
pa dukkaran“ ti, „nibaddharh‘* kuto labhissámiti“, „папи ban- 
dhanāgâre bahumanussá* ti, so tato pattháya (аа аказі, apara- 
bhāge bandhanāgāre тапиввеви khinesu „idāni kim karomiti“ 
а., „antarāmagge sahassabhandikarh khipitvā yo ta ganhati° 
tarh ‘coro’ ti gahetvá mārehîti“, во tathá katvā' aparabhāge 
sahassabhaņndikam olokentam рі айїзуй ,„ідапі kih Кагошібі“ 
å. „yāmabherivelāäya’ парага akular hoti, (уап ekasmim 
gharasandhimhi vä catukke vā thatvá глапивваф paharitvā’ 
татват ganhá%“ ‘ti, во tato pattháya Шатайват ädāya 
gacchati, tesu tesu {һйпези kaļebarāni dissanti, „mama mātā 
па paññāyati, pitâ па paññayati, bhātă Бћаріої па раппйуаб1ї“* 
manussánarh paridevanasaddo suyyati, парага bhitatasitá hutvā 
„іше manusse siho nu kho khādati vyaggho nu kho vakkho 
pu kho“ ti olokentā pabáramukharh disvā „eko manusso khā- 
dati maññe“ (1'° mahājano гајапрапе sannipatitvā. upakkosi'', 
гаја „kih tātā“ ti pucchi, „deva imasmirn параге manussa- 
khádako сого atthi, gaņhāpethā‘“ `ti, „ahar katharn jánissámi, 
kih аһа парага rakkhanto carāmîti“, mahājano ,„rājā 


1 Bd pādesi. ° Bds add no се kathesi. 2 O% tai. * Ck kbandai, Ha 
mbandha. * Bd -hiesati. * Bds akāsi. 7 Bde pathamapacchimayame yada 
majbimsyäme-. * Bd» add vithiyarp vā 9 Rds -ese māretvā. '° Bd -titl 
pañüsnt. !! pd -sisu. 


35 


= 


10 


15 


90 


35 


460 XXI Айар. 


nagarena anatthiko, Kălahatthisenāpatissa ācikkhissāmā“ '{1 
vatvā' tassa kathetvā „corah pariyesiturh vattatiti“ vadihaa, 
so „sattāharh ágametha, pariyesitvā согап dassšmiti“ mahā- 
janar uyyojetvá purise āņâpesi „tātā nagare kira manassa- 
khādako coro atthi, tumhe tesu tesu thánesu niliyitvā tarh 
ganhathá%“ ‘ti, te ,,s&dhü“ "і vatvā tato pattháya nagara 
pariganhanti, bhattakárako pi ekasmirm_ gharasandhimhi patic- 
channo hutvā ekarh itthiñ máretva ghanaghanamarnsam ādāya 
pacchim püretum árabhi, афа narh te ригіѕ& gahetvā pothetvë' 
pacchábaharn bandhitva .gahito manussakhādako coro“ ti 
mahāsaddarh karirmsu. mahájano?' рагіуйгеві, atha паш sutthu 
vadhitvá * marnsapacchim рїуйуз bandhitvá senāpatissa dasse- 
sni, senāpati’ disvā „kin nu kho esa imah marmsarm khādati 
udahu aññena mamhsena missetvā vikkiņāti udāhu вппавва 
vacanena māretiti®“ cintetvā tam atthah pucchanto' patha- 
marh gåtham áha: 
1. Kasmā tuvarh rasaka edisāni 

karosi Кашїпйпї sudárunani, 

һапавї* itthi purise са mülho 

marhsassa hetu айи° dhanassa káranë ti. 868. 


Та. ra'sakā чі bbattahürakarn jlapati, Itoparah qttšnasambandhini va- 
Canapativacanani Palivasen' eva veditabbāni !°. 


+. Ма attahetu na dhanassa Кагапа 

na puttadárassa sahāyañātinar, 

bhattā са те bhagavā bhūmipālo 

so khadati'' marnsarn bhadante'’ ейіѕат'". 369. 
s. Sace tuvarh bhattur atthe payutto 

Кагоз1 kammāni sudšárunani 


| Bd дата. ê? Ске poth-. 2 В atha паб mahā-. * Oks vadi-, Bdz bandbi. 
5 Ваг add tari. * Rds -siti. 7 На» add sutasoniajatake, 8 Ck hanāti, В4 
hanesi, ° Ске s=. 10 Bd: add bbattskárako аһа. !! all three MSS. t. 1 
Ск bhante, Bd bhaddante. !2 Hae -santi atha narh senapati aha, 


5. Mahāsutasomajātaka. (527.) 461 


pñto ув antepurarh pāpunņitvā 

lapeyyāsì me гёјіпо sammukhe tarh'. 370. 
< Таа karissëmi ahah bhadante' 

уаша? (пуат bhāsasi Külahatthi, 

рахо va antepuram pāpuņitvā 

vakkhámi te гајіоо saminukhe tan ti. 371. 

Ta. bbagavā tl garavadivacanam etam, весе tuvan ti васса nu kho 
bbanatit udähu maranamukbena° musi (t vimarmsanto evam &,, ta. au- 
dšrunsnitl manusssghšátakamman!, ват mukletan ti sammukbe tbstvš evati 
тайвуудвій so sampaticchanto g. à. 

Atha rar senapati gá])habandhanam eva sayāpetvā vi- 
bhātāya rattiyā amaccehi са saddhirn mantetvâ sahbesu eka- 
vádesu' játesu sabbatthánesu йгаКЕһап thbapetvā nagaram 
hatthagatarn katvā rasakassa рі giváya marhsapacehim ban- 
dhitvā ādāya rajanivesanarn pāyāsi, sakalanagararn viravi°, 
гаја hiyyo' bhuttapātarāso sáyamásam pi alabhitvā ,,rasako 
idāni ágacchissati idāni āgacchissatîti“ nisinno va rattih viti- 
nāmetvā .ајјарі rasako nágacchati'% nāgarānañ са mahásaddo 
suyyati, kin na kho etan“ ti уаќарапеоа olokento tarn tathá- 
rüparh aniyamánam disvā ,pškatam idam Кйгапапп jātan“ ti 
сіоќеіуй dhitirn'' opatthapetvā pallarnke nistdi, Kálahatthi pi 
pam upasamkamitvá anuyuñji, во рі 'вва kathesi. 

Tam attham pakāsento Sattha аһа: 

s. Tato гаќуё vivasgne'! suriyass' uggamanam pati 
Kålo rasakam ādāya гајаоаш upasamkarmi. 
upassmkanitvë тајапат idab vacapam nbravi'': 372. 
a. Saccam kira maharaja гаѕако pesito (вуй 


banati '* ittbī purise tuvam ташзёпі khadasi'5. 373. 


1 Bds tanti atha nar rasako aha. # Bd bhadd-. 3 Ck yameva, Се yame. * 
Ck bhaneti, C? bbati, Bd bhanasi. * Rds -bħhayəna, * Bd тиза bbaņasīti. ? 
Ваг -chandesu. ê Bd vivari. *# Bde hiyo, Ca bhiyo. ° А-н. © Basati. 
19 Ck rattā-. )5 Bd -viti tattbs bbikkhave tato (айа kile ratyāvivassāne suriyugga- 
тапа pati kälo гаѕвакаі adšya та)апатй upasañhamitvá idarh vacanarh abravi 
атосв. !* Bd banati. 1% Bd -siti tattha шаһёгаја kira rassako tayá рево 


вассаф ayarh rassako jttbi ca purise са Һапай (ға mnarnsšn! manussamarbsini, 


khadael ssccam kira teto гаја aha. 


10 


15 


10 


15 


95 


462 ХХ]. Asitinipāta. 


т. Evam eva! tathë Kāla газаКо pesito maya. 
тата айап! karontassa kim etah panbhasasiti, 374. 


Te. Каіа ‘ti Kalahatthl, evan evau ti tejavsntene senapatina anuyutto ° 
тией vattüurü asakkonto evam aha, ta. tathā ti Idah purimasa' eva vevacanari, 
mamatthan ti mama vadibim, karontassā `1 karontam, himetan t| kasna 
ovaro paribhšsssi aho dukkararh karosi tvah пата sññarh corarh agahetváë mama 
pesanakarakarn” ganbāsîti tassa bbayarn janento Касћев! *. 

Tarh sutvë senäpati „аўатп saken’ eva mukhena patijānāti, 
aho sāhasiko, ettakam náma kalam manussā‘ etena khāditā*, 
vāressāmi пар“ ti ciutetvā áha: ,.maháraja må еуаф kari, 
mā’ manussamarhsarn khädîiti".  ,,Kalahatthi Кїї kathesi, 


паһат ito viramiturn sakkomiti'"“ ,„Mahārāja'" sace na vira- 
missasi attānañ са ratthañ са nāsessasiti'"'. „Evar nassante '* 
рі ahan n’ eva viramituh sakkomîti“. Tato senāpati tassa 
вайїйрапйуа'!* vatthuh āharitvā давѕеві'*: atitasmirn hi mahā- 
samudde cha mahāmacchā ahesurh, tesu Anando Тїтапдо'* 
Ајјһоһаго'* ti ime tayo janā” pañcayojanasatikā, Tiītimīti'“ 
Miñgalo Timirapiñgalo'" ti ime” sahassayojanikā”, te sabbe 
pi pāsăņasevālabhakkhā™ аһезшї, tesu Anando samnddassa 
ekapasse vasati, гат *° bahü macchā Чаззапйуа upasarmn- 
kamanti, еКайїуазай ,,sabbesarn dipadacatuppadānarn гӣјӣ 
pañňāyati, amhākam raja” п’ atthi, mayam р' etarh? гајё- 
narh karissāmā“ ‘ti cintetvā sabbe ekacchandā hutvā Ānandarh 
rajanarn karirsu, macchā tato ра{{һйуа tassa sāyapātarh* 
upatthānarh gacchanti. Ath’ еКайїуаватп Anando ekasmirn pab- 
bate pāsāņasevālarh khādanto ajānitvā sevālo™ ti вайпауа eka- 


1 Bd ava. > Ce-o. 2 Cs -pa-. * Bd tattha bho kälshatıbi evamaça tathà 
тавзако me mayá pesito шаша atthari karontassa гавзаказве atah газзакап 
kih paribhāsas! in the place of tettha - - kathesi. > Bd -взашапвай. * Bd 
чат. 7 Cha omit mā. * Bd kbādasiti. ° Суг -mi. !° Ске omit ma-. M! 
Ске «titi, Rd nasslesasiti. '? Bd -о. !? Rds -natthaya. 1* Bdz add mabärāja. 
13 Ваа panando. 1* Cs ajjhoro, Ck ajjbāro. 17 Bds macchā. !8 Ck tmit. ™ 
Bd plūgalo timirapiñgalo mahātimírapiňgalo. 20 BA adds tayo тассһа f! 
Rds add honti, 28 Ck -na-, 32 Cks omit tan. 2? Скә omit гаја. 25 Che 
pokah. ?* Rd sayain pāto. 21 Bde „Јат. 


5. Mahšsutasomajataka (537 ) 463 


тассһаш! khádi, tassa tam шаат сһайеві, so',,kin nu kho 
idarh ativiya madhuran“ ti nlharitváë olokento macchakhandarh 
disvā ,ettakam kalam ajānitvă na khadin?“ ti cintetvá ‚„єй- 
yam рі páto рі шассЬёпаф upatthānah Ка{уй* gamanakāle 
ekadve' macche Кһайіввёші, рёкаёаф katvā khádiyamánesu 
hit еко pi mam na upasarhkamissati, sabbe palāyissantiti“ 
paticchanno hatvā рассһа' osakkitosakkitarn pabaritvā’ khadi, 
macchā рагіккһауат gacchantā’ cintayirhsu: „kuto nu kbo 
ба!їпаїїй bhaya uppajjissatiti“, ath’ eko panditamaccho '° 
„mayhah Ānandarsa Кігіуаф " па ruccati, parigaņbissāmi" 
nan“ ti macchesu upatthánarh gatesu Anandassa kannapattena 
paticchanpo atthási, Апапйо macche uyyojetvā pacchato gac- 
chbante'° khadi, so maccho ќат disvā itaresahm ārocesi, te 
sabbe pibhit&'° palāyihsu, Anando tato pattháya maccharasa- 
lobhena '* anññarn сосагаф па ganhati, so jighaccháya ” kila- 
manto" „kahan nu kho раќа ti!" te macche pariyesanto 
ekam pabbatarh disvă „mama bhayena imar pabbatarm nissāya 
vasanti maññe™, раЬЬаїап parikkbipitvā upadhareasamiti' 
nañgutthena sisena са ubbo раєварі:° parikkbipitva ganhi, 
„асе idha vasissanti™ paláyissantiti“ pabbatarmh parikkhipantarh 
attano nañguttharh disváë ‚ауа maccho mar vañcetvā pabba- 
tarh nissáya vasatiti“ kuddho panpāsayojanamattarh nañguttharp 
ganhi”, абпат macchan ti? зайййуа'* gahetvā murumurā- 
yanto™ khadi, dukkha '* vedanā uppajji, lohitagapdhena macchā 
sannipatitvā Inñcitvá luñcitvā ?? khádantë*° yāvasīsam āgamimsu, 


1 Hds екаћ-. 3 Bd» kbadantassa іп the place of cb. so. ° hd kbādāmi. * 
На āgantvå. 5 Bd екайһ-, © Bd -пе, omitting bl. 7 Bde maccbain. ° Bas 
add khadissámiti tatbā katvā. ° Bdz viditvā. '° Bd <o-. !1 Bd káranam, 
Ве karana. '? Cks omit рап. !3 Bd -tarn. '* Bds bītatasitā, !* Bd -гавва- 
giddbona, !* Ck tigacchasáyaib, Сә Jigacchasayam. !! Ck kllento, Cs kilanto. 
18 Ва adds jigacchāya pilito. !*# Bd adda ti tah. 3° Bd passeaa, Bs ubhosu 
passesu. 7! Bas vaganti. 2 Bd khandan. 33 Cks maccha, omitting u. 34 
Bd adds даат, ?*% Bd mururhmarāpento. 22% Bd dukhkba. 2° Bd omita 1. 1. 
28 Ва adds bhuñjJetça. 


10 


15 


90 


464 ХХІ. Asitlnipšts. 


mabásariratáya nivattiturh аваккопіо (аїїһ` eva jivitakkhayar 
рёрові, pabbatākāro' atthiršsi аһові, ākāsacārino tápasaparibba- 
КЕ manussānarh katbayirnsu, sakala-Jambudipe manussă 
jānińsu. Таш vatthurh āharitvā dassento Kālahatthi â.: 
a. Апапдо sabbamacchánar khāditvā rasagiddhimā 
parikkhīņāya parisāya attānarn khādiyā mato’. 375. 
+. Evar pamatto rasagárave rato 
bālo yadi йуайт nâvabujjhati 
vidhamma putte сајі" ñátake са 
parivattiyā' attánam eva khādati. 376. 
зо. Idan te sutvăāna vihetu* chando, 
та ЫһаККһавї* raja manussamamsarn, 
mā їуаш iwar kevala vārijo va 
dipadādhipa suññam akāsi ratthan ti. 377. 

Та. 6аһһашвссһапап (1 sabbesarb macchanarh Jetthako, khaditva tl 
зо attano parisarb Ећа41', khadiya ti pacchā айапмый kħāditvā mato, äyatin® 
ti yadi anāgate uppajjanadukkba na jānâti, vidbammā `ti vidbawitvā nā- 
setvă, putte са 'ti puttadbitaro caji’, ñatak са 'U seseñātake caji, vidhanima 
putte cajitvā ñatake са "Ша. parivattiyă ti añōab alabhanto nivattitvâ 


attānam eva khadati, vihetü "1 vlgacchstu, kevelan 11 sakalarațtharn, vārijo 
vā 'ti Anandamaccho viya 10. 


|! Bd’ pabbatarăsiviya, ° Bd khadiyamako. Š Bd only ca. * Ck -vattatiya, Са 
-vattiya, Bd -vattaya. 5 Ві vigetu. % Bd bbikkhayi, Ck: -8l. ! Ck omits khadi. 
e Che-ti, ? СЕ сарі. 'O Da tattha mabārāja atitasmirn kale mahāsamudde pañ- 
casatayojaniko anando паша mahamaccho sabbesarn шассһапага гаја mahásamud- 
dasse ekapasse thito, khadltva ti sakajátikanarn шассһапап rasagiddhimā macche 
khaditvá par!kkhina ti macchaparisaya khayar ра(сёув attenan t| anñarn goceram 
agahetrā pappatarn parikkhipento pannaásayojanamattarn attano nañguțhakban даф 
macchasañňâya khaditva nato шагапаррацо hutvà idáni mabšsamudde pappata 
matto atthi гёвї ahoel, өғаф pamatto ti evampi yathá mahámaccho ånando 
evarh tathă trai: tanhaya rasagiddhito hutvà pamatto pamadabhavappatto, rasa- 
gāravo ratto И шаливвататтвапваз®л Trasagārave ratto alirettacitto hotl, balo G 
yadi tvab balo ЧиррайПо šyati anāgate uppajjanadukkbam nāvabujhati na 
Јана ki attho, vidhamátl vidhamitvë nāsetvā, putte са ti puttabhsriyayo са, 
ñatake сё ti зезайа(љке ca sabāyə са, vidhamā И vihamitvá атпа! šbšrar ala- 
bhitva Jighacchaya pilito sakalanagararn parivattaya manussamarhsarh alabhitvà 
attānarh khādauto nando pacchbš viya ацапаПбета khadati, Jdante sutvëpa ti 
mnaharaja te tuyham mayá anitam tdan ифаїагапаш sutvāna chando manussa- 


5. Маһавшќавошајаќака. (532.) 465 


Tam sutvë гаја ,Kalahatthi (уат eva upamam јаоёві 
aham рі janëmiti“ mannssamarhsagiddhatáya poršnakavatthurh 
āharitvā dassento ёћа: 

и. Sujáto пёта nāmena tassa atrajaoraso' 
jambupesim aladdhána mato во tassa" sarnkhaye, 376. 
i. Evam eva ahat Kāla bhuttá" bhakkharñ rasuttamarh 
aladdhā mënusarh marhsam maññe hassāmi‘* jtvitan ti. 379. 


Ta. tagsš 'ti tassa Bujātassa’; абе kira Bšršnasiyarn Sujáto nama 
kutlmbiko lonambllasevanatthëáya Himarantšë! ägatāni рабсе islsatāni attano 
uyyåne vasāpetvā upalthshi!, gbare niccapsaüüsttá ° va bbikkhëá abosi, te репе 
tšpasš kadāci Janapada pi bblkkháya carenti”, mahšjambupesi pl šharitvë khá- 
danti, tesaiù jambuposih šharitva kbadanakšle Sujato cintesi: ajja bbadantanarb 
tayo cattáro divasā anāgacchentănamh kaban nu kho gatā (1 зо puttakah añguliyā !0 
Râhāpeotvâ tesa bbattakiccakäle tattha agemāsi, tasmirù samaye mahallakinarp 
mukhavlkkhšlansudakarp !! datvš sabbanavako '° јашЬорев/го khādatl, Sujšto täpase 
vanditvă nisinno: uih bharte khädatbå 'Ч puechl, mabájambnpesiih ëvuso ti, tar 
воітё kumāro plpåsarh uppådes!, sth’ asse апа]е|{һайо!? (Бокай dāpesi, ao tam 
khadítv5 vararase bajjhitvã: pesim me detha pesim me йе{һ& ' punappuna 
yåei, kujimbiko dhamma supanto!t: ma viravl'S gebarh gantvā khšdíssatiti! 
nah vaňcetvā imar niesaya bhadsntë mnkkaniheyyun (| tah samassasento 
tarn lslganarn apucchitva ! та goham gato, gatskšlato paitbšy' eva c'amsa putto: 
pesim ше dethā '1 регідеті, isayo pi!° cirai vutth'ambš!? 'Ц vatvä Himavan- 
tam eva gatš, ñráme івауо apasnantš? tassa smbajambupanasamocšdinarh реаіуо 
@akkharácunnasarhyuttá '! adarnsu, tš tassa jivbagge (hapitamattš haláhalavisasa- 
disa Боп, so sattāhah niršbšro butva 2% jivitakkhayaro рёрапі; гаја Idarh 


таваф Кһаданасһапдо, vigetü ti vigacchatn viramatu, må bhakkhaylti maba- 
гаја manussarmamsarb më bhshkhayi më khadi, mâ tvan іра kovalanti шаћа- 
samuddar suññarn karonto vârijo anando maccho Idha, dvipadidbipa ti bho dhipa- 
dådhipa дтірадёпат manussšnarn Jssara mă (та kevalarn вассаїо imam {тап 
kšslkaratharn парага suññarn më akāsiti апо. ' Bds oraso {ваза atrajo. 
э Bds -& 2 во СМ; Bd bbuttah. * Bdz hissāmi. 5 Bd tattha kâjabattbi ku- 
Wumpiko пашепа војаво пёша tasases atrajo putto oraso Jampupesi аіайдћ& па 
alabhetvšna, mato ti tasaá јатриревіуё sarnkhayo во kutumpikapnutto mato yathā 
ahah ovameva rasuttamarn aññarasanaüca uttsman mauussšnarh masarh bhutva 
bhuücetvë aladdha nanussaməarsam jivitah hlseämiti mañüe mañūāmi, * Bd 
-talo. ? Bd upathšsi. ê Bd niccainpañcasatamattā. ° Bd adds кайёсі. '° pd 
-уайш. !! Bd -nakšle u-. !% Bd sarnghana-. '? Ва adds tāpaso. '* Bd adds 
putta. 16 Bd vivari. 1% во all three MSS. for -aiti? !' Bd апар-. !* Bd, 
add idha. 19 Ck vutthāya, C? vatthumhā, Bd vatibambš. 3° Ads -о, 321 Ваг -ə, 
23 Cks omit bu-. 
алва, v, 3 


10 


15 


15 


30 


466 ХХІ. Asidoipāta. 


kaárabamn âbsritvā dassento evam šba, tasse заш к зуе G tassa jambupesiyā 
kbaye aññarn ëhšrarh anšharitv3 mato, bbakkhan tÍ kbidaniyarn, rasuttaman 
ti uttamarh газа, hassšmiti Jshissami, basamiti рі pêtbo !, 

Tato Kalahatthi „ayah rājā ativiya rasagiddho, aparšni'" 
udāhbaraņāni áharissámiti“ cintetvā „шаһагаўа virama'%“ 'ti ā., 
„па 6Gakkomiti',“ „sace па viramissasi ñatimandalato c` eva 
rajjasirito ca pariháyissasi“; — atitasmim pi°idh' eva Bārā- 
nasiyarn pañcasilarakkhakarn sotthiyakulam* ahosi, tassa ku- 
lassa еко puttako ahosi, so шаїариийпаш ріуо manápo pan- 
dito” tinnarhn vedánarf páragü, во samavayehi tarunehi saddhirh 
ganabandhanena vicari, sesaganabandhá macchamarhnsadini КЬй- 
dantá впгаш pivanti, māņavo mamsādfoi na khādati suram pi 
па pivati, te cintayimsu°: „ayam впгйуа apivanato ашһаКаш 
mülam па deti, upáyepa пап surar рйуевзашй““ ‘ti’ te sanpi- 
patitvë „samma chanarh kilissámëá: '{{ йһатпвп, ,,ќошћһе '° su- 
гаф pivatha аһат па pivāmi, tumhe va gacchathā“ `ti, 
„затта tava pānatthāya™ khirarm дапһареввашй“*!' "і, во 
98960 ‘ti sampaticchi, Фина uyyánam gantvá padumini- 
pannesu tikkhinarm surat bandhāpetvā {(ћарауіфво, atha nesar 
рйёпаКа]е māņavassa khīrah прапауйївп'', еко dhutto „роК- 
kharamadhum bho áharš“ 'ti āharāpetvā paduminipatte putam 
Һейћа '* chiddam katvá'° mukhe thapetvá aákaddhi, еуаш аге 
рі ābarāpetvā pivirhsu, māņavo „кіш etan“ ti россћі, „pok- 
kharamadhusaññāya suram pivi, ath’ assa añgāre pakkamarnsarn 
adarhsu, tam рі khādi™, evam assa punappunam pivantassa 
mattakale „na etab pokkharamadhu, вога евй“ ti vadimsu, so 
pettakah kālm™ madhurarasah na jäānińm’’, āharatha bho 
suran“ ti ā., āharitvā™ puna рі adarsu, pipāsă mahati ahosi, 


* Ck Jahessumi, Се ]аһезват!, tasaa samkhaye - - - pàtho wanting in Bå. 
Ві» add pisse. # Bd -māħi. * Bd adds so manussamarhsarb viramltunna. 
Bd -m Ы, * Cks əotti-. ` Bd adds byatto. ° Bd mantaylsu. # Rd adds таіта. 
t0 варта tu-. !! Bdz pivana-. '7 СЕ -pesahi, Сг -pehi, Ве -pomā. !% Bde 
add atha. 1* во Ске; Bd -pattaputarn gabetvā. 15 Hd adds sñgull, Ве армый? 
16 Ва „дай. !7 Вёз add evan. 1% Bê janami. !*# C% omit â-. 


Б. Mabasutasomajataka. (537.) 467 


ath' assa рооа уйсепїазза! „khīņā“ ti vadirhsu, so „handa 
tamh Ъһо* āharāpethā“ ‘ti aügulimuddikarh adšsi, ќаѓо° sakala- 
divasah tehi saddhim pivitvā matto rattakkho kampanto:! 
vippalapanto geha gantvā nipajji, ath’ assa рИй surāya 
pitabhāvarh* Па(уй vigate тайе* ,„tāta ayuttan te katah 
sotthiyaknle jātena surar pivantena', mā ропа evam akăsîti’ 
Ā, „tāta ko mayham doso“ ti, „surāya pitabhávo"“ „tāta kim 
kathesi, тауа еуагораф madhurarasarh ettakarh kálarh aladdha- 
pubban“ ti, bráhinano ропаррооа yāci, во рі „па вакка" 
viramitun“ ti а., atha bráhinano ,evarh sante ашһаКаш kula- 
Yamso ca ucchijjissati dhanañ са nassissatiti“ cintetvā: 
зв. Mánava abhirüpo ві, kule játo ві sotthiye,' 
па {уаш агаћаєі tāta abhakkham bhakkhayetave ti g. &. 380. 


Ta.abbakkbarn-- ti abbakkhitabbayuttakarh bbakkbitoth 19, 


Evañ ca рапа vatvā ,„tăta virama sace na viramasi 


аһа vā'' ito gehā nikkhamissāmi tava у&'° ratthá pabbā- 
janiyakammarh karissämîti“ 4., mënavo „evar sante pi aham 
surar јаһісшо na sakkomiti“ vatvā gātbādvayam å.: 
14 Бавйёпатп айбаѓагат etah yasmë' шаф tvar niváraye, 
so ‘har tattha gamissëmi yattha lacchëmi edisarh. 381, 
ys. So váham nippatissãmi, na te vacchämi santike 
yassa те dassanena tvah nâbhinandasi brähmaņā ‘ti. 382. 
Ta. гавёпац ti lonambilatittekatukakbārikamadburakasāvānarn !* аайап- 


nar!’ aññstararn, uttamarasabbütam etan majjan паша, во vāban ti sọ 
aham eva, nippatissškmitl nikhkhamissami. 


Evañ ca pana vatvā ,,nëharm surāpānā viramissámi, yan 
te ruccati tar karohiti“ a. atha brābmaņo „tayi amhe 
pariccajante mayam pi tarh pariccajissãmā“ "і vatvā 


% Rd yaca-. 2 Оке tha, omitting bho. ? Bdz so. * Che -ento. ° Bd plvita-, 
* Ваг matte, 1 Bde add па vațjati. ° Bdz pivitabhāvenâti. # Cs Bd -о. !'° 
Båt „ауа. 11 Bd дава. 12 Bd {айса 19 Bdz kasmā. tt Bdè -kasáva- 
sañkhitāvam. 15 Dds sdd rasšnarp. 

30* 


“ 


10 


15 


30 


468 ХХІ. Asitlnipāta. 


` ae. Addhā aññe' pi дауййе putte laccháma māpava, 
{уай са јатта vinassasu 
yattba pattarn na [tarn] ѕвопошё `t g. а. 383. 


Та, yattha pattan tl yattha gatah {зї?  asukatthane пата vasatit[ na 
supama tattha gacchā 'u a, 


Atha паш viniccbayam netvā apottabhāvarn katvā пїһагй- 
реві, во aparabhāge пїррассауо kapano pilotikah’ nivāsetvā 
kapálahattho pindáya caranto аййа!агай kuddam оіввйуа 
këlam akāsi. — Idarn Багарат áharitvá Kalahatthi raño dassetv& 
„mahārāja васе (уап атћһёкат vacanarn па karissasi pabbā- 
janiyakamman te karissantiti“ vatvā g. й.: 

ат. Evam eva (шуат raja* dipadinda sunohi me: 

pabbájessanti ќат гаића sondamanavakarm yathë ti. 384, 
Evah Кајаһайһірё upamāya ábhatáya pi rājā tato viramiturh 
asakkonto aparam pi udáharanam dasaeturh &,: 

1а. Sujáto паша nämena bhávitattána вёуако 
ассһагаш kámayanto va na so bhuñji па so pivi. 385. 
19. Коварре пйаКат* ādâya samudde udakam mine 

evar mānusakă Ката dibbakāmāna santike. 386. 

в. Evam eva aham Каја bhutvá ЫһаККһат гавпашаш 

aladdhā manusarm marhsarm mwañãe hessámi jivitan ti, 387. 
Vatthum hetthávuttanayen eva. 

Te. bhăvitattānan ti bhavitaciitšanarn бевақт pañcannath isisatšnarh, 
accharar kāmayanto ti, во kirat isinan mahšjambupesikbšdanakšlə” апйда- 
тапап viditvã? kena nu kho Кагәпепа па? šgacchantlsace katthaci рага Janissami 
посе аа nesari santike dhammai; sunissamit иууапап› gantvë!? ganajettha- 
kassa santlká dhammarn sunanto!l аогіуе ettharngate uyyojiyamāno рі ajja idb’ 
ета vaslssámit[ vatvš [siganarb vanditvā panuassšjerh pavlalitvā nipajji, rattibhšge 
Bakko бөтаггја devasarnghaparivuto saddhirn asttano paricšrikábi isigaņah van- 


diturn šgato, sakalšršmo ekobbáso аһов!, Sujšto kin nu kho etan ti utthšya 
pannasšlacchiddena oloketváë Sakkarh isiganarh vanditurn āgatain dovaccbarãe 


1 Cha eam. 3 Bd omits tah. ° Rds јіппарі-. * В4* таһагё}л, Ck? tuvarb rājā, 
* so Ch for dakan, Bdr kusaggenudakarn, 6% Bdz add tosan. 7 Ce -sirn-, Bd 
«а1у&-, * Bd diavā. 9 Bds kinnu kāraņam па, Ck# omit na. 19 Bds add inayo 
vanditvā. !! Bds add nisinno va. 


5. Mahbāsutasomajātaka. (537). 469 


parivutarn disvë accharBnarn взһадавзапеп' eva гїрагас(о ahosi, Sakko nisiditva 
dhammakatbaro satvă sakațțhánam evs gato, kutimbiko punadivase isiganarh 
vanditvā pucchi: bhante ko nšm' esa rattibhšge tumhákarn vandanatthāya ágato 
tl, Sakko švuso ti, tarn parivšretvë nisinnë katamš?' tl, дотассћага паш’ өз ti, во 
lslganarn vanditva geharh gantvå gzatakšlato pattháya асеһагат me detha accharam me 
дефа ti vilapl, бабака parivåretvā bhütapavittho?nu kho tl ассћагайћ paharirhsu, so 
nåharn etah’ асеһагаф kethemi dovacchararh kathemíiti vatvë ayain acchara u 
alarnkaritvë ånîtah bharlyam pi ganikam pi olohetvå* пйушп accharå yakkhini 
enà ti dovaccharam ше dethā "і vippalapanto nirahšro% jivitakkhayan рарш, 


tena vuttarn: acchararn kamayanto va na so bhuñji па во pliviti, samudde 
udakern mine tí samma Kålahatthi уо kussggena адакат gahetvë eltakarmh 
вуй ° samuddo udakan tÍ tena saddhiin upamâys mineyya во kevalai mineyy' 
ета kusagge! udakarn pana |ativiya parittam eva yathā tah evah шёпозакё 
kàmëá dlbbaksmënarh santike, tasmá во Sujšto aññarh Ítthirn па olokesi,accharam 
eva patthento mato, evamevā ’ti yatha во dibbakAmarh alabhanto Jivitah Jabi 
өтый aham рі uttamarasah manusasarnarnsarn alabhanto Jivltarn  jJahlissë- 
шій уайай, 


Тай sutvë Kālļahatthi „ayar rājā ativiya rasagiddho, 
вайййрезвёті nan“ ti, „sakajātinmahsari’ khāditvā ākāsacara- 
виуаппаһатазйрї tăva natthš“ ti dasseturh gāthādvayam йһа: 

п. Yathápi te dhataratthā һава vehāsayamgamā !° 

avuttiparibhogena "' sabbe abbhatthatarn дайа 388. 

эз. Evam eva tuvam гаја dipadinda sunohi me: 
abhakkharh гаја bhakkhesi tasmá pabbájayanti tan ti. 389. 


Ta. avuttiparidbhogonā?’? '1 attano anājivabhūtena!? paribhogena, 
abbhatthatan ti sabbe maranao era patta: atite kira Clttaküla Suvanna- 
goubaáya navutihahessahaasâni vasaiti, te vassike cattiro шаве na nikkhamanti, 
sace nikhhameyyum udakapunnehi pakkhehi't ahindeturn !5 asakhontë samudde 
yeva раќоууо 1%, tasmë па nikkhainanti, upakatihe pana vassakile jätassarato 
sayañjátasšlim ăharitvă @Пһатп!! pūretvā вап khädantā vasanti, tosan paua 
guha Ppavillhakile guhādvâre eko rathacakkapamáno unnanšábhimakkatako 1° 
ekekasml;in mäso єкекага Jšlarn 9? bandhatif30, tassa екекат auttarı gorsjjuppa- 
апай 2', hamsâ лат * јаіай chindissatiti?: ekassa taroņnaharhsassa dvo 


Y Chs півіопо, Вёз півіппё kà nāmetā. $ СЕ bhütšvattho, Ве -ivațto. 3 Ва 
өчаш. * Bdz -ento, 5 Bde add hutvš tattbeva. * Bds mabā. ? Bd -ena. 6 
Chs ош Јї-. ° Ваг -jštikënarh шашып, ° Bd vehšyasarh-. ': Ck &-, Ва 
atutta-, Ве ahbutta-. ?? Rds abhutta- !2 Bds sajâtibhū-. !* Chs варацеЫ. !5 
Bds uppatitui. !* Che рё-, !7Т В22 guhšyam. !*#* Bés uppi-. 1)" Bd adds ne 
%0 Chs vinati for viuamati?. èi Bde add hoti. 32 Bj (аф. 23 Bdz -ssantitl. 


10 


15 


39 


15 


35 


30 


470 ХХІ. Astiolpāta 


kotihšse делі, во vigate дете рогасо Һастё! jalarn cblodati, ten eva шадрепа 
веза gacchantl, atb’ екавшій кае райга māse vassāratto" ahosi, һашай Шһїпа- 
Восатё kin nu kho battabban ti mantetvë ° Јітапёё andšni labblasimā 'Ч ра(ћа- 
таф sņdâni khšdisu tato potske tato Jinnabarbse, райсаш&зассауепа тазваф 
apagatah, makkatako pañcajâlšul vibandbati*, bams sakaJjštikánarb marsam 
khāditvā appətthāmā játā, dvigonakottbšasalšabhitarunabarbsot jālah® раћагіста 
сайат! bbindi!, pañeamarh bhinditur |nàsakkbi, tatth’ eva laggi, ath’ assa sisarh 
chinditrāä’ makkajo lohitarn рісі, аййо pi aüño pi ёдапеча Јаја pabari, so pi 
лаб’ ета laggo (1 evarn [sabbesarn makkstako lobitah pivi, (айа dhatarsitha- 
kulan ucchinnan ti vadant’, tena vuttsrn: sabbe abbbattbatarn даб ti, evam- 
ovan?? ti yathë to barnaš abhskkbarn sajštimarhaarn kbādihsu tathā (хаш рі 
khädasi sekalanagararn bhayappattarn virama mahârājā 'ti, tasmā pabba- 
Jayanti tan ti yama sbbakkbah sajātiņmemhsarn bhakkhest (аешё!! nagara- 
vāsino ten та1Ь& pabbājonti. 


Rājā aparam рі орама vattukāmo abosi, oāgarā рапа 
uttháya „sāmi senāpati Кій karosi™, kih тапивватаг:а- 
khádakacorar gahetvā carasi'' sace ра viramati ratthato 
pah pabbājehîti'*“ пйвва kathetuh adarsu, гаја ba- 
Һорпаф kathan sutvá bhito рара '° vattu násakkhi, puna 
рі nam senápati „kih mahārāja viramiturh sakkhissasiti“ va- 
tvā „па sakkomîti" vutte sabbar '* orodhajanañ ca” putta- 
dhitaro ca sabbálarnhkarapatimanditam'* passe thapetvā ,ma- 
ћагаја imam ñatimandalam eva amaccaganañ са rajjasiriñ са 
olokehi, mā nassi, virama manussamamsato“ ti а., гаја „па 
mayharm etah™ manussamarhsato рїуаїагап*“* (і vatvā „tena 
hi mahārāja imamhā парага са ratthà са nikkhamathā“ "і 
vutte"' „Kālahatthi, na ше rajjen' attho™, nikkhamámi, ekam 
pana™ khaggañ ca rasakañ ca ° dehiti“ й., ath’ assa khaggañ 
ca manussamarhsapacanabhajanañ ca pacchiñ ca ukkhipāpetvā 
rasakañ ca datvš ratthá pabbajaniyakammarnh Кагїйви. So** 


1 Bdsa gantvà. 2 Hs -vuttha, Dd -хоо. * Ваг add mayah. * Ц» vinandhati, 
Che viui. ° Bd -namkothësain. © Bda -je. 7 Bd -ati. * Bd vijbltvā ° Ва 
omits va-. 19 Che -etan. !1 Bd: add іше. !! Bas -оше. ™ Dd vicarlssasi, 
M Ваг add vutte. 1% Ce Bd pu-. 1$ Bat sabbeserh. !? Bde -dbanaüca, ! во 
Che; Ва -te, Be -to. 19 Bde ote. 30 Bd -rā. 3: Bds add гајв аһа. °' Вёг add 
педагё, 33 Rds add me. >t Bd: адд bhâjanañca. 5° Bde add khaggañca. 


5. Mabasutasomajšátaka. (537.) 471 


rasakar' ádáya парага vikkbamitvā araññam pavisitvā ekas- 
mim nigrodbamüle vasanatthānarh katvā ta. vasanto atavimagge 
{һа{уа шаповве măretvā āharitvā rasakassa deti, so рі "вва 
marisah расйуй* upanámeti, eva ubho рі jivanti', „aham 
are coro рогїв&йо'* ti vatvë tasmim pakkbante Косі saka- 
Ъћауепа santhátum ° па sakkoti, sabbe Ъћашіуаф patanti, tesu 
уві icchati (аф uddhapšádar уй* adhopádam' vā katvā’ rasa- 
kasesa deti, во ekadivasah агаппе kañci manussam alabhitvā 
gato rasakena „kiin беуй““ `ti уште ,uddhane ukkhalirh ёгоре- 
hiti“ а., ,marnsam kaba devā“ ‘ti, ,labhissëm' aharn mam- 
san“ ti, so „п' atthi dáni me jtvitan“ ti kampamâāno uddhane 
aggin katvá ukkhalirn āropesi, atha narh porisādo |asiná pa- 
haritvë māretvā татваш pacitvā khádi. Tato patthāya ekako 
jāto sayam eva pacitvā khadi°. „Рогївйёдо так аг patipanne'° 
hanatiti“ sakala-Jambudipe pākatarh'' ahosi. Tadā eko sam- 
pannavibhavo brāhmaņo райсаћі sakatasatehi vohárarh karonto 
pubbantato aparantarn sañcarati, во cintesi: „рогїзййо nama 
kira сого magge™ manusse máreti, dhana datvā™ а{ауйй 
atikkamissámiti“ so atavimukhavasinam manussaánarh'' „mamn 
аїауйй '* atikkamethá“ 'ti sahassarn datvä tebi saddhiù mag- 
gam patțipajji, gacchanto ca'* sabbasattharh ” рпга{о Каќуё 
nahëtánulitto sabbálamkárapatimandito setagonayutte sukha- 
уёпаке nisinno tehi ativāhikapurisehi parivuto'" sabbapacchato 
agamāsi ", рогівабо rukkharm āruyha ригїве upadhárento „ве- 
вашаппввевп kim imesu” kbaditabbarh atthiti?'!: vigatacchando 
hutvā bráhmanpadittbakaálato*' pattháya tah khāditukāmatāya 
upagalitakhelo” аһові, во tasmim attano santika ада{е** 


1 Hds „абса, # Вёг add rājānaro. ° ВФё add manussagabənakále. * Ck māro, 
Bd агаййа, Ве атаййап. 5 Bd sandhaáreturp. * Bä omit ті, 7 Bd adhoslsarn, 
Вг -әјга. 5 Bs add aharitváva. ° Rds -ай. 1° Сіз omit pa-, Bd reads maggo 
maggapatppanue, Ве maggapanue, 1! Bdr-o. 12 Bas antarimagge. “° Ба 

adds tah, 1* Bde add abs tumhe. !5 Ва -ito. '* Bdz add Ьгаһшапо. !7 
Bd -sakstarn. 19% Bde адд sayah. 9 Ck Ва &., 20 Віз add mayi 3! Bde add 
ааһһевп. ??Cks omit brahmana. 2% Rds paggbaiite-. 7* Bda edd rukkato огпуһа. 


95 


472 ХХІ. Astltinlpata, 


„aham аге! coro рогізёйо“ ti námarh' sšávetvá khaggarm pari- 
vattento válukáya akkhini pürento viya pakkhandi, eko pi 
uttháturn' samattho nāma náhosi, sabbe urena bhümiyam ni- 
pajjisu, so виКһауйпаКе рівірпаш bráhmanam рёде gāhetvā 
pitthiyarb adhoslIsakam olambetvā sīsan gopphakehi paharanto 
ukkhipitvā pāyāsiʻ, purisā utthāya „bho purisa cara, maya 
bráhmanassa hatthato sahassarn* ganhimha, ko пйта amhākarm 
рогівёкаго" sakkonto vā asakkonto vā, thokarh anubandbāmā“ 
1° anubandhirhau, porisādo pi nivattitvá olokento kici adisvā 
вапїкагї pāyåāsi, tasmiń khane eko sürapuriso vegena tam på- 
puni, во tam disvā ekar vatin larmghento' khadirakhánukarpb 
akkamitvā khánurh pitthipáadena nikkhami, so'° lohitena galan- 
tena'! larnghamáno yåti, atha nam во puriso disvā „kho mayá 
esa viddho, kevalah tumhe pacchato etha, ganhissámi пап“ 
ti ā, te dubbalabhávarb ñatvá tam anubandhihsu, so tehi 
anubandhanabhāvah ñatvă Dbršhmanarh vissajjetvā attanarb 
sotthim akāsi, ativābikā™ brahmanassa laddhakālato pattháya 
„kin ашһаКата согеоӣ“ "1 tato nivattirhsu, porisādo рі attano 
nigrodhamülam gantvå pārohantararh '* pavisitvā nipanno ,ayyo 
rukkhadevate, васе me sattāhabbhantare yeva vanar phäsukarh 
káturb sakkhissasi sakala-Jambudipe ekasatakhattiyānarn gala- 
lohitena te Кһапаһаш dbovitvă'* antehi parikkhipitvā’® pañca- 
madhuramarmsena Баікаттаф karissamiti' áyšcanar аКйвї'°, 
tassa pana аппарёпаф alabhantassa вагїгАїп sukkhi' anto- 
sattāhe yeva vauo phāsuko ahosi, devatšnubhávena'" tassa 
phāsukabhāvath sallakkhesi, so katipáharm шапивзашатйазаш 
khāditvā bale ™ gahetvā cintesi: „bahūpakārā me devatā, йуй- 


сапё?° 


muccissāmîiti"“ so Кһаррай адауа rukkhamülato 


) СЕ ahah máre, С* amars, Bd аһа hare, 3 Bå? add tlkkháttur. 2 Bds 
(асот. * Bde add tadā. ° во Ва; Сі Ьһо Шага pussa. * Bds кећарара-. 
T so Скз; Ва азеррагівакаго. * R&s add vatvă. ° Bdz .апіо, 10 Ckz omit во. 
1 Ваг paggharantena, !2 Bas -kapurisā. 18 во Сг; Ck ра-, Bd ро-. 1* Bds 
dhovissëmi. 1° Ва» -pāpetvā, !* Bdz kari. '7 Bde sussetva, `° Bd во доте-. 
19 Ваг am. 20 Bde „патавгё. ?1 Bd шпйс-. 


5. Mahāsutasomajātaka. (537.) 473 


nikkhamitvā „rājāno ñánessš&miti“ рауаві, atha narh purimabhave 
yakkhakāle ekato manussamarhaakhádako saháyako yakkho 
anuvicaranto tarn disvā „ayan mama atitabhave sahāyo“ ti 
ñatvâ „samma marh sañjănāsiti‘“ pucchi, „па jānāmiti™, ath’ 
авва purimabhave Каќакагапат? kathesi, so° sañjánitvë pati- 
santháram akāsi, ,kubim* nibbatto вїїї' puttho nibbattatthánañ 
ca ratthato° pabbájitakáranañ са idāni vasanatthanañ са* 
khánuviddhakáranañ ca’ devatāya āyācanamocanattha’ ga- 
manakáranañ са йгосебуй'” ,*ayápi mama (аш'° kiccam 
pittharitabbarh, ubho рі gacchāma sammā“ ‘ti å., „samma " 
дассћеууёта ", ekarh pana me kammar atthi, abah kho pana 
agghapadalakkhanarn': пйша mantah јёоёті, во balañ ca 
javañ ca tejnssattañ са'* karoti", tah mantah рапһа“ ‘ti й., 
во „sādhū"“ ’'ti sampaticchi, yakkho рі `ss& tah datvā pak- 
каші, porisādo mastan uggahetvā tato pațțhāya vatajavo 
atiaūro ahosi, во sattāhabbhantare yeva ekasataršjáno uyyáná- 
diíni gacchante diavā vátavegena pakkhanditvá'* пётайћ săvetvă 
vagganto nadanto bhayappatte Каїуй pāde gahetvš adhosire'' 
katvá рапһїуй sisan paharanto vātavegena netvā hatthatalesu 
chiddáni katvā rajjuyá'° піргодћагоккһе olambesi, aggapādañ- 
gulíthi Ыһйтїуаш phusamānăbi ” vāte paharante milátakaranda- 
kadāmāni™® viya parivattantā’' olambimsu, Sutasomarh pana 
„pitthiācariyo me“ ti ca „Jambudīpo mā tuccho ahositi“ pi nânesi, 
во”? „balikammam karissámiti“ aggin Каїуй sūlath ќассһеп(о "* 
півїаі, rukkhadevatā’™* disvā „mayhan kir’ esa balikaminam 
karoti, vano рі "вва шауй'* рһазокаф katah п' atthi, idāni 


1 Bd аабјё-, Вә mayari janamit, 3 Bd katarp-, * Ваг add tem. * Bde ka-. 
5 Bd rathā, ' * Ck adds devatānañca, 7 Вія кһапопа-. ° Bd ёуасапа-, *# Bdz add 
пашта. !9 Bds mameta.. !! Bds add na. 1 Bde -maham, '!! Bds Сә anag- 
абаш-. !*во Cks; Ва tejussadattañca, '* Bd -hi 1% Bde add aharb are porisšdo ti. 
17 Ва „діва. 5 BA adds šnunetva, Вә ädhunstvă. !?° СЕ Bds -nehl; Bde add 
te. 20 pd -ког-, 2: Слз -antā. 38 Bd sutasomo рапа mama pițthi йсапуо 
boti sace ganhləsāmi sakalajambudipe tuccbo bhavlasatīid tain nånesiti во imebl. 
23 В4 süle (ассһышто. ?* Bdz add tais kiriyain. 2° Ваг add kiñci. 


15 


474 ХХІ. Asitlnipšta- 


mahavinësar karissati, kin пи kho kattabbao““ ti cintetvā „ahari 
etam тйгеіот па sakkhissāmîti“ cátummaharájikánam santikarh 
gantvā' kathetva ,„nivāretba nan“ ti Ā., tehi? „na mayai >* 
sakkhissãmă“ ‘ti vutte* Sakkam празашКатиуа tam аһа 
kathetvā „nivarehi пап“ ti а., so pi ,nàham sakkomi niváre- 
turn, samattham pana acikkhissámiti“ vatvā ,,Ко раё“ ‘і 
vutte „sadevake loke? añño п’ atthi, Когига ће pana Inda- 
pattanagare Korabyarājaputto Sutasomo пата, tami nibbiseva- 
пат damessati гаўйпай са jlvitarn dassati, (ай са manussa- 
пайва“ oramāpessati, sakala-Jambudipe amatarm' abhisiñ- 
cissati, sace рі rajünarh/” jivitam datukán:o Sutasomarm ёпеѓуё 
Ъајікаштат katur vadehiti° во ,88dhü“ 'ti® khippam 
āgantvā pabbajitavesena tassa avidüre pāyāsi, so padasaddena 
„Tājā nu kho koci palāto“ ti" olokento {аш disvá „pabbajitā 
паша khattiyá va, imarh gahetvā ekasatarn pūretvā balikammarm 
karissāmîti“ uttháya asihattho” anubandhi, tiyojana anu- 
bandhitvápi pāpuņiturh násakkhi, gattehi" веда mauccirmhsu!*, 
во cintesi: „abam pubbe hatthim рі assam рі ratham рі @һй- 
vantam anubandhitvā ganhámi, aj) imar pabbajitah вакауа 
gatiyä '° gacchantam sabbatthāmena dhávanto pi gaphitum na 
sakkomi, kin nu kho Кйгапап“* ti, tato „pabbajitā '* пёша va- 
canakārakā hontiti?'? (Ьа 'ti narn t vatvā ,thitam раһевай- 
шїїї'* cintetvā „(Ша samana ‘ti а., „aham tava thito, (уа 
pana thátum уйуаша “1 й.'*, аа nam ,,bho pabbajita'” nāma 
jīvitahetu рі alikarñ па Ылапапп'!, tvah papa musā kathe- 
siti“ vatvë g. й.: 


1 Bd» add tematthais, > Cks te, > Bds add porlsëdassa hammarh piviroturth. 
* Bd» add ko eakkhissasiti pucchitvā sakko devarājā ti sutvā. 5 Наз add бай!во. 
* Che -ваш, ? Ids add viya dhammar3. ° Ско -ānain. ° Віз vattatiti vadebiti 
аһа, !0 Bds add sampsilechitvā. 1! Bds bhavissatiti. +3 Bd āvadba-. ! Cha 
gatte. !* Bd muñe-. !5 Bde pakatiya. 1% Bd фо p-to. !7 Ва -karo boti, '% 
Bd vacanaris. 3° Bd 4һауйїшйа vayamanaskissti. 7° Bd -to. 21 Bd -atl 


5. Mabäsutasomajātaka. (537.) 475 


эз. Tittháhiti mayá vutto so tvah gacchasi yammukho', 
athito thito 'mbiti?'lapasi 
brahmacãri’ ida te samana ayuttam, 
asiñ са me maññasi kamkapattan ti‘. 390. 


Tattha sammukho ti parummukho 5. 


Tato devatā gšthadvayam аһа: 
s< Thito "ат asmi saddhammesu га}а, 
na nåmagottah parivattayāmi, 
согай ca loke ațhitah vadanti 
apāyikarh nerayikarh ito соат, 391. 
ss. Šace pi sahasi” гаја suta рапһаһї khattiya, 
tena yaññam yajitvána evarb sagga gamissasìti. 399, 


Ta. заййһзшшвей 'ti sakosu kusslakammaspathesu", na nëmagottan 
tl yathā tvarı pubbe” Rrahmadatto һшуё!© tah nàmat jahitvā porisādo batvi 
1941 kammasapido јасо khattiyakule t jāto'? abhakkbarı’® bhaukhbesi пёһап 
tathā namagottarñ parivattayami, corañcā ' akusalakammapathesu (Һат 
сога ațhitah паша vadanti, ito cutan ti ito cuta һата арауе niraye 
nibbattamānarb, so hi шгауе patanto па patitthānamh labhst( паша, sutan 01:4 
bho porisšda musšvàdi tayã mayhan sakala-Jambudīpo rājāno ânetvā bali- 
ашай Кагївёёшїї!ї patlesutaro 1дёпі ys vë te та dubbalarajano ānesi Jambudi- 
patale Jotthakarb Sutasomarajánarb sace tvan nënessasi vacanan te mus nama 
hoti tasma $шавошаш ganhabiti. 


Evari vatvā devatë pabbajitavesarn antaradbāpetvā sakena 
vannepa й@Кйзе suriyo viya jalamānā atthási, во tassā katha 
sutvá rüparh са oloketvā ,,Кёѕі tvan“ ti 2., „їтавтїш rukkhe 
nibbattadevatā“ ti, so „ditthā me attano devatā‘“ ti tugssitvá 
„ейі devarāja, mā Sutasomassa Кагапй cintayi, attano ruk- 


1 Bde раштюи-. ? зо Cks; Bd atbito trari thito smiti. ® во Cka; Bd -rini, ¢ Oka asica 
ше varnñarbsi-, Fd kabkha-. 5 Hd tatha samana tijbāhiti titbábi Idam уасапаш 
шауй vutio во tvah pamukho, pararnmukho hutvā gacchasi brahmacarini athito 
tvarb {blio amhi iti lapasi me asiñca kañkhath pattarh maüüñssi. * Bd -о. 'Bds 
васе tvarh saddahasi, 5 Bds dassku-, adding (hito asmi bhavami. ° Bds айб 
daharakäle. 10 Bd adde pitari kālañkate bārāņasīrajjain !abhitvë bārāņasirājā 
Јао. '3 Ске ошіє kbaniya. !% Bd adds рі. 1° Bē шаһивзашашымй. °* Ше 
wording of tbe previous passages 15 qulte different In Ваг, 


15 


95 


476 ХХІ. Asinipata. 


kham pavisá%“ ‘ti &., devatā (азва passantass’ ета rukkhamn 
pāvisi, tasmirn khane вогіуо а((ћаторатіќо cando uggato, pori- 
sādo vedavedañgakosalo pakkhattacárar jānāti, so nabha 
oloketvā ‚вте Phussanakkhattarn bhavissati, Sutasomo nahá- 
уой пууйпап gamissati, tattha tah ganhissšmi, ārakkho 
pana' mahā bhavissati, samantáë tiyojanah sakala-Jambudi- 
pavāsino rakkhantá carissanti, asarmvihite ārakkhe pathama- 
уйше yeva Migëšciruyyánam * рапта mañgalapokkharanim ota- 
ritvë thassñmiti":* cintetvá' gantvë pokkbaraņiù oruyha 
paduminipattena ° sisah paticchādetvā atthási, tassa tejena 
macchakacchapšádayo osakkitvā udakapariyante vaggavaggā 
hotvàá vicarirhsu, „kuto рап" assâyarh tejo“ ti pubhayogato, во 
hi Kassapadasabalassa kâle khbfrasalākabbattarn upatthápesi*, 
tena mabāthāņwo ahosi, aggisālah këáretvë bhikkhusarngham 
sitavinodanattharn aggiñ са dārūni са dārucchedanavāsfphara- 
вай са adāsi, tena tejavā ahosi, еуаш tasmim antouyyápam' 
gate yeva balavapaccūse’ samantăā tiyojane ārakkban gan- 
hirso, гајарі pāto va bhuttapātarāso alarhkatahattbikkhandha- 
gato caturañūgiviyā senāya’ парага піккћаші, tasmih khanņs'° 
Takkasilato Nando паша brāhmaņo саїавво satárahagëšthá'' 
ādāya уїзафуојапазаќат !' шарраш atikkamma tam парага 
расуй dvāragāme vasitvā suriye uggate nagara pavisanto 
гајапаш pācīnadvārena nikkhamantam disvā hattham ussã- 
petvā '* jayāpesi, гаја disācakkhuko batvā gacchanto unna- 
tappadese thitassa brabmanassa pasáritahattharn dievā hatthiná 
tath '* upasarhkamitvā evam aha": 
вв. Kasmin nu ratthe tava jātibbūmi, 
atha kena atthena idbânupatto, 


› Rds penasss. > Bds migšjinain-. * Bda vaslssšmid, * Bg adds tattha. * 
Bd paduma-. < Rd pathapesi. т Hj -ne. ° Bäs -вазатауе. ° Bds add part- 
vato. 10 Bde tadā in the place of t. kh. 31 Bds „дуо. '' Bd visati-, Вә 
vissibti-. 1% Rds равагеіта. ?* Bds hattbināgai, }* Bds pucchi, omitting 
ovem. 


5. Mahāsutasomajātaka. (537.) 477 


akkhāhi те brāhmaņa etam attham, 
kim icchasī demi tay-ajja patthitan ti' 393. 
Atha nam so’ аћа: 
s. Саа catasso дһагапїтаћһеввага? 

sugambhiratthā varaságarüpama, 

tav’ eva‘ attháya idhâgato ‘smi, 

sunohi gāthā paramatthasarnhită 11* 394. 
vatvā’ „mahārāja imá Kassapadasabalena desită catasso ва!й- 
rahă раа", tumhe sutavittakā ti sutvā tumhákam desetu 
āgato mhîti“ аһа, гаја tutthamánaso hutvă „ācariya sutthu te 
katah’, тауа pana nivattituh па sakká', ajja Phussayogena 
віват nahāyitudivaso'“, āgantvā sossāmi, tvah mā ukkan- 
thiti“ vatvë „gacchatha brāhmaņassa авоке gehe sayana 
paññápetvá ghāsacchādanam samńvidahathā“ “і ашассе йпй- 
petvá пууйпат pāvisi, tam Aatthárasahatthena păkārena pa- 
rikkhittarn ahosi, tah аййатаййаш дһатпзап!й!! hatthi pa- 
rikkhipirnsu, tato assš tato габа tato dhanuggahadayo pattîti 
khubhitamahāsamuddo'? viya attipnabalakáyo'” ahosi, гаја 
olārikāni &Бћагапёві muñcitvă'* massukammarmh káretvëš ubbatti- 
tasarīro pokkharaņiyā'* rájavibhavena паһаїуй paccuttaritvā 
ndakagahanasátake'' nivāsetvā atthási, ath’ assa gandhamālā- 
ЈатКаге '* праһагиййзи!', so porisādo cintesi: „rājā alakata- 
kāle bhāriko bhavissati, .sallahukakāle yeva nah gaņhissåmîti“ 


% Hd adds tattha bbo brahmana (ата jitibhūmi hisml rathe atthi, yena atthena 
tvah payojanena hetubhütena idha imasmim nagare anuppatto bho brahmana 
шауё pucchito во (тап etamattharo etariı payojanarb me maybsri әккһаһ, 
kathahi tayā pathiteb уайһил te tuyham dadami kih vatthuh iecchaelti tarn 
bbagavantam pucchami. 3 Bd adds gštham. 2 Bd С» mahi-. * Che tameva 5 
Ваа add tattha dharan! mahlssara bbūmipāla kassapadasabslena йввіса catusstá- 
таһа catasao gātbā kimbhūtā sugambhīrastthavarā sagarūpamā tava eva atthšys 
idha {ёре anuppatto asmi bhavāmi sunohiti kassapadasabalena desità para- 
matthasamhhită imi satárahë gšthšyo sunohiti attho. * Ва adds ca рапа. 7 
В4 -āyo. ° Bdəs gatah. ° Bde sakkomi. '° Bd пһауципп agatombitl abai 
ропадіғазе. n Bds sarpghattanta samantā, 12 Баз sacbkh-. 13 Bds цпп5- 
дета ha-. !# Dd om-, !5 Bds add anto, !$ Bd -ona. !! Rds npanayihsu. 


10 


478 XXI. Astinipata. 


во nadanto vagganto уіјјо! viya matthakupari khaggam pari- 
vattento „aham аге" coro porisādo“ ti n&mamh sāvetvā 
añgulih naláte thapetvā udakā nikkhami*, tassa saddarh sutvá 
va hatthārohā hatthihi авзйгоһа assehi ratbikā* rathehi* bhas- 
sirhsu, balakāyo gahitāni” āvudhāni chaddetvā udarena’ nipajji, 
porisãdo Sutasoma ukkhipitvá ganhi, вевагӣ)ёпо рёйе ga- 
hetvā adhosirarn' katvá panhiyá sisam pabaranto gacchati, 
Bodhisattaru pana upagantvë onato ukkhipitvá khandhe nisi- 
dāpesi ®, во ,dvárena gamanam papañco“ ti" sammukhattha- 
пеп’ ета!" atthárasahattharn pákáram “Bamghitvë purato pi 
galitamadamattaváranakurpbhe' оккашіётй' pabbatakūtāni 
pátento viya vatajaváni'” assaratanāni'* pitthe akkamapto 
pštetv& гаћауаге '* rathastse''" akkamitvā bhamarikam bba- 
manto viya nllaphalakáni'' nigrodhapattāui maddanto viya 
ekavegen' eva'' tiyojanamattam ° gantvā ,atthi nu kho Косі 
Ѕиќавотавв" attháya pacchato āgacchanto“ ti avaloketvăā 
Кайсї?! adisvā saņikah gacchanto Sutasomassa kesehi nda- 
bindüni attano upari patantëni” disvā ,,maranassa abháyanto 
пата оп’ atthi, Sutasomo pi maranabhayena rodati тайпе'"““ 
ti cintetvá аһа: 
зв. Na ve rudanti matimanto варайп& 

bahussutë уе bahothănacintino, (cfr. IV д5) 

dipam hi etam paramam пагёпаш 

yam panditaá sokanudā bhavanti. 395. 

+. Attëpam Пйїї'* uda* puttadáramn 
dhaññam °° dhápam rajatarn jatarüpam 


1 Cka maccharn. * Bd matthake khaggarn paribhamanto. 2 Bd hare. * Bde 
uttari. > Bd rathātrobā, * Dd adds sabbe. 7? Hdsçgebitagahitani. 5 Віз 
urena, adding bhümiyem, * Bd -sisakərh. !° Cke -petvë. !! Bde bhavlasatiti. 
t3 Bd „пеуета. 1 Bd paggalitapade таца-. 1¢ Ваг ak- !5 Bds -паф. t° 
Bds -dbure. 1? Dd -sesu. '° Che -ká. 19 Bd екат-. 3° Bd adds magkgarh. 
зэ. Ва ki-. 22 Ва» ure ratitáni. 33 Bd omits maüñe. 3“ во all three MSS. 
for айапа 081? 25 Bde udābu. 


5. Mabäsutssomajātaka, 


kimo пй! tvah Sutasománutappe, | 
Koravyasettha vacanarm sunoma ќе? ti. 396, 


Та. yarn panditš И yah tumhadisa 


(537.) 479 


panditā aññesam рі sokanudš 


hhavanti evarh soksvinodanarn еййеваш pl diparn samudde bhinnanavánam dipo 
viya patlitha hoti tasma tumbādisā matimantā (add na) rudantitl a, kimo nu 
tvan ti samma Sutasoma tumhadise тагапађћеуепа rodante aññe andhabšála kira 
karissanti apl са tarh pucchšmi imesu puttădisu kimo nu tvan Sutasomānu- 
tappe ti kim eva еповосаві kir clntesiti a” 


Sutasomo аһа: 


во. Na‘ váham attānam anutthunami° 
па ройедагат na dhanamh па rattham, 


satañ са dhanımo carito purānņo, 
tarn sarngararn' Ьгёћтапазѕёпоќарре. 397. 


з. Kato mayā sarngaro brāhmanena 
ratthe sake issariye thitena, 
tah samgararn bršhmanassa-ppadáya”? (supra р. 24,15.) 
зассёпогаккћї punar ávajissan ti. 


398. 


Ta. anutthunamiti ahah naë їл” rudami, imesam рі puttădinar 
atthāya na anntthunāmi na socâwl, apl ca kho satah panditānam carito purâņna- 
dhammo etthi, ваїйдага1 katvā saddhšánuppattarn nām’ etan samgararh brib- 
manassas aham anusocâmiti a. вассёпигаккЬ їе saccah anurakkhanto!2, во 
bdråbmaņo Takkasilato ћевверабавађа1епа !! 80812 catasso gātbāyo ädäya agato, 
tasaÑharh ägantukavattarı káretvš паһаста āgato зопівеаші, уйата mamůgamanā 
ägamehît! sarngararn Каста agato, Стаф tā gāthā sotu adatvā va mam gaņbl, 
бэсе mar vísssjjesi tan dbemmam sutvà saccănurakkbi punar avajjiesan 


tl табай. 


Atha porisado аһа; 
ss. Na váharn'?* etah abhisaddahámi: 
sukhī паго maccumukhá pamutto 


amittahattharh punar ёхајеууа', 
Koravyasettha па hi mam npehi. 


399. 


Y Ва kimiva. 9 Віз -metan. 
quite different from the above. 


marikararp. ? Bd -pah sampadāya. 


in Ва is quite different. 


1 Ва lassa. 


э во Сіз; {һе comment In Bd is more diffusa and 
* Bd weva-, Ck tšva<. 


5 Bde anuttarami. $ Bds 


° Седа va. ? Се ре. 19 The comment 


02 Bå петё-. 


19 Ck „деууа, 


‹0 


16 


90 


90 


480 XXI. Aeitinipite 


ss. Matto tuvam рогівёдевва hatthá (cfr. supra р. 25,17.) 
gantvë вакат mandiram kāmakāmi 
madhurarm piyam jIvitarn Jaddha rāja 
knto {пуаш ehisi me ваййзап ti. 400. 


Та. sukhiti sukhappatto hutva, maccumoukba pamutto ti шёдівазва 
corwssa hatthato muttatáya maraņnamnkhā pamutto пёша hutâ, na hi mam 
ореһїй! па Ы mam upagamissasi, mandiran 1! rájadbánigehbari Entva, 
këáamakamit šlapanam etah, кёрайп kamayamino Я а, kuto ti kena паша 
këáranena f, 


Таш sutvá Mahāsstto siho viya asambhito ha: 
sa Ма(ат vareyya ° parisuddhasilo 
па“* jivitarb garahito papadhammo, 
na hi tah nararh tāyate duggatīhi* 
yassâpi hetū alikarh bhaneyya. 401. 
e. Sace pi vāto girin âvaheyya (IV 4%%) 
cando ca suriyo ca chamā pateyyurh 
sabbā va пајјо pațisotarù vajeyyurh 
na tv-ev' abha гаја пова bhaneyyan ti. 402. 


Та. matar vareyyš 'ti maranarh 1ссһеууа, icchatu* patthetü 'И a, па 
bi Jivitan t| рарайһашто рапа garahito jivitah ua vareyya mā iccbatu, 
Jivltarn hl tassa anáyatabhadrakatta! dujjivitah паша, yassā 'Ц yassa attādino 
абду duasilo айкаш bhapeyya etaù attâdivatthurh na tah purisaro duggatibl 
na tàyate ° na rakkħati, girimâvaheyyā `ú samma porlsšda mayā sañddhirb 
exücariyakule sikkhito evarüpo sabāysko hutvš ayab’ Jivitahetu musā па ka- 
thetifi'?, kim рапа na saddahssi: васе Ы purattbimadibbedo vāto uttháya ma- 
bantah pabbatan tulapicu viya ākāse avaheyya tah saddhátabbaro abarh са 
musā па bbapeyyan t| {дат pana па tv-eva saddhātabbarh l, 


Evam vutte рі во па saddbahi yeva, atha'" Bodhisatto 
„ayah mayham na saddahati™, sapathena't рі nah ваййаһа- 
pessāmîti“ ciatetvā ,samma porisāda, khandhato tāva mam 
otárehi, sapatham рі katvā tarn saddabāpessāmiîti“ vutte tena '* 
otáretvá bhümiyarh thapito sapatbam karonto ёћа: 


1 Che upesiti. ? The comment in Bd very different. ? Ck -yyarh. * Cka add 
М. * Bd -tibbi, © Che iccbetu * Оз -tì-. Š Ck піпётгаузсе, C* цабагауае. 
° Rd abai. # Bd emiti. !' The comment quite different in Bd. 1° pds 
add hho. !! Bd -hi. !+ Ck: „е, 16 Bd adds tarh. 


5. MhibssutasomaJjitaka. (537.) 481 


»в. Авїй са sattiñ са рагатавёш!, 
sapatham рі te samma ahami Кагоші, 
(ауё рато(ќо апапо' bhavitvā 
saccánurakkhi punar ávajissan ti. 403. 

Tans' attho: васе ісеһаві evarüpshi āvudhehi susamvihitārakkhe khatu- 
yakule nibbatti цёла mä hotü '] asih vä sattim vā parâmasimi айбат vä yarh 
Icchasi tah зарыһат рі te samma аһа karomi yathā aharn (ауд mutto gantvā 
brâhmanasea anano hutvå saccam anurakkhanto punâgamlssan’ ti. 

Tato porisādo ¡ayam Sutasomo khattiyehi akattabbarh 
sapatham karoti, kim me iminā, etamhá* aham рі khattiya- 
гаја, mam’ eva báhulohitam  gahetvë devatāya balikammam 
karissåmi, ayam ativiya kilamatiti“ cintetvë šha:; 

sr. Yo ° te kato вайдаго* brāhmaņena 
ratthe sake іѕвагіуе thitena 
tarh вафрагаћ * brihmanassa-ppadaya ' 
вассапигаккћї punar āvajassū 'і р. а. 404, 


Те. punarávajassü °1 рипа ёдассћеууёзі. 


Atha пат Mahāsatto „samma mā cintayi, саќавзо ваїй- 
rahā gāthå sutvá dhammakathikassa рӧјат katvā páto våga- 
тіввап?‹ ti табуа g. á.: 

s. Yo' me kato вайдаго* brāhmaņena 
га{{һе sake issariye thitena 
(ат sañgaram bráhmanassa-ppadaya 
saccãourakkhi punar ávajiesan ti. 405. 

Atha пат porisãdo „mahārāja tumhe’ khattiyehi akattab- 
barh sapatharh karittha, tarh ® anusareyyāthâ“ ‘И vatvë „samma 
porisëda, tvah mar daharakálato раИћёуа jānāsi'', hassena '*" 
pi me muså na kathitapubbam, sv-āharn™ idáni rajje thito 3“ 
dhammādhammarh јапапіо kim musë kathessāmi, saddaha 


3 all three MSS. an-. 3 Rd -saâmi. > so Сї; Bd esa etu дёшё, Вг ега etu 
vā mā vi. * во Ске; Ва bahu-. * Ck во. “ Bd вайка-. 7 Ва -narn sap-. 
è Се во, ° Căs tvar. 10 Ске -ritvë tvah. !! Ck Bd Ја-, 12 Rds hšsena. 
13 Ck suvábarh, Bd soharb. '* Bde patl-. 

Jamia. V. 81 


16 


482 XXL Añtünlpäta 


шауһай, ahah te balikammarm pāpaņissāmiti" saddahápito 
„tena hi gaccha maháraja, tumbesu anāgatesu balikammarh па 
bhavissati, devatápi tumhehi vinā ра sampaticchati, mā me 
balikammassa 'antarāyarh karitthbā“ “ti M-am uyyojesi, so 
Rābumokbā pamottacando viya nāgabalo thámasampauno 
kbippam eva парага рёропі, senâpi ‘ваа „Sutasomarăjā pandito 
madhuradhammakathiko ekadvekathā katheturh labhanto pori- 
sådan dametvā sihamukháë muttamattavāraņo' viya ágamissa- 
titi“ са" ,‚гајапаф porisãdassa datvā āgatā ti no’ рагаһївза{111* 
са cintetvá bahinagare yeva nivitthā‘ narn ° dürato va ágacchan- 
tarh disvā paccaggantvâ vanditvá ,„kiñcittha* mabārāja pori- 
вайепа na kilamittbā™ "і patisantháram katvā ,porisādena 
шауһай mátapitúbi pi докКкагаќагаф katah, tathārapo náma 
cando sābasiko mama dhammakatham sutvā шаш vissajjesîti“< 
vatte rājānah alamkaritvā batthikkandbah йгоре{уй pari- 
vāretvā’ nagara pavisirbsu', (ап disvā sabhe nāgarā tus- 
sihsu, во pi dbammasondatāya mātāpitaro adisvā va „pacchâpi 
пе'?° passissñiniti%“ rājanivesanah pavisitvā rājāsanņe nisajja '' 
bráhmanam раккозёреіуа massukammāni ‘вва ёпёреќуй ќаш 
kappitakesamassurh nahātānaolittab vatthálarnkárapatimanditarmn 
katvá ānetvā dassitakálə! вауай рассһа nahātvā tassa attano 
bhojanarm dāpetvā tasmim hhutte вауаф bbuñjitvā tam таһа- 
rahe pallahke nisīdāpetvā dhammagarukatāy’ assa" gandha- 
mālādīhi роја katvā sayan пісёвапе!* nisīditvā ,tumhehi 
тауһаш šábhatá gātbā вираша ° ācariyā“ ‘ti yāci. 
Tam attham dipento Satthā аһа: 


s». Mutto са зо porisadassa hatthă 
gantvāna tam Ъгаһшапаш etad втоса '°: 


t Ва -pattan vā-. 2 Bd ime. > Bds mahājano. * Rds yeva khandhavararh 
катча atthšsi. 5 Bd’ саф. * во Сіз; Bd kiāci. ' Bd -ito. * Bd omits pari-. 
° Ва pavisi. 1° Bdr nesan. j: Bd nisiditvā. 1 so Ck; Ce алвіба-, Ba 
deslta-. '° Bd -gurutā. :* Bd nivesane. !5 В4виппо-. '* во all three МУЗ. 
Гог et' avoca? 


5. Mahšsutasomajšátaka (537.) .483 


sunoma gāthāyo satarahayo 
уй те зиёд assu hitaya brehme ti. 406. 


Ta, etaduvoca 'tl etam evoca. 


Brāhmano Bodhisattena yācitakāle gandhehi hatthe ub- 
battetvā pasibbakā manoramarh potthakam niharitvá ubhohi 
hatthehbi gahetvá „tena bi mahārāja Kassapadasabalena desitā 
rāgamadādinimmadanā' layssamugghaátavattupacchedatanhak- 
khayatthñáya' viráganirodhaamatamahanibbënasampápika' ca- 
їазво satārahā gāthā sunáhiti““ vatvā potthakarm olokento аһа: 

<, Sakid eva° Sutasoma sabbhi hotu' samāgamo, 

ва nar’ samgati păleti násabbhi bahusarngamo. 407. 

ө. Sabbhir eva samāsetha 
sabbhi kubbetba santbavarn, (Semyuta-N. 1 р, з.) 
satarh saddbammam añúñáya веууо hoti па pāpiyo. 408. 
в. Jiranti ve rājarathā восі, (Dhp. v. ısı, Samyutta-N. [. р. 71.) 
ао вагїгат рі jararh upeti, 
заїап ca dbammo ра jaram upeti, 
Banto have sabbhi pavedayanti. 409. 
эз. Nabhā’ са dūre pathavi са dūre, 

pšrar samuddassa tad аһа dūre, 

tato have düratararn vadanti 

satañ са dhamma’ asatañ са гаја чі. 410. 

Та. вакійеуа 'ti ekavëram :ета, sabbhiti варрцгівећ!, аё пап ti ві 
варЬЫ вавай вашёдашо еказёгаф ! ° pavatto!! рі tarn puggalarh pšletl rak- 
khati, nāsabbhîti asappurisehl рала Ьзһц 1 suciram pi kato sarbgano 
ekat(hšne nivšëso!: па påleti, па thavaro hotiti a, ввшазе{һа 'П вайд 
nisideyya, sabbe pi iriyāpathəe papditen' eva aaddhim pavatteyyā '(1 a. san- 
thavan tÍ mittaaanthavarn, satam ssddhamman ti panditanan ВойдЬа- 


dinara sattatirnsabodbapakkllyadharnmasampkhštarh sasddhammarh aeyyo һо !*, 
elarü dbammam ñatvë vaddbi yeva Ьойй, hāni паша n'atthitl a. raJaratha 


1 во Ck Ве; С» -пітейапё, Bd -nippidana. ? C? omits tthšya. 
nirodha wanting in Bd. * Ва -по-. ` Bds sakin дета. * Bds-ti. ? Ck sa 
tah. ê Віз ar. ° Ва „о. 1% Ck „га. !! Bda pavattento. '? Сё -u, ' Bd 
=e. 14 Bd ц, 

31* 


20 


10 


90 


95 


484 XXI. Asitlnjpáta. 


ti rajünarh arohaniyarathá, eucittā ti! suparikammakat, ssbbhl pave- 
dayšntitl Buddbšdayo asanto sabbhiti sarnkharh gatah sobhanah uttamarh 
nibbanarn pavedenti?, so nibbinasarikháto аап(айһашшо? jarah па upeti na 
jirati, nabbā* ti ākāso, dūre t! pathav; hi sappatitthā* sañgabanët akšso 
nirålambo sppatițtho, 14 ubho ete ekš baddhâpi” vissrhyogaithena anapalittat- 
thena ca’ dūre nšma honti, paran ti orimatirato paratirab, tadahü ti 
tan šhu. 

Iti brāhmaņo catasso satārahā gāthā Kassapadasabalena 
desitaniyámena desetvā tunhi ahosi, të" sutvá M. ,„saphalarh 
me ügamanan“ ti tHtutthacitto „inā раа п’ eva вёуака- 
bhāsitā па isibhásitá ра ¿avikatá'", sabbaññunā va bhāsitā, 
kin nu kho agghantiti'!"“ cintetvá ,imasam sakalam рі cakka- 
таф уёуа Brahmalokā sattaratanapunnar katvá dadamāno 
п’ eva anucchavikam Кёїшї sakkoti, аһа kho рап’ авва tiyo- 
janasate Kururatthe sattayojanike Indapattanagare rajjam 
dáturh pahomi, atthi'° khv-assa rajjam kāretum bhāgyan“ ti 
añgavijjānubhāvena olokento náddasa, tato senapatitthšánadinmi!" 
cintetva '* ekagamabhojanam рі їавза!* bhágyarn adisvā dhana- 
lšbhassa olokento kotidhanato patthāyaą oloketvā catunnarb 
kahápanasahassánarn bhagyam disvā ,,ettakena пай pūjessã- 
miti catasso sahassatthavikā dāpetvā „ācariya tumhe aññe- 
sarn khattiyánarn іта gāthā desetvá кіі '° labhathā“ ‘ti pacchi, 
sekekáya'' ва{аш satah mahārāja, teu` eva'' satárahá nāma 
jātā“ ti аһа, atha nam Mahāsatto „йсапуа tvarn attanā" ga- 
hetvā vicaranabhandassa ° anaggbarh*' na јарӣві, ito pațthāya 
tā™ sahassárahá паша hontū* ‘ti vatvā gātham aha: 

a Sahassiyo іта gāthā na imā gàáthá ваїагаһа, 
cattāri tvarh sahassšui khipparh ganhahi brābmaņā "ti ?. 411. 
Ath’ assa ekarn sukhayánakarh datvá „brāhmaņarh sotthina 


1 Си omit tl. * Bd adds thomentl, ° Bde satarndb-. * Ваг -an. ° Bd 
вашра-. < во Bde; Ck yagaganah, Сг yagshanarn. ? Bd handb-. ° СЫ vi. 
+ Bd tan. '° Bd na кепасі bhaásitë. !! Bd agghanti, Cha aggbatiti. !? Bds 
add nu. !# Ck -dinam. '* Ваг olokento. !5 Bd -Ьһојапавзёрі, !® Bd kitta- 
кат dhanarm. !7 Bd adds gāthāya. !* Bd add tå. !° so Che; Bd -no дһапар 
39 so Сів; Bd vikipltabh-. 11 so Chs; Ва ардћат. ?3 Bd еқек gātbā. ” 
Bd? add ап explanation of this verse. 


3, Mahasutasomajataka. (537.) 485 


geham pavesethš'%“ "і purise ёпареѓуа tat uyyojesi, tasmirh 
khane Sntasomena raññā satārahā yathā sahassārahā katvā 
pūjitā’, sādhū sádhü 'ti mahāsādhukārasaddo ahosi, tassa 
måtāpitaro tam saddam sutvā „kińsaddo nām’ eso“ ti puc- 
chitvā уваат sutvá° dhaoalolataya' Mahāsattassa* kuj- 
jhimsu, so рі bršhmanarh uyyojetvā tesa santikarh gantvā 
vanditvā ațthăsi, ath’ assa pitā' ,tëta evarūpassa sābasika- 
corassa hatthato mutto siti“ patisantháaram рі akatvá attano 
dhanalolatáya* „sacca kira tāta tayo catasso gāthā sutvā 
cattāri sahassāni dinnānîti“ pucchitvā ,,вассап“ ti vutte 
as. Asltiya!' navutiyá ca gāthā, 

satārahā cápi bhaveyyu’ gāthā, 

paccattam eva Suttasoma јёпаћі 

sahassiyo nāma kuth’ аһ" gāthā ti āba. 412. 


Ta. paccattamevā 'ti attanā janall, kudbẹjatthîti kubi atthi'°. 


Atha nar Mahāsatto „nâêham tāta dhanena vaddhimn 
icchámi sutena icchāmîti“ зайййёрепїо ёћа: 

sa. Icchāmi vo ‘har sutavuddbim attano, 

santo са marh suppurisă bhajeyyam, 

aham savantihi mahodadhiva 

pa hi (аба tappāmi subhāsitena. 413. 
и. Aggi yathā tiņakattharh dahanto 

na tappati sāgaro vā nadihi'!" 

evam pi te panditā rájasettha 

sutvā na tappanti subhāsitena 414. 
ав. Sakassa dásassa уада sunomi 

gāthā abar atthavatī janinda 


1 Bd sampašdetha, Ве ватрареїһї. ? Bde add t! nagaravāsino. ! Bd adds attano. 
* Ва -lobhataya. ° Ck mahšsaddantsssa. * Bd adds kathah. 7 Ске add và 
9 Cks ий, Bd -yya. # Ck kuthātibi, Наг kä atthi. 10 Ck Һай; Bd tattha 
tšta sutasoma раса азісёгаһё navutārabā satārahā сар! gāthā hhaveyya, tāta 
sutasoma paccattameva attanā va jānāhl, sahassārāhā nāma gāthā kā kassa 
puggal santika atthīti. ! Ck nadihi, Bå nadibhi. 


15 


20 


a 


10 


16 


s 


486 XXI. Asitinipášta. 


tam eva sakkacca nisamayámi, 
na hi táta dhammesu mam’ atthi tittîti. 415. 

Ts. то ti nipatamattaru, santo (і ele ca mam bhajeyyun ti ісеһаші, 
ватапеїћ іц nadibl, ваказаа ‘ti titthatu Nandabrahmano yadā abar attano 
дёзаявёрі 1 sunomi ?. 

Evañ ca pana vatvā „mā mar tāva’ dhanahetu pari- 
bhăsi‘, аһа ‘dhammam sotvā ágamissámiti' sapathah katvā 
āgato, idán' йёһатп porisādassa santika gamissāmi*, idarn vo 
rajja gaņhathā“ `1 niyyadento 

ао. Ідаф te rațthah sadhana sayoggam (2°) 
sakāyurah sabbakámüpapannam, 
кіп kāmahetu paribhāsase тай, 
gacchám' аһа рогіѕёдаѕва kaote“ ti g. а. 416. 


Та. калбе ё ti santike. 


Tasmim ватауе pitu габбо hadayam unham аһозі, во 
„tāta Sutasoma kin nām’ etais Каћеѕі, caturañginiya вепйуа 
corarh gahessámiti“ vatvā р. ёћа: 

во. Attánurakkháya bhavanti h` ete 

hatthārohä гака pattiká са 
аввйгоһа yeva dhanuggahāse, 
senai payuñjána, һаойта sattun ti. 417. 
Ta. һапаша “t васе етеп рауој!&' eenā ten gaheturn ра sakkonti 


atha паш saakalsratthavasino gahetva gentrå Һапёша esttuńn màremsa" tam 
attano° paccamittan ti a 


Atha nam mātāpitaro assupuppamukhā ,„tāta mā” gan- 
tum '' labbhá“ ti yácirhsu, solasasabassá natakitthiyo pi sesa- 


` 


рагіјапо рі „ашһе anāthe katvā kuhim gacchasi devā“ `ti 


paridevirbsu, sakalanagare Косі sakabhāvena santhatum '? 


asakkonto ,,porisádassa kira“ patiññam datvā gato, idāni 
t Ваз add santike. > Hdz add tata dhammesu шаша ШЧ na hi айып. > Hd 
саса. + Віз -sasl. ° СЕ -iti 5 во Ска for ñatte? cfr. р. 26.0; Bd unte, Be 
ante? 7 Ck „Беш, Сә -кё. 5 Bd Һапета, ? Bd? ambškari. !° Bd adds gaccha. 
11 Ваг add па. 12 Bds sandhišreturh. !° Ba pana kira ahata. 


5. Mabašsutasomsjštaka. (537.) 487 


catasso satārahā' gāthā sutvā dhammakathikassa вакКагаф 
katvá mátápitaro vanditvā puna kira corassa santikam ga- 
missatiti“ sakalanagararh ekakoláhalarh ahosi, so mātāpitunnarh 
vacanarh воіуй 
s. Sudukkaram porisādo akási: 

jiva gahetvāna ауавва}ї mam, 

tarn tādisarh pubbakiccarh saranto 

dubbhe aharh tassa katharn janindā ‘ti g. ё. 418. 


Ta. Jivarn gahetvānā tl Jivagaharn2? gahetvä, tern tādlsen ti tari 
tona katah tathërüparn?. pubbakiccan ti purimaupakirarn, janindā "1 
pitararh alspati. 


So mātāpitaro авайве{уй* „amma táta tumhe mayham mā 
cintayittba, katakalyáno aham, сһаКАшардїввагїуаш°* na dolla- 
bhan“ ti mātāpitaro vanditvá веваўапаш anusãsetvā pakkāmi. 


Tam attham pakāsento Satthā даат аһа: 
ъз. Vanditvā’ so pitarah mātarañ са 
апивйзе{тё negamañ [са] bslañ са 
saccavadi вассйёпигвЕКһатйпо* 
agamāsi so yena зо porisādo ti, 419, 


Ta. васеапигай Кһатапо ti saccah anurakkbamáno, sgamāsiti таф 
ratti nivesane yeva звуіста? punadivase srunuggamanavelšaya mātāpitaro 
Yanditvë sesejanarh anusšsetvë asaumukhena папаррайагапп paridevantena itthâ- 
gārtādljauena anugato nagarā nikkhamma tar janan nivattetum asakkonto 
mahämagga dandakena tiriyarn Jekbarb katvā „imah'? mayi sannebš!l mā?’ 
atikkamirhsū" 'ti аһа, mahājano tejavato silavantasaa апат atikkamiturn asak- 
konto mahâsaddena paridevamāno tarh sihavljambbitena gaccbantarh olokeuto 1° 
thatvă авт dassanūpacâram atikkamante ekaršvarh ravanto nagararh pärist, 
80 рі âgatamaggen’ eva tassa santikarñ gato, tena vuttarh: agamasi зо yattha 
во рогівайо ti. 


Tato рогівёйо сіпѓеві ‘*: „sace таша ваһёуо Sutasomo 
арапіокато āgacchatu vā mā уй" rukkbadevatā ще yam'' 


% Ва ваһазгётаһћа. ° Bd Jivamaánarh. 2 Ске tatbanurü-, * Bd’ anusāsetvā. 5 
Bd .masaggissarlyarn. “ao all three MSS. 7 read: вассёпогаккђатіпо saccavëdi? 
è Ваз yattha, ° Bde vasltvā. !° Bd adda sace. 1! Rd slneho айы. 1? Ck 
шай. !3 Bds -etvā, 1 Chs gacchanto рапа in the place of tato porlsšdo cintes. 
33 Bd omits vā mā vā. 1* pd yañ шаућаф. 


30 


15 


20 


488 XXI. Asitinipata. 


iccbatu tañ karotu, ime rājāno máretvë pañca шайһагашашвепа 
balikammarñ karissāmîti“ citakarm katvā aggin jáletvá „аш- 
gārarn (ата hotū“ "і tassa вШагп tacchantassa nisinnakāle' 
āgato’, atha narh porisādo disvā tutthacitto „samma gantv& 
kattahbakiccarm te katao“ ti pucchi, Mahāsatto „āma mahārāja 
Kassapadasabalena desitā me gāthā виќа°, dhammakathikassa 
sakkáro ca kato, tasmá gantvá kattabbakiccarh пата һо © 
dasseturn gātham аһа: 

ss. Kato mayā samgaro brāhmaņena 

ratthe sake issariye thitena, 

tarn загпдагагп bráhmanassa-ppadáya * 
saccãnurakkhī punar âgato `smi, 

yajassu yaññarm hantvëna тата mamhsarh * 
khādāhi vā тат ватта porisādā‘ "і, 420, 

Та, уајаѕвӣ 'Ч шат māretvā devatāya vā уайбаћ yajassu masah váš 
me khadahiti a. 

Тай sntvá porisādo „ауа rājā na bhāyati, vigatama- 
ranabhayo hutvá katheti, kissa nu kho esa ānubhāvo“ ti 
cintetvă ,aññar п' atthi: ауага ‘Kassapadasabalena desitā 
me gāthā sutā' ti vadati, tšsarh etenánnbhávena bhavitabbarh, 
aham р' ебат kathápetvë tā gāthā sossāmi, evam aham рї 
nibbhayo bhavissámiti“ sannitthánarn katvā gātham аһа: 

se Na bāyate khāditurh’ mayham pacchā, 

citakā ауатп tāva sadhūmikā va’, 
niddhümake pacitarh sadhu ракка, . 
sunáma° gāthāyo satārahāyo tí. 421. 
Те. kháditun10 ti khádanarh, tava khâdapah!! тауһап рассһа её 


pure và na рагїһйуа!!, pacchâpi’? hi tvah mayá khaditabbo va, pacitan ti 
nidhümake nijjále agglmbi райКашагпва!һ sidhupakkarn nima hoti. 


t Hds add sutasomo. 3! Ck gato. * Ва sutva. * pd -nasampsdšya. *во Rdr; 
Cks omit hantvāna mama marhsarb; read: hantvàna me marnsarh yajasan yaññarh ? 
* Сіз khāda шаш porisáda. ' Bd -(аф, ° Ві са ° Bd no. 1° Bd -tan, 
41 Ва tava khadeyyarn. 12 Ck paccâye pl. 


5. Mahasutasoraajatsha. (537). 


489 


Tam sutvā Mahasatto „ayar porisādo pápadhammo, imarh 
thokarh niggahetvá lajjāpetvā kathessāmîti“ cintetvā йћа: 
ss. Adhammiko tvah porisádak' азі 
rattháto bhattho udarassa hetu, 

Чһатшай c' іта abhivadanti gāthā, 


dhammo adhammo са kuhih sameti. 


422. 


sa. Adhammikassa luddassa niccar lohitapánino 


n'atthisaccam kuto dhammarn !, Кіт sutena karissasiti. 423, 


Та. dhammaācā ’tl imā ca gâthà navalokuttaradhammarh abhivadanti, 
kuhirm sametiti katiba samāgacchatl’, dhammo hi sugatih vā ават 5 vā 
păpet! айһашто duggatlh, Киса dhammaan! ti vacisaccamattami рі n’ aithi 
kuto dhammo, kir sutena ’ti tvar etena sutena kirn karissasi, mattikâbhā- 
јалаф viya sihavasšya аЫһВ]апагп tvah dhammassa. 


So eva kathite n' eva kujjhi, 


kasmá: 


Mahäsattassa 


mettãnubhävena’ mahantena, atha nar „kih puna вашта 
Sutasoma aham eva adhammiko*“ ti vatvá gātham аһа: 
и. Yo marhsahetu migavam careyya 
уо сёһапе* ригізвт attahetu 
ubho pi te pecca ваша bhavanti, 


kasmá по adhammikarh brüsi' marh ќуао ti. 424. 


Та. kasma no tt ye Jambudipatale гёјапо slarnkatapatiyatta mabâbala- 
parivārā rathħavaragatā migavarh caranta tikhineh! sarehi mige vijjhitvā mārenti 
te avatvü Кавга (таф mam yeva adhammikah vadesi’, yadi te niddosā aham 
рі niddoso yevā 'u dipeti. 


Тат sutvá Маһазайо laddhirn bhindanto gātham aha: 
ав. Райса райса na khā’ bhakkhā khattiyena pajānatā, 
abhakkharn гаја bhakkhesi, tasmā adhammiko tuvan ti. 425, 


Tasa’ attho: samma porisäda !° khattiyadhammamh Jánantena pañca pañca 
'ti hatthlšdayo даз’ eva satt marnsamayena!! па Юһо!? bhakkhā ne kho? 
khàditabbayuttaki, na kho (Ú eva vā рё{һо, aparo nayo: khattiyena khattiya- 
dħammarn jänantena pañcanakhesu satlesu sasako sallako godho !3 aimi?‘ kummio 


t Bd -о. 


+1 Сиг -ві. і Bd nibbānah. * Ck -aaccarh tampi. 


Ъћётапауа. * Bd gāhane. * Ске brühl. ° Bd -asi. °’ во all three MSS. 
Baz add khattlyena пагод. 1: во Сї», Bd marbsavusens. 


Ске -K. 


14 во Си; Bd: sici. 


13 Ba omita kbo. 


3 Ваз mette 


10 
13 


20 


25 


10 


зо 


490 XXI. Asitlnlpita, 


ti Ime paüc' ета sattë bbakkbitabbsyuttska na añe, (таф pana abbakkbarh 
purisamarbsarm bhakkbesi, tenápi adhammiko ti. 

Iti so niggaham Ppatvá аббат nissaranarm adisvā attano 
рёраш paticchādento gátham аһа: 

s. Matto tuvan porisādassa hatthā 
gantvā sakam mandira kāmakāmi 
amittahattharm punar араќо si, 
nakkhattadbamme kasalo ві гаја "і, 426. 

Te. nakkbattadbsmme ti {тыр nakkhatthadhammasarnkhšáte nīti- 
aatthe! na koueslo si’, attano atihānattberb na јаоёв!, akâraņen’ eva te loke 
pandito ti kitti pattbstš °, abah рала te penditabbāvan na passimi‘, ањо 
siti vedeti. 

Atha паш Mahāsatto „samma khattadhamme kusalena 
паша mädisen’ eva bhavitabbam, аһа tarn јёпаті, na puna 
tathattáya' pațipajjāmîti“ vatvā gātham aha: 

во. Ye khattadbamme kusalā bhavanti 
рёуепа* te nerayiká bhavanti, 
tasmā аһаф khattadhammarn pahāya 
saccánurakkhi punar йраїо ‘вті, 
yajassu yaññań kháda mar porisādā’ ‘і. 427. 

Ta, kusalā ti tatbattāya patipajjanakusalá, păyenă "i yebhuyyena Dera. 

yikā, ye pana tattba ла nibbattanti te sesapayesu nibbattanti. 


Porisādo аһа: 
вз. Pāsādavāsā pathavigavássarh'" 
kámitthiyo kásikacandanañ са 
sabbam tahim labbhati sámitáya”', 
вассепа kit passasi ánisarhsan ti. 428, 
Те. равгдатёвё ti samma Sutasoma (аул tinnah ойпат апоссћатіка 


dibbarimanakappa tayo nivãsapāsādā, ра!һат!ратазвап!° d patbavi ca gāro 
са asså ca bahü, kamitthiyo ti kamavstthubbütš ftthiyo, kasikacandansü 


t Ва пабі-. * Bds уо. 2 Сіз -patthava, Ва patthato. * Bd adds na јапаюі, 
+ Cke only (ауа. * Che разе 7 road: шаш khšds posada yajassu узббаг Р 
* Bds-a. * Bd labhasi sšmikaya. '° Bd -sañ. 


5. Msbšsutasomajatska, (537.) 


491 


сё `t! kasikavatthañ cs lohitacandanañ са, sabbarh tabin ti өй! са аййай 
ca upabhogaparibhogarn sabbath tabir t attano nagare sšmitšya labhasi, sāmi 
batvā yathā icchasi tatha paribhnuñjiturn labbasl, во tvah aabbarh etath pshaya 
вассёпогаккї !Idhágacchanto saccons kim anissrbsarh2 passasi. 


Bodbisatto йһа: 
вз. Ye kec’ ime atthi rasá pathavyá 


saccarh tesarh sádhutaram гааёпат, 


вассе thitá samanabráhmaná са 


taranti játimaranassa pāran ti, 


429. 


Та. sšdhutaran Ч yasmá sabbe pi тава sattanarn saccakāle yera panita 
honti tamā saccarn ева sšdhutararn*, yasmā vä viratlaaccavacīsacce {һИа 


jJštlmaranasarnkhátassa 


papunantl tasmā tsrb sadhutaran tí. 


Evam авва Mahāsatto sacce ānisarhsarh kathesi, 


tebhümakavattamsa рага amatamahšnibbanar tsranti 


tato 


porisādo vikasitapadamapnunnacandasassirikam v’ assa mu- 
khar oloketvâ „ауа Sntasomo ° añgáracitakarn marh sasūlarh * 
tacchantarn passati, cittutrāsamattam pi 'вва оп’ attbi, kin nu 
kbo esa’ satāârabänarı gāthānarh йпиЬһауо udābu saccassa 
aññass' eva vā kassaciti“ cintetvā ,,россһіввёті tšva пап“ 


ti pucchàuto gátham аһа: 


es. Mutto tuvarh porisādassa hatthā 


gantvă вакат mandira kámakámI 


amittahattharh ponar āgato si, 


na ha’ nūna ќе maraņabhayar janinda, 


alinacitto с' asi’ вассауййні, 430. 
Mabāsatto рі "вва ācikkhanto âha: 
e. Katā me kalyāņā апеКагйра, 


yapüš yitthā™” уе vipulā pasatthā, 


visodhito paraJokassa maggo, 


dhamme thito ko maraņassa bhāye. 


в. Каїй me kalyāņā апекагйрй, 


уаййа yitthā ye vipulá pasatthā, 


431. 


' Сї evañ. 


Ске omit oloketvā ayah sutasomo. 


° Bd asl. 


2 Ck tanhl, Bd hi. 


10 Ва ditha. 


3 Сї Q2anussathsarh. 
* Bd marbsasnlamh, 


4 Наг add rasãuaio. * 


7 Ва asss. 


° Bd hi. 


30 


15 


10 


499 XXI, Asitinlpato. 


anënutapparh рага!оКатп! gamissarm, 
уа]аззп yañüarm kháda marh porisáda, 432. 

в. Pitá са mātā ca upatthitā me, 
dhammena me issariyam pasattharn, 
visodhito paralokassa maggo, 
dhamme thito ko maranassa bháye. 433. 

м. Pitë ca шйїй са upatthitá me, 
dhammena те issariyarm pasattham, 
апёпоќарратћ paralokarh gamissarh, 
yajassu yaññam kháda marh porisado, 434. 

вв. Ñatisu mittesu katá me Кага’, 
dhammena те issariyar pasattharh -ре-. 435. 

e. Манап mittesu katā ше kará*, 
dhammena me issariyarh pasattham, 
anšnutapparm -ре- 436. 

то. Dinna me дзпат bahudha bahunnam, 
santappita затапа brābmaņā ca, 
visodhito paralokassa maggo -pe- 437. 

п. Ріопат те dánam bahudhā bahunnam, 
saatappitā ѕатарё brāhmanā ca, 
anānutappar paralokam gamissam, 
yajassu yaññam khāda marh рогізёда ‘ti. 438. 


Та, kalyápa (1 Каіудпакаттё, епекагӣра ti danadlvaeena3) neka- 
vidhā, уаййа ti dasavidhadanavatthupariccágavasena ativipulá panditapasatthā 
уайпёр! yitthāä pavattitā, dham m= thito ti evan dhamme patit(hito madiso ko 
паша шатапавва bhàyeyya, ananutappan ti ananutappamano, dhammena me 
issariyarn paeatthan ti dasavidharšjadhammarb akopetvā dhammen' eva шуа 
rajjam pasarnsitam 4, karat 11 байзо ñatlkiccanl тісіево ca mittakiccâni, 
danan ti savatthukacetanā, bahudhaá ti bahühi ākārehi, Ьаһпппап tí na 
райсаппа па dasannarh aatassa pi sahassassa pl, dinnam eva, santappită 
ti gabitagabltabhājanānl рӣгесуё sutthu tappita 2. 


1 sọ all three MSS. 3 Bd: katūpakārā. ? Bd annādi-. * Біг равёгі-. > В 
katūpekārā, C? каго. * Сіг sahassam рі, Bd sdds satasahassassa рі. ? Bd senta-. 


5. Mebāsutasomajātakā. (537.) 493 


Тай gutvá porisādo „aya Sautasomarájá sappuriso ñána- 
sampanno', sac’ аһа? etan khadeyyarn muddhë те sattadhā 
phaleyya pathavi vă papa me vivararh байеуу&“ і bhitatasito 
„samma па tvah mayá kháditabbaynttarüpo“ ti уабуй gā- 
tham аһа: 

т. Visar рајёпаћ рогіво adeyya 

āsīvisarh jalitah uggatejam, 

muddhápi tassa vipateyya sattadhá 

yo tādisarh saccavšdir adeyyā 'ti. 439. 

Ta. visan t! tatth' eva māraņnasamattharh® halahalavisar)i, jalitan ti 
attano visatejen ета Jalitath 'tena uggatejarn aggikkhandharh viya vicarantaro 
āsivisain та pana so givāya ganheyya. 

Iti so Mahāsattarh ,haláhalavisasadiso me tvar, Ко tam 
khādissatîti“ vatvā tā gāthāyo sotukāmo tam yācitvā tena 
dhammagãravajananattharh „evarūpānam anavajjadhammānat * 
сапат tvah abbājavaa“‘ ti patikkhitto pi ,,sakala-Jambudipe 
iminā sadiso pandito n’ atthi, ayam náma шата batthā muñ- 
citvë gantvā tā gāthā sntvā dhammakathikassa sakkárarh katvā 
nalátena шассош ādāya punágato, ativiya sādhurūpå раа 
bhavissantiti“ suțthutarah señjātasavanādaro hutvë yācanto 
gātham āha: 

т. Sutvá dhammarh* vijânanti пага kalyanapapakam, 

api ра(һа suņitvāna dhamme те ramati mano ti. 440. 

Tase’ attho: samma Sutasoma пага пата dhamma sutvā kalyáanam рі 
pšpam рі Jánanti, app-eva ° tš gāthā sutvā mama pl Шиза!ара{һайһашше? mano 
таштеууа ‘ti. 

Atha Mahāsatto ,,sotukamo dāni porisādo, kathessāmi 
"ѕва nan“ ti cintetvā „tena hi samma sādhukahm зппйаһїї“ 
tah ohitasotarn katvá Nandabrāhmaņena kathbitaniyāmen’ eva 
gätbāuarh thutih katvā сһакатауасагайеуево“ ekakolābalarh 


1 Bds add madhuradbammakathiko. 2 Cka ветаһаш. 9% Cks Bd ша-. + Bd omits 
dbammānab, > Cke -а, 6 Rds add паша. 7 Bd kusalakammapatha, * Bd 
chasu - - vesu. 


23 


30 


10 


494 XXI Asitnipāta. 


Каста devatāsu sādhukārah dadamanāsu’ Mabāsatto рогіва- 
dassa dhamma Касһеві: 
тє. Sakideva Sutasoma sabbhi hotu’ зашарашо, 
sā narh samgati pšleti násabbhi Баһивафрато, 441. 
тв. Sabbhir eva samësetha sabbhi kubbetha santbavarh, 

aatarh saddhammam aññáya seyyo hoti na рарїуо. 443. 

za. Jiranti ve rājarathā sucittā, 

atho sariram pi jaram upeti, 

satañ са dhammo na jaran upeti, 

santo have sabbhi pavedayanti. 443, 

тт. Nabhá' ca dūre pathavi са dūre, · 

pārarn samuddassa tad āhu dūre, 

tato have“ ййга{агаш vadanti 

gatañ ca dhamma asatañ са гаја '. 444, 

Tassa tena sukathitattā с` eva attano panditabhávena ca 
„gāthā sabbañūūbuddhakathitā viyā““ °*ti ciotentassa sakala- 
sarirarh райсауапоёуа pitiya phari° Bodhisatte mudacittamn 
ahosi, setacchattadayakarm ,pitaram viya nam amaññi, во „aham 
Sutasomassa* dātabbahiraññasuvaņņe” na passāmi, ekekāya 
pan’ assa’ gātbhāya ekekańħ’ тагаш dassámiti% cintetvā 
gštham аһа: 

тв. Саа imā айһауай вптуай}апа (15!) 

subhásitá tuyharh janinda satvā 

ānandicitto'” sumano patito, 

cattári ќе ватта vare dadámiti. 445. 


Та. ānanditi ãnandajāto !', вевёпі tass' eva vevacanāni, cattāro pi b' 
ete tutthâkārâ yeva. 


Atha паш Mahasatto „kih оёша уаш тагаш давзавіц“ 
apasādento аћа: 


1 Се pd -deve. 2 Bds hoti. 3 Rds -ar. * Uke bhave. > С. pūri, Rde рагі- 
рїп. © СКә sutasomo masss. ? Bde карба kiñci bivannah. ! Rd pana. 
Y Che „кё. 10 Ва anantlvitto, Cks änandacitto. !! Che -di-. 


5. Mabâsutasomajātaka. (537.) 495 


те. Yo п” аќќвпо maranam bujjhasi (уап 

hitahitam vinipátañ са варрат 

giddho газе duccarite nivittho 

Кіш {уаш! vararm passasi рарадһашша?. 446. 
во. Ahañ са tam dehi varan ti vajjarn 

{уап сёрі datvāna avākareyya, 

sanditthikarn kalaham imam уїуйдаш 

ko pandito janam upabbajeyyā "і. 447. 

Ta. уо t! yo tvan maranadhammo sham asmiti attano maraparh па 
Jānāsi® na bujjhasi* pšpsdhammam eva karosl, hitšhitan ti 1йып me kame 
шай Һа idam ashitarn idam vinipátarh nassati' idah asggan tl na Јапӣві, 
rase (1 manussamarnsarase, vajjan ti vadeyyah’, атакагеууа 'tl vâciya 
datvā debl me veran t! vuccamāno” avākareyyãsl па dadeyyãsi’, upabba- 
Jeyyš ' ko imah kalaba pandito upagacchoyya. 

Tato porisādo „пёуаф mayham saddahati, saddahāpessämi 
nan“ ti gātham аһа: 

м. Na (аш varam arahati janta dáturh 
yam vápi datvána avākareyya, 
varassu вашта avikampamáno, 
рёпаф cajitvána pi dassam evā 'ti. 448, 


Ta. avikampamāno t! anoliyamano 


Atha Mahäsatto „ayan ativiya süro һибуй Каеві”, ka- 
rissati ше уасапаш ganhissámi'? sace pana ‘шаповзвшабваћ 
па khaditabban' ti pathamam eva vara varissah'' ativiya 
kilamissati, pathamam aññe tayo vare gahetvë pacchā etam 
gaņhissāmîti“ cintetvā aha: 

ss. Ariyassa ariyena ваше! sakkhi'* 
paññassa paññāņavatā '' вашей, 
passeyya {аш уаввава!аш arogam, 
etam varánam pathamam varāmiti. 449. 


t Bd tan. > Bd „о, В#-ө. *# Ck omita па, Bd omita Janasi. * Bd adds па 
Jānā, 5 Bd omits пезза!. * Bd айа па. 7 Bd sdda па, * Rd omits па da-. 
° Bd -еп. ?% Bd -mitl. 1 Bd vàrayissarn. `!9 Bd вакы, '6 Сіз -navatš. 


5 


20 


30 


10 


15 


95 


496 ХХІ. Asitinlpāta. 


Та, arlyassš 'ti ācāreariyassa, sakkhiti! sakkhidhammo ti? mitta- ` 
dhammo, paññaánavastš? ti ñanasampaunena?', sametiti Gaŭgodakarh vlya 
Yamunodakena вагмапйаї! dhātuso* hi satth sarnsandanti, passeyya tan ti 
porisadsssa cirein jJivitarn іссһепёо° ра{Башаф attano jivitavarah уёаса! pandi- 
tassa bi panat mama jivltarn dehid vattu ayuttarh ар! са во mayham eva? 
arogyarh iccbatiti cintetvā tussissatiti° pl evam aha 


So ќай sutvë va „ayam issariyá dhamsetvā’ idāni mam- 
вап kbāditokāmassa evam mahšanatthakárassa mahācorassa 
mayham eva jīvitarh icchati, aho mama hitakámo“ ti tuttha- 
тйпаво ќа '° vañcetvā varassa gahitabhávarm sjánitvá va tam 
varam dadamáno gátham āha: 

e». Ariyassa ariyena sameti sakkhi'' 
paññassa paññanavatá sameti, 
passe pi' mam vassasatam arogam', 


etam уагёпаїй pathamam dadāmiti. 450, 
Та. varānan ti catunnari тагапапз ра(ћашаг. 


Tato Bodhisatto āha: 
es. Ye khattiyā ye'* idha bhümipálá 
muddhåbhisittā katanāmadheyyā 
па tšdise bhümipatií adesi, 
ебат уагапаїй dutiyarh уагашіі. 451. 
Ta. Касапётадћеууа tí muddhaul abhisittattä'* va muddhābbtaittā 
katanämadhoyyā ti, na tãādise tl tâdise kbattiye па айей mā khaditi. 
Iti во dutiyarh varai ganhanto рагозаїйпаїш КһҺаї{йуйпаш 
jivitavaram ganhi, porisādo рі "вза dadamāno āha: 
es. Ye khattiyā ye'° idha bhümipålā 
muddbhabisittá katanāmadheyyā 
па tādise bhümipati ademi”, 
etarn varánam dutiyarh dadámiti. 452. 


1 Bd акый, 2 Bdz omit tl. 2 pd üšna-. * Bd yo. 5 Bd adde vlya. * Ck 
рі, Bd omite pana. ? Віз add ева. ° Cka -siti. ° Віз -yar (ареста. '° 
Сї omit tam. 1! Bd sakkhi. '% Bd рааварі. !® Bd аговуаш. !* Bd se. 35 
Oks „ава. 1# Bds ве, 3! Сёз adeai. 


5 Mahasqtasomasjataka. (537.) 497 


Kim pana ќе tesarh saddar_ supanti па! sunantiti па" 
ваһһаш вопапіі, рогівёдепа hi rukkhassa dhümajálupaddava- 
Ъћауепв* patikkamitvë aggi kato, aggino са rukkhassa са 
antare nisiditvā Mahásatto tena saddhim kathesi, tasmā sab- 
Бат asutva upaddhupaddham вппїйви, te ‚„їййпї Sutasomo 5 
porisådarh damessati, mā bháyathá%“ `{1 aññamaññarn samassã- 
sesurh, tasmirn khane Mahāsatto imam gātham аһа: 

вв. Parosatam khattiyá te gahitë 

talāvutā assumukbā rudaotā, 
sake te* гаће pațipādayābi, 10 
etarn varānamr tatiyarh varāmîti. 453. 


Ta. parosatan t! atirekasatain, te gabitā ti taya gahitā, talāvutā 
ti hatthatalean āvuiā. 


Iti Mabāsatto tatiyarn' vara рапһап{о tesam khatti- 
yånarn sakarattharn' niyyátanavararh ganhi, КіфКкагапа: во 15 
akbādanto pi verabhayena' sabbe te баве katva araññe yeva 
vāsāpeyya' māretvå vā chaddeyya paccantam vă netvā vikki- 
пеууа, tasmā tesań ваКага{{һапїууй!апатагатї gaņhi, itaro pi 
'вза° dadamüno ішагі '° gātham āha: 

вт. Parosatarh khattiyå me раһїїй 20 
talavutá àssumukha гидапїй, 
sake ќе“ ratthe pațipādayāmi, 
etah varanarh ќайуаф dadamiti. 454. 

Catuttharn рапа рапһаоќо Bodhisatto imar gātham аһа: 

вв. Chiddan te габат vyšádhitam ! bhayāhi, 95 
pnthü пага lenam anuppavittháš, 
manussamarhsarh viramehi гаја", 
etah varšnarh catutthah varámíti. 455. 


Y Ck omits supanti na. ! Ck tarb. >? Ске „Ја-, * Che na. ° Bd -ya. “Hd -ө. 
7 Ва veri-. 8 Bd уаввууа. ° Сі omit вва. !° Cks idaro. !! Сә vya-, Bd 
byādbikāya. !2 Ck Dd -jā. 

Хака. V. a2 


10 


20 


35 


498 ХХі. Asitlnipšrs. 


Ta. chiddan tl na! ghanšvšsarn ?*, tattha gamadinar qtthitatta ватїтататп, 
vyadhitarnt bhayšáhitl porisãdo 1452 Agamissstit] tava bhayena kamparmani *, 
lenamanuppavittha 41 дагаке hattheso gahetvš tlnagahanadiniliyanatthanarir5 
рат ({}&, manussarmarbsan t| duggandhajegucchapatikkülarp marussamarbsarth 
рајаһа nissakkatthe vā upayogah, mauussamarhsato viramabiti attho. 

Evam vutte porisādo pšnim paharitvā hasanto „samma 
Sutasoma, kin nām’ etarn kathesi, kath’ āharh tuyham! etar 
varan дайеууйті*, васе рі gaņhitukāmo аййаш ganhā“ `°ti 
vatvā’ gātham йһа: 

зә. Addhā hi so bhakkho татат manapo, 
etassa hetom pi" vanar pavittho, 
so ‘har katham etto upårameyyarh, , 
айбат) уагёпат catuttham varassü і. 456, 


Та. vanan ti rajjarb раһауа imarh тапаг pavittho. 


Atha nar Mahäsatto „tvah manussamarhsassa piyattá'' 
‘tato уїгашїїшї na sakkomiti' vadasi, уо hi ріуаф nissëya 
раёраш karoti ауаш bálo“ ti vatvā gātham йһа: 

ə» Na ve piya’ ше ti janinda tádiso (Ш 23°) 

айаш '* nirarhkatv& piyāni sevati, 
attā va ѕеууо рагашё va ѕеууо, 
labbhá ріуё ocitatthepa pacchā ti. 457. 


Ta, tšdiao tl janinda tšdiso yuvă abhirüpo mahayaso ідал nima me 
piyan t! piyavatthūb’ ālaggo'* attānsin nirarbkatva sabbasngatihi с' eva sukha- 
“івөвеһі ea nuditvä’’ niraye pătetvā na ve piyāni eevatl, paramā va soyyo 
ti porisassa bi paramhbā!’ piyavatthumbā аба va varataro!, iabbhā piyā tl 
р!у8 nāma visayavaseua 1% c’ eve puñāena са ocitatthens vaddhitatthega dițtha- 
dhammoa c’ ova parattha ca devamannssasampattii patvë sakkà laddhurh. 


Evar vutte porisādo bhayappatto hutvā „аһаш'' Suta- 
вошепа gahitavararn vissajjāpetum pi manussamarhsato vira- 


1 Bda omit na. 3 B4s għarā-. * Bd hyädbitā, Ске vyadbitah. * Bd kempitā. 
5 ali three MSS. gahapā-. * Cks nlssakkanatthe. ? Bd (пшһашаш. ° Bds dassāmi. 
* Ck pavatvä, Ва вапЬ&Ы tl vatvā. 10 Bd¿ hetumhi. '! Bds piyatarattă, 12 
Ck paveslyarh. !3 B4 ацапаш. 1⁄4 Сг -ühl leggo, Bd -vattbulo tena tattha. 1 
Bd сатеіуё,. 14 Bd omits ра- 1" Ва» add kirhkáaranšá. !1* Сіз visayāyasona. 
19 Сг Bd add Ы. 


5. MahasutasomsJitaka. (537.) 499 


mitum рі na sakkomi, kin пп kho karissāmiti“ assupunnuehi 
nettehi gátham аһа: 
эз. Piyam me müanusarh marnsarh 
Sutasoma vijānahi', 
п’ amhi sakko niváreturh 
айпат tuva" samma vararn varassü ‘ti. 458. 


Ta, viJšnahitl (ғаш pi Jānābl? 


Tato Bodhisatto āha: 

эз. Yo ve piyam me ti piyãoukarkhī ® 
atta nirańhkatvā рїуйпї sevati 
sondo va pitvëna visassa' thálarn 
ten' eva so hoti dukkhi parattha. 459. 

әв. Yo с” tdha sarmkháya piyáni hitvā 
kicchena рі* sevati ariyadhammam 
dukkhito ув pitvána yathosadháni 
ten’ eva во hoti sukhi paratthā 'ti. 460. 

Ta. yo ve ti samina porlsšda yo idam me piyan ti рёракігіуёуа а((апаф 
nirarhkatvë yani vetthüni sevat! so вигёрешепа visamlasam sorar pitvā? sondo 
тув tens papakammens parattba nirayadisu dukkhi botl, ваф ЕЬёуа '1 Jšnltva 
tuletvā piyšáni biivápi° adbammapaisarbyuttánl piyáni сћадјегта, 

Evaro vutte porisádo Карапаш paridevanto° gátham йһа: 

s< Oháy' ahar pitaram mátaraü са 
тапёріке kāmaguņe са райса 
etassa hetumhi уараф pavittho, 
tan te varar kin ti-m-aham dadámiti. 461. 

Та, etassš "і manussamarbsarh dasseti!9 kintimahan t! kim katva 1) 
aham (аі часа deml, 

Tato Mahësatto imar gatham аһа: 

эв. Na рапдїїй digunarm "> Аһп такуа, 
saccappatiññá ca'' bhavanti santo, ` 


1 Ва -nšhi. >? Ске tvah. ®© Ск апан, * Ва» -nurakkhī. ° В visamissa. * 

во all three MSS. ? Ck рита, Bs pivitvá, 3 Bd: bitvātl. # Bd kslunam. !° 

Ck dasse, Dd mapussamainsassa. '! Bd Кіп vatvā. 1? B3 dvi-. !* Ске -йй&уа. 
82* 


35 


500 ХХІ. Asilnipats, 


varassu samma iti mam ауоса, 
icc-abravf tvah na hi te sametîti. 462. 


Ta. diguņan! t! samma porlsāda рапдНа паша ekaro vatvā puna tarh 
visarnvadento dutiyarn +асапаш па vadanti ?, iti шаф svocā 'Ú samma Suta- 


soma varassu varan ti evan mam атосё '!!%, Iccebravitl tesmā* yarn (тай 
itl abravi te idäāni na sameti. 


Ропа so rodanto yeva gātham åāha: 

=. Apuññalábharh ауаваш akittirh 
pšpam bahu duccaritarh kilesarh 
шаппввашаїпвазва kate* upágá, 
tan te varar kin ti-m-aharh dadeyyan ti. 463. 

Та. рёрап tl kammapatbarm арайап%, duccaritan Ч kammapathap- 
рабай, kilasan ti dukkha, manussamarsassa kate (1 manussamarb- 
sassa hetu, upšgš ti upsgato 'mbi, tan te ti tarh {пуһат, kath’ Бай тагай 
demi, ша mar mârayi, sanukamparm kâruññam mayi karobi, aññarh vararb 
gaņnhâ ‘ti aha. 

Atha Mahāsatto аһа: 

sz. Na tar varar arahati jautu datum 

yarn vápi datvāna avakareyya, 
varassu samma avikampamăno, 
рапаф jahitvāna’ рі dassam ета '6, 464. 

Evar tena pathamarh vuttagātharn āharitvā dassetvā vara- 
дёпе ussáharh јапепќо° gātham ãhba: 

s. Pāņañ cajanti santo nápi dhammam', 

saccappațiūñāā ca" bhavanti santo, 
datvā varan khippam avākarohi" 
etena sampajja snršjasettha. 465. 

o. Саје dhana yo рага añgahetu!* 

айрат! caje јїтііаш rakkhamăno, 


1 Bd dvi- 3 Bd kathenti. > Bd abhāsi, Вә abhšsasi. * Bd kasmā, ` Bas 
Ъћато. * во Che, Bå appattah. 7 Chksjahe-, Bds cajitvāna. ° Bd ussšhento. 
* Che sata nasa dhammo. 19 Bd va. !! Bd khippamevšk-, 19 B3 аһапай 
añgavarasaa hotu, Се omis уо pana. 


5. Mahasutasomajitaka. (537.) 501 


añgadhanam' jfvitarh cápi sabbarh 
саје паго dhammam anussaranto ti. 466. 

Та. ралап ti Jivltar, sento tað ca? арі jivitarh cajant!, па 4һашшап 
khippamavākarohîti idhe КЫрраћ mayhan dehîti attho, etenā 'ti etena 
dhaemmena c' eva saccena са sampajja ssmpapno upapanno hobi, suraja- 
вера 1 (аф samganhanto? ` älapati, caje dhanan ti samma porisāda рап- 
dito puriso batthapådādimbi añge chejjamāne* tassa rakkhanatthāya’ babum 
pi 4һапата сајеууа, dbhammamanussaranto #1 añgadbanajivitan pariceajanto 
pi setam dhamma па vitlikkamissāmiti өтап dhamma апозѕагапіо, 

Evam Mahësatto imehi káranehi tarh sacce patitthápento 
idāni attano garubhávarh dasseturh 

100. Yassápi° dhammam рогіво уіјайбё 
уе с” assa КашКһаш vinayanti santo 
tar) hi ‘вва dipañ са рагёуапай са 
па tena тіїбић јагауећа’ райпо ti ра‹ћат āha, 467. 

Ta. уаёва 'tl yambä рогів, dbamman t! kusaläkusalajotakarh karanarn, 
vijsüña ti janeyys', tain hissë "1 tah ācarlyakulaŭı etsssa pugRaslasss 
patltthšnatihena? dipam орраппе bhaye gantabbathanasttbens!? рагаувпай ca, 
na tona mittin ti tena aceriyapuggalens веће !! pandito kenaci kāreņena 
mettin па Јагаўећа!? na vinšseyya. 

Evañ са рапа vatvá „samma porisada gunavantassa 
ācariyassa vacanarh ойша bhinditnh na vattati, ahañ ca ta- 
runakále pi tava pitthiácariyo hutvā Баһшф '° sikkhápesim, 
idāoi Вийаһа1Пһауа ваїйгаһа gāthā kathesirh, tena me va- 
canarh kātu arahasiti“ аһа, tai sutvā рогїзййо!* ,Sutasomo 
тауһаћ ācariyo c° eva pandito ca', varo с' assa mayā diono, 
kih ваККа Каїпш, еКавшїїї attabhāve maranam пата dhuvam, 
manussamarhsam па khādissāmi, dassãmi ‘ssa varan“ ti assu- 
dhārāhi pavattąamānāhi uțtthāya Sotasomanarindassa pădesn 
patitvá varan dadamāoo imam gātham аһа: 


1 Ck abam dbanah, ? Rds пата Іп the place of tañca. ? Bd pagganhanto. 
* Bd chijj-. * Ck -natthāya. * Cks yassāhi, 7 Bdtjl-. ® Bd vljaz. * Che 
-tthatthens. 10 Ске gantabbațthena, Bd gandbeppațbāna-. 1 Ck ваһазаһа, Bas 
заһаво. '? Bd jiyaretha, Вг Jirayetba. '? Bd adds stkkhá, Ве віккһаф. '4 
Bd adds ayan. !® Ck» omit pandito са. 


10 


15 


95 


15 


зо 


95 


30 


502 ХХІ. Astinlpšta. 


191. Addhá hi so bhakkho mamam manāpo, 

etassa hetum pi vanam pavittho, 
засе vå' тай yácasi etam attham 
etam pi te samma vararh dadámíiti. 468. 

Atha пат Mahăsatto „evam atthu? samma, sile patitthi- 
tassa maranam pi náma vara, ganhámi mahārâāja tayā din- 
nam varam, ajja’ pattháya ācariyapathe* patitthito "ві, evar 
gante pi {ай yácámi: васе te mayi sineho atthi pañcaslláni 
ganha mahārājā““ "і аһа, „sādhu samma dehi те sīlānîti“‘, 
„ganha mahārājā“ *1, so Mahāsattah pañcapatitthitena van- 
ditvá ekamantam пїзїйї, Mahāsatto рі tarn sIle* patitthāpesi, 
tasmiù khane tattha sannipatitā Ъһопипадеу& ,,.Mahësatte 
рїї јапепіо* Avlcito yáva bhavaggá añño porisādam ma- 
uussamarmsato nivāreturh samattho пата п’ atthi, abo Suta- 
somena dukkararn' katan“ ti mahantena saddena vanaghatarh 
unnëádento sádhukáram adarnsu, tesarn saddarn sutvă сёќотта- 
hárájiká ti evan уйуа Brahmaloká ekakolāhalarh ahosi, rukkhe 
laggitarájáno рі tam devatānah sadhukárasaddam sunimsu, 
rukkhadevatâpi vimáne° thitā va sādhūkārarh adāsi, iti deva- 
tānarh saddo süyati rüpañ na dissati, devatānarh sādhukāra- 
Saddarn sutvā rājāno cintayirhsu: „Sutasoma пїззауа* jīvi- 
{ат laddharh, dukkaram katah Sutasomena рогїзййаїй da- 
mento“ ti Rodhisattassa thotih karirnsu, porisádo Mahásat- 
tassa раде vanditvá ekamantarh atthási, atha nain Mahāsatto 
„затта khattiye mocehîti“ аһа, so cintesi: „ahah etesar 
paccámitto, ete mayá mocitá “gaohatha no paccāmittan’ ti 
таш |hinaeyyum pi, mayá jīvitah cajantenápi па sakká Su- 
tasomassa hatthato gahitar silah bhinditnrn, iminá saddhirm 
yeva gantvā mocessámi, етагї me ahhayarm bhavissatiti“, atha 
Bodhisattarn vanditva „Sutasoma ubho рі gantvā khattiye 
mocessãmā“ {1'° gátham ёћа: 


1 pd Cs са. 9 Паз гҺа > Dd ajjato, * Dd bharlya. ` Bd паі silesu, © Bd 
=etva, ' Ваг -ratararh. Š Bd makavi-. 9 Ваз add по. !9 Р4 adds vatvā. 


5. Маһћазоіавотовјабака. (537.) 503 


102. Satthë са ше ћозі вакћа са ше ві, 
увсапат рі ќе ватта аһа аКкӣзіћ, 
tuvam' рі те samma karobi vákyam, 
ubho рі рапіуёпа ратосауёта ‘і. .469. 

Та. sattbš ti saggamsggassa desitattā satthš, tarunakilato ра( буа 5 
ѕакћа? са. 

Atha nar Bodhisatto 

10s. Satthā са te homi sakhá са ty-amhi, 

vacanam рі тое samma {пуат аКйвї, 
aham pi te затта Каготі vākyar, 10 
ubho pi gantvāna ратосауйта ’ti’ vatvā 470, 

te upasamkamitvá йһа: 

104. Kammăsapādena vihețhitattā * 
talavutá assumukhë rudantā, 
na jātu dubbhetha imassa гаййо, 15 
saccappatiññarn те pațissuņāthā ‘і. 471. 

Та. kammâsapādenāä "1 {дат Mahāsatto ubho рі gantvāna pamoca- 
yämä ti sampațiechitvā kbattlyā паша mānatthaddhā hontl mottamattā iminā 
эїһе(ҺИ' ашһа 'ti рогівёјат potbeyyum рі haneyyam pl na kho реп’ esa (ево 
dubbbisgati aharù ekako va gantvā ра[іййат tāva nesan gaphāmiti сіп(віта go 
tattha gantvā te batthatalje avunttvë aggspadañgulibi5 bhümlyar  phusamanasu 
rukkhasškhásu olamblte?' vštappahšáranakšle nagadantesu* olambitakarandakadu- 
mâni” viya samparivattante addasa, te pl tarn disva idān! 'mha arogā t! ekappa- 
hšrən ' eva maharavaiñ ravirhen, atha te Mahāsatto шй bhāyathā’? t] азаёвеітб I 
mayâ рогівёйаќо!! tumhakarh abhayarn gahítarh tumhe pana me тасапагп karothë gs 
ЧЇ vatvā evam аһа, tattha na?? Jštü 'ti ekarhsen' eva na dubbhetha. 

Tato te йһатзп: 

19%. Kanimšásapádena vihethit" атһа 

talāvutā аззшппКһа rudantá, 
na játu dubbhema imassa rañño, 
saccappatiññan te patissunáma'?' ‘ti. 472, 


1 all three MSS. (вагі. ? Che .aya. 3 Bd: add етап, + so Cha for vihethit' 
attha? Bd vihedhitamhā, Вг vibetbayitthamha. 5 Bd „ва, * Bd bhūmi. 7 Ске 
-tesu, Bd olaggite. 5 5d -dante. ° Bd olaggitakor-. !0 Ва -yittbā. 3 Dd 
-do damlto, !2 СЕ рапа. '? Bd patlsunomi. 


80 


5 


15 


зо 


504 ХАІ Asitlnipšts. 


Та. ра{іввопёшё! '(1 evan ра|!йПагп adhivšsema вашрајіссђаша арі 
са kho рапа mayar kilantā katbeturb па sskkoms tumhe вабћана((&пат вага 
пага tumhe va kathetba mayarb vo vscanarh sutvá ра!пбањ dassamnë ‘ti. 


Atha nam’ Bodhisatto „tena hi me?’ patiññam деа“ 
'ti vatvā’ 

108. Yathā pitá vā athavâpi mātā 

аоокашракё atthakāmā pajánam 

evam eva по° hotu ayañ са таја, 

tumhe ca vo hotha уа’ eva рид“ ti. 473. 
Te рі sampațicchamānā imarn gátham āhbarmsu: 
107. Yathā рієа và athavápi mātā 

anukampakëá atthakāmā pajaáanam 

evam eva no hotu ауай са rājā, 

mayam рі hessáma tath’ eva puttā ti. 474. 


Ta. tumbo ca vo ti vokāro nipštamattarh, 


Iti Mahësatto tesarh patiññarh gahetvā рогїзйдатї pakko- 
sitvā ,,ећі", khattiye mocehîti“ аһа, so khaggarn gahetvā ekassa 
rañño bandhanam chindi, гајё sattaham пїгїһаго vedanāmatto * 
sahabandhanacchedá mucchito bhümiyarh pati, tam dievā Ma- 
hāsatto kāruñňaro katvā „samma porisāda, mā evarh chinditi““ 
ekam rājānah ubhohi hatthehi dalharn gahetvá ure katvā 
„idāni bandhanarh chindā“ “і аһа, atha porisādo khaggena 
chindi, Mahāsatto pi thāmasampannatāya tah ure nipajjāpetvā 
orasaputtarm viya muducittena otáretvë bhümiyarh nipajjāpesi, 
evam snbbe pi te bbümiyarh пірајјёреіуё vane dhovitvā dāra- 
kanar Каппа{о suttarn viya ѕапікаф гајјџуо nikkaddhitvā 
pubbalohitarh dhovitvā vane niddose katvë ,,samma porisāda, 
еКай rukkhatacarn рӣвапе gharnsitvá āharā“ чі аһагареіса 
saccakiriyarn katvā (еза hatthataláni makkhesi, tam khana 
yeva vano phásukarmn° ahosi, porisādo tandule'° gahetvā vāra- 


Y Bd patlsupoma. ! Bd ne. ? Bd omite ma. * Bd adds gāthamāha. Bd по. 
* Bd шауаш p! bessāma ystbeysteva puttš іп (Ве place of tambə--. 7 Rds 
add samma. ê Rds -patto. * во all three MSS, 19 Bd“ „Јат. 


5. Mabāsutasomajātaka (537.) 505 


пат paci, ubho jana parosatarh khattiye váranarh' рёуевоф ', 
iti te sabbe santappitá, suriyo рі attharhgato, punadivase рі pāto 
са majjhantike сё sāyañ са várànám `! eva páyetvë tátiyádivase 
вавіћакаф yágnrm páyesurh, {йта{й* arogā' аһевиїй, atha te 
Mahāsatto „‚‚рап{шїй sakkhissathā“ ‘ti pucchitvā „рассһап&“ 
'ti vutte „ehi samma рогівёда, sakarattham рассһаша“ `ti 
аһа, so rodamáno tassa pādesu patitvë „tvah samma rājāno 
gahetvā gaccha, аһа idh' eva mülaphaláni khādanto vasissá- 
ті“ āha, „вашта idha Кїї karissasi, ramaniyan te rattham, 
Báránasiyam rajjarn karohîti™, „samma kim kathesi, na sakkā 
mayá tattha ganturh, sakalanagaravāsiuo рі* me verikš', te 
“mayham iminá mātā khāditā mayham рИё` ti таш paribha- 
sissanti, “рапһаїһ' imarh согап` ti ekaledduná° va' mam jivitā 
voropessanti, ahañ ca tumbákarh santike sile patitthito, jivita- 
hetum pi па ваккё mayā parah máretum, náhar gacchāmi, 
aharn manussamarhsato viratattá'° kittakarn jivissámi, idāni 
mama tumhākarh Чавзапаїй n’ atthiti%“ гоййуй „gacchatha 
tumhe" ti аһа, ath' assa Mahāsatto р {һїш parimajjitvā ™ 
›ватта '? Sutasomo námáham, тауа hi tādiso kakkhaļo" vi- 
nito, Báránasivásikesu kirn vattabbarn'* atthi, аһаш tam tattha 
patitthāpessāmi °, attano гајјаф dvidhā bhinditvā даввйти1“, 
„tūmhākam pi nagare тата verino atthi yevā“ ‘ti vutte „iminä 
mama vacanam karontena dukkararm katah, yena ten’ прёуепа 
porāņakayase patitthápetabbo esa mayá: ti cintetvā tansa palo- 
bhanattháya nagarasampattim vannento áha: 
10. Catuppadarh sakunañ cápi marhsam 

südehi randharn виКаїат sunitthitam 

sudham va Indo paribhuñjiyāna 

hitvë kath’ eko ramasi araññe. 475. 


! Cha tarana, 3 во Cka; Bd рзћевот. 2! Вб yšávata. * Ck -8. 5 Ck kare-, 
Ва Катө-. * Bde hi. 1 Bde verino, * Ве okeka-. * С» Bd va. !0 Ва -marn- 
sassa viramitattā, 11 Ck -manditva, Сә -madditva. !? Bd adds porisāda mā 
cintay. 15 Bds add pharuso. !$ Ска omit vattabbsrb. !? Bdradd васе !* 
Ck -sana, Вг -уапі. 


10 


15 


90 


95 


506 XXI. Asiinipšta 


еә, Та kbattiyá vellivilākamajjhā ' 
alarnkatá samparivārayitvā 
Indah va devesu pamodayimsu 
hitvā kath’ eko гатавї araññe. 476. 
19. Tambüpadháne * bahugoņakamhi 
sucimhi?' sabbasayanamhi saññate `! 
sayannssa majjhamhi snkharh sayitvá 
hitvā kath’ eko ramasi агаййе, 477, 
зи. Pánissararm kumbhathünarn пізїсће 
atho pi ve* nippurisam hi turiyarn 
bahurn sugíitañ са suváditañ са 
hitvë kath’ еко гатавї araññe. 478. 
112. Uyyánasampannarh“ pahütamalyarh ' 
migācirūpetapurarh’ surammarnh 
hayehi пареһї ratheh' преѓа 
hitvā kath’ eko ramasi araññe. 479. 


Та. sukatan (1 nanappakarehi sutthukatam, sunitthitan ti sambhára- 
уојалепа? tarh 10 satthuyojitain, katheko 1) kathah еко, ramasiti mûla- 
phalāul kbādanto kathah ramlesasi, ehl maharaja gamissāmā "l|, vellivilaka- 
maJJ)hš tl ettha vellfti!! гаві 19 vllakamajjha {1 vilsggamajjhā uttattaghana- 
вотаппагавірраЪћа с” ета!? tanudīgħhamajjhā са!* '{{ dasseti, devesū ‘ti 
devaloke accharā Indarn уа ramaniye Rārāņasinagare pubbe tar pamodayirnsu 
эЧ, tā hítva idha ка karlssasi, ehl samma gaechīmā 'u, tambupadhbāna!* 
ti rattupadhane sabhasayanamhiti sabbatthəranatthato вауапе, saññate'® 
tl anekabhümike')?! dassetvā attharattālatnkatayutta '® tuvath !# pubbe sayiti attho, 
aukhan t! tädisagsa sayanassa majjhamhi eukharh sayltvë idni katbah araño 
ramissasi, vhi cacchama вашта 'ti, nisithe ti rattibhāge??, hitvā t| eva- 
їйраїї затрат chaddetvå, uyyanasampannar pabūtamalyan?’! ti 
mahärāja tava uyyänssampannarn nānāvidhapuppharo’?, migācirūpetapuran® 
1 Bd vell- > Bd kambupadāne. 5 Kå subhamh!i. * Bd запро. * Bd аћо 
ulsive, Bs пізіре. * Cts -nna. ? Ck pahuta-, Се bshüta-, Dd bahuta-. ° Dds 
Аг migajinüpetarn-. ° Bà! nanasamhbh-. !9 Вв omit tah. !! Aà veli- 12 
so Bd; Сә rathsi. '2 Ско -bhavova, Bd -suvannaršsivannaršásipabhá сега. !* 
Ска va, 1% Dd kampu-, !* Rd saüge. 1 Cks „Ка. !5 зо Вә; Са atthathattā- 
arbkayutte, Ck attharantšarbpkayutte, Bd addharatālañkata-. !° Bde tatthatuvarn. 
зо Рае add niside ti рі рёћо. 2! Pd bahuta-, Bz пууапай-. 32 Cks nānā- 
vldhebí puppham. 


S. Маһёвоќазошајагаке (537 ) 507 


suramman ti ќат uyyiánern Migaciran! паша пёшепа ореќаић puram р! te 
autthu rammarh hitvš ti evarūpah шапотатат chaddatvá. 


Iti Mahüsatto „app-eva оёта esa pubbe upabhuttaupa- 
bhogarasarh* saritvá gantukāmo bhaveyyá" "і ра{һататп bho- 
janena palobhesi йпбуатп kilesena’ tatiyah sayanena catnttharh 
naccagitavāditena райсататп uyyănena с` eva парагепа сӣ “і 
imehi ettakehi palobhetvā „ehi mahārāja, aham tam ädāya 
gantvá Bárñnasiyam patitthāpetvā pacchá sakarațthaih gac- 
chámi*, васе Bārāņasirajjarh па labhissáma' upaddharajjan te 
dassāmi, kim te агайПауйвепва, mama vacanam karohîti“ aha, 
so tassa katharn* sutvā gantukāmo hutvă ,Sutasomo' тауһатп 
atthakāmo anukampako pathamarn kalyáne patitthāpetvā ʻidāni 
porāņakayase’ patitthāpeasāmîti” vadati, srkkhissati с' ева 
patitthāpeturh, iminá saddhiin yeva gantun vattati, Кт me 
вгаййепё °“ ‘ti cintetvā tutthacitto tassa gunarh nissäya vannarh 
kathetukāmo ,,samma Sutasoma kalyánamittasarhsaggato sëdhu- 
tarar papamittasarhsaggato ca pšpataram náma п” atthiti“ 
vatvā äha: 
из. Kñlapakkhe yathá cando hāyat’ eva suve suve 

kālapakkhūpamo rája asatain hoti samagamo, 480. 
via Yatháham rasakam адатта '° sūdakarh'' purisādhamarh '* 

akāsih раракаш kammarh yena gacchāmi duggatih. 481, 
пв. Sukkapakkhe yatbā cando vaddhat' eva suve suve 

sukkapakkhüpamo гаја satan hoti samágamo. 482, 
na. Yathâêharh tavam адатта Sutasoma vijānahi '° 

kāhāmi Коваіа kammar yena gacchāmi suggatir,. 483. 
ме. Thale уаёһа уйгіјапіпдатабат `* 

anaddhaneyyamh асіга Кат !* 


1 Ваи migšajinarn, 7 Bd -paribhoga-. ? Kd -аатазепа * Наг gamlssāmi, 5 
На [abbissaási, © 118 vacanarn, ! Ck -ша. * Ваг аба са. * Bds „асёверл. 19 
Ck yathā bhārasmā ganta, ВФ yathā harassakam-. 11 Bd suddhahkā. !! Ck 
рагіѕада-. '2 Bd pajānāhi. '* Bds vuttharb. !® Ck Bd -lukarh, С -Тйат. 


20 


25 


20 


30 


508 ХХІ. Asilnipata 


evam pi ce hoti asatam samāgamo 
anaddhaneyyo udakath thale va. 484. 
тє. Sare yathá vārijanindavattari ' 
ciratthitikarn* naraviriyasettha 
evam рі ce hoti satah samšgamo 
cirațthitīiko udakarh ваге va. 485. 
иә. Avyáyiko hoti satah samāgamo, 
yāvam pi tittheyya tath’ eva hoti, 
khippam hi veti asatah samágamo, 
tasmā satam dhamino asabbhi агака ti. 486. 

Та. anvo suvo ti divase divase, anaddhaneyyan ti na sddhšënakkamarh, 
aaro il semudde, naraviriyasettha t патеви viriyona setjha, udak atm 
вате vă 'ti samnddo vattandakam viya, avyäyiko ti avigacchanako, уёуат 
pi tittheyyš ° yattakarn kālarn jivitah tittbeyya tattakarn Каја tath’ eva 
hotli, na Jirati sappurlaehi mittabhavo. 

Iti so porisádo sattahi gāthāhi Mahasattass' eva vaņņarh 
kathesi, во porisādañ са te rājāno ca gahetvā paccanta- 
сатат agamāsi, рассап{ауйвїпо Mahāsattah dievā nagararn 
gantvá' ācikkhirhsu, атасса balakāyarh ādāya gantvā parivāra- 
уітво, Mahāsatto tepa parivārena Bārāņasirajjah agamāsi, 
antarāmagge janapadavāsino* раппёкагат datvā anugamarthsu°, 
mahanto рагіуйго ahosi, tena saddhim Вагапавип sampapuni, 
(ада porisādassa putto гаја hoti, senëpati Kāļahatthi yeva, 
парага rañüo árocayirhsu: „mahārāja Sutasomo kira porisádam 
dametvā ādāya idhágacchati, nagaram assa° pavisitprh па 
dassāmā" `{{ sīghah оарагайуагапі pidahitvá āvudhahatthā 
attharnsu, Mahásatto dvārapidahitabhāvarh ñatvā porisadaü ca 
parosatañ ca гајапо oháya katihi са amaccehi saddhim āgantvā 
„aham Satasomo' rājā, буага! vivarathá“ `ti аһа, purisā 
gantvā rañño агосевшћ, so ,khippam vivarathā“ 'ti ујуагё- 
pesi, Маһӣва(ќо nagaram pāvisi, гаја са Kalahatthi ca ° расспр- 


1 Ва» vuttharb. 2 Ck Bd -iken ? Rds add аюассёпат. * Bd adde bodhisattassa, 
5 Сә -mirnsu, Bd gacchirnsu. 5 Ckz nagarassa. ? Bd -ma. ° Ві сазва. 


5. Mahasutasomajataka. (537.) 509 


gamanarh katvá ādāya pásádam йгорауїгївп, во rājāsane nisi- 
ditvā рогівёйваза aggamahesiñ са вевётассе са ракћовареітё 
Kalahatthim аһа: ,Kalahatthi kasmā rañño падагаш pavisiturh 
па dethá“ ‘ti, „s80 rajjarn karonto imasmirh nagare bahumanusse 
khádi, khattiyehi akattabbarh kari, sakala-Jambndiparhn chiddam 
akāsi evarüpo pāpadhammo, tena kāraņenā “і, idáni во eva- 
тйратп karissatiti“, „mā cintayittha, aham tan dametvā silosu 
patitthápesim, jīvitahetn pi Кайсї! па vihettheasati, n’ atthi 
vo tato bhayarh, eva mā karittha, puttehi паша mātāpitaro 
patijaggitabbā, mátápitiposaká' hi варда gacchanti, Маге 
nirayarh“, evarh во пїсйвапө nisipnassa puttarájassa ovñdam 
datvā „Kālahatthi (тат rañño sahāyo c’ eva sevako са, rañ- 
йёвї* mahante іввагіуе patitthápito, tayápi rañüo atthañ cari- 
tarh vattatiti“ senāpatim рі аповёвіёуё „devi tavam pi kula- 
gehā йдапбуй tassa santiká* mahesitthánarn' patvā puttadhitáhi 
vnddhippattá, tayápi tassa attharm caritah vațtatiti“ детіуё 
оуёдат datvá tam ета vatthah matthakarh pápeturh dham- 
marh 'desento ёћа: 
190, Na во rājā' уо ајеууаф jinati, 

na во sakhá yo sakhaárarh' jināti, 

na вё bhariyá° уй patino vibheti°, 

na te puattë'° уе па bharanti jinnarh. 487. 
з. Na өй sabhñ yattha na santi santo, 

па te santo" уе na bhananti dhammam, 

răgañ са довай са paháya moharh 

dhammarh bhanantá va bhavanti santo. 488. 
1s. Nâbhāâsamâānar ` jānanti missam bālehi panditarm, 

bhāsamānañ ca jānanti desentarn атаќаф райда, 489. 
iss, Bhásaye jotaye dhammarh, pagganhe isinai dhajath, 

subhásitadhajš isayo, dhammo hi isinaro dhajo ti. 490. 


1 Bå Міс. 2 Bd -tuposakā. 3 Bdzraññapi. * Bd -ke. > Bdsaggama-. * 
Tead: гаја па so? ' Bd sakhšna. read: bharyā na sī? ° Вг viroti, Сёз 
pihotl. 19 read: puttā na te? 11 read: santo na te? !3 СЕ» nabh-. 


35 


16 


90 


35 


510 ХХІ. Aslinipšts 


Та. ајеуувп ti ajeyyā паше matapitaro, te jinanto гаја паша na hoti, 
васе tvarb pitu santakarb rajjarh labhitvá tassa pstisattu hosi? skiccakšri папа 
bbavlssasi, вак агаш ? Jinatiti kutattena Jināti, sace tvaru Kalahatthi тайба 
вай4Ыш mittadhammaih па püres айһаште hutvā siraye ulbbattissasi, па 
vibhetiti? na bhayatl*, saco tva гайба па bháyssi ariyadhamme  thíta nāma 
na 001$, jinnan ti mahallakarn, tasmi каје abharantë' puttā паша па 
bonti, santo ti panditi, уе ne bhananti dhamman ti ye pucchitā sabhi- 
vah na vadanti па te panditā nima, dhammamh bhaņautā tl ete rāgādayo 
pahaya parassa hitānukampakā hurvá sabbšvern Ыһапапїй panditā паша bonti, 
nábhšásamanan! ti па abbāsamānah, amatam padan ti amatamaba- 
nibbaparn desentarn panditan tl Jšnentl, ten’ eva porisādo шаш Qatvš pasanna" 
cattāro vare datvā pañcasu silesu patittbito, bbasaye ti pandito puriso dlam- 
mam bhäseyya Joteyya*, Buddbadayo hi івауо, yasmā dbəmwmo (ева. dhajo 
subbáaltadbajë паша, subbásicarb gaņhanti'’, bālā рала subhäsitan ganhantë 
пёша n’ attbÎti. 


Imassa dhammakatharn sutvā rājā ca senāpati са uLutthá 
„gacchāma mahārâjāoarh™ йпеввйтй'''* "і!" падаге bheriñ 
cārāpetvā пйараге sannipātetvā „tumhe mā bhāyathā'*, rājā 
kira dhamme patitthito, еа'° паш ānemā“ "і шаһа]апат 
ādāya Mahasattam purakkhatvā `° rañño santikam gantvā van- 
ditvā kappake upatthápetvá kappitakesamassum паһагарава- 
dhitarh '' rājānah гаѓарагӣзішћі patitthápetvá abhisiñcitvá na- 
gararh рауевевші, porieãdarājā parosatünam khattiyánam Mà- 
hāsattassa са mahásakkárarn Кагеві, ,,Sutasomanarindena kira 
рогївйёйо'* dametvá rajje patitthápito“ ti eakale-Jambudiíipe 
mahākolāhalarh udapādi, Indapattanagaravāsino „rājāno agac- 
chantū 19 Ч1 dütam pahiņpihsu, so tattha mâsamatta vasitvā 
„вашта gaccháma mayarh, tva appamatto hobi™, nagara- 
dvāre*' ca nivesanadvāre™ сё Чі pañca dānasālā™ kārehi”‘, 
dasarājadhamme* akopetvā agatigamanarh рагіћага“ 'ti pori- 
sādam ovadi, parosatāhi rājadhāoīhi balakāyo yebhuyyena 


1 Bd abosi. ? Bd пакћапаф. 9 Cke viheti. * Oks bhāgati. * Ско bhari-. * 
Bd hoti, adding shiccakári паша bbavissati. 7 Ck aralautā, С» аһагтапц. * Bde 
-acitto. ? Hd katheyya. 20 Bd paggaDhanti. !! Ваг -ja, omittiug nah. 13 Rds 
&пеша. 12 Bd adds vatvā. 14 Bd -ittha. 15 Bd atha. !* Bd purato katvā. ?' 
Ck -ditarn, Bd nhātānulietā равоЬһНаш. ?* Ва „даф. '# Rds -atū. ?° Bd ҺОМ 
30 Dd resu. ?? Ck niväsana-. 33 Bd -lāyo. 34 Cka -еві, ?3 Bd -esu. 


` 


5. Mahāsutasomajātaka. (537.) 511 


sannipati, во tena balakāyena parivuto Вагапазіќо nikkhami, 
рогївйдо pi nikkhamitvā upaddhapathá nivatti, Mahāsatto ауй- 
һапапатп rájünam váhanáni datvā sabbe uyyojesi, te рі! tena 
saddhih sammoditvā yatháraharn' vandanáliñganádini katvā 
attano attano janapada’ gamimsu, Mahásatto рі парага 
patvà mahantena issariyepa Indapattavāsīhi devanagara viya 
alarnkatanagaram pavisitvá mātāpitaro vanditvá pațisanthārarh * 
katvā таћһёіајаф abhirühi' во dhammena rajjam kārento* 
cintesi: „rukkhadevatā mayhan bahūpakārā, balikammalabham 
assă’ karissámiti“ so tassa nigrodhassa avidüre mahanta talá- 
Каш kāretvā bahüni kulāni pesetvā ратар nivesesi, gāmo mahā 
ahosi asītimattaāpaņasahassapatimaņdito, tam рі rukkhamūlarh 
săkhantatato pattháya samatalam kāretvā parikkhittar vedikarn 
toranadvarayuttárh akāsi, devatā pasIdi°, Катшаѕарадавва da- 
mitatthāne ріуі аа pana so рамо Kammáasadammanigamo” 
пйша játo, sabbe pi гёјапо Mahasattassa ovāde țhatvā dānādīni 
рїййапї katvë saggapadarh '° рйгауйшзо. 

Satthā imam jhummadesanam аһагїу& ,nëham bhikkbave idān’ 
eva Aūgulimālah damemi, pubbe р’ esa mayá damito yevā“ "і vatvā 
jātekarn зашодЬёпеѕі: „Tadā рогіѕёдагаја Añgulimālo ehosi, Kalahatthi 
Såriputto, Nandabrabmano Anando, rukkhadevatā Kassapo, Sakko 
Anuruddho, sesarājāno Buddhaparisā, mātāpitaro mahārājakulāni, Suta- 
somarajá kira aham ета" `Ч6. Mahasutasomajátakam'', Asi- 
tinipātavannanā nitthitá ™. 


1 Bd adds гајапо. > Bds шарёвасый. > В-де, * Bds madhurapa-. * Bd 
=rüyhi, * Bd karonto. 7 Ck assa, ° Bds abhippasīdati. ° Ck -dhamma-. 
10 Ва naggapūrah, !! Bd omits mahā and adda nithltar. ™ Cë adde patl- 
sandhimanusiho bhogavšsanapitakattaye дапаеПашауб puñña mama hotu bhavī- 
bhate, Imibš риййакашшеп& yäva Buddho bhavampaharn mahosadho va ñšnena 
Jotisetthiva bhogiuā vessantaro va danena hotu mayhan bháçvabhave. Ba adds 
an iudex of all the Jātakas сошсаїпей In Visatinipšta — Asitlnipāta. 


80 


PRINTED BY NIELSEN & LYDICHE, KOPENHAGEN, 


